,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist,"$106k-$172k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is an exciting time to join Portland General Electric. As Oregon’s largest electric utility, Portland General Electric is leading an energy transformation that will harness the power of clean and renewable resources. Our vision for a clean energy future relies on three interrelated and overarching strategies: de-carbonize through investing in clean and reliable energy; modernize through a smarter more resilient grid; and empower our customers in their energy technology choices.

We’re searching for innovative, customer and results-obsessed leaders to help power our mission and lead the way in championing the world’s clean energy future!

Data Scientist

The Data Strategy & Management Team (DSM) bears critical responsibility on behalf of Portland General Electric (PGE) to create value for customers, regulators, and business operations through the collection, organization and interpretation of data from PGE’s expansive data portfolio. The mission of our team is to enable data driven decisions across the company and external stakeholders by ensuring secure, reliable and cataloged data access from our datalake and delivering insights utilizing advanced AI/ML approaches to support achieving PGE’s goal to provide energy that is safe, clean, reliable, affordable and secure.

We are looking for a Data Scientist to join our team and drive our mission together. This individual will collaborate with the business partners to answer their business questions by using advanced data analysis techniques, including pattern detection, graph analysis or statistical analysis. He/she will work closely with the Information Architect, Data Architect, Data Engineer, and Business SME’s to design and develop ML solutions utilizing various data sources, modern architecture, and state-of-the-art machine learning techniques to cater business value, quality and end-user experience. Through their work, He/she will lay foundation of best practices and framework that other scientists can follow.

The ideal candidate is proficient at manipulating and analyzing large datasets over multiple domains and skilled at using various machine learning and statistical techniques to create solutions realizing clear business values. They must be comfortable at designing programmatic solutions from ambiguity, and able to convey their idea clearly to stakeholders. They must also be experienced at productionizing ML solutions. They should be great communicators and presenters even to high-level executives. Last but not the least, they should share the same passion to make the world a great place to live by providing clean and reliable energy to people.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Collection - Participates/assists in identifying what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources; supports data collection, integration and retention requirements based on the input received; ensures information used follows PGE compliance, access management and control policies and meets PGE qualification and assurance requirements.
Collaborate with Stakeholders - Works with business stakeholders to identify the business requirements and expected outcomes. With business stakeholder support, models and frames meaningful and impactful business scenarios for critical business processes and/or decisions.
Analyze Data - Develops data and analytics products to improve how business is conducted and increases throughput through operational efficiencies. Employs appropriate algorithms to discover patterns; uses statistical and data mining packages and dedicated frameworks. Shares data quality findings with data stewards and partners with data stewards on data quality definition and standards; includes experimental design approaches to validate findings by comparing appropriate samples. Develops approaches for validation.
Educate - Educates the Data Strategy & Operations Management organization on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and statistical validation of results. Follows best practices and guidelines for data science initiatives. Tracks metrics for measuring the value of data science initiatives.
Education &Experience
Requires a bachelor’s degree in computer science, electrical engineering, economics or other related field or equivalent experience. MSc or PhD in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field, such as physics, economics or operations research preferred.
Typically, five or more years in data science or related field; prototyping and implementation experience preferred. Utility background is desired.
Intermediate programming skills, including experience with Hadoop MapReduce or other big data frameworks, Java, Python, statistical modeling, SQL and text mining or machine learning.
3 years of experience in data or statistical analysis, with mathematical and causal modeling skills.
5+ years using R or Python to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
Strong communication and interpersonal skills. The ability to communicate with the business to understand requirements and present back findings and recommendations by demonstrating the potential value to the organization.
Self-starter. The ability to come up with solutions to loosely defined business problems by leveraging pattern detection over potentially large datasets. He/she is expected to define the problem space based on industry or technological threats.
Extensive background in data mining and statistical analysis.
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills.
Demonstrated implementation experience in different areas of machine learning: Supervised machine learning, Unsupervised machine learning, Time series forecast, Geo-spatial deep learning, Image recognition, Natural language processing, Outlier detection, Recommendation engines, Survival analysis, and Reinforcement learning.
Demonstrated experience in working with structured, unstructured, streaming data.
Demonstrated experience in setting up ML solutions in API’s.
Familiar with Git, Docker, and container management technologies; Familiar with Apache Spark to create and maintain distributed data processing pipelines
Demonstrated implementation experience in one of the following visualization tools: R-Shiny, Dash, Tableau, PowerBI, AWS QuickSight
Advanced business acumen and interpersonal skills; able to work across business lines at senior levels to influence and effect change to achieve common goals. Knowledge of Transmission and Distribution OR Customer OR Power Supply is required.
Substantial data literacy — the ability to describe data sources and management concepts, and analytical approaches/options. The ability to translate among the languages used by executive, business, IT and quant stakeholders.
Mastery in oral and written communication skills, including the ability to explain data concepts and technologies to business leaders, as well as business concepts to technologists.
Proven record of effective leadership, including the ability to balance team and individual responsibilities; building consensus; getting things done through others not directly under his/her supervision; working ethically and with integrity.
Join us today and power your potential!

To be considered for this position, please complete the following employment application by the posting close date. A cover letter may be needed with your application to be considered for this position.

PGE believes in rewarding strong performance. We provide a total compensation package that is designed to reward your contributions to the company, and, at the same time, support your well-being and professional development, both now and into the future.

PGE is committed to diversity and inclusion in the workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. PGE will not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment based on race, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, religion, disability, protected veteran status, or other characteristics protected by law.

Assisting with storms or other Company emergencies is a part of all positions at Portland General Electric.
Talent Acquisition Contact:
Staffing@pgn.com

This job posting will close at 12:01 am Pacific Time on the closing date listed below:",3.7,"Portland General Electric
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1889,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
1,Data Scientist,-1,"Company information*
Coverent is a specialized consulting services firm focused on developing innovative solutions to the most challenging problems facing our nation. We are growing quickly, but focused on maintaining our commitment to fantastic results and a fair, flexible, and fun culture:
Are you interested in working for a boutique firm who sees its employees as more than just a number?
Are you intrigued by the notion of joining a small team of talented, passionate consultants with a clear vision to help our clients achieve their missions better, smarter, faster?
Does a company culture that emphasizes outcomes, fairness, and flexibility sound appealing?
Would you like to be rewarded for your contributions, via programs like annual bonuses and company profit sharing?
Would you appreciate having a choice of options from top-notch benefit providers for medical and retirement plans?
Are you interested in a learning culture that is forward-leaning regarding training, education, and professional development?
If you answer YES to these questions, Coverent could be the employer of choice for you. Description of role

Coverent is seeking a Senior Data Science Consultant to lead program evaluation activities for a client in the US Intelligence Community. On this project, the Consultant will have the opportunity to demonstrate intellectual agility by leading data collection and data analysis activities to produce key performance insights. Furthermore, they will lead the implementation of recommendations when they are adopted by the customer. This project features the opportunity to interact with a wide range of key stakeholders, including those at senior levels. This is an exciting opportunity for an intellectually curious, energetic consultant to work on a project with real impact helping our client develop ways to understand and improve performance of activities that support delivery of the mission.
Responsibilities*
Consult with clients on the development, prioritization and implementation of process improvement and impact evaluations tasks.
Develop recommendations for changes to policy, processes, communications and training to enable achievement of vision. Develop and implement research designs with practical strategies for measuring performance of organizational units and/or unit activities to include development of performance measures and design of actionable methods for collecting and analyzing data, and implement strategies and refine as needed.
Perform a variety of research activities to include document reviews, structured interviews, and gap analyses, and involves stakeholder identification and logistical coordination for data collection activities and documentation of discussions.
Analyze both qualitative and quantitative information to provide customer with comprehensive insights into organizational strengths and challenge areas.
Prepare visual presentations of data and analysis.
Prepare reports and presentations for senior leadership based on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Brief senior level customers on research plans, activities, findings and recommendations.
Requirements *
U.S. Citizenship
Active TS/SCI clearance w/ Poly
Must have a Bachelors degree ; Masters degree in business, social science, or behavioral science preferred
3+ years of experience in a consulting role in the IC
Experience extracting insights from social media data using data analysis techniques
Experience developing and implementing change management strategies
Demonstrated experience designing and implementing organizational or programmatic performance measurement strategies
Proven ability to analyze data and translate analysis into meaningful insights
General understanding of data coding, data integrity, and statistical sampling and analysis concepts
Experience developing presentations and providing briefings to middle and senior management
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including visual representation of data using charts and graphs
Advanced proficiency with MS Excel and PowerPoint
Ability to perform in an individual contributor role while also excelling in a team environment
Ability to analyze information and identify implications for policy, processes, communications and training
Demonstrated experience leading qualitative research and program evaluation activities to include experience leading structured interviews
Familiarity with industry-standard data science and visualization tools
Familiarity with advanced statistical concepts
Some knowledge of Python scripting
_Indeed Hire and Coverent are working together to find the best candidate for this job. _*
_*_
_*_*
_By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $140,000.00 - $185,000.00 per year

Experience:
extracting insights from social media data: 1 year (Required)
developing and implementing change management strategies: 1 year (Required)
analyze data and translate analysis into meaningful insights: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
TS/SCI clearance w/ Full Polygraph (Required)
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Other",4.3,"Coverent
4.3","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
2,"Senior Data Scientist, Zoro",-1,"Company Summary:
Zoro.com is an eCommerce company that sells business supplies, equipment, and tools—but we’re much more than just a website. We’re a team of people who win and lose together (we prefer winning!). Since 2011, Zoro has been working hard to make it easy for our customers to purchase everything they need to make their businesses go. Zoro currently offers 3 million products, fast and free shipping, no-hassle returns, and exceptional customer service. We’ve grown quickly in a short time, recently surpassing 400 team members and reaching annual revenue of over $500 million. Add to that our award-winning culture—we were named a Great Place to Work for 2019-20, among other accolades—and we think Zoro is a pretty amazing place to work and grow.

Primary Function:
Our Sr. Data Scientists are key contributors to the development of Zoro’s customer, product, eCommerce, and pricing plans. The Data Science team covers a broad scope of projects including customer segmentation, A/B testing, marketing investment optimization, predictive modeling, promotion forecasting, and pricing analysis. We are closely integrated with our business leaders and support their ability to make critical decisions. At Zoro, you will be challenged by new questions every day.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Lead data science projects from beginning to end: develop and refine the idea, create a project plan and methodology, collaborate with business partners, execute, and provide recommendations for the company
Collaborate with other data scientists to develop and implement algorithms, write code, evaluate relevant academic research, and deliver outputs
Advise the company about tools, data sources, and best practices to facilitate digital marketing, pricing, and web analytics
Build predictive and inference models using Python and R to support business initiatives in the areas of customer acquisition, activation, engagement, retention, or channel investment optimization
Document code and data science processes that are critical to the company, and develop strategies to ensure those processes are robust and fault-tolerant
Communicate findings to business leaders and colleagues using data visualizations, presentations, and written means

Qualifications:

Experience leading data science projects that have a direct impact on company objectives
Demonstrated ability to assist business decision-making through data mining and machine learning
Strong communication skills to collaborate effectively with business stakeholders. Must be able to interact cross-functionally and drive both business and technical discussions
5+ years’ progressive business experience in areas including marketing analytics, database marketing, data mining, or statistical modeling. Experience using data science or advanced analytics in an Internet retailer or a top-tier consumer-focused company is required
Ability to translate complex business problems into project plans and solve them by analyzing large amounts of data
Familiarity with Python or R for statistical modeling, clustering, classification, machine learning, and data mining
Demonstrated proficiency in SQL and cloud-hosted data platforms (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, etc)
Familiarity with BI tools such as Tableau or Looker, and ability to communicate results to business partners
Master’s degree preferred in quantitative fields such as Statistics, Engineering, Operational Research, or Economics
Knowledge of web tracking technology and web analytics tools (Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.) a definite plus

Final note: We share a commitment to our Zoro values – Win & Lose Together (We prefer winning!), Take Ownership, We Are Transparent, and Aspire to be Customer-Obsessed. Everything we do at Zoro is centered around delighting our customers. It's a natural extension of our company culture and how we care for each other. We believe when we act in ways that are consistent with these values, we can solve any technical challenge that lies ahead of us. As a Zoro employee, you can expect to work with smart, energetic people, learn something every day, and be valued for your perspective.

Zoro is an Equal Opportunity Workplace and an Affirmative Action Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.",2.0,"Zoro Tools
2.0","Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
3,Senior Data Scientist Virtual Hiring Event,"$84k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Plymouth Rock Assurance Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, October 20, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Customer Care Representative

Inside Sales Representative

Internal Audit Specialist

Claims Casualty Supervisor

Claims Supervisor Property-Home

Claims Analyst

Data Science Manager

Senior Data Scientist

Intake Details:

Requirements

Above average interpersonal, listening, communication and organizational skills.

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About Plymouth Rock Assurance

The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service.

We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Hiring for Woodbridge Township, NJ

The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Horsham, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
4,Data Scientist,"$80k-$111k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,"IFG Companies
2.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,Spark/Big Data Engineer,"$52k-$101k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Consumption team of Decision Sciences and Transformation (DSaT) is seeking a highly motivated Spark / Big Data Developer to start or continue an IT career on the Big Data Platform project. Teaming up with architects, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to make the data on the Big Data Platform accessible for the needs of the organization through Atomic Models and Analytical Data Stores. In this role, you will coordinate with a variety of IT departments to elicit and translate high level business requirements into detailed system requirements. You will participate in the entire software development lifecycle by writing and executing test plans, finding solutions to issues during development and after deployment. You should be intellectually curious, have a solutions-oriented attitude and enjoy learning new tools and techniques.

Basic Qualifications:

At least two years of experience with SQL and Java or Scala

Experience with manipulating and transforming data

Exposure to NoSQL databases, Spark and the Hadoop Ecosystem (MapReduce, Oozie, Hive, Pig)

Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills

Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences

Bachelor’s degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience required

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers

Experience with Spark core and Spark SQL
Experience as a Big Data Developer

Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering and Data Modeling

Exposure to Graph Databases

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications
About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

Benefits:

As a full-time Big Data Developer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**

Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave

401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
Tuition Reimbursement
Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
6,Data Scientist,"$75k-$131k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


Data Scientist

Locations US-MA-Boston | CA-QC-Montreal

Category

Data Science

Overview

Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

We are currently seeking a Data Scientist to join our team. The ideal candidate should be passionate about working on cutting edge research and analytical services for Fortune 500 companies, global pharma/biotech firms and leaders in industries such as finance, energy and life sciences. The Data Scientist will be a contributing member to client engagements and have the opportunity to work with our network of world-class experts and thought leaders.

Job Functions and Responsibilities

The candidate Data Scientist will help develop, maintain and teach new tools and methodologies related to data science and high performance computing. This position will also help Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data analytics. The Data Scientist will be responsible for staying abreast of new developments in technology relating to data science, to share more broadly with Analysis Group.

Key responsibilities for this position will include:
Working with project teams to address data science/computing challenges
Identifying opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Acting as a resource and participating in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintaining up-to-date knowledge of computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base, specifically in a Linux environment
Presenting research at selected conferences
Examples of activities for the Data Scientist will include:
Developing data engineering and machine learning production systems for full stack data science projects
Using natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Optimizing procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Creating interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Building and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Developing and reviewing software and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establishing optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications
Significant experience working within a Linux environment required, experience with Docker and front-end development using a Javascript framework (e.g., Vue.js, Angular) is highly preferred.
Strong credentials and experience in database management and/or data visualization is preferred.
Bachelor’s degree required. Advanced degree, ideally PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or other relevant scientific degree with relevant experience, is preferred. Other candidates with at least one year of experience in the field may also be considered.
Demonstrates strong interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills.
Project experience with Python and/or R is preferred.
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g. Azure, AWS) is preferred.
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others.
At Groupe d’analyse we believe that a diverse workforce directly supports our goal to provide the highest quality work for our clients, which drives our commitment to ensure equal opportunities regardless of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, race, color, or religion. We encourage all qualified candidates to apply.

Scientifique des données – Boston - Montréal

*Le masculin est utilisé ici en tant que genre neutre et sert uniquement à alléger le texte.

A propos de Groupe d’analyse :

Groupe d’analyse est l’une des plus grandes sociétés de conseil en économie, avec plus de 1000 professionnels répartis dans 14 bureaux en Amérique du Nord, en Europe et en Asie. Depuis 1981, nous fournissons une expertise en analyse et en stratégie dans les domaines de l’économie, de la finance et de la santé, à des cabinets d’avocats de premier ordre, des entreprises du Fortune Global 500 et des organismes gouvernementaux du monde entier. Nos experts internes, en collaboration avec notre réseau d’experts affiliés issus du monde universitaire, de l’industrie et des entités publiques, offrent à nos clients un éventail de connaissances d’une étendue et d’une profondeur exceptionnelles.

Nous recherchons actuellement pour notre équipe un scientifique des données (« Data Scientist »). Enthousiaste à l’idée de travailler sur des projets à la pointe de la recherche et d’offrir des services analytiques aux sociétés classées au Fortune 500, aux entreprises pharmaceutiques et biotechnologiques d’envergure internationale ainsi qu’à celles de premier plan dans les secteurs de la finance, de l'énergie et des sciences de la vie, le scientifique des données contribuera à l’activité de nos clients tout en ayant la chance de travailler avec notre réseau d'experts et de leaders d'opinion de classe mondiale.

Le poste de scientifique des données :

En tant que scientifique des données, vous contribuerez à développer, alimenter et enseigner de nouveaux outils et méthodologies liés à la science des données et au calcul haute performance (HPC). Ceci permettra notamment à Groupe d'analyse de continuer à être un moteur de progrès aussi bien méthodologiques que dans l'analyse des données. Le titulaire du poste devra en outre se tenir au courant des nouvelles avancées technologiques en science des données, afin de les partager avec toute l’entreprise. Les principales responsabilités et tâches dévolues au scientifique des données peuvent inclure, sans s’y limiter, les éléments suivants :

Collaborer avec les équipes de projet pour relever les défis informatiques et liés à la science des données
Identifier des façons dont la technologie peut améliorer l’offre de services
Contribuer à l’activité et à la recherche du client en tant que spécialiste et membre de l'équipe de projet
Maintenir les connaissances sur les outils informatiques à jour, former le personnel sur des points techniques et aider à développer la base de connaissances interne, en particulier dans un environnement Linux
Présenter les recherches lors de certaines conférences
Développer des systèmes de production en ingénierie des données et apprentissage automatique pour des projets de science des données full-stack
Utiliser des méthodologies de traitement automatique du langage pour travailler avec les données des DME et des médias sociaux et d’autres données non structurées
Optimiser les procédures de gestion et d'accès aux grandes bases de données (déclarations de sinistre, dossiers de santé électroniques, transactions financières, etc.)
Créer des portails d'analyse interactifs et des visualisations de données (en utilisant par exemple R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Construire et alimenter des outils de HPC sur la grille informatique et l’informatique en nuage
Développer et réviser des logiciels codés en R, Python et autres langages orientés objet
Mettre en place des procédures optimisées pour les tâches répétitives ou gourmandes en calcul (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Qualifications requises :
Expérience de travail significative dans un environnement Linux exigée ; une expérience du logiciel Docker et en développement frontal en JavaScript (Vue.js, Angular, etc.) est fortement souhaitée.
Solides références et expérience dans la gestion de bases de données et/ou de la visualisation de données souhaitées.
Diplôme de niveau licence exigé. Dans l’idéal, le candidat possède un doctorat en informatique, mathématiques, statistiques, économie ou un autre diplôme scientifique pertinent accompagné d’une expérience professionnelle concordante. La candidature d’autres personnes possédant au moins un an d'expérience dans le domaine sera éventuellement étudiée.
Excellentes aptitudes pour les relations interpersonnelles, la communication orale et écrite.
Expérience de projets utilisant Python et/ou R souhaitée.
Bonne connaissance de l'informatique en ligne/en nuage et du stockage (sur Azure ou AWS par exemple) souhaitée.
Expérience avérée de travail au sein d'équipes de projet et de collaboration avec des tiers.
Chez Groupe d’analyse, nous croyons qu’une main-d’œuvre diversifiée soutient directement notre objectif d’offrir un résultat de la plus haute qualité à nos clients, ce qui motive notre engagement à assurer l’égalité des chances, peu importe le sexe, l’orientation sexuelle, l’identité ou l’expression sexuelle, l’âge, la race, la couleur ou la religion. Nous encourageons tous les candidats qualifiés à postuler.

Groupe d’analyse est une entreprise équitable en matière d’emploi et respectueuse de la loi américaine portant sur la protection des anciens combattants et des personnes handicapées.

Vous pouvez consulter les brochures (en anglais) de l’OFCCP, bureau rattaché au Ministère du Travail des Etats-Unis et relatives à l’égalité des chances professionnelles ici.

L’entreprise s’engage à ne pas licencier ni discriminer, de quelque manière que ce soit, tout employé ou candidat qui se serait renseigné sur, aurait discuté de ou révélé son propre salaire ou celui d’un autre employé ou candidat. Néanmoins, les employés ayant accès, dans le cadre de leurs fonctions, aux informations relatives à la rémunération d’autres employés ou candidats ne sont autorisés à révéler ladite rémunération à des tiers – qui n’auraient, autrement, pas accès à ces informations – que dans les cas suivants : (a) en réponse à une plainte ou accusation en bonne et due forme, (b) dans le cadre d’une enquête, de poursuites judiciaires, d’une audience ou d’une action en justice, dont toute enquête à l’initiative de l’employeur ou (c) conformément aux obligations légales de l’entreprise en matière de transparence (Article 41, paragraphe 60-1.35(c) du Code de la règlementation fédérale des Etats-Unis (CFR)).

­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.8,"Analysis Group
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
7,Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist (Occupational Therapy),"$43k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

Learn More about USAMMDA HERE

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Occupational Therapy (MES-OT).
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implement a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and manage a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and document plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices, to include but not limited to, Medical Communications for Combat Casualty Care (MC4), United States Army Medical Information Technology Center (USAMITC), and Defense Health Information Management System (DHIMS) to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Participating in the requirements generation process with the Army Medical Department Center and School (AMEDD C&S), Medical Center of Excellence (MEDCoE), Capability Development Integration Directorate (CDID) for assigned H2F products, as required.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Performing logistical analysis and analyze materiel fielding as part of medical logistics project management.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives
Developing and implementing the logistical strategic planning process for the provisioning of the subsystems that make up the Mission Equipment (ME).
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

What You'll Need (required):

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience.
Possess a level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and DOD Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering, System Engineering and the AMEDD process for developing, procuring, packing, marking, storing, and fielding SKOs.
Familiarity with the DoD Medical Supply Chain and Logistics Management infrastructure and systems.
Experience as a logistics planner or in performance based logistics with the Army with an understanding of the system function and effect on the defense supply system.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

Attributes for Success:

Excellent oral and written communications skills.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
8,Data Scientist,"$82k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Varen, our performance is measured by the success of our clients, and our reputation for service, superior quality, objectivity, integrity and results. Our reputation is everything to us as we are committed to being a trusted advisor to our nations decision makers in a day in age that demands acute attention to detail in a fast-paced environment. Varen is seeking to add the sharpest technical professionals who share our passion for ensuring the mission success of our customers at all times.

We are looking for Data Scientists with various years of experience. In these positions you will work closely with the client to review and respond to data science requirements. These positions will involve analyzing both structured and unstructured data using data analytics, natural language processing, and artificial intelligence/machine learning techniques.

Experience with training and optimizing machine learning models and coordinating with data engineering components to deploy trained models to work on production data at scale is desired.

EDUCATION:


BS degree in technical field and 3+ years of experience

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENT:

TS/SCI w/poly clearance
Varen Technologies, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and applicants receive lawful consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, gender, age, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",4.2,"Varen Technologies
4.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
9,Senior Big Data Engineer,"$62k-$117k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you want to be part of the transformation that's pushing forward a truly data-driven company? Are you ready to collaborate and innovate with a team responsible for changing the customer experience using the latest technologies? As a Senior Big Data Engineer on the GEICO IT squad, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information and uses that information to drive action. One focus is our Single View of the Customer (SVOC) initiative. As part of this team you will be designing, creating, and populating customer centric data stores necessary for deriving valuable insights in real time to provide tailored customer experiences. As a senior engineer you will have the opportunity to mentor more junior associates and help grow our team.
When you first join our SVOC team, you will have opportunity to come up to speed on the innovative technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o At least 2 years as a Big Data Engineer/Developer on the Hadoop Ecosystem, with experience in data profiling and transformations
o At least 2 years of experience using Spark core, or Spark SQL,
o Experience with core Java (and/or Scala, Python)
o Experience with NoSQL databases such as HBase, Cassandra, or MongoDB
o Proficient in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers
o Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o A Bachelor's degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Skills:

o Exposure to Spark Streaming and Machine Learning
o Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering, and Data Modeling
o Exposure to Graph Databases

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO
For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Big Data Engineer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
10,Data Scientist,"$58k-$95k
(Glassdoor Est.)","STRATACACHE provides salable customer experiences, empowering retailers to learn deeply about their customers’ shopping preferences and behaviors, allowing for personalized shopper interaction. Our solutions deliver consumer activation at the point-of-decision, generating new sales opportunities and enhanced retail profitability. With 3 million+ software activations globally, we power the biggest digital networks for the world’s largest brands. Across the STRATACACHE family of complementary digital media/ad tech solution companies, we have the technology, expertise and track record to bring retail innovation that delivers results.

Learn more about the STRATACACHE family at www.stratacache.com.

Data Scientist

Do you love data? Do you enjoy creating statistical models and finding insights that make a difference? Are you interested in the future of retail, commerce, and customer analytics? If so, this is the role for you. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with software engineering, sales, and product organizations to develop innovative, impactful data applications. Your efforts will enhance the overall product quality utilizing many aspects of data science, including various types of modeling that drive toward strategic analytics. You will be focused on the future of the restaurant and retail experience by discovering insights while creating strategic, marketing, retail, customer experience and digital analytics. Your background in statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quantitative research, and/or analytics consulting will be very beneficial as you take on this exciting position in the company and join our Data Science team. In this role you will also have the opportunity to continue to build and improve the marketing of technology products that are influenced by data, understand human behavior and determine how to influence and impact the retail marketplace with exciting new solutions and insights.

Responsibilities include:

Design, build, and deliver statistical models and related actionable data-focused results to support product and customer requirements and initiatives.
Work closely with engineering, product and sales teams to understand business and technical requirements, translate these into important discovery directives, and follow through to optimize and support the enhancement and growth of Stratacache products.
Establish and make effective use of internal and external datasets to back up and support key strategic, product, and customer decision-making efforts.
Serve as the data science expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives and education on accessing and utilizing qualified and focused data for decision making.
Analyze, propose, design and successfully deliver data experiments for engineering, product and sales teams to ensure statistical rigor and effectiveness.
Provide expertise and professionalism in handling sensitive, privacy-protected data, including sources, structures, organization, and optimization.
Communicate complex ideas about our product through visual aids like charts and dashboards.
Keep up-to-date with emerging data science and statistical technologies, methods and practices.
Create and/or use existing data models for predictions regarding user behavior.
Communicate ideas, processes, and results to all levels of internal and external clients and teams.
Basic & Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Analysis, or other technical field related to software development.
Minimum 3 years of related experience working with data science and statistical modeling.
Experience in the QSR, retail or ecommerce industries from a data perspective is required.
Experience with recommendation engines and discovering new and advanced modeling methods i.e. deep neural networks, gradient boosted decision trees, etc.. is required.
Experience with SQL and at least one functional or statistical programming language is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with R and Python is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with REST APIs is required.
Experience working with Postgres, Timescale DB and/or other related database technologies is required.
Ability to distill complex statistical concepts and methodology, and articulate insights to cross-functional teams and clients with varying levels of knowledge in this space is required.
Ability to work with distributed and remote teams is required.
Experience with complex query writing is required.
Experience with result-set performance tuning and related data administration is required.
Experience with big data technologies is required.
Experience and understanding of various statistical modeling tools and platforms is required.
Experience in ecommerce, wifi, app messaging, social and other datasets is beneficial.
Experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence methods and practice is beneficial.
Understanding and experience with database technologies is beneficial including Oracle, SQLServer, etc..
Understanding and experience with BI technologies is beneficial: Tableau, Microstrategy, Microsoft, OBI, etc..
Experience with kafka, Go, or Redis is beneficial.
Understanding of data modeling techniques and star schemas is beneficial.
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce is beneficial.
Experience with ftp, file transfers, data exchange methodologies.
A solid understanding of methodology, data and systems from a broad range of research and analytics providers, including emerging tools and methods is required.
Ability to articulate and tie data to business strategy.
Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint skills
Self-motivated, self-starter with a team-centric focus while working in a fluid environment.
Exceptional communication skills: verbal, written, and presentation.
Experience in the following areas: strategic analytics, marketing analytics, digital analytics, data analytics, statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quant research, analytics consulting.
Desire and interest to uncover and discover insights using disparate data sources.
Desire and interest in being the “Go To” person for data science.
Dynamic personality and passion for data, analytics, visualizations and storytelling is beneficial for this role.
Keen sense of user interface design, style, aesthetics and effective visual presentation.
Experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to work effectively in fast-paced, results-oriented work environment.
Ability to handle and adjust to change in requirements and direction.
Positive attitude, attention to detail, and great problem solving skills are important.

STRATACACHE and its family of companies provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, veteran, marital, parental, citizenship, or domestic partner status, or any other status protected by applicable national, federal, state or local law.

While we are excited and appreciate you interest in our opportunities, please keep in mind that we are not able to contact all applicants that have applied.

No vendor/agency solicitation please.",3.6,"STRATACACHE
3.6","Dayton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
11,Sr Business Intelligence Analyst - Python / Government / Military experience and active TS/SCI required,"$87k-$162k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: Less than 10%
Requisition Type: Regular

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst provides strategic business analysis services to business partners. The focus of this position is to work closely with the staff and operational elements of the client to gain in-depth understanding of the client’s business strategy, processes, services, roadmap and the context in which the client operates, with the goal of understanding, documenting and mapping the technical, process, and management capabilities needed to address the challenges faced by the client in meeting the needs of its customers.

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for reviewing assigned business processes from end-to-end to identify and address operational, financial and technological risks. The Senior Business Intelligence Analysts identifies opportunities to improve efficiency.

Roles and Responsibilities

Perform duties as a Senior Business Intelligence (BI) Analyst, providing the information for executives to make strong business decisions.
The BI analyst will provide the professional role and expertise responsible for data mining, analysis, summaries to maximize its utility, and summarily be used to support decision-making.
Help managers in the process of making informed business decisions so as to improve or sustain his/her organization’s competitive position.
Collect past and present data in order to establish and even fashion of an organization’s operation.
Provide development, reviews and evaluations of operational business processes, activities and data for the purpose of making tactical, strategic business decisions.
Required to be operationally focused which allows the agency to quickly react to dynamic and continuously changing issues, business and customer requirements.
Effort will be a continuous occurrence of business events and processes and is typically will be focused scenarios requiring analysis of business insight on a daily, short-term or frequent basis. This is applicable to operational business applications, systems and storage resources that have the most current business data, events and processes. May require monitoring of data driven business processes and events - in motion and at rest.
Provide the tools and information for executives to make strategic decisions.
The BI analyst will utilize and transition to the standard tools that are available to the enterprise users in order to ensure the reoccurring reports can be transitioned to be generated and delivered in-house by the Directorates and Commands.
Implement standard reporting systems in the organization.
The BI analyst will also be responsible for designing reports and developing processes to aid the business intelligence of an organization.
Develop standards for best practices for reporting, marketing, and educating the client on available reporting tools in the agency and how they can be utilized to provide reoccurring reports.
The BI Analyst will data mine the client’s enterprise services to the use data to figure out market and business trends for companies to increase profits and efficiency. This process includes:
Gather data through a number of ways, from mining the Client computer systems through software, looking at competitors data and industry trends to help develop a picture of where the Agency stands in the industry, industry trends and standards, where they can improve and where they can avoid costs.
Exploit the data warehouse of the company to dig for important statistics and facts that may help in rendering a true picture of an organization’s industry standing and performance.
The business intelligence analysts will spend most of their time analyzing data that includes past trends, current conditions, projected, etc. They must be able to look at large chunks of data and understand trends, and then communicate those trends.
The BI Analyst ensure that the client knows whom to approach for data to meet the report requests (TTPs)

Core skills (Required):

Knowledge of general business principles, military and government organizations, and systems engineering concepts.
Strong oral, written and interpersonal communication skills in English and at the Graduate level.
Technically proficient with Microsoft Office products (Excel, Visio, PowerPoint, Access, Publisher).
Advanced to Expert level of knowledge with Microsoft Project, with experience in developing integrate master schedules from multiple project schedules.
Working knowledge of Python programming language
10 years of experience working within the Federal Government and/or DOD performing similar duties

Educational Requirements

Required - Bachelor of Engineering / Science Degree in Project Management, Business Management, Business Analysis, Computer Information Systems, Information Technology
Preferred - Master of Business Administration or Master of Technology Management
Preferred – Education in two or more programming languages (e.g. Python, JAVA, C++, .NET)

Experience Requirements

Minimum if 10 years’ experience working as a business analyst within an Information Technology enterprise within the Federal Government and/or DOD supporting 8,000+ users, with a bachelor’s degree
Minimum if 5 years’ experience working as a business analyst within an Information Technology enterprise supporting 8,000+ users with a Masters of Business Administration or Masters of Technology Management
Experience should include no less than three years working within the Department of Defense.

Desired Behaviors

Self-starter with the ability to multi-task.
Strong leadership skills with excellent listening skills. Must have the ability to see multiple conflicting views and assist in the formation of consensus. Must be able to lead and to be led by others.
Strong formal and informal communications skills including the ability to mentor and train – must take satisfaction in the accomplishments of mentees
Must be able to work well within teams either as a member or leader

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
12,Microstrategy Business Intelligence Analyst,"$73k-$141k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Headquartered in Modesto, CA, G3 Enterprises has been supplying the wine and spirits industry for over 50 years. As a single source packaging solution, its products and services include labels, stock and custom closures, warehousing, transportation, bottle etching, and mobile bottling.

The Business Intelligence Analyst creates reporting and analytical solutions that enable translating data into knowledge and maintains Microstrategy infrastructure across G3 organization. Analyzes business intelligence data to inform business decisions. Partners with other areas of the business to model the outcome of implementing potential business strategies.

Essential Functions
This job description reflects management’s assignment of essential functions; it does not prescribe or restrict the tasks that may be assigned.
• Utilizes data architecture to enable business decisions and recommend technical solutions to management based on scalability and complexity.
• Provides guidance and analytical support to include analysis and research in areas across G3 corporation.
• Satisfies ad-hoc requests for information from G3 teams that aid in uncovering new understandings that drive decisions which move the organization forward.
• Acts as technical expert, addressing infrastructure needs, systems/applications integration, compatibility, and multiple platforms.
• Analyzes data to create and maintain reports, dashboards, visualizations, and other tools (such as cubes and views) in multiple development and production environments.
• Responsible for executing the implementation of the BI strategy related to G3’s SAP ERP and OTM systems.
• Sources data from various systems via Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) and external data sources.
• Designs user driven analytics structure using existing data architecture.
• Influences data warehousing teams to recommend data layer structures and integrate systems.
• Translates business requirements to functional and technical design solutions, specifications, and prototypes.
• Collaborates with development teams to design business intelligence solutions to facilitate data gathering, storage, and retrieval.
• Consults with users or decision makers to identify data sources, required data elements, or data validation standards.
• Develops test plans and facilitates testing prior to promotions.
• Creates and maintains technical documentation
• Performs cross-functional analysis and collaborates with stakeholders across departments. Partners and presents findings to senior leadership.
• Responsible for understanding and complying with applicable quality, environmental and safety regulatory considerations. If accountable for the work of others, responsible for ensuring their understanding and compliance.

Qualifications
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, Data Analytics, Data Science, or Engineering plus 3 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management; OR High School diploma or State-issued equivalency certificate plus 7 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management.
• Ability to build and understand basic SQL queries.

Preferred Qualifications
• Master’s degree in Computer Science, Operations Research, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, or Engineering.
• MicroStrategy Intelligence Server Development experience.
• Experience designing and executing Application objects and Schema objects using MicroStrategy Desktop.
• Experience analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of complex reports, ETL scripts and dashboards.
• Experience troubleshooting high level issues to identify and resolve problems caused by the database, source data, ETL, or the Business Intelligence software (common examples: nulls in data causing joins to function incorrectly; ETLs running out of sequence; MicroStrategy Objects not set up properly).
• Experience with cloud computing and “big data” processing and analytics.
• Understanding of web servers and applications.
• Knowledge of components of an enterprise systems architecture
• Knowledge of business process re-engineering processes including Lean Six Sigma principles.
• Lean Six Sigma Green or Black Belt Certified.
• Strong understanding of network architecture and application development methodologies
• Experience reading, analyzing, and interpreting common scientific and technical journals and financial reports.
• Knowledge of emerging technologies and development platforms.
• Experience applying machine learning or artificial intelligence to BI applications.
• Possesses a passion for technology and its impact on the enterprise, customers and consumers along with a breadth of experience that can balance business, application and operational requirements.
• Strong understanding of systems and “systems thinking” with the ability to make trade-off decisions to accomplish system-wide goals.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Excellent planning and organizational skills.
• Skilled in balancing long-term and short-term goals and perspectives of challenging situations.
• Skilled in applying multiple technical solutions to business problems.
• Remains unbiased toward any specific technology or vendor choice.
• Excellent analytical and technical skills.
• Skilled in navigating complex political situations to ensure successful change management.
• Exceptional interpersonal skills, including teamwork, facilitation and negotiation.
• Demonstrates strong technical thinking and developed high credibility with the technical community. Recognized by the IT community as someone who solves complex technology related business problems.
• Experience with performance tuning of business intelligence applications.
• Strong knowledge of SQL queries including writing, reading, and debugging.
• Experience working with Enterprise Data Warehousing, specifically SAP Data Warehousing (HANA).

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.

Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

EEO/AA M/F/Vet/Disability",3.9,"G3 Enterprises
3.9","Modesto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
13,Data Scientist,"$65k-$108k
(Glassdoor Est.)","HPOne, named CT Magazine's 2018 Great Places to Work, is looking for a Data Scientist to join our team.

The Data Scientist is responsible for collecting, cleaning, translating data to meet the company's needs. Every business collects data, whether it's sales figures, market research, logistics, or transportation costs. The Data Scientist will use that data and machine learning to help drive HPOne's business plans.

What you'll do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Develop insights and deliver recommendations based on data analyses
Work with business leaders to articulate business requirements for data analyses
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies for specific models or analyses
Optimize joint development efforts through database use and project design
Create automated reports and dashboard products, in order to display results to internal teams
Develop end-customer segmentation schemes by analyzing customer behavior
Perform ad hoc analyses and deliver recommendations
Develop and implement predictive models like decision tree, regression using R or similar
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Required Skills/Abilities:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field
Five years' experience with SAS (or similar), ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
Experience in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience with programming languages such as Java / Python (or ""R"")
Experience conducting regression analyses
Understanding of relational databases and data management as well as experience with data aggregation and normalization
Advanced excel expertise (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, report filters, etc.)
Ability to approach tasks strategically, while owning and mastering the details
Exceptional problem solving, as well as analytical and strategic thinking skills
Initiative to own projects from start to finish
Strong oral and written communication skills, with ability to work well with people across the company at all levels


Preferred Skills/Abilities:
Coursework in at least one of the following: mathematics, business, analytical marketing, information systems, programming/databases, statistics/statistical modeling, finance, economics, or physics
Experience conducting analyses and building predictive models using SAS (or similar)
Experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools preferred (like Domo or Tableau)
Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer, typically in an office or cubicle environment (constant noise, fluorescent overhead lighting)
HPOne is an Equal Opportunity Employer:

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is a fundamental principle at HPOne, where employment is based upon personal capabilities and qualifications. HPOne does not discriminate because of actual or perceived sex, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity, gender, transgender, race, color, religion, national origin, creed, citizenship status, ancestry, age, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, medical conditions including genetic characteristics, mental or physical disability, military and veteran status, or any other protected characteristic as established by law. HPOne requires the necessary drug testing and background checks as part of our pre-employment practices.",3.6,"HPOne
3.6","Trumbull, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
14,Data Scientist,"$55k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Scientists develop and apply methods to identify, collect, process, and analyze large volumes of data to build and enhance products, processes, and systems. They conduct data mining and retrieval, and apply statistical and mathematical analyses to identify trends, solve analytical problems, optimize performance, and gather intelligence. They visualize information using a range of tools (e.g., GIS, R), develop scripts and algorithms, create explanatory and predictive models, and conduct comparative analyses to address complex problems.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. Our intelligence officers go beyond describing 'what, where and when' to revealing 'how and why.' Our work enables decision advantage for our policymakers, warfighters, intelligence professionals and first responders. Data Scientists apply the application of programming, statistics and visualization to glean insights from large and disparate data sources. Data Scientists understand and utilize aspects of machine learning to solve and automate classification, regression, cluster analysis, anomaly detection, association discovery, and topic modeling tasks. Data Scientists understand and utilize solutions with predictive patterns from data into practical, intelligent applications that anyone can use. They can utilize rich toolsets to help users create, rapidly experiment, fully automate, and manage machine learning workflows to power intelligent applications. They produce intelligence using geospatial methodologies and spatio-temporal data derived from imagery, intelligence databases, and other classified and unclassified sources in support of national security. They are intelligence analysts who use their understanding of geographic information science and technology, spatial thinking, remote sensing, intelligence issues, spatial relationships and visualization techniques and the social and physical sciences to create information, characterize events, and discover relationships and trends. They produce descriptive and predictive analyses and communicate findings as written, visual, and/or oral geospatial intelligence. Other duties may include: \* Develop and apply quantitative and qualitative analytic methods to identify, collect, process, and analyze large data sets for specified purposes; \* Identify trends, solves analytical problems, optimizes performance, and develop results through appropriate data analysis techniques (e.g., data mining and retrieval); \* Use applied statistics, build algorithms, and collaborating with domain experts to analyze large volumes of data to build and enhance products, processes, and systems \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically; operate in a dynamic environment; and deliver interoperable corporate solutions. \* They will have extensive experience in building and maintaining geodatabases and integrating and managing foundation, intelligence, and multi-INT data into structured geodatabases. \* Seek out spatial data from classified and unclassified sources and utilize existing tools or develop methods to tie spatial information to datasets where necessary. \* Builds and maintains professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective data management, data dissemination, and online on-demand practices \* Conduct data mining and retrieval and apply statistical and mathematical analysis to identify trends, solve analytic problems, optimize performance, and gather intelligence. \* Develop scripts and algorithms (e.g. Python), create explanatory and predictive models and conduct comparative analyses to address complex military and intelligence problems. \* Support the visualization of information using a range of tools (e.g. Tableau, R, and ESRI Arc-GIS 10.4 suite, including model builder). \* Provide excellent customer support and interact with analytic units in a professional manner to help understand their challenges, incorporate their feedback, and provide quality solutions. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R, SQL or Java. (others languages will be considered). 2. Demonstrated experience developing and deploying automated processes to identify, collect, process, and analyze large data sets. 3. Demonstrated expertise with the use of data visualizations for exploratory comparative analysis by way of scripts, algorithms, and/or predictive models. 4. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Mathematics, Data Science, Geographic Information Science, Information Science, Informatics and Computing, Information Science, or degree that provided at least 6 semester hours in statistics, and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc. Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience that should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as: (a) intermediate and/or advanced statistics, (b) linear, semi-linear, and/or non-linear models, (c) working with a range of data types and statistical methods, or (d) data visualization capabilities. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Ability to communicate technically complex methods and solutions to non-technical audiences verbally or in writing. 3. Familiarity working with DoD analysts, such as geospatial and/or imagery analyst. 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Demonstrated expertise with visualization techniques and software tools (i.e. Tableau, matplotlib, etc.). 6. Experience applying analytic techniques such as classification, regression, similarity matching, clustering, co-occurrence grouping, profiling, link prediction, data reduction, and causal modeling.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
15,Data Scientist,"$70k-$95k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Position at Homes.com

Homes.com is looking for a Data Scientist in Norfolk, VA to join our team of IT professionals. You'll be working with our Business Intelligence Team to support and grow our premier real estate portal. You'll participate in technical research, developing models, data analysis, machine learning and be expected to bring your own ideas to the table to help keep us innovating.

Responsibilities:
Forecast site traffic for use in inventory calculations
Analyze and report on trends such as home valuations
Develop suggestion models
Help develop image classification models
Requirements:
BS or MS in computer science, data science, mathematics or other related field
2+ Years working as a Data Scientist
1+ Years Experience working with Time Series modeling
Experience working with Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working in R and Python
Experience providing Statistical Analysis
Nice to Haves:
Experience working in a cloud environment
Experience working with a relational database

About Homes.com

Homes.com offers today's demanding home buyers, renters and those somewhere in between a simply smarter home search. With features like Homes.com Match, HomeShare and Snap & Search, homeshoppers now have a more personalized way to search for their next home. Since its launch over 25 years ago, Homes.com offers real estate professionals brand and property advertising, search engine marketing and instant response lead generation to help them succeed online. For more information, visit Homes.com.

About DE

Dominion Enterprises (DE) is a leading digital marketing and software services company offering client solutions across multiple business verticals. Our customers rely on our B2B cloud SaaS solutions to establish their online and mobile brands, generate leads, and manage customer relationships through our Homes.com, Dominion Dealer Solutions, Dominion Business Solutions / DX1, Travel Media and Franchise and Business Opportunity divisions. Our B2C web and mobile applications include Homes.com, HotelCoupons.com, FranchiseOpportunities.com, FranchiseGator.com, Franchise.com, and BusinessBroker.net.
About 2,000 employees reside and work in our Norfolk, VA home office and in offices across the U.S. Our employees will tell you about our collaborative, innovative, team-oriented work environment, excellent career enrichment opportunities, community service opportunities, competitive earnings, and a comprehensive benefits package that includes a generous 401(k). DE is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workforce. DE is a drug-testing employer.",4.3,"Homes.com
4.3","Norfolk, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
16,Data Scientist,"$55k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sartorius Stedim Data Analytics, a market leader in advanced analytics and provider of Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions, is on a strong growth path driving new innovative solutions in the field. It currently has an outstanding opportunity for a Data Scientist to drive customer applications, support the Sartorius sales teams and feedback customer needs into the development of new solutions. The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.

What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Training customers on the use of our software
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum of a bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred) in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.)
Minimum two years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum two years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics a plus
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience a plus
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
Strong identification with Sartorius core values: sustainability, openness, enjoyment
Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organization suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognized for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.

Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here

E-Verify Participation Info

E-Verify Workers Rights

Interested? Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organisation suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognised for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

To find out more about Sartorius as an employer visit us on Sartorius Careers

Become part of our global team.",3.6,"Sartorius
3.6","New Oxford, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
17,Data Scientist,"$91k-$149k
(Glassdoor Est.)","OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,"State of Wisconsin Investment Board
3.0","Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1951,Government,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
18,Data Scientist/ Data Automation Engineer,"$110k-$178k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JSR is a global leader in material sciences and chemical engineering committed to contributing to social good by supplying materials to serve future generations and providing new value today for our customers and society in the areas of digital solutions, life sciences, elastomers, and next generation solutions.
We value Innovation, Quality, Customers, and People!  JSR combines a deep Japanese heritage of materials innovation, with speed propelled by our strong customer partnerships with premier tech & life sciences companies.  Are you interested in taking JSR and your career to the next stage?
The Opportunity
The role of the successful candidate is to accelerate the technology and product development cycles through focused automation initiatives. This engineer will lead cross functional teams to develop tools and applications to manage data from multiple chemical manufacturing sites as well as quality and development data to enable proactive process management and system troubleshooting.
Collaborates with the Manufacturing teams and Digital Transformation Office to develop product roadmaps in the digital space.
Works closely with technology development, product design teams and IT teams to rapidly establish the data science infrastructure necessary to meet the above goals
Communication of project updates including status, needs, and risks throughout the management chain.
Establish Way-of-Working guidelines and deliver communication and training sessions to ensure seamless implementation of the automation framework.
About You
7+ years plus B.S. or 5+ years with M.S. desired
B.S. degree in Engineering, Data Science, Material Science, or equivalent. M.S. a plus
Experience in chemical processing, organic chemistry, and analytical chemistry a plus
Proficiency and experience with Solution Focused Thinking - evaluating current problem patterns and devising a workable plan/process/solution
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Excellent data analysis proficiency required. Ability to do data manipulation via basic scripting techniques, macros or programming languages (i.e., Python) is preferred.
Knowledge of chemical processes and basic chemical structures, reactions and interactions needed to tie data into current troubleshooting or experimental work.
Proficiency and experience with Statistical Process Control (SPC) needed.
Strong computer skills essential – JMP, Access, Excel, PowerPoint, database and statistical software experience highly desired.
Detail-oriented and strong organizational skills. Quick problem-solving skills, able to communicate in-depth to customers, internal and external.
Experience in working within a cross-functional team is necessary.
Here's More of What You'll Be Doing
Work safely by observing safety rules, policies and procedures. Identify unsafe conditions or actions to the immediate supervisor.
Perform analyses and report results with minimal supervision.
Identify and execute improvements to existing quality procedures for data analytics, following guidelines on accuracy and validation
Act as Product Owner for development of digital solutions that assist in more efficient and effective issue resolution.
Do deep, wide and detailed data analysis using existing across a variety of platforms (databases, LIMS, other operational flows).
Work on and resolve various issues with data sets, including standardization of values, units and naming conventions, as well as bigger problems with current calculation methods and any underlying assumptions behind the calculations.
Initiate and perform a variety of analyses and recommend statistically designed experiments to address customer issues with general instructions.
Maintain and verify reliability of calculation methods, language or programming behind current macros or other scripts for data analysis.
Create reports and group presentations using Excel, Access, JMP and PowerPoint, to communicate data to other teams – Production, Quality Control, R&D, Sales and Management.
Independently design experiments using statistical methods (Does) towards developing and optimizing new test methods for products and raw materials and facilitate the implementation of these procedures by educating and assisting other members of the Data Automation Team.
Work in a team environment, especially the cross-departmental Data Automation Team (Cleans Engineering, Quality Control, Production, Litho Engineering, Sales, Logistics and Materials).
Make suggestions to management for improving this position or improving work processes

JSR is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
**Recruitment agencies/Headhunter do not submit resumes/CVs through our Web site or directly to managers. JSR will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with JSR. JSR do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. **",3.8,"JSR Micro
3.8","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
19,Staff Data Scientist I,"$127k-$203k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Scientist – Machine Learning & Real-Time Decision Processing (Remote, US)

Valassis is a leader in online advertising technology. We process over 12 trillion calculations daily to analyze and decide on more than 110 billion digital ad requests. As a Data Scientist at Valassis your work is central to keeping us at the forefront of the AdTech industry.

We are seeking data experts who are passionate about using cutting edge technology and data science methods to solve unique and complex problems. The ideal candidate is innately curious about how data can be used to tell a story and inform decisions. You have honed your skills through a combination of education, work experience, and hobbies. You are excited about the complexity and challenges of creating intelligent, high performance systems while working with a highly experienced and driven data science team.

If this describes you, we are interested. You can be an integral part of a cross-disciplinary team working on highly visible projects that improve performance and grow the intelligence in our product suite. Our day to day work is performed in a progressive, high-tech workspace where we focus on a friendly, collaborative and fulfilling environment.

On any given day you’ll be…
Using geo location data to track foot traffic, commercial visitation and next most likely visit to understand consumer physical behavior.
Using online behavior data to determine the primary interest categories of consumers and the web properties they visit.
Implementing a predictive model to determine whether a person is likely to visit a car dealership based on the advertising signals they’ve received.
Monitoring & improving a system that deploys and refits 10’s of thousands of models daily.
Developing algorithms to optimize the setting of every lever in a high throughput real-time decision system.
Analyzing data to better understand how a neighborhood’s consumption of web pages correlates with visits to a local big box store.
Finding the handful of outliers in billions of transactions.
Deriving a set of new features that will help better understand the interplay between geography and audience features to improve model performance.
Building new products with applied AI and bring them to market.
Participating in planning, roadmap, and architecture discussions to help evolve our AI processes to improve revenue-generating products.
Our ideal candidate will likely have…
The professional experience and desire to perform responsibilities similar to those listed above
An advanced degree in a relevant, quantitative field or equivalent experience working with Big Data and Spark in a professional setting
Ability to grow and ultimately mentor team members of varying experience levels and competencies through data science, product and software development life cycles
WHO WE ARE
Valassis is a leading digital marketing intelligence company, providing a best-in-class data management platform and online and offline targeting capabilities that fuel superior display advertising and media offerings. Through proprietary technology and the Valassis Digital Consumer Graph™, we power the lifecycle of marketing campaigns – from planning to activation and measurement. In fact, 19 of 20 leading brands work with Valassis to drive better campaign performance.

WHAT'S IN IT FOR YOU?
Valassis has a generous total rewards benefits package that includes medical, dental and vision coverage, 401k and PTO allowance. A wide variety of additional benefits like life insurance, employee assistance and pet insurance are also available; not to mention smart and friendly coworkers!

Valassis is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Applicants who have disabilities may request that accommodations be made in order to complete the selection process.

EEO is the law. To review your rights under Equal Employment Opportunity please visit: www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.

#LI-JM1",3.4,"Valassis
3.4","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,Data Scientist,"$83k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.6,"Buckman
3.6","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1945,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
21,Data Engineer,"$58k-$107k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you passionate about Data and Cloud Technology? Do you enjoy working with Python, ETL Frameworks, and BI Reporting? Are you intrigued by Investments and Finance? Do you want to join an Innovative Team with a start-up mindset and fortune 100 stability? If Yes, there’s a place at Liberty Mutual Investments for you!

About the job:

The Data Engineer will help build technology to enable Back and Middle Office Investment functions (trade flows, accounting, reconciliation, reporting, and automated batch scheduling workflows) for integration with the investments Accounting Book of Record. Knowledge of investment financial data to serve application integration to trading platform and reporting is strongly desired. Prior experience working on Agile scrum teams in a scaled framework is preferred.

You will possess a hardworking “can-do” mindset with focus on the collective success of the scrum team to iteratively deliver high quality products to enable the investments business.

Collaborates with the Product Owner, Scrum Master, Subject Matter Experts and Development team to define and analyze user stories tracked in Jira.

Collaborate in design, development and implementation of software solutions for LMI Tech using modern technology stack.

Demonstrates solutions and articulates business value to LMI business partners at sprint showcases.

Desired skills:

Bachelor’s degree in technical discipline, or equivalent professional experience.

Minimum 3-5 years' experience as Data Engineer.

Expertise in MS SQL Server (Programming views, stored procedures, and functions).

Expertise in Python (ETL tools- Pandas/NumPy, Python unit testing etc.).

Experience with Cloud platform technologies (AWS/Azure).

Experience with Data Warehousing, Dimensional Modeling (Kimball etc.), and Data Extraction Utilities.

Experience with business intelligence tools and reporting solution (PowerBI, Tableau etc.)

Experience with Financial Systems and reporting (Investments accounting/General Ledger)

Preferred skills:

Experience in integrating large scale financial investment/ERP systems (SimCorp Dimension or similar platform) is a plus.

Experience with CI/CD pipeline, and DevOps.

Experience with REST API.

Experience with Git/Bitbucket.

Experience in Agile software development practices (story sizing, sprint planning, retrospectives).

Experience with automated testing software (Selenium, Ranorex, Tosca).

Benefits: We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:

At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.

We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
22,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer Northern, VA

Machine Learning Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Machine Learning (ML) Engineers to produce automated anomaly/object detection and characterization, forecasting, optimization, and recommendation solutions to national security challenges using modular, cloud-native, API-centric approaches. These solutions will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on incorporating machine learning insights to automate and scale analysis and improve decision support. Teams will be working in a highly collaborative environment and expected to identify opportunities to apply and improve data-driven insights and support related design and development within big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Engage with mission owners/operators to discover applications for ML, set project expectations, define requirements, and review results
Design and develop reusable workflows for data integration, transformation, and feature engineering required to train models
Train and validate models, often in big data, distributed environments
Perform exploratory data analysis to understand data and model-derived insights
Perform model introspection to understand model behaviors and explain predictions
Visualize data and model-derived insights to communicate internally and externally
Integrate models into operational systems
Lead trade studies, analyses of alternatives, and assessments of existing systems
Develops or provides input to engineering artifacts
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 5 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Ability to describe the data assumptions and processing steps of common machine learning methods, and which methods are appropriate for a variety of use cases
Expertise with ML libraries, like Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, PySpark, MXNet, MLib, and Weka
Experience with ML platforms, like KNIME, Spark, SageMaker, H2O, and TensorFlow
Familiarity with Java, Python, and SQL including related ecosystems and frameworks, like Eclipse and Jupyter Notebook
Familiarity with visualization tools, preferably Qlik, Tableau, Plotly, Kibana, Matplotlib, and QGis
Strong problem-solving skills
Strong written and oral communications skills
Able to work independently and self-identify tasks
Ability to review and maintain existing code and applications
Ability to research and evaluate new concepts and processes to improve performance
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with time series forecasting
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Machine Learning Engineer",4.4,"NuWave Solutions
4.4",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
23,Medical Laboratory Scientist or Medical Lab Tech / Lab Core,"$13-$27 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","We’re searching for a Medical Laboratory Scientist, performs patient laboratory testing, instrument calibration, maintenance troubleshooting, quality control testing, and equipment function verification in the areas of Hematology, Microscopy, Coagulation, Chemistry, Microbiology, Virology and Serology. Reports and interprets laboratory test results. Advises and consults with the Medical Staff, nursing staff, and laboratory staff.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS

Performs laboratory tests on patient specimens in the areas of Hematology, Chemistry, Microscopy, Coagulation, Microbiology, Virology and Serology to assist in identifying medical disorders and to monitor ongoing patient therapy.
Utilizes LIS for reporting patient results, documenting quality control and distribution of data.
Checks instrument calibration and reagent reactivity by assaying quality control specimens to assure accurate patient test results.
Evaluates results of patient testing, quality control and survey testing, takes appropriate action to prevent compromises in patient care.
Participates throughout the calendar year in proficiency testing.
Performs troubleshooting, function checks and maintenance procedures to keep equipment and instruments in proper working order.
Maintains adequate inventory levels and stocking of supplies and reagents.
Supports new staff in training as necessary.
Prepares specimens to be sent to referral laboratories and reports test results as they are returned.
Consults with physicians, nurses and other healthcare professionals concerning requested services and test results.
Performs the duties of Charge Technologist as stated in the Policies and Procedures Manual when assigned.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES

Ability to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing.

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university in Medical Laboratory Science or related science, which includes a one-year internship in an approved clinical laboratory required.

CERTIFICATIONS/LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS

Current and valid Medical Laboratory Scientist (MLS) or equivalent certification with the American Society of Clinical Pathology or other equivalent certifying agency required, within 6 months of hire.

EOE/Vets/Disabled

ref 9809

We’re searching for a Medial Lab Technician, under the direction of a Medical Laboratory Scientist, Laboratory Supervisor or Charge Tech performs patient laboratory testing, instrument calibration, maintenance troubleshooting, quality control testing, and equipment function verification in the areas of Hematology, Microscopy, Coagulation, Chemistry, Microbiology, Virology and Serology. Reports and interprets laboratory test results. Advises and consults with the Medical Staff, nursing staff, and laboratory staff.

Essential Functions

· Under direction of a Medical Technologist, Laboratory Supervisor or Charge Tech, performs laboratory tests on patient specimens in the areas of Hematology, Chemistry, Microscopy, Coagulation, Microbiology, Virology and Serology to assist in identifying medical disorders and to monitor ongoing patient therapy.

· Utilizes LIS for reporting patient results, documenting quality control and distribution of data.

· Following the guidance of a Medical Technologist, Laboratory Supervisor or Charge Tech, checks instrument calibration and reagent reactivity by assaying quality control specimens to assure accurate patient test results.

· With oversight of a Medical Technologist, Laboratory Supervisor or Charge Tech, evaluates results of patient testing, quality control and survey testing, takes appropriate action to prevent compromises in patient care.

· Participates throughout the calendar year in proficiency testing.

· Performs troubleshooting, function checks and maintenance procedures to keep equipment and instruments in proper working order

· Maintains adequate inventory levels and stocking of supplies and reagents.

· Supports new staff in training as necessary.

· Obtains blood specimens from patients using standardized capillary or venipuncture procedures as ordered by the physician.

· Consults with physicians, nurses and other healthcare professionals concerning requested services and test results.

Performs other duties as assigned
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES
Ability to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing.

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Associate’s degree from an accredited college or university in Medical Laboratory or related science required.

CERTIFICATIONS/LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS

Current and valid Medical Laboratory Technician certification with the American Society of Clinical Pathology or other equivalent certifying agency required, within 6 months of hire.

EOE/Vets/Disabled
About Children's Hospital

When you work at Children’s, you’re part of a treasured place of healing in the Omaha community—and beyond. Join our team of highly engaged, caring professionals who believe deeply in the organization’s mission—to improve the life of every child. We support equity, diversity and inclusion, and as you apply your skills and expertise to helping children, you too will have opportunities to grow your career. In 2021, we’ll open the new Hubbard Center for Children, tripling our capacity to serve children.

When children are your everything, anything can be…",3.6,"Children's Hospital & Medical Center
3.6","Omaha, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
24,Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist (Performance Nutrition),"$43k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

Learn More about USAMMDA HERE

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Performance Nutrition [which is referred to as the Registered Dietitian (RD) Support (MES-RD)].
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implement a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and manage a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and document plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices, to include but not limited to, Medical Communications for Combat Casualty Care (MC4), United States Army Medical Information Technology Center (USAMITC), and Defense Health Information Management System (DHIMS) to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Participating in the requirements generation process with the Army Medical Department Center and School (AMEDD C&S), Medical Center of Excellence (MEDCoE), Capability Development Integration Directorate (CDID) for assigned H2F products, as required.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Performing logistical analysis and analyze materiel fielding as part of medical logistics project management.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives.
Developing and implementing the logistical strategic planning process for the provisioning of the subsystems that make up the Mission Equipment (ME).
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

What You'll Need (required):

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related l experience.
Possess a level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and DOD Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering, System Engineering and the AMEDD process for developing, procuring, packing, marking, storing, and fielding SKOs.
Familiarity with the DoD Medical Supply Chain and Logistics Management infrastructure and systems.
Experience as a logistics planner or in performance based logistics with the Army with an understanding of the system function and effect on the defense supply system.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

Attributes for Success:

Excellent oral and written communications skills required.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
25,"Scientist, Assay Development",-1,"POSITION SUMMARY:
This position is responsible for developing, coordinating, and providing assay support for preclinical, clinical candidates and other CMO projects coordinated by Process Development and Manufacturing. This position will also be responsible for developing and evaluating technology to characterize vaccine products (example: recombinant protein, virus or bacterial vaccines). This position also involves and coordinates the assay qualification, validation and tech transfer activities.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsible for developing physicochemical methodologies and analytical techniques including chromatography (HPLC - size exclusion, ion exchange), light scattering, solubility and viscosity measurements, spectroscopy (CD, fluorescence, UV/VIS, and FTIR), for quantifying purity/quality of proteins, peptides, VLPs, viral vectors.
Responsible for performing Peptide micro-array, ELISA, SDS-PAGE, Western blotting, qPCR, and RT-PCR and other gene/protein expression assays.
Responsible for developing or optimizing viral titer assays, TCID50, plaque, and focus assays for viral vectors.
Lead development of assays for physical and functional characteristics of recombinant protein, bacterial or viral vaccine formulations to support various phases of clinical manufacturing projects.
Coordinates and lead the development of release and potency assays for various vaccine platforms as needed.
Coordinate various projects and provide assay or analytical support for Process Development and Manufacturing.
Coordinates assay transfer activities as appropriate for internal or external projects.
Coordinate assay activities among Assay Development, Quality Control and Process Development groups for driving work to meet project deliverables as well as for cross-functional improvements.
Experienced in the principles of good record keeping for all the assay development processes.
Demonstrated ability to assemble data generated into technical reports, summaries, and/or graphic presentations.
Write, review, and edit SOPs.
Performs other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS:
PhD degree in Molecular Biology, Biochemistry, Biophysics or Pharmaceutical Chemistry discipline with a 3+ years in Assay/Analytical Development, Protein Characterization, Formulation development in vaccines in an industrial setting.
Hands-on and in-depth understanding of different recombinant protein physical and biochemical characterization and stabilization techniques.
Experience in technology transfer, assay qualification and assay validation
Experience in the design and screening various formulations for protein and virus to assess stability. Investigates, develops, optimizes, and implements new analytical assays.
Evidence of experience with cGMP, ICH testing guidelines and regulatory requirements for filing and registration of vaccine and/or biologics.
Evidence of effective communication, both verbally and written.
Demonstrate highly organized, analytical, accurate, and detail oriented capabilities.
Evidence of ability to prioritize assignments; time management and multitasking in a dynamic environment.
IDT offers a competitive compensation package to include major medical/dental/vision, group life insurance, STD/LTD plans, 401k plan with company match, and paid vacation, sick and holidays.
IDT Biologika Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status andwill not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",3.6,"IDT Biologika
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Unknown,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
26,Data Scientist,"$72k-$121k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
27,Web Data Analyst,"$65k-$79k
(Employer Est.)","Web Data Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Our customer promise is worth bragging about. Use your marketing and advertising expertise to spread the word and grow our business.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Collect web data and statistics for Uline’s various eCommerce websites (Uline.com, Uline.ca and Uline.mx).
Analyze data and provide weekly and monthly reports to management.
Make recommendations to improve website and reduce return rates.
Translate complex and analytical work into easy to understand data points.
Respond to ad hoc reporting requests and maintain relationships with various departments.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
Experience using Google Analytics or Adobe Analytics.
Experience using a data visualization tool such as Power BI or Tableau.
2+ years experience in website analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Excel with some knowledge of SQL and / or Google BigQuery.
Well organized and detail-oriented with an ability to multitask.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-SR1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
28,Risk Analytics Manager,-1,"Key Responsibilities

Develop and execute risk management and lead acquisition strategies inside the business rules / decision engine and help quality assure, roll out and monitor.
Validate and test risk management strategies. Evaluate statistical scoring, segmentation, and third-party products for effective risk mitigation solutions.
Work with cross functional teams to develop and execute on strategic initiatives.
Implement initiatives to ensure consistency and compliance with credit policies, and liaise with cross functional business counterparts to develop and implement risk strategies and third party platform integration.
Analyze credit risk and financial data to develop, test, and optimize risk factors related to credit policies.
Leverage analytics skills to perform risk, financial and data analysis including profiling, reconciliation, and quality testing.
Prepare risk reports for senior management that include analytics of risk, performance, emerging trends and opportunities.
Planning, designing and implementing an overall risk management process for the organization

Essential Functions:

Project Management: Oversee project lifecycle of data studies, new technology interrogation, or any other projects related to risk or analytics. Deliver written project plans to set expectations and gain strategic agreement. Interface with systems personnel for timely accurate implementation of underwriting solutions. Gather requirements for new or modified software systems enhancements and/or integration solutions. Conduct and analyze business and information technology processes and prepare essential groundwork. Make recommendations for necessary changes on projects that come from other departments.
Support: At as liaison to general counsel, marketing department, operations department, financial department, financial department, and individuals. Work with portfolio and merchant representatives to execute current and emerging business strategies. Interact internally to determine involvement, data requirements, and analysis. Research and evaluate new technology trends, data providers and analytics opportunities.
Leadership – Mentor junior level analysts of the Risk Management team. Ensure training/delivery of scheduled and ad-hoc data reports/studies and developing new effective methods to communicate significant risk information. Make recommendations for personnel actions and assist in day-to-day operations of group.
Insight – Maintain a thorough understanding of risk, operational, and management concepts to manage major portfolio risk factors. Investigate escalated incidences in reports for further review. Suggest possible risk management solutions, credit policy changes, and action plans. Turn business requirements into functional and technical specs for inclusion in the development process and in business planning. Define and develop business reports that support project assignments.

Skills:

Active Listening - Giving full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Writing - Communicating effectively in writing as appropriate for the needs of the audience.
Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gather and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
Project Management – Coordinates projects; communicates changes in progress; Completes projects on time.
Technical Skills – Pursues training and development opportunities; Shares expertise with others
Analytical – Synthesizes complex or diverse information; collects and researches data.
Critical Thinking - Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Credit Scoring & Modeling - Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies
Reading Comprehension - Understanding written sentences and paragraphs in work related documents.
Social Perceptiveness - Being aware of others' reactions and understanding why they react as they do.
Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies

Attributes:

Oral Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Oral Comprehension - The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Written Comprehension - The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Written Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in writing so others will understand.
Speech Clarity - The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you.
Speech Recognition - The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person.

Experience and Education:

Bachelor’s degree in economics, mathematics, statistics or related field
3+ years experience, risk and financial services
2 years’ experience in the risk management field, minimum

Computer Software/Hardware:

Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Access and Crystal Reporting
Outlook Exchange
Underwriting Software, Proficient in SQL, SAS, R or Python

Physical Requirements/Work Environment:

Must be able to stand and sit for long periods of time, talking, hearing constantly.
Occasionally lift up to 10 lbs. on occasion
Must be able to sit in front of computer monitor (s) daily
Sitting and or standing for long periods of time.
Noise level: moderate noise level daily in an office atmosphere.

Skills
Required
Technical knowledge & skills
Critical Thinking
Active Listening
Analytical",-1,"Cane Bay Partners VI, LLP/CBP","Christiansted, VI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
29,Risk Analytics Manager,-1,"Key Responsibilities

Develop and execute risk management and lead acquisition strategies inside the business rules / decision engine and help quality assure, roll out and monitor.
Validate and test risk management strategies. Evaluate statistical scoring, segmentation, and third-party products for effective risk mitigation solutions.
Work with cross functional teams to develop and execute on strategic initiatives.
Implement initiatives to ensure consistency and compliance with credit policies, and liaise with cross functional business counterparts to develop and implement risk strategies and third party platform integration.
Analyze credit risk and financial data to develop, test, and optimize risk factors related to credit policies.
Leverage analytics skills to perform risk, financial and data analysis including profiling, reconciliation, and quality testing.
Prepare risk reports for senior management that include analytics of risk, performance, emerging trends and opportunities.
Planning, designing and implementing an overall risk management process for the organization

Essential Functions:

Project Management: Oversee project lifecycle of data studies, new technology interrogation, or any other projects related to risk or analytics. Deliver written project plans to set expectations and gain strategic agreement. Interface with systems personnel for timely accurate implementation of underwriting solutions. Gather requirements for new or modified software systems enhancements and/or integration solutions. Conduct and analyze business and information technology processes and prepare essential groundwork. Make recommendations for necessary changes on projects that come from other departments.
Support: At as liaison to general counsel, marketing department, operations department, financial department, financial department, and individuals. Work with portfolio and merchant representatives to execute current and emerging business strategies. Interact internally to determine involvement, data requirements, and analysis. Research and evaluate new technology trends, data providers and analytics opportunities.
Leadership – Mentor junior level analysts of the Risk Management team. Ensure training/delivery of scheduled and ad-hoc data reports/studies and developing new effective methods to communicate significant risk information. Make recommendations for personnel actions and assist in day-to-day operations of group.
Insight – Maintain a thorough understanding of risk, operational, and management concepts to manage major portfolio risk factors. Investigate escalated incidences in reports for further review. Suggest possible risk management solutions, credit policy changes, and action plans. Turn business requirements into functional and technical specs for inclusion in the development process and in business planning. Define and develop business reports that support project assignments.

Skills:

Active Listening - Giving full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Writing - Communicating effectively in writing as appropriate for the needs of the audience.
Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gather and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
Project Management – Coordinates projects; communicates changes in progress; Completes projects on time.
Technical Skills – Pursues training and development opportunities; Shares expertise with others
Analytical – Synthesizes complex or diverse information; collects and researches data.
Critical Thinking - Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Credit Scoring & Modeling - Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies
Reading Comprehension - Understanding written sentences and paragraphs in work related documents.
Social Perceptiveness - Being aware of others' reactions and understanding why they react as they do.
Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies

Attributes:

Oral Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Oral Comprehension - The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Written Comprehension - The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Written Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in writing so others will understand.
Speech Clarity - The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you.
Speech Recognition - The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person.

Experience and Education:

Bachelor’s degree in economics, mathematics, statistics or related field
3+ years experience, risk and financial services
2 years’ experience in the risk management field, minimum

Computer Software/Hardware:

Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Access and Crystal Reporting
Outlook Exchange
Underwriting Software, Proficient in SQL, SAS, R or Python

Physical Requirements/Work Environment:

Must be able to stand and sit for long periods of time, talking, hearing constantly.
Occasionally lift up to 10 lbs. on occasion
Must be able to sit in front of computer monitor (s) daily
Sitting and or standing for long periods of time.
Noise level: moderate noise level daily in an office atmosphere.

Skills
Required
Technical knowledge & skills
Critical Thinking
Active Listening
Analytical",-1,"Cane Bay Partners VI, LLP/CBP","Christiansted, VI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
30,Risk Analytics Manager,-1,"Key Responsibilities

Develop and execute risk management and lead acquisition strategies inside the business rules / decision engine and help quality assure, roll out and monitor.
Validate and test risk management strategies. Evaluate statistical scoring, segmentation, and third-party products for effective risk mitigation solutions.
Work with cross functional teams to develop and execute on strategic initiatives.
Implement initiatives to ensure consistency and compliance with credit policies, and liaise with cross functional business counterparts to develop and implement risk strategies and third party platform integration.
Analyze credit risk and financial data to develop, test, and optimize risk factors related to credit policies.
Leverage analytics skills to perform risk, financial and data analysis including profiling, reconciliation, and quality testing.
Prepare risk reports for senior management that include analytics of risk, performance, emerging trends and opportunities.
Planning, designing and implementing an overall risk management process for the organization

Essential Functions:

Project Management: Oversee project lifecycle of data studies, new technology interrogation, or any other projects related to risk or analytics. Deliver written project plans to set expectations and gain strategic agreement. Interface with systems personnel for timely accurate implementation of underwriting solutions. Gather requirements for new or modified software systems enhancements and/or integration solutions. Conduct and analyze business and information technology processes and prepare essential groundwork. Make recommendations for necessary changes on projects that come from other departments.
Support: At as liaison to general counsel, marketing department, operations department, financial department, financial department, and individuals. Work with portfolio and merchant representatives to execute current and emerging business strategies. Interact internally to determine involvement, data requirements, and analysis. Research and evaluate new technology trends, data providers and analytics opportunities.
Leadership – Mentor junior level analysts of the Risk Management team. Ensure training/delivery of scheduled and ad-hoc data reports/studies and developing new effective methods to communicate significant risk information. Make recommendations for personnel actions and assist in day-to-day operations of group.
Insight – Maintain a thorough understanding of risk, operational, and management concepts to manage major portfolio risk factors. Investigate escalated incidences in reports for further review. Suggest possible risk management solutions, credit policy changes, and action plans. Turn business requirements into functional and technical specs for inclusion in the development process and in business planning. Define and develop business reports that support project assignments.

Skills:

Active Listening - Giving full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Writing - Communicating effectively in writing as appropriate for the needs of the audience.
Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gather and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
Project Management – Coordinates projects; communicates changes in progress; Completes projects on time.
Technical Skills – Pursues training and development opportunities; Shares expertise with others
Analytical – Synthesizes complex or diverse information; collects and researches data.
Critical Thinking - Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Credit Scoring & Modeling - Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies
Reading Comprehension - Understanding written sentences and paragraphs in work related documents.
Social Perceptiveness - Being aware of others' reactions and understanding why they react as they do.
Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies

Attributes:

Oral Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Oral Comprehension - The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Written Comprehension - The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Written Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in writing so others will understand.
Speech Clarity - The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you.
Speech Recognition - The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person.

Experience and Education:

Bachelor’s degree in economics, mathematics, statistics or related field
3+ years experience, risk and financial services
2 years’ experience in the risk management field, minimum

Computer Software/Hardware:

Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Access and Crystal Reporting
Outlook Exchange
Underwriting Software, Proficient in SQL, SAS, R or Python

Physical Requirements/Work Environment:

Must be able to stand and sit for long periods of time, talking, hearing constantly.
Occasionally lift up to 10 lbs. on occasion
Must be able to sit in front of computer monitor (s) daily
Sitting and or standing for long periods of time.
Noise level: moderate noise level daily in an office atmosphere.

Skills
Required
Technical knowledge & skills
Critical Thinking
Active Listening
Analytical",-1,"Cane Bay Partners VI, LLP/CBP","Christiansted, VI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
31,Data Scientist,-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
32,Data Scientist,-1,"Fidelity TalentSource is your destination for discovering your next temporary role at Fidelity Investments. We are currently sourcing for a Data Scientist to work at Fidelity in Boston, MA.

At Fidelity’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. We work closely with business partners, collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer and business value. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry.

These positions are all located in Boston, MA.

The Team

The AIML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) team contributes to the vitality and growth of the organization through researching and building complex, cutting edge and scalable AI algorithms, models, platforms and technologies to significantly improve customer experience and drive business results. Our team of high caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians use rigorous quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand.

The Expertise You Have
Minimum Master’s Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Computational Statistics, Operations Research, Machine Learning or related technical fields.
Advanced knowledge in model evaluation, tuning and performance, operationalization and scalability of scientific techniques and establishing decision strategies.
Hands on experience developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms (regression, decision trees/random forest, neural networks, feature selection/reduction, clustering, parameter tuning, etc.),
Experience in evaluating and making decisions around the use of new or existing tools for a project.
Experience in projects involving large scale-multi dimensional databases, complex business infrastructure, and cross-functional teams. Three to five successfully launched ML projects would be ideal.
Programming skills in Python, Spark, Scala, R or MatLab
The Skills You Bring
Your solid skills in algorithm development and predictive modeling
You have deep knowledge of some combination of the following:
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Deep Learning, Neural Networks
Real Time Event Detection and Scoring
Time series analysis, Econometrics
Robotic Process Automation
Cloud ML
The Value You Deliver

You will partner with business stakeholders to identify/prioritize top AI opportunities, create business/technical requirements, transform large volumes of data into AI-driven solutions using creative, cutting edge open source methods/technologies, lead ML strategy and road map planning, work across teams and influence the direction of external teams. The ideal candidate will combine experienced AI/ML/Open Source/Tech knowledge with hands on experience building algorithms/models/programming and outstanding business skills (revenue/cost drivers, customer experience, customer journey, communication, etc.) to manage and deliver complex/critical projects driving significant value to Fidelity.

Company Culture

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and furthering a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates.

Company Overview

We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skillset and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource.

For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Company Overview

Fidelity TalentSource, formerly Veritude, is the in-house temporary staffing provider for Fidelity Investments, one of the largest and most diversified global financial services firms in the industry. We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skill set and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource. For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Information about Fidelity Investments

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments and Fidelity TalentSource are equal opportunity employers.",3.9,"Fidelity TalentSource
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
33,Data Scientist,"$80k-$130k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
34,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,"$49k-$100k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Overview:

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for turning data into knowledge, enabling business decisions.

Specific Duties Include:
Partnering with the user community to create new business intelligence, reporting and data analysis solutions.
Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements.
Build and maintain ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) and integration processes.
Validate data delivered to user community.
Ensure compliance with Protolabs data and software policies and procedures.
Monitor software systems to ensure reliability and accuracy of information loaded into the databases.
Maintain all documentation related to database objects, source systems, and operations.
Conduct complex, important work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgment.
Minimum Qualifications:
6+ years of experience working in software engineering
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with Domo
Experience with PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Service (SSRS)
Ability to work on multiple project concurrently
Ability to manage time effectively
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, collaborative environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous leadership experience preferred
Knowledge of document databases including Raven
Previous experience with Microsoft Dynamics AX
Previous experience with Salesforce
Software development in a continuous integration and continuous deployment environment
Proto Labs maintains ITAR-compliant operations in all of our United States based facilities. Due to ITAR regulations, this role is only open to U.S. Citizens, lawful permanent residents (green card holders) or foreign nationals granted refugee or asylee status. Individuals with temporary visas (e.g. E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, TN or OPT) are not eligible for hire in this role.

Proto Labs, Inc. is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer",3.8,"Protolabs
3.8","Maple Plain, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
35,Nurse Scientist,"$24-$39 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","Baptist Health South Florida is once again one of the 2020 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For! This is the 20th time Baptist Health has been recognized on the list. We have also been recognized for being among the best healthcare providers in the nation by U.S. News & World Reports in its 2020-2021 Best Hospitals and have been honored as one of PEOPLE's 2020 50 Companies that Care by PEOPLE magazine and Great Place to Work.

Baptist Health South Florida is the region's largest not-for-profit healthcare organization with more than 23,000 employees working across 11 hospital campuses and more than 100 outpatient facilities throughout Miami-Dade, Monroe, Broward, and Palm Beach counties. In 2016 we welcomed the newest weapon in the fight against cancer, the world-class Miami Cancer Institute and proton therapy center.

Everything we do at Baptist Health, we do to the best of our ability. That includes supporting our team with extensive training programs, millions of dollars in tuition assistance, comprehensive benefits and more. Working within our award-winning culture means getting the respect and support you need to do your best work ever. Find out why this is the best place to be your best!

Description:

The Nurse Scientist is a doctorally prepared nurse that directs the development and coordination of the clinical research program at assigned entity. The Nurse Scientist enhances translation of evidence to practice for quality patient care and contributes to the professional development of staff. This individual provides guidance for the development of nursing and inter-professional research studies. This individual will be accountable for overseeing execution of research deliverables and will lead the research team to achieve research goals and objectives.
Qualifications:

Licenses & Certifications: CITI, FL Registered Nurse

Additional Qualifications: Master’s degree in Nursing – MSN, required. Willing to enter into an accredited Nursing PhD program within 2 years of hire, PhD preferred. Minimum of three years experience in academic or clinical research. Strong, broad clinical background. Effective relationship management skills and ability to build successful collaborations across programs and multidisciplinary teams. Strong communication skills (including scientific and technical) - verbal, written and presentation, Strong knowledge of research regulations and Institutional Review Boards, Proficient in computer programs (Microsoft Office, statistical packages, qualitative data management). Excellent analytical skills. Must be extremely flexible with ability to multitask effectively. Must be willing/able to travel domestically and internationally. Minimum Required Experience: 3 years

Join our Talent Community and stay up-to-date on our career opportunities. We’ll send you alerts of new jobs matching your interests as well as exciting news and events happening at Baptist Health South Florida.

EOE",3.9,"Baptist Health South Florida
3.9","Miami, FL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1960,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
36,Research Scientist,-1,"MatMaCorp is a materials engineering and biological science company located in Lincoln, Nebraska. We are actively developing small, portable and easy to use medical and scientific instruments along with accompanying DNA and RNA based test kits. Currently, we have an opening within our Biology Group for a Research Scientist.

We are looking for dynamic individuals with creative abilities who can work within a multidisciplinary team of scientists and engineers. Individuals must have experience in basic DNA/RNA technology and familiarity with molecular biology and/or biochemistry. Ideal candidates will have experience in experimental design, assay development, and a proven track record of project management. Experience in the industry setting is plus.

Qualifications: Master’s or Ph.D. in Microbiology, Molecular Biology, Virology or other related areas. This is a full-time position with benefits including health, dental and paid vacation. *To apply, please forward your resume along with cover letter to Andrew Rush, Human Resources.*

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.matmacorp.com
Work Remotely:
No",2.9,"MatMaCorp
2.9","Lincoln, NE",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
37,Medical Technologist/Lab Supervisor/Certifying Scientist - LC-MS/MS,-1,"Job Description
Duties and Responsibilities*
– Work independently to operate LC-MS/MS in-office laboratory, with full support of Sr. Scientists, R&D and LIMS admin

– Supervise additional personnel (lab tech) as needed

– Performing general instrument maintenance.

– Reviewing and preparing final reports based on all data submitted an assay results.

– Following the laboratory procedures for specimen handling and processing, test analysis, reporting and maintaining records of patient test results;

– Recognize deviations from expected results and follow up appropriately.

– Participate in proficiency testing and maintaining a record of ongoing competency.

– Evaluating and solving problems related to the collection and processing of specimens.

– Perform appropriate Quality Control (QC) procedures and produce reports.

– Report the QC results to the Director, or designee and carry out troubleshooting and corrective actions of questionable or out-or-limit results under the direction of the Director or designee.

– Document all corrective actions and submit them for review by the Director or designee.

– Resolving and/or escalating issues in a timely fashion.

– Communication difficult and sensitive information tactfully.

– Maintain general laboratory cleanliness.

– Maintaining a productive relationship with each internal department within the company.

– Representing the Company in a positive, professional manner with the highest ethical integrity.

– Adhering to confidential HIPAA requirements (patient files, personal and proprietary information).

– This position will NOT require you to perform method development and validations.

Job Types: Part-time or Full-time

Pay: $25.00 - $40.00 per hour

Job Types: Full-time, Part-time

Pay: $25.00 - $40.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Work Location:
One location
Hours per week:
30-39
Typical start time:
9AM
Typical end time:
5PM
Company's website:
www.catalystlabsolutions.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Catalyst Lab Solutions,"Jacksonville, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
38,Data Scientist,"$94k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will conduct sophisticated data analysis to help address critical business and member questions, the outputs of which enable members to drive improvements in clinical, operational, and economic outcomes.

Responsibilities:

Provide analysis to identify critical issues/questions around member performance.

Conduct exploratory data analysis from complex, disparate data sources to recognize patterns, and identify member performance improvement opportunities.

Generate hypotheses and analyze data to test and interpret results.

Design and develop data models to predict member outcomes or future impact of key member decisions.

Communicate findings from exploratory and predictive data analysis broadly to team and leaders.

Identify improvement opportunities in reporting and BI tools and collaborate with Products Technology to implement enhancements.

Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for statistics, machine learning techniques, data modeling, simulation and advanced mathematics.

Collaborate with key leaders and clinicians to build analytical acumen across all analytic roles in the organization.

Qualifications:

Relevant degree preferred. Advanced degree a plus.

5 or more years of relevant work experience.

Proficient programming experience using SAS/Python/R.

Demonstrated ability to manage large disparate data sets and using quantitative and qualitative analysis.

Experience effectively communicating and presenting data to a variety of audiences required.

Experience working with health care administrative claims data (ICD-10, MS-DRG, CPT/HCPCS) or electronic medical record data tools (Epic Clarity/Caboodle, Cerner CCL-Discern/PowerInsight) strongly preferred.

#LI-DM

#IDS

Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",4.0,"Vizient, Inc.
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
39,Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist (Physical Therapy),"$43k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: 10-25%
Public Trust: NACI (T1)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT's military health team is HIRING is a Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist to join our team to support the Department of Army. This position is based in Frederick, Maryland.

The Biomedical Engineer / Project Scientist will support the Warfighter Health, Performance and Evacuation (WHPE) Product Management Organization (PMO) at the U.S. Army Medical Materiel Development Activity (USAMMDA).

Learn More about USAMMDA HERE

This task will require moderate (10-25%) travel to locations throughout the United States, as well as OCONUS locations TBD.

What You'll Be Doing:

Supporting one of three assemblages, and their respective contents, that compose the Holistic Health and Fitness (H2F) system - the Medical Equipment Set (MES) Physical Therapy (MES-PT).
Conducting a systems analysis for all identified devices and assemblages (sets), to include communications interface, data modeling, systems security, information assurance, patient privacy, and program assessment to support integration planning and systems program management.
Developing documentation and implementing systems engineering, acquisition, and support strategies for assigned H2F products.
Developing systems engineering, program, and acquisition documentation in support of major acquisition decisions for assigned products and assemblages, as required.
Developing and implement a system engineering management process through the entire system engineering life cycle for assigned H2F products.
Developing and manage a test program that is consistent and aligns with the Program-wide Test and Evaluation Master Plan for assigned products and assemblages.
Compiling and document plans, processes, test objectives, test results, and other documentation as required for assigned H2F products.
Coordinating with required external program offices, to include but not limited to, Medical Communications for Combat Casualty Care (MC4), United States Army Medical Information Technology Center (USAMITC), and Defense Health Information Management System (DHIMS) to establish required systems integration, communication and security between all key components and sub-components to effectively satisfy program requirements.
Managing configuration control, ensure successful integration and interoperability, and champion life-cycle management of the H2F products by building integrated product team partnerships with other DoD organizations.
Participating in the requirements generation process with the Army Medical Department Center and School (AMEDD C&S), Medical Center of Excellence (MEDCoE), Capability Development Integration Directorate (CDID) for assigned H2F products, as required.
Conducting internal project requirements analysis for assigned H2F products to derive lower level requirements and system specifications with traceability from system specifications, through lower-level requirements, to the end user requirements represented in the CDID published requirements.
Preparing contract documentation to include but not limited to market research, acquisition strategy, independent government cost estimate, performance work statement, purchase request, justification & approval on contracts.
Performing logistical analysis and analyze materiel fielding as part of medical logistics project management.
Supporting and consulting with product management staff, OTSG consultants, requirements generators, and regulatory support to meet H2F program objectives
Developing and implement the logistical strategic planning process for the provisioning of the subsystems that make up the Mission Equipment (ME).
Providing direct support of uniformed soldiers during test, evaluation, fielding, training exercises and warfighter assessments. This includes all levels of review and oversight of H2F and other supported systems as required.
Participating in discussions to analyze and interpret medical equipment to trend current practices to ensure inclusion of the most appropriate equipment and supplies in various medical unit assemblage publications
Participating in various discussions involving new or replacement medical equipment to ensure proper parallel planning and sharing of information for timely development, review, and publication of medical equipment configuration and unit assemblage and Set, Kit and Outfit (SKO) documents.
Participating in special projects as required.

What You'll Need:

Bachelor’s Degree in engineering or related discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience.
5+ years of related experience.
Possess a level of familiarity with Fitness and Rehabilitation Sciences, Network Engineering and DOD Risk Management Framework (RMF) requirements.
Have capability of applying subject matter expertise in the areas of Biomedical Engineering, System Engineering and the AMEDD process for developing, procuring, packing, marking, storing, and fielding SKOs.
Familiarity with the DoD Medical Supply Chain and Logistics Management infrastructure and systems.
Experience as a logistics planner or in performance based logistics with the Army with an understanding of the system function and effect on the defense supply system.
Must have experience with Microsoft Office, to include MS Outlook, MS Project, MS PowerPoint, MS Excel and MS Word.
Must be U.S. citizen and be able to obtain a T1.

Attributes for Success:

Excellent oral and written communications skills required.

#militaryhealthgditjobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
40,Innovation Applied Data Scientist,"$60k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Responsibilities:

Noblis is positioned to provide subject matter expertise (SME) on emerging threats, data analysis, and algorithm development to decision makers in the CWMD office and DHS components using information obtained from distributed sensor network capabilities, open source reporting, and other sources.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity to help develop and advance DHS’s new approach to countering WMD, we are actively seeking to identify personnel to join our team of talented professionals who possess the experience, vision, commitment and integrity to successfully support the strategic goals of DHS CWMD by assisting with the fulfillment of the office’ policy and strategy requirements as DHS’s CWMD focal point as an Innovation Applied Scientist for CWMD. Responsibilities include:

Responsibilities:

Develops and incorporates novel algorithms and methods for complex, large-scale data analysis in coordination with operational/analytic end-users within and outside of DHS CWMD.
Provides applied science technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Researches new technical approaches for application across the CWMD mission portfolio.
Client Engagement: · Support and lead evolving business development efforts by applying technical and functional expertise to develop business solutions. · Lead proposal sections for small or limited competition proposals and actively participate in teaming strategy discussions Qualifications:

Qualification:

Has 7-10 years of experience and a (B.A./B.S) or 3-10 years and a (M.A./M.S) in natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields.
Qualifying experience must be in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Experienced with Providing technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Experience developing, or evaluating the development of, systems, algorithms, and approaches for complex large-scale data analysis across a range of different types of data.
Secret Clearance is required.

Desired:

Preferred Specialized Experience: Considerable professional experience in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, statistics, computer science, modeling and simulation, software engineering, and signal processing.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, computer science, statistical and probabilistic modeling, and advanced analytic software such as Matlab and SAS
Overview:

Noblis and our wholly owned subsidiary, Noblis ESI, are solving difficult problems that help our government and our country. We bring the best of scientific thought, management, and engineering expertise with a reputation for independence and objectivity. We support a wide range of government and industry clients in the areas of national security, intelligence, transportation, healthcare, environmental sustainability, and enterprise engineering. Learn more at Noblis -About Us

Why work at a Noblis company?

Our employees find greater meaning in their work and balance the other things in life that matter to them. Our people are our greatest asset. They are exceptionally skilled, knowledgeable, team-oriented, and mission-driven individuals who want to do work that matters and benefits the public.

Noblis has won numerous workplace awards. Noblis maintains a drug-free workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.9,"Noblis
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
41,Certified Lab Scientist or Certified Lab Tech,-1,"Prairie Ridge Health is looking for a team member to join or Lab Department in the role of Certified Lab Scientist or Certified Lab Tech. This position is PRN (as needed) and will be responsible for performing general laboratory testing in the areas of Hematology, Chemistry, Urinalysis, Transfusion Services, Coagulation, Microbiology, Serology, and Specimen processing with a high degree of accuracy and reliability...….

POSITION SUMMARY
Lab Scientist

The Medical Technologist performs general laboratory testing in the areas of Hematology, Chemistry, Urinalysis, Transfusion Services, Coagulation, Microbiology, Serology, and Specimen processing with a high degree of accuracy and reliability. The data obtained is used in the diagnosis and treatment of disease involving patient of all ages. The Medical Technologist develops and maintains test procedures and protocols, and troubleshoots both technology and sample related problems. (S)he exercises independent judgment and responsibility with minimal supervision. May supervise others in the absence of the Laboratory Supervisor. Makes decisions about the accuracy of test results, instrument operation, specimen suitability, and uses sound clinical judgment in setting the priority of tests/patients

OR

Lab Tech

The Clinical Laboratory Technician I performs general laboratory testing in the areas of Hematology, Chemistry, Urinalysis, Transfusion Services, Coagulation, Microbiology, Serology, and Specimen processing with a high degree of accuracy and reliability. The data obtained is used in the diagnosis and treatment of disease involving patient of all ages. The Clinical Laboratory Technician II develops and maintains test procedures and protocols, and troubleshoots both technology and sample related problems. (S)he exercises independent judgment and responsibility with minimal supervision. Makes decisions about the accuracy of test results, instrument operation, specimen suitability, and uses sound clinical judgment in setting the priority of tests/patients.

EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS/LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION/REGISTRATION

Lab Scientist

Bachelors’ degree in Medical Technology and graduate of an accredited Medical Technology Program.
Registered or eligible as a Medical Technologist (MT) or Clinical Laboratory Scientist (CLS) with a national accrediting agency (ASCP) or qualified as a MT/CLS having passed the Federal Equivalence Exam (HEW)
Meets the CLIA 88 requirements for individuals performing highly complex testing
CPR certification

OR

Lab Tech

Associate degree and completion of a 2 year CLT / Medical Laboratory Technician (MLT) training program.
Registered or eligible as a Clinical Laboratory Technician or Medical Laboratory Technician (MLT) with a national accrediting agency (ASCP).
Meets the CLIA 88 requirements for individuals performing highly complex testing.
A minimum of 1 year experience in a clinical laboratory performing highly complex testing is desired or a recent new graduate of an accredited school.
CPR certification

FTE: PRN (as needed)

Shift: As Needed

Powered by JazzHR

Ly3sHi576B",-1,Prairie Ridge Health,"Columbus, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Hospital,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
42,Data Scientist,"$80k-$134k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

MMIT is growing from the leading drug coverage data business into a comprehensive, integrated market access company serving pharmaceutical manufacturers, health insurers, PBMs and healthcare IT companies. Their suite of applications is designed to manage an ever-changing proprietary set of pharmacy and medical benefit information and to provide a structured view of complex market access information. By embedding their data and SaaS applications across healthcare, they help ensure transparency, consistency and informed prescription decisions across the MMIT Network. They partner with hundreds of payers and pharma manufacturers ensuring that their products continually capture and analyze coverage and restriction criteria for more than 98% covered lives.

Team Overview

The MMIT Product Management Team is charged with developing, growing and maintaining the MMIT product portfolio that smooth access to lifechanging therapies. This entails managing products through all phases of the product lifecycle, from concept to sunset. The product management team embraces a market-backed perspective, champions unmet client needs, and is committed to a highly accountable and collaborative Product Management approach.

Job Description

MMIT is seeking experienced Data Scientists to meaningful contributes to the growth and development of the MMIT product portfolio. Ideal candidates are comfortable working with large, complex data sets to help inform, simplify and actualize key product capabilities. They will have comfort collaborating with various stakeholders and navigating ambiguity with limited direction. They will dedicate themselves to understanding the MMIT product portfolio (both current capabilities and future product roadmaps) and key data dependencies to inform data models, architecture, and new product development.

To succeed in this role, you will apply your skillset to

· Inform, create and/or maintain master data hierarchy, attributes and structure.

· Bridge claims data and coverage data – Refine existing rules and create and continually improve new methods for accurately assigning pharmacy and medical claims volumes to MMIT controller entities

· Apply data science to the creation of short and long form geographic market and controller entity descriptive narratives (NLP / NLG)

· Translate product management strategy into actionable data science deliverables, guiding development of data models, business rules and other advanced analytical capabilities

· Excel at communicating across a broad set of cross-functional stakeholders.

· Work collaboratively with MMIT product and data teams to develop and/or commercialize analytics use cases that may include market access, coverage / lives, and RWE data

· Effectively partner with external organizations including clients and vendors to develop meaning and projectable analytics about trends in market access dynamics across payers, geographies, indications, drugs, etc.

· Identify and evaluate additional data sources that could be integrated in value enhancing ways.

· Build reports, dashboards and/or other analyses as needed and/or as specific initiatives arise.

· Support various commercial or commercialization efforts as needed.

· Take a leading role in developing data science as a discipline across product management, development and data operations.

Qualifications

Relevant Skills and Experiences

· Postgraduate degree or higher involving machine learning, statistics, or computer science

· Experience of statistical / machine learning projects in academia or commercial sector end to end with proven delivery capability including capturing requirements, designing analysis plans, interfacing with clients and report / manuscript writing

· Experience in applying Natural Language Processing and related AI capabilities.

· Experience working with large and complex healthcare datasets, preferably patient-level longitudinal data and experience with studies of treatment effectiveness/outcomes, disease progression, adherence, healthcare utilization, patient journey, sales targeting, prescription/procedure volumes/shares, provider networks and prescribing/treatment patterns, etc

· Strong related programming skills including experience with good coding practices and a thorough understanding of the data science package landscape. Familiarity with Tableau and PowerBI a plus.

· Familiarity with agile software development practices

· Excellent written and spoken communication skills, including ability to present technical concepts to lay audiences, write analysis plans for projects, contribute to proposals / grant applications, pitch ideas effectively and persuasively to clients / internal stakeholders, etc.

· Demonstrated ability to work both collaboratively to solve complex problems and individually to research/advance areas of interest and exploration

· Proven ability to develop meaningful/valuable analytic insights from multiple data sources and support value through commercialization

Preferred candidates may also have

· Experience supporting or launching Data and Analytics or SaaS-based enterprise product

· Experience in managed markets and pharma market access ecosystem

· Experience in the commercial health insurance industry

· Knowledge of payer marketing, drug development lifecycle and drug launch process

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Position will be based in Livingston NJ or Yardley PA

(highly qualified remote applicants will be considered)

Travel Requirements:

Approximately <10>",3.8,"MMIT
3.8","Yardley, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Data Scientist Lead Virtual Hiring Event,"$99k-$165k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Booz Allen Hamilton Interview Event!

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, October 20, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Cloud/DevOps Engineer

Logistics Engineer, Sr. (TS/SCI)

Cloud Microsoft Exchange Engineer, Sr.

Java Developer

Data Scientist Lead

Intake Details:

Requirements

Experience with Cloud/DevOps

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Booz Allen Hamilton

Empower people to change the world℠

We are a global firm of approximately 27,200 diverse, passionate, and exceptional people driven to excel, do right, and realize positive change in everything we do.

We bring bold thinking and a desire to be the best in our work in consulting, analytics, digital solutions, engineering, and cyber, and with industries ranging from defense to health to energy to international development.

We celebrate and value diversity in all its forms; it’s something we truly value as a multicultural community of problem solvers. We believe in corporate and individual citizenship that make our communities better places for all.

We have one guiding purpose—to empower people to change the world. Our founder, Edwin Booz said it best: “Start with character… and fear not the future.” We bring a ferocious integrity to not only train our clients to tackle the problems they face today, but to help them change the status quo for tomorrow. Each day, we imagine, invent, and deliver new ways to better serve our employees, our clients, and the world.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

https://careers.boozallen.com/jobs/JobDetail/Lexington-Data-Scientist-Lead-R0090256/29932",3.9,"Booz Allen Hamilton
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
44,Sr. Data Visualization Developer,"$70k-$119k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Axle Informatics is a bioinformatics and information technology company that offers innovative computer services, informatics, and enterprise solutions to research centers and healthcare organizations around the globe. With experts in software engineering, bioinformatics and program management, we focus on developing and applying technology tools and techniques to empower decision-making and accelerate the discovery in translational research. We work with some of the top research organizations and facilities in the country including multiple institutes at the National Institutes of health (NIH) Overview We are looking for a Sr. Data Visualization Developer with a Front-End Developer experience and extensive D3.JS and/or WebGL experience to support projects at the NIH. The position will be based in Rockville, Maryland. We are looking for a skilled and motivated developer with expertise in interactive graphical representation of large data and/or streaming data for 2D and 3D visualizations. The successful applicant will be involved with developing user interfaces and data visualization tools from data acquired in collaboration with scientists, biologists, and/or clinicians across the NIH. Responsibilities * 5+ years of experience in web-based user-interface design and development. * Experience building large-scale, reactive web UI frontends: * UI design using HTML5, CSS, etc. * Javascript frameworks (e.g. React, Vue.js, Aurelia, Angular, etc). * Javascript build and bundling tools (gulp, webpack, requirejs, jspm, yarn). * Building interactive graphs using D3.js libraries. * Building interactive visualizations using WebGL or WebGL based (ie. Deck.GL) libraries. * Finding and integrating custom components in a chosen framework as well as building one from scratch when needed. * Defining API needs for the client. * Troubleshooting web applications. * Using debug tools such as Chrome developer tools. * Finding fixing bugs, cross browser issues, performance issues. * Use of message-bus architectures and message queue implementations in a web UI ( http2, websockets, wamp, websockets, server sent events, stomp). * Candidates must be comfortable working with: * Linux and MacOS operating systems. * A ticket system such as Jira. * A team documentation system such as Confluence. * Source control (git), collaboration tools. * Agile and scrum workflows. Preferred * Experience with any/all of the following: Plotly Javascript, ParaViewWeb, Tau Charts, C3.js, Nvd3, and/or ReCharts * Experience with any/all of the following: WebGL1.0/2.0, Deck.gl, Luma.gl, three.js, xeo.gl, stack.gl, wgpu, and dawn. * Experience with container (e.g. Docker) technologies. * Experience with build and deployment tools (ie. npm, Jenkins, TravisCL). * Listed examples of open-source work (e.g. GitHub) . * Experience developing for mobile platforms (native or web-based applications) . Qualifications * Bachelor’s Degree plus 2 years of experience in UI designing, or master’s degree. * 3-6 years developing and designing visualization platforms. * Strong knowledge and experience with D3.js and/or WebGL. * Excellent communication skills and ability to work in a team environment. Benefits    * Paid Time Off (PTO)  * 10 Paid Federal holidays  * Generous health coverage provided with no monthly premium to the employee  * Generous vision and dental coverage provided with no monthly premium to the employee  * Short and Long-Term Disability coverage (paid by company)  * Basic Life and AD&D coverage (paid by company; option to purchase additional coverage)  * 401(K) with significant company match and no vesting period  * Competitive salaries with performance bonus opportunities  * Discount plan for legal services & identify theft protection  * Flexible Spending Accounts:   * Healthcare (FSA)  * Parking Reimbursement Account (PRK)  * Dependent Care Assistant Program (DCAP)  * Transportation Reimbursement Account (TRN)    The diversity of Axle’s employees is a tremendous asset. We are firmly committed to providing equal opportunity in all aspects of employment and will not tolerate any illegal discrimination or harassment based age, race, gender, religion, national origin, disability, marital status, covered veteran status, sexual orientation, status with respect to public assistance, and other characteristics protected under state, federal, or local law and to deter those who aid, abet, or induce discrimination or coerce others to discriminate. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $55.00 - $67.00 per hour Benefits: * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Paid time off * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * UI designing: 1 year (Preferred) * developing & designing visualization platforms: 3 years (Preferred) * Deck.gl, Luma.gl, three.js, xeo.gl, stack.gl, wgpu: 1 year (Preferred) * container (e.g. Docker) technologies: 1 year (Preferred) * D3.js and/or WebGL: 1 year (Preferred) Work authorization: * United States (Preferred)",3.9,"Axle Informatics
3.9","Rockville, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
45,Data Scientist BSLEF8,"$57k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
46,Data Analyst,"$33k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)",,3.4,"divvyDOSE
3.4","Moline, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
47,Data Scientist,-1,"TACG is a driven Alaskan Native 8(a) professional consulting firm, that focuses on employee growth in collaboration with client delivery. Our portfolio ranges from support work with Health and Human Services to highly skilled Defense consulting. We have recently been awarded as one of INC.5000's fastest growing companies and received multiple best places to work awards. How can you help shape TACG?
Position Summary:

TACG is looking for a Data Scientist to support the business in defining information/data requirements to allow for the design, development, testing/evaluation, implementation and sustainment of critical business applications and IT capabilities. The Data Scientist will provide technical expertise in Business Intelligence (BI) tools and programming languages to support data analytics, data visualizations, and predictive analysis.

Responsibilities:
Applies analytic methodologies and principles to address client needs.
Applies analytic techniques in the evaluation of project objectives and contributes to the implementation of strategic direction.
Performs analyst functions including data collection, interviewing, data cleansing, data modeling, project testing, and creation of performance measurements to support project objectives.
Performs data collection, interviewing, data cleansing, data modeling, project testing, and creation of performance measurements to support project objectives.
Required Knowledge, Skills and Experience:
Excellent analytical skills
Experience using SQL, Python, and R languages for statistical analysis
Experience using Tableau Desktop, Prep Builder and Reader for the generation, sustainment and viewing of data visualization dashboards
Experience in ETL, specifically with data resident on SharePoint
3 years of experience with a Bachelor's Degree in computer science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or engineering; or, 1 year of experience with a Master's Degree in computer science, information systems management, mathematics, operations research, statistics, or engineering.
Education & Certification Requirements:
Four year degree or a Master's Degree in Computer Science, Business, Management or related field
Preferred Skills:
Creative thinker
Strong communication skills
Proficient in MS Office suite of tools, specifically MS Excel.
Excellent team skills.
Experience or understanding of AF or DoD processes, data and systems
Disclaimer:
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this classification. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified.

Work Environment:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions
All work will be performed in an office environment.
Physical Requirements:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The employee is frequently required to talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk; reach with hands and arms to stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision.
Citizenship: United States
Security Clearance: NACI background will be required
Percent of Travel Required: Up to 10%
FLSA Status: Full-time, Exempt
Benefits:
We understand that our employees make us the great company we are, so we want to give back as much as possible. Whether it's our flexible wellness program that gives you the power to do what makes you happy or focusing on career development utilizing our tuition reimbursement, we're sure to have every benefit you're looking for, to also include; matching 401(k), Medical, Vision, and Dental Coverage and much more!

TACG is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.7,"TACG Solutions
4.7","Dayton, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,"$106k-$182k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,"MITRE
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
49,Senior Data Analyst,"$83k-$141k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you want to innovate customer experiences and make business decisions smarter through data? Are you ready to join a collaborative and motivated team diving into cutting edge big data technology? As an Senior Data Analyst on the Single View of the Customer (SVOC) team, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information, and uses that information to drive action. You will have the opportunity to interact with all our SVOC scrum teams, ensuring that we are incorporating new technologies seamlessly, all while providing value to our customers. This opportunity also allows you to dive in to complex technologies, and work with a very forward-thinking group of peers!

Familiar, but never leveraged big data technologies? No worries! When you first join our SVOC team, you will have the opportunity to come up to speed on the cutting-edge technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with functional stakeholders to identify requirements and expected outcomes.
o Experience in developing test plans and scenarios to ensure the highest quality deliverables
o Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
o Working knowledge of Big Data and the Hadoop Ecosystem
o Outstanding time management skills and attention to detail
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o Strong presentation skills. Should be comfortable with presenting to all levels of management
o A Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, related field (business, finance, mathematics, computer science), or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Qualifications:

o Understanding and experience with Web Services and APIs
o Experience in querying NoSQL databases
o Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment
o Exposure to QLIK or other data visualization tools
o Experience with providing Production Support

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO:

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
50,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,"$49k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.9,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
3.9","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
51,Sr. Data Scientist - Model Governance,"$101k-$163k
(Glassdoor Est.)","General Summary:

The position plays a critical role in the oversight of predictive analytics and robust modeling at Elevate. The Sr. Data Scientist, Model Governance provides effective challenge, review, oversight, guidance, and ongoing monitoring for all models used within our Account Origination (Fraud, Risk and Response) and Account Management functions.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Review models and provide effective challenge and feedback to the developers to action change.
Manage a model review/validation program aligned to OCC 2011-12 / SR 11-7 guidelines.
Perform model stability monitoring to ensure ongoing performance for business applications.
Deliver model variable stability and performance reviews on determined cadence.
Write clear and detailed model documentation coordinating efforts with the model developers.
Work with other members of the Governance team to ensure all documentation is saved in the official repository and meets internal Credit Policy standards for all new and existing models.
Utilize advanced statistical software to validate linear/non-linear, parametric/non-parametric based predictive modeling/data mining analytic methodologies.
Creation of associated decks for presentation to executive management.
Present findings and make recommendations to Model and Risk Governance teams.
Act as liaison between partner banks / third party validators and Elevate.
Complete all other projects as assigned.
Experience and Education:
Minimum M.S./M.A. in a highly quantitative field (Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other quantitatively-oriented degree) or experience in a process related Senior Analyst role in an analytical capacity.
Strong quantitative /statistical modeling capabilities, including with 5+ years of experience in credit scoring and model development preferred.
3+ years’ experience in Risk Management or Model Governance functions including knowledge of OCC / FDIC regulations for model documentation.
3+ years’ experience within the consumer lending environment.
Strong SAS, R, and SQL skills preferred, with ability to conduct extensive data research required. Candidates with experience with other software such as Python, SPSS, MATLAB may also be considered.
Demonstrated experience working with large complex data sources.
Strong PowerPoint presentation skills a plus.
Required Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work in fast-paced environment with ever-changing demands.
Ability to manage multiple projects at one time, possibly including overseeing others projects.
Strong communication skills. Must be able to clearly communicate in speech and writing with Risk Management peers, Marketing, Operations, Collections, Finance, C-level Executives, CEO, and BOD.",3.6,"Elevate Credit
3.6","Addison, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
52,Data Scientist,"$90k-$148k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description*
Job Title*: Data Scientist
Job Purpose*:

Nutrisystem is seeking a Data Scientist to join its growing Analytics community. This role will develop, manage, and deliver analytical solutions to solve complex business challenges. The Data Scientist will closely interact with online and offline Marketing, Product Development, Call Center Sales, Retail, and Finance to influence key business decisions through fact-driven insights. The ideal candidate will possess excellent analytical and communication skills and have a history of thriving in fast-paced business environments.

Essential Job Responsibilities*:
Develop queries and performs extensive programming to access, transform, and prepare data for analysis, ad-hoc, and automated reporting and modeling. Create visualizations for a variety of projects.
Support ad-hoc analysis, discussions and conclusions around the efficacy of marketing channels to drive revenue per customer, length of stay and lifetime value.
Analyze data to describe customer behavior and preferences, understand marketing channel effectiveness, diagnose customer experience problems, and measure the impact of initiatives.
Prepare and deliver insight presentations and recommendations. Communicates complex material in digestible terms appropriate for each audience. Educate company executives and the broader team on analytical findings and implications using storytelling and data visualization techniques.
Design analytic plans, translating business problems/opportunities into analytic approaches. Engage with project sponsors and stakeholders to understand each business question. Probe for hidden questions and goals. Bring structure to each request and translate requirements into the appropriate analytic approach.
Participate in special projects and performs other duties as required.
Job Qualifications*:
Education*
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Analytics, Operations Research, Information Technology, Computer Science, or another quantitative field required. Master’s degree preferred.
Experience*
Must have a minimum of five (5) years of experience working in an analytical role with a history of taking on additional responsibilities with data analysis, measurement reporting
Must have five (5) years of experience with SQL programming
Must have a minimum of three (3) years of experience working with relational databases and associated data query tools. Experience with cloud databases a plus (e.g. AWS Redshift, Google BigQuery, Snowflake).
Must have proficiency in data visualization and report writing technologies using at least one of the following Business Intelligence tools Tableau, Power BI, QLIK or SAS. Knowledge of Looker preferred.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Experience with R programming or another statistical language
Knowledge / Skills*
Excellent verbal and written communication skills. Experience presenting to senior executives distilling complex concepts into actionable recommendations
Advanced Microsoft Excel skills including pivot tables, data manipulation and analysis
Ability to work in a team-oriented environment.
Licenses / Certifications*
NA

Company Info*:
Tivity Health: *
Tivity Health®, Inc. (tivityhealth.com) is a leading provider of health improvement, nutrition, fitness and social engagement solutions at scale to improve clinical outcomes, reduce healthcare costs and create opportunities to feel better, work better and live better. With decades of clinical and operational expertise, the company touches millions of consumers through its integrated portfolio of brands and works directly with hundreds of healthcare practitioners and many of the nation’s largest payers and employers. Tens of millions of Americans are currently eligible for Tivity Health’s SilverSneakers®, Prime® Fitness, WholeHealth Living™ and flip50™ programs and millions of people have lost weight with Nutrisystem®, South Beach Diet® and DNA BodyBlueprint™. As part of its commitment to tackling social isolation and loneliness, in 2017, Tivity Health launched a rural aging initiative to address challenges unique to older adults in rural communities.
Our Purpose: *
We empower older adults to live their best lives – with vitality, dignity and purpose. We enable healthy aging – both in place and in community.
Our Vision: *
We will transform the aging experience – reducing the burden of chronic conditions among older adults, enabling these to be their best years, and inspiring the next generation that the best is yet to come.
EEO/AA*
Tivity Health. Inc. is an equal employment opportunity employer and is committed to a proactive program of diversity development. Tivity Health, Inc. will continue to recruit, hire, train, and promote into all job levels without regard to race, religion, gender, marital status, familial status, national origin, age, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, source of income, or veteran status.
SQF Standards*
All staff shall be informed of their responsibility to report food safety and quality issues to personnel with authority to initiate action.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We will be working from home until the end of the year (2020). While we plan to be back in the office soon, that date is not determined.

Experience:
Relational Databases: 3 years (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
tivityhealth.com
Company's Facebook page:
tivityhealth.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"Nutrisystem
3.3","Fort Washington, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Data Scientist,"$88k-$148k
(Glassdoor Est.)","POSITION SUMMARY:

The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual who likes to work in a multi-disciplinary team. The Data Scientist will be instrumental in the analysis and interpretation of high-throughput molecular data. Additionally, the individual in this role should have solid Data Science background and be strongly goal-oriented with a focus on real-world impact.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Statistical and bioinformatics analyses of high-throughput molecular data
Interaction with internal and external collaborators to understand, design, and develop the requested solutions
Development and execution of data analysis protocols to support the company's discovery pipeline
Presentation of scientific results internally and externally
Preparation and submission of scientific manuscripts for review and publication
Other duties as assigned
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Sciences or related field with 0-3 years of experience; or an MS with 5-7 years of industry experience
Proficiency in R is required. Experience in Bioconductor is preferred
Experience in Linux and Big Data technologies
Experience in Scala, C, Python and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with Graph Neural Networks (GNNs) is a plus
Proven ability to find creative and practical solutions to complex problems
Proven experience in applying Data Science methodologies to extract, process, and transform data from multiple sources
Proven ability to deliver outputs in a comprehensive format that highlights major trends, avoid miss-interpretations and value the conclusions
Proven ability to demonstrate attention to detail and record-keeping
Quick learner, extremely flexible and adaptable to the needs of internal collaborators in a dynamic environment
Ability to efficiently work in multiple projects
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team-oriented environment",4.1,"Berg Health
4.1","Framingham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
54,Data Engineer,-1,"At Moser Consulting, a data engineer / bi engineer, performs advanced (senior-level) data analysis and data engineering work. Work involves leading initiatives to create data analytics-driven solutions for critical business objectives. This position represents the data management team to our business partners, and brings technical expertise to citizen BI and data analytics teams across the agency. Sr Consultants may supervise the work of others. Works under minimal supervision with extensive latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgement. Consultants will have supervision and likely work with or under the direction of a Principal or Senior Consultant.
Works closely with customers regarding their specific data needs to develop the requirements for data subject areas needed.
Captures the inventory of data sources and dashboards to prepare and manage integrated data.
Acts as the IT knowledge leader on data warehousing and data analytics to the business.
Ensures data warehouse implementations meet business expectations and coordinates customer acceptance testing and training.
Ensures the customer can exploit the data warehouse solutions and helps identify additional possible uses of information; anticipates future needs and opportunities.
Assists in the identification and integration of potential new data sources.
Designs and develops ELT pipelines that extract data from various sources and load into the data warehouse or other systems.
Ensures that controls to verify the accuracy and consistency of data are implemented and monitored.
Provides ongoing operational support of the enterprise data warehouse, continued development and enhancement of the data warehouse, automation of daily data extracts and external system feeds, and development and enhancement of current dashboards.
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited four-year college or university with major coursework in computer information systems, computer science, data management, information systems or information science or a related field.
High School diploma or equivalent and additional directly related experience may substitute for the required education on a year-for-year basis.
Six (6) years of experience in data warehouse, including dimensional modeling, ETL/ELT pipeline design & development, data management, data analysis, process measurement, and metrics management, or a related discipline.
Two (2) years of experience working closely with business analytics teams and data analysts, including PowerBI (or equivalent) experience with financial and accounting data.
Successful track record of Business Intelligence/Data Warehouse solution implementations (design, implementation, data visualization and ongoing support/maintenance) with extensive interaction with business users.
Emerging data and analytics technologies
Cloud platforms and development patterns
Relational and non-relational data structures, theories, principles, and practices.
Metadata management and associated processes.
Data encryption and secure transmission practices (SSL, SSH, SFTP, Certificates, PKI, OAUTH2).
Machine-learning, statistical analysis, artificial intelligence, predictive analytics.
Microsoft/Azure Certifications, Snowflake Certifications are beneficial.
Preferred Locations: Indianapolis, IN and Baltimore, MD
Benefits

For more than 20 years, Moser Consulting has been the go-to source for exceptional IT talent with the ability to self-manage. At Moser Consulting, our people are our #1 asset. We hire the best people, welcome them like family, connect them with opportunities, and let them do what they do best: produce innovative solutions to technology problems.

Our culture gives us a competitive advantage by keeping our employees happy, healthy, and by lowering stress levels in a very demanding industry. It is no accident that we are recognized as one of the Best Places to Work in Indiana. We focus on giving employees: an incredible work space; a fun, collaborative, and creative atmosphere; an extremely generous compensation package; and dozens of outstanding and unique perks usually not found at one company.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.",4.8,"Moser Consulting
4.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
55,Data Scientist Risk Analyst,"$50k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Oasis Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to support the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) in Washington, DC.
The successful candidate shall provide support in data analytics, Python, data visualization, dashboards and use of data analytic tools. Activities which the contractor may be tasked to perform include gathering requirements from stakeholders, conducting financial data analysis and risk analysis in a Big Data environment, and creating interactive dashboard reports and documentations.

LOCATION: Washington, DC

JOB STATUS: Full-Time

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Certifications, Experience, Skills)

SECURITY CLEARANCE: Ability to pass a Special Agreement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquires (NACI) Background Investigation

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree

CERTIFICATIONS AND TOOLS: Certifications in Data Analytics program languages such as Python and R preferred but not required. Experience with Global Risk product a plus, but not required.

EXPERIENCE LEVEL: A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field and a minimum of 5 years of industrial analytics experience using Python (recent use during the past 3 years) as well as extensive experience with SQL.
Specific experience with financial or market risk analysis is a Must.

DESCRIPTION: Functionally, the candidate will be responsible for:

Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements.
Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and Machine Learning techniques.
Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, (such as Value at Risk (VaR): computation and evaluation, VaR tracking (VaR evolution over time), Incremental (and marginal) VaR calculation for individual asset classes /positions, conditional VaR, stress testing).
Test each project thoroughly before presenting it to the task order project manager for quality control. Document test results as part of the project closeout documentation.
Create documentation as required under the PMLC and the Configuration Change Board (CCB) in order to move projects to the production environment.
Coordinate with internal and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues.
Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC which may include regular status meetings, user acceptance testing meetings and ad hoc development discussions.
Data analysis tasks may be varied. They will include complex data requests that require data mining, extraction, and query optimization services from Divisions throughout the CFTC.
Assist business users, economists, statisticians, and others, as required, to support effective use of analytic techniques and CFTC-approved tools to meet the customers various analytic needs.

Who We Are

Oasis Systems is a premier provider of customer-driven, cost-effective and quality Engineering Services; Enterprise Systems and Applications; Human Factors Engineering; Information Technology and Cyber Security; Professional Services; and Specialized Engineering Solutions to the Department of Defense, FAA, NRC and other federal agencies.

We strive to be an exciting and welcoming company that attracts, develops, motivates and retains the most talented, skilled and dedicated people in the industry; where they are encouraged to achieve personal excellence, purpose, and their full potential and career aspirations; while supporting mission-critical national security technologies and programs.

Oasis Systems is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of any legally protected characteristic including, but not limited to, race, color, religion, national origin, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, medical condition, military veteran status or on the basis of physical handicap which, with reasonable accommodation, render the application to satisfactorily perform the job available.",3.8,"Oasis Systems LLC
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
56,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,"$99k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,"Acuity Insurance
4.9","Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
57,Marketing Data Analyst,"$34k-$62k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:
Can you work in a relationship with other people where it requires ongoing flexibility?
Do you have an upbeat, positive attitude?
Do you take pride in knowing you are helping to make things happen?

If you can answer yes to these questions, Idaho Central Credit Union may have an opportunity ideally suited for you.

As a Marketing Data Analyst, your primary function is to interpret credit union data, analyze results and implement decisions based on the data. You will be responsible for turning data into information and insight that aids in campaign and business decisions. Also you will be responsible for performing a range of functions in support of market research, market assessment and campaign implementation.

Responsibilities:

Assist in managing technical aspects of key marketing systems (marketing automation, CRM, data warehouse) used to generate, distribute, and report.
Establish and maintain scalable processes that ensure best practices in campaign and lead management.
Create and maintain metrics reports on marketing and sales activities, effectiveness, and business impact.
Analyze marketing and sales data to develop insights and make recommendations on areas for optimization
Monitor and maintain data quality within the marketing database.
Evaluate new technologies and add-on applications to improve and optimize marketing team performance.
Manage membership targeting to strengthen relationships, prevent attrition, and increase profitability.
Leverage web and email engagement to create member insight and data to help improve individual experiences with our digital channels.
Generate and govern segmentation efforts by developing queries and custom reports, target groups, and campaigns for product and service performance.
Track all marketing campaigns and provide meaningful analysis and insight for future efforts.
Analyze consumer segments and other demographic information from the membership database to provide insight for product development, usage, and cross-sell opportunities.
Manage third-party vendor integration with marketing systems including Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Integrator MCIF, Encompass CRM and Microsoft Power BI.
Represent the Credit Union at community events as needed.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Marketing, Mass Communication, Advertising or related field. 5-9 years of experience with database marketing required. Preferable experience with: Raddon Integrator MCIF, Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Microsoft Power BI, SQL, and data warehouse experience. Strong analytical skills. Proficiency in marketing automation systems and integrating those systems with other technologies. Technically capable, excellent communicator and a desire to improve processes. Math skills, Secondary-level computer knowledge including Microsoft Office, especially Excel and pivot tables, etc. Ability to maintain the confidentiality of Credit Union and member records at all times. A demonstrated cooperative and positive attitude toward members and other Credit Union staff. Professional in appearance, attendance, quality, and quantity of work performed. Ability to analyze member needs, develop, and coordinate marketing activities to fit member needs with Credit Union products and services. Must be willing to comply with the Bank Secrecy Act and USA Patriot Act as implemented by Idaho Central Credit Union. Team member will be asked to work extended/unique hours.

Perform tasks requiring manual dexterity (processing paperwork, filing, stapling, sorting, collating, typing, counting cash, etc.) Sit for extended periods of time. Lift 20-40 pounds of office supplies (copy paper, computer paper, mail, etc). Some heavy lifting may be required in order to execute proper event logistics. Repetitive motion using wrists, hands, and fingers. Reach keyboards. Ability to operate basic office machines (calculator, computer, telephone, copy machine, fax machine, etc).

Must be eligible for membership at Idaho Central Credit Union to obtain employment.

EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability

Idaho Central Credit Union is a dynamic financial institution that is focused on helping our members achieve financial success. Established in 1940 we have become the largest and fastest growing financial institution in the state of Idaho. ICCU was voted for large companies the Best Place to work in Idaho. We have also been named by S&P Global Market Intelligence as the top performing credit union in the nation. We are a talent based organization looking for talented individuals to help our members achieve financial success.",4.2,"Idaho Central Credit Union
4.2","Chubbuck, ID",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
58,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,"$68k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,"MITRE
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
59,LabVIEW Developer/Architect (Control & Data Acquisition Engineer),-1,"Your Opportunity: *
As a LabVIEW developer/architect (controls and data acquisition engineer) you will work with Los Alamos National Laboratory (LANL) in delivering a new National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) flash X-ray radiography capability at the Nevada National Security Site (NNSS) for the Advanced Sources and Detectors Project (ASD). This radiography capability is a multi-pulse linear induction accelerator, Scorpius, to be commissioned at the NNSSs U1a Complex by 2024. A national project team comprised of personnel from LANL, Sandia National Laboratory (SNL), Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory (LLNL), and Nevada National Security Site (NNSS), as well as academic and industrial partners, will research, design, build, install, and commission Scorpius to fulfill the Department of Energy (DOE) National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) subcritical experiment program mission needs. The LANL ASD Technical Development office (ASD-TECH) is responsible for coordinating and executing these activities.

You will be working with the technical leads for various Scorpius systems to support the design and development of instrumentation and control systems, process control systems, and data acquisition systems. You will also assist with the design and documentation of key elements such as the control room layout, network layout, controls schematics while working collaboratively with a large team of scientists, vendors, and engineers to provide instrumentation and controls systems and data acquisition systems for various Scorpius systems. Your work will have a signification impact on our nations safety and security.
What You will Do: *
Develop instrumentation and controls software utilizing LabVIEW when possible to automate operation of process controls equipment and accelerator components.

Assist with design and testing of a virtual Scorpius software emulator.

Design and develop instrumentation and controls, and data acquisition systems for the downstream transport, detector and global controls systems while working under the direct supervision of a Lead Controls Engineer.

Develop and revise design drawings and instrumentation and controls schematics using Autocad or Autocad Electrical.

Assist with design and layout drawings and schematics for various systems within Scorpius project.

Involvement with vendor and SMEs in acquiring requirements and design of control software to be developed and integrated into the overall global control system for Scorpius.

Produce materials for technical reports, documents, presentations, and concept papers.

Partner with multiple engineering disciplines to accomplish the work.
What You Will Need: *
Certified LabVIEW Developer or LabVIEW Architect.

10 years of experience with NI LabVIEW and in the design and implementation of signal conditioning electronics, analog and digital I/O, and software development.

Bachelors degree in engineering (Electrical, Mechanical, or Chemical preferred) or equivalent work experience.

Experience with Ethernet industrial communications, RS485 and RS232 communications.

Experience and knowledge of equipment rack design, power supplies, and electrical power distribution.

Experiences with NI hardware platforms including CompactRIO, CompactDAQ, and/or PXI.

Experience with the design and development of Data Acquisition hardware such as NI hardware, LabVIEW PXI chassis, various interface cards, oscilloscopes, and digital multi-meters.

Experience with LabVIEW development to include custom drivers for various equipment, FPGA development and troubleshooting.

Able to define, design, develop, test, debug, and maintain LabVIEW code for machine control software.

Proficient with AutoCAD or AutoCAD electrical.

Excellent verbal, interpersonal, and written communication skills.

Motivated self-starter with strong attention to detail and ability to work independently.

Accelerator experience is preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity: *
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status and any other protected class under state or federal law.
What We Offer: *
We know benefits are important to you. Therefore, we offer an array of excellent benefits including medical, dental, and vision insurance, generous paid time off policy, and 401(k) employer contribution. Furthermore, you will have access to a health savings plan, flexible spending plan, and superior paid holidays offering.

TechSource has been providing superior science and engineering consulting services to a multitude of government clients for over twenty years in several locations across the United States. We are passionate about our people because we know our people are what drives our success. We believe that trust is the key to our relationships with our clients, our communities, and our people. We pride ourselves on our honesty, our ethical behavior, and our open and straightforward communication. Integrity is at the core of everything that we do.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
LabVIEW: 10 years (Required)
instrumentation and controls: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://techsource-inc.com/about/careers
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.5,"TechSource, Inc.
4.5","Los Alamos, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
60,"Data Scientist, Medical Diagnostics",-1,"_*The Company*_
The world is facing a medical crisis, bacteria are increasingly evolving resistance to even our strongest antibiotics. The problem is already very real and immediate; for example, bloodstream infection leading to sepsis is now responsible for more than half of all deaths in hospitals and is the most expensive condition treated in hospitals. Sepsis mortality rate increases >6% every hour without effective antibiotic treatment. Yet, despite the life and death urgency, and healthcare cost impacts, current methodologies require 3 days to determine the correct antibiotic.

Specific Diagnostics has developed a breakthrough solution to rapidly determine the effective antibiotic treatment for bloodstream and other acute infections. Used for bloodstream infection Specific’s solution provides results 2 days sooner than existing methods, saving patients suffering from drug-resistant infection.

We have been funded by nearly $30 M in non-dilutive government sponsored research support and recently $17.5 M in venture capital. This is an opportunity to join us at an inflection point in our commercial growth as we bring our first key product to market and with recognition from major customers fueling an expansion of our staff.
_The Job*_
_*_*This is the job for you if want to be where your ideas to be central to a world-changing and lifesaving product. Data science and analytics are at the core of our company we are seeking an exceptional talent to join our team. You will be a key contributor and critical to the success of the company. The main analysis tasks you are expected to contribute to are:
Analytical methods and statistical analysis for processing high-volume, temporal high-dimensional data streams generated in real-time from our proprietary sensor technology.
The development of data-driven visualization tools for the explorative analysis of high-dimensional data.
The application and development of suitable pre-processing, feature-selection and dimensional reduction techniques to detect, measure and account for data artifacts.
The development and validation of applications for a medical instrument built under the guidance of a senior manager experienced in the application development discipline (so you’ll be learning the valuable skill of integrating your work into applications for medical diagnostic devices).
Algorithm development for decisions and measurements from multi-dimensional data streams.
This is not the job for a numbers only person. We want someone with a passion for and experience in the sciences that will lead you to look deeply into the sources of the data along with the scientists so that the data analysis is influenced by the science of our diagnostic technology and the science is influenced by the analysis.
_You_*
You have a proven track record of successfully developing, validating and deploying data analysis and analytical methods to solve challenging real-world applications. You are deeply familiar with a broad range of analytical models and are at the pulse of developments in the field. Ideally you have proven expertise in the analysis of spatio-temporal data. You have a strong domain knowledge in the field of statistical analysis and signal processing. You should have a track record of success in your education and projects and have these characteristics and skills:
MS degree in computer sciences, biomedical engineering, or related field and at least 5 years of interesting relevant experience.
Expert in R and proficient with C++ and Python.
Expertise in analytical methods and statistical analysis.
Proficiency in SQL as well as NoSQL database technologies a plus.
Full fluency (verbal and written) of the English language is a must.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
relavent: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Specific Diagnostics
2.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
61,Senior Data Scientist,"$80k-$132k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Benson Hill empowers innovators to develop more healthy, tasty and sustainable food by unlocking the natural genetic diversity of plants. Benson Hill's CropOS platform combines machine learning and big data with breeding techniques and plant biology to drastically accelerate and simplify the product development process. This platform allows for cost-effective and more efficient ways for companies to analyze and make improvements in plant genetics. Benson Hill brings a unique and holistic approach to our product and platform development, as we span a broader workflow involving trait and seed development, genome editing, and breeding all the way to creating better ingredients and varieties that tap a strong consumer demand for more flavorful and nutritious fruits and vegetables. More information can be found online at www.bensonhill.com. Follow us on Twitter at @BensonHillInc.

Our Purpose and Core Values

Our Core Values are a set of common principles we share that are fundamental to our company's identity.
Be Bold! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Inspired! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Real! We understand who we are, what we want to achieve, and what it takes to get there. We hold each other accountable through timely, candid, and well-intentioned feedback. Together we engage in honest communication and healthy debate that leads to success through true alignment.
Department Overview

The Data Science & Platform Engineering Department leads the development of Benson Hill's crop design platform, CropOS which combines machine learning and big data with genome editing and plant biology to accelerate and simplify the product development process. The team partners with the Research & Development teams on the development of a portfolio of offerings (commercial, product, or platform related) that meet the needs of Benson Hill's business units.

Position Summary

We are actively seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing Research and Development Department. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing models enabling field experimental design and optimization of product performance across testing environments. This person will work closely with Benson Hill data engineers, scientists and project leaders to maximize the impact of Benson Hill's product development programs.

You Will:

(Essential Duties and Responsibilities)
Develop and refine data analysis, storage, and modeling systems.
Conduct independent analyses of performance, and use advanced approaches to identify predictive models in a geospatial framework.
Participate in the design of hypothesis-driven experiments and analyses.
Perform spatial and statistical analysis on experimental outputs and interpret results
Communicate results in written and visual formats to scientists and program leaders.
Identify opportunities for model enhancements and opportunities for new models to create value in the product discovery and testing pipeline.
You Have:

Education
PhD preferred (minimum BS plus 4 years' experience), in applied mathematics, physics, engineering, statistics, ecology, or closely related field with formal training in statistics and experimental design, with demonstrable track record of peer-reviewed publications.
Experience
Demonstrated enthusiasm for data-driven discovery.
Experience with geospatial analyses, modeling, and interactive system development.
Highly developed ability to identify and evaluate predictive models and their utility.
Experience with machine learning and statistical concepts, packages and libraries.
Background and experience analyzing data with Python, R, or Julia.
Expert with at least one scripting language, Python or R preferred.
Ability to work in collaborative team, and the ability to respond positively to critiques of work.
Excellent communication skills, both electronic and in-person.
A track record of producing deliverables and meeting tight release deadlines.
Ability to work autonomously, identify key tasks, and find solutions to challenges.
Experience organizing and planning complex projects
Strong record of personal development and learning new technologies.
Software/Skillset
Strong understanding of scientific concepts, approaches, application, and interpretation.
Demonstrated experience with common machine learning approaches, statistics, geospatial and command line (e.g. R) applications.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in associated area, with proven publication and communication track record.
Familiarity with crop science and agronomic applications and modeling a plus.
Background and experience using AWS or experience with other cloud architectures
Other
Attention to detail
Strong Customer Focus
Collaborative
Ability to focus and work independently with little direction
We have a Total Rewards Package at Benson Hill that consists of more than just your paycheck. Total Rewards at Benson Hill covers Pay (salary and bonus), Health (employer benefit contributions) and Wealth (investments). Some of the perks include:
A Collaborative Environment
A flexible PTO program with a focus on work/life balance
Competitive medical benefits and retirement savings plan
FREE Dental and Vision Coverage
Education reimbursement
PAID parental leave
And more.",3.0,"Benson Hill
3.0","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
62,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,"$83k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.3,"LMI
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
63,Data Scientist,"$120k-$140k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
64,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Job Description

GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to create and enhance data driven products
Analyze and extract insights from internal and external data
Work with Big Data and transform complex datasets into more usable formats
Work with a variety of data science tools and programming languages such as Python, c++, SQL
Work independently and collaborate with other groups to solve complex problems
Create and present analyses to internal and external partners and clients
Document models and write code to track and monitor models and product performance
Understand the realities of model development and make pragmatic and business-aware choices when trading-off sophistication and accuracy versus implementation and performance costs
Other related duties assigned as needed

EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:
PhD in Statistics, Decision Sciences, Applied Mathematics, Economics or Computer Science or the equivalent combination of education, training, and work experience ( will consider a masters degree).

GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Knowledge in machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistical modeling, data visualization, and data analysis

Proficient in data science tools and programming languages such as Python, C++, SQL
Knowledge of financial services industry
Ability to collaborate with others and solve complex problem
Proficiency in solutions design and requirements
Outstanding verbal and written communication skills to technical and non-technical audiences of various levels in the organization, e.g., executive, management, individual contributors
Excellent analytical, decision-making, problem-solving, team, and time management skills
Ability to persuade and influence others on the best approach
Positive outlook, strong work ethic, and responsive to internal and external clients and contacts
Ability to work as part of a team or alone making a strong contribution in either scenario
Exceptional statistical, mathematical and analytical skills
Superior interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Delivery-oriented team player who takes responsibility for the team’s success and strives to continually learn and improve
Ability to interface with all levels of employees and effectively interact with various functional areas and facilities

Please forward your resume to kevin@libertyjobs.com
#LI-KM1

#IT",4.3,"Liberty Personnel Services
4.3","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
65,Senior Machine learning scientist,-1,"Responsibilities:
Collect image/video data and clean/organize/augment them,
Build machine (deep)learning framework to train various models for camera image-based applications for autonomous driving
Implement the inference process for on-vehicle testing.
Qualification:
MS or Ph.D. in computer science or related real-world experience
Extensive experience in machine learning and deep learning
Experience in image/video processing and computer vision
Comfortable writing code in C/C++, experience in Pytorch/Tensorflow
Familiar with motion estimation, depth estimation, image segmentation, camera pose estimation, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Black Sesame Technologies Inc
4.0","Santa Clara, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
66,Computer Scientist 1,-1,"Computer Scientist

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a broad software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Jr. Computer Scientist position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software repository containing code in Python, MATLAB, C++ and Java. Candidate will also be responsible for maintaining this repository and its accessibility. Machine Learning, Cloud Technology, and a strong CS background is highly desired. Good communication skills with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Some experience in scientific programming
Experience programming in a high-level language such as C/C++ on Unix/Linux platforms
Experience programming in high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Familiarity with interfacing C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages.
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
67,Consumer Lending Data Analyst,"$44k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are searching for a Consumer Lending Data Analyst to research and analyze data in order to make strategic business recommendations. In this role, you will perform competitor research to enhance our product strategy and direction. Having 3 years' experience in a complex analyst role will help you succeed in this role. Additionally, having an understating of lending principals and risk metrics will help the candidate be successful.
Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job Duties:
In partnership with key stakeholders, analyze, test and launch new initiatives to increase productivity
Provide data driven insights and recommendations to various departments within the credit union
Perform key competitor research and analysis to better inform product strategy and direction
Creating advanced reports, dashboards and deep dive analyses that inform and drive the
credit union’s product and business strategy
Create and refine predictive models on product, marketing, and risk initiatives
Uncover actionable insights for increased product performance
Partnering with marketing, finance and digital teams to enable business and systems synergy
Essential Skills:
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role; financial institution strongly preferred
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience with data collection methodologies
Experience with relational databases, e.g., SQL, Alteryx, and Tableau will help you succeed in this role
Familiarity with coding languages, e.g., R, Python
Strong understanding of statistical overlays and models for predictive analytics
Ability to analyze data from a strategic point of view and contribute to and influence discussions that drive the business
Ability to use key performance metrics and data to provide insights and make strategic business recommendations
Proficiency to organize, analyze and interpret data to explain complex irregularities or trends
Form strong relationships with cross-functional teams where support, resources and synergy is needed
Basic understanding of lending principals and risk metrics
Project Management experience; familiarity with Six Sigma/DMAIC methodologies
Expert knowledge of Excel
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, other related fields of study or equivalent experience
Location: Hillsboro, OR 97124

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position

FT123

#LI-EK",3.3,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.3","Hillsboro, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
68,Research Data Scientist,"$72k-$120k
(Glassdoor Est.)","IAI is looking for a talented research scientist to contribute to research and development efforts in machine learning, graph theory, and scientific software development. The candidate will incorporate novel ideas and improve the state of the art on advanced projects related to processing of large networks, analyzing data in high dimensions and implementing high performance computing software. Additionally, the candidate will develop a portfolio of related research by extending existing work and proposing new methods with novel application domains.

You are highly encouraged to apply if you enjoy working with data and algorithms, passionate about understanding how things work, want to solve complex problems and strive to stay current on the technology and literature in areas of high performance computing, network analysis and machine learning.

JOB DUTIES

Design and develop scalable machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Evaluate performance of a variety of machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Debug and solve problems in complex environments
Explore use of novel methods for compression, dimensionality reduction and summarization
Communicate findings effectively in the form of briefings and technical reports
Formulate research ideas/hypotheses to solve new problems

DESIRED SKILLS

Algorithm development experience in Python, C/C++ and/or Java
Development of machine learning and/or graph-based algorithms (e.g., scikit-learn, networkx, mlpack, weka)
Familiar with high performance and big data computing technology (e.g., MPI, OpenMP, OpenACC, CUDA, opencl, mapreduce, hadoop, spark, BSP)
Exposure to graph traversal languages and graph databases (e.g., Apache Tinkerpop, neo4j, JanusGraph)
Familiar with word embedding methods (e.g., word2vec, GloVe, doc2vec)
Comfortable working on linux systems

EDUCATION

A Masters degree or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or related field is required.

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID:",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
69,"R&D Scientist, Associate","$37k-$67k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Improve Lives—that’s what drives us. It’s what makes us better, more innovative, more compelled to work harder. What we do is develop superior point-of-care rapid testing solutions for healthcare providers around the world; what we help create is healthier lives and communities.
Position Summary*: The R&D Scientist, Associate is responsible for performing experiments to develop and refine state-of-the-art assays for the detection of infectious diseases.
Duties & Responsibilities* include but are not limited to:
° Responsible for the preparation and application of all buffers, test lines, control lines, and other components used in Chembio diagnostic products

° Analyzes data

° Writes summaries and reports

° Performing daily and weekly instrument calibrations as indicated

° Responsible for maintaining neat and accurate batch records as either an operator or a witness during all procedures

° Compliance with regulatory standards. Adherence to all OSHA compliance laws and to the requirements of the USDA and FDA

° Compliance to the requirements of cGMP’s

° Maintenance of equipment and work area as directed

° Reporting deviations to established processes

Qualifications Required*:

° Bachelor’s degree in a Life Science or related field

° Attention to detail and proficient record keeping

° Computer literate, familiar with Microsoft Office
COMPANY PROFILE*
Chembio Diagnostic Systems, Inc. is a public company serving the increasing global demand for rapid tests needed for the effective prevention and treatment of infectious diseases and other conditions. Located minutes off the Long Island Expressway in Medford, NY, Chembio operates a research and manufacturing facility that is registered with the US FDA.

Equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disability/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation

For more information about Chembio Diagnostic Systems Inc., please visit our website.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Chembio Diagnostic Systems, Inc.
2.6","Medford, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
70,Senior Data Scientist,"$89k-$149k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.
Develop or participate in the development of the overall analytical framework to support the company’s strategy for growth
Communicates analysis, strategy and recommendations to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Collaborates with upper management to assess the potential effects of proposed solutions and incorporates these considerations into recommendations.
Manages projects of high complexity.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Advanced skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (Non-Linear Regression Analysis, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non Parametric estimations, etc.).
Ability to apply various predictive modeling techniques to develop solutions to various real-world problems.
Hands-on experience developing and delivering structured, methodology projects.
Exceptional programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
In-depth understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Ability to influence and guide across departmental boundaries.
Qualifications and Education
3 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods. PhD in economics, statistics, or related field required.
Or in the alternative, a Master’s degree in Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field (foreign educational equivalent accepted) and five (5) years of experience as indicated above.
High level of organizational and project management experience handling multiple projects simultaneously
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
71,Associate Data Scientist,"$81k-$134k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",4.0,"Cerner
4.0","North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
72,Data Scientist - DAB,"$83k-$144k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Rare Disease Early Diagnosis

Rare Disease Early Diagnosis - Accelerate rare disease patient early diagnosis through best-in-class enterprise-level advanced analytics and digital tools leveraging key external partnerships.

We will help patients discover what’s wrong with them sooner and bring them out of the unknown and into the right treatment faster. We will bring relief by helping them discover what is wrong with them at the earliest time possible.

Although there have been advances over recent years, awareness and diagnosis of rare and chronic diseases continue to lag. It can still take up to 10 years to get a diagnosis.

We will explore emerging technologies and establish partnerships with great minds within Takeda and across the healthcare industry to reduce that time for diagnosis.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Independently perform complex analysis using modern Data Science techniques against structured or unstructured data and report results back to generate insights to Takeda.
Apply machine learning, deep learning and other advanced techniques while performing Data Analysis engagements. This is against structured and un-structured data sets, at small and large scale.
Provide mentorship to other Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Data Specialists across R&D and Vaccine at Takeda as we elevate our data IQ across the organization. This will include coordination of Internal and External collaborations.
Deliver critical analysis against Takeda’s toughest data problems to give us critical insight to the organization’s largest questions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Perform machine learning, deep learning and other advanced data techniques at a level of quality that can be defended by peers at a PHD level across the organizations.
Introduce novel and state-of-the-art computational techniques to other teams and scientists to improve capabilities for data analysis with the purpose of deriving high accuracy insight from available datasets more efficiently.
Understanding and usage of different Supervised and Unsupervised learning techniques, their biases, how and when to apply them and which methods are the best for a particular analysis.
Ability to wrangle raw data sets into a format that can have advanced methods applied against the resulting data.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology and data problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other technical organizations throughout the company

CORE ELEMENTS RELATED TO THIS ROLE

Provide leadership and expertise to best construct data and execute analysis for feature detection, retrospective and predictive modelling, within a complex R&D and Vaccines environment.
Understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Re-enforcement learning and other techniques to be able to use and teach these methods inside the organization.
Ability to stay up to speed on modern data techniques, understand how to apply them and constantly demonstrated how and where to apply these new methods.
Ability to produce analysis for and defend results to PhD and executive level audience across the organizations
Design, Execute, QC and Deliver Data Science Analysis independently and effectively across the organization

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Master’s Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science or equivalent
3+ years’ experience or a PhD and relevant project / coursework
Expertise with the Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies
Experience with Spark
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables
Experience with two of the following languages: Python, R, Java or Scala
Experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, MX Net
Working knowledge of SQL and NoSQL datastores
Experience in a scientific environment

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
73,Preclinical research scientist - Autoimmunity (PhD required),-1,"The preclinical research scientist (RS) – Autoimmunity will be involved in conducting research programs directed at identifying new therapeutic targets and developing new product candidates hitting these targets for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. The RS will write scientific publications, grant and patent applications and investigational new drug (IND) applications. We seek a highly motivated and innovative RS with experience in immunology, cell and molecular biology, and immunometabolism to work with our team on cell-based assays and animal models to drive drug discovery in autoimmune diseases. The successful candidate will work in a team setting and be responsible for cell culture, assay execution support and implementing a broad set of biomarker discovery, PK/PD, animal modeling techniques, and translational studies in primary specimens from autoimmune disease patients plus IND-enabling and clinical studies. The RS will be aligned with four fundamental pillars of Landos' entrepreneurial corporate culture: 1) Be bold and decisive, 2) Never give up, 3) Be solution-oriented, and 4) Do the impossible.
Responsibilities: *
_Experimental Design: _ Generate and test novel experimental hypotheses to advance discovery-based R&D at Landos. Propose controlled designs capable of robustly testing respective hypotheses to draw conclusions relevant to drug development research. Conduct research studies from in vitro to animal models of autoimmune disease to translational and clinical trials.

_Data analysis: _ Leverage the LANCE drug development platform to help identify new therapeutic targets and develop new drugs. Utilize established and novel methods to analyze data. Data types will include but are not limited to flow cytometry results, high-throughput sequencing, proteomics, protein biochemistry assays, and histopathology.

_Data communication and reporting: _ Develop lab protocols. Provide detailed study reports of experimental results. Generate figures, presentations and publications to communicate results with scientific community, investors, and collaborators. Support the development of peer reviewed scientific publications, patents and grants relevant to ongoing research.

_Laboratory Procedures_: Perform various standard experimental assays including quantitative real-time PCR, Western blot, flow cytometry, and ELISA. Work in sterile conditions to conduct cell culture experiments and maintain the growth of cell lines. Express and purify recombinant protein. Collect and analyze generated data.

_Personnel Training_: Training of Landos personnel on laboratory upkeep, experimental assays and research projects. Guide the personnel resourcing of projects and tasks.

_Animal Procedures_: Conduct various IACUC approved laboratory animal procedures and techniques for Landos projects including but not limited to basic rodent handling, oral gavage, intraperitoneal injection, blood collection, and euthanasia. Interact with animal facility personnel to maintain organization and compliance of animal facilities. Will design new animal studies for projects related to therapeutic efficacy or mechanisms of action of new drugs for autoimmune diseases.

_Teamwork_: Work independently and collaboratively in a matrixed environment. Be able to successfully work with other Landos team members in experiments.

_Regulatory Compliance_: Support regulatory compliance efforts as instructed by the senior leadership in accordance with IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocols. Implement, organize and maintain regulatory compliance records.

_Record keeping_: Keep detailed records of all activities, record these activities in ASANA, Google Drive, laboratory notebook, the Landos Colony Management System (CMS), and Labkey. Provide weekly updates of the Landos research progress to the Scientific Director, and Landos team. Maintains confidentiality of all data, information and knowledge.

_Product Development_: Support for product development ranging from development, interfacing with CROs, CMOs, and other vendors for IND-enabling and clinical studies. He will help support sales and marketing activities following NDA approval in the commercialization phase.

Maintain the confidentiality of all the company deliberations and plans.

Any other tasks requested by the President and CEO.

Act in accordance with Landos’ policies.
Important skills: *
A+ attitude, great work ethic, and attention to detail
Previous drug development experience.
Capacity to foster a fast-paced, yet supportive, working environment
Organized with ability to multi-task
Laboratory assays: real-time PCR, Western blot, and ELISA
SOP development, record keeping skills
Knowledge of mucosal immunity and inflammatory processes in autoimmune diseases.
Multi-parameter flow cytometry staining and analysis
Analytical software: PRISM, FACS Diva, FlowJo, Excel, SAS, IPA
Demonstrated experience analyzing, interpreting and presenting experimental data and developing reports, peer-reviewed publications, grants, patents.
IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocol writing experience.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $92,074.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.landosbiopharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Landos Biopharma, Inc.","Blacksburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
74,Data Scientist,"$77k-$128k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Every Analyst a Scientist - One of our primary goals is to empower intelligence analysts to be able to study their data like scientists. The tools we develop focus on streamlining intelligence analysis through integrated algorithms and software that provide insight into the geopolitical landscape for use in operational intelligence missions around the world.

The Role:

As a Data Scientist, you will live by our motto that “Data is Destiny.” You will work with a diverse collection of massive datasets, including social media, structured and unstructured text, geospatial, time series, and imagery data. You will design, test, and validate statistical tests and machine learning models in support of cutting-edge problems in the national security space. Your expertise as a data scientist will aid a diverse team of researchers to build state-of-the-art tools and technologies that are deployed to extract and enrich intelligence used by analysts.

If you would like to help intelligence and defense analysts keep pace with technology-driven innovation, then this role is for you!

Who you are:
A U.S. Citizen with the ability to obtain a Security Clearance
A degree in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, or Computer Science
Experience in statistical modeling including performance evaluation and uncertainty quantification
Proficiency with a scientific programming language, preferably Python, and familiarity with Numpy, Pandas, and/or Scikit-learn packages
Experience in grooming sparse, incomplete, and noisy datasets
Motivated collaborator who is an excellent communicator of ideas to both technical and non-technical audiences
Even better:
Active Clearance
MS or PhD in a scientific field such as Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or Data Science or 2+ years of relevant work experience
Familiarity with handling and analyzing data at scale, for example using Hadoop, Dask, Spark, and MapReduce
Working knowledge of data store tools such as SQL and Elasticsearch, and experience interacting with databases
Experience with deep learning and neural network training, testing, and evaluation with fluency in Tensorflow or PyTorch
Specialized expertise in a data-rich field such as time-series analysis, graph analytics, geospatial analysis, image processing, or Bayesian programming",4.2,"Systems & Technology Research
4.2","Woburn, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
75,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Work with the business to determine and document reporting and analytic requirements, create mock-ups, and develop reports, dashboards and analytics that help drive company objectives.
Develop and maintain a set of Metrics and KPIs to drive efficiency and measure productivity within the Sales and Operations teams
Tell stories with data and propose analytical solutions instilling confidence to leaders making operational and strategic business decisions
Develop data and reporting requirements documentation in line with data systems framework including business requirements documentation, report mock-ups, data mapping and test plans
Manage expectations by communicating project plans, features, and statuses to business stakeholders
Build strong relationships within the business and support functions to understand the business needs
Construct reporting utilizing Excel, Cognos, and NetSuite to drive insight for sales and operational leadership
Collaborate and knowledge share to ensure single source of truth for all data
Perform ongoing assessment of analytics tools and dashboards relative to their usability, efficacy and adoption with their respective audiences
Synthesize data to provide executives with actionable insights as input to corporate, product and sales strategy
Plan and facilitate requirements gathering sessions, meetings, and presentations
Bachelor's degree
4+ years prior Strategy, Consulting, Sales/Marketing Operations or Medical Products experience
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Understands internal/external communication channels and escalates appropriately
Comfortable with ambiguity and able to work through it to get the right things done
Strong initiative; able to self-manage
Proficient in the following: Excel and SQL
Familiar with at least one of the following: Netsuite, Cognos, Prophix
While this position can be done remotely, candidate will be required to be on-site at the Clearwater location for initial 90 days of employment. *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Practicing social distancing, masks optional.

Experience:
Strategy; Sales/Marketing Operations: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Clearwater, FL (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Shifts:
Morning (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Company's website:
mercurymed.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.4,"Mercury Medical
3.4","Clearwater, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1963,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
76,FCC Data Scientist,"$73k-$121k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary: The FCC Analytics group is responsible for the development and management of the BSA/AML, Fraud and Quality Control analytics functions. The group tunes the financial crimes models dedicated to the detection of suspicious activity and fraudulent transactions as well as those designed to risk rate customers and screen against OFAC designated lists. Additionally, the group manages application related implementations, maintenance and enhancements and the development of reporting and visual analytics used for investigations, KPI tracking, quarterly reporting and annual risk assessments.

The primary purpose of this position is to assist with the management of the Fraud and BSA/AML models related to transaction monitoring, customer risk rating, OFAC fuzzy logic filtering, and transactional fraud mitigation strategies. The individual that fulfills this position must understand the general dynamics of model risk management as set forth by OCC guidelines. Furthermore, the candidate must also have experience with SQL, quantitative stat based analytics (such as standard deviation, percentile distributions, k-means, clustering, etc.), model forecasting and reporting analytics (including visual and flowchart modeling) amongst other skill sets around management of information systems. Requires basic commercial awareness.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: While other duties and special projects may be assigned, the primary duties and responsibilities include the following:
Conduct assessments of models and provide reports detailing the current state of data feeds, rule output at current settings, and alert outputs at alternative settings.
Utilize Oracle SQL to the extent of simulating model output.
Identify potential logic deficiencies in model outputs through cross validation of external analyses
Assist with the identification, evaluation, and development of controls to mitigate FCC risk and operational impacts.
Research, develop, prototype and test new models and their related inputs.
Assist with annual FCC model tuning and optimization efforts in line with regulatory expectations to meet false-positive and detection rate criteria; performs quantitative analysis on the alert output of each tuning cycle (able to prepare reports detailing forecast results).
Perform model management reviews for the ongoing assessment of model suitability against emerging risk.
Assist with data integrity and validation testing on FCC projects including software implementations, operational enhancements related to efficiency gains, and other special projects as needed including the coordination of software updates in collaboration with the Bank's IT Department and or Project Management Office.
Support manager with resolving of open issues and/or defects involving applications used by the FCC Department including the identification of issues, tracking, escalation, testing, and resolution.
Maintain business definitions in the form of a data dictionary for all department managed models.
Prepare reports in a manner that is clear and comprehensible to FCC supervisors/managers, internal auditors and regulatory examiners.
Communicate production issues with key stakeholders such as business lines, FCC management team, and the IT Department.
Create documentation and provide technical training to business users as needed (this includes training post model tuning deployments and on new enhancements).
If necessary, effectively communicate with the business lines in order to obtain the necessary information and documentation to complete model improvements.
Handle a large workload with the ability to complete the tasks correctly and efficiently within the designated timeframes exercising discretion in setting priorities.
Communicate effectively to different audiences, including both business and technical parties.
Possess a general understanding of banking with respect to BSA/AML and Fraud risks.
Perform any other assignments as directed by manager.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems or related field.
At least 3 years working with data modeling, software implementation, enhanced reporting analytics or related experience preferably with a financial institution.
Advanced experience with data mining/analytical tools such as R and Python
Strong knowledge of Structured Query Language (SQL), Oracle programming language, data mining techniques, and Business Intelligence Tools
Strong database skills, including working with advanced data sets, pivot tables, advanced database and statistical functions and methods
Experience visualizing data using tools such as Tableau
Experience with developing and implementing Fraud and BSA/AML risk strategies in decision engines, detection tools and onboarding platforms.",3.0,"BankUnited
3.0","Miami Lakes, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
77,IT Data Analyst,"$44k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Federated Insurance is looking for a passionate Data Analyst with experience in the insurance industry. The successful candidate will turn data into information, information into insights, and help lead the transformation toward data driven business decisions. Data analyst responsibilities include conducting system and process analysis to elicit data and reporting requirements. Data analysts will additionally develop, validate and promote data models and reporting capabilities.
Responsibilities
Lead requirements elicitation sessions with both technical and business partners to understand the business’ data, requirements, and business problems
Document business/functional requirements, ETL mapping requirements, and reporting requirements for the development of reporting and data consuming applications
Develop conceptual, logical, and physical data models and designs technical solutions to satisfy requirements
Define and support data lineage from data source to consumer
Design and execute tests validating data transformation accuracy, completeness, and reporting correctness
Develop partnerships and collaborate with a variety of business and functional areas
Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Information Systems preferred
3-5+ years on a data-focused team, responsible for data warehousing, analytics and/or reporting
Knowledge/experience utilizing SQL databases - creating queries, reviewing data and performing data analysis
Data warehouse skills: source-to-target mapping, data profiling, data lineage
SQL Server experience and ACORD model knowledge desirable
Strong communication skills, analytical mindset and ability to collaborate with a team
Meticulous, downright excited about data and being a humble disruptor

At Federated Insurance, we do life-changing work, focused on our clients’ success. For our employees, we provide tremendous opportunities for growth. Over 95% of them believe our company has an outstanding future. We make lives better, and we’re looking for employees who want to make a difference in others’ lives, all while enhancing their own.
You will have opportunities to grow in your career. Our employees are encouraged to ask questions and learn on the job, and we are committed to promoting from within. We recognize your contributions with an exceptional rewards package that includes competitive pay and bonus programs, incredibly affordable health insurance, generous pension and 401(k) benefits, and gift matching and paid volunteer time to support your involvement in the community. Learn more about our Benefits.
If California Resident, please review Federated's enhanced Privacy Policy.",3.8,"Federated Mutual Insurance Company
3.8","Owatonna, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1904,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
78,Senior Bioinformataics Scientist OB/Gyn Research,"$224k-$446k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Bioinformatics Scientist OB/GYN Research Needed!

This is a unique opportunity to conduct bioinformatic analysis on research projects for Inova, the region’s leading non-profit healthcare provider in the Northern Virginia area recognized in 2019 by U.S. News & World Report.

Position Highlights:
• Recognized leader: 923-bed nationally recognized regional medical center.
• Team Member centric: We create an environment or respect and growth, where contributions are recognized and rewarded.

What You Will Do:
• Conduct bioinformatic analysis on research projects.
• Develop new analytic approaches to complex human diseases, such as cancer, diabetes and heart disease.
What You Will Need:
• Candidates for this position will have an MD, Ph.D. or Master’s in Computer Science, Bioinformatics or related field.
• Experience working with large scale biomedical data and hands on experience developing software or information systems to manage and analyze biomedical data.
• PREFERRED: Hands-on experience working with Next and Third generation sequence data, proteomic data and microarray data from a tremendous breadth of clinical areas to gain new insights into human disease.
• Ability to interact with team members for project coordination
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Strong software development skills
• Experience working with terabytes of translational biomedical data
• Strong informatics skills to include the use of programming and/or scripting languages such as Python, Perl, java, C/C++, and R.
• A Strong knowledge base of bioinformatics principles

M/F/Vets/Disabled

#LI-MT1
IND2
#LI-BQ1

IND2
#LI-KD1

Requirements

MD, PhD or Masters in Computer science, Bioinformatics or related field.

At Inova, safety is the foundation of everything we do. You’re always safe at Inova.

Our commitment to quality starts with the safety of our team members. We safeguard our patients, by safeguarding our employees.

Our commitment to keeping patients safe, means there’s no safer place for you to work.

 Inova is well stocked with the best and latest PPE

 Masks are provided to patients entering our buildings, and offered free to visitors

 Covid-19 patients are isolated in dedicated areas

 Inova operates curbside Covid-19 testing sites that are far removed from the main facilities

 All team members are trained in the latest screening guidelines

Work Site Location

INOVA FAIRFAX MEDICAL CAMPUS",3.5,"Inova Health System
3.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1956,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
79,Process Development Engineer/Scientist,-1,"Process Development Engineer/Scientist
Lompoc/Buellton, CA*
FULL-TIME*
About Central Coast Agriculture: *
Headquartered north of Santa Barbara in the heart of the Santa Ynez Valley, CCA is a company focused on utilizing science and sustainability to grow quality, modern crops. Our unmatched commitment to innovating both organic farming and modern manufacturing means our customers have access to products that exceed expectations.

We breed, grow, and cultivate the highest quality cannabis so we can then process, manufacture, and package the highest quality single-source products on the market under our brand, Raw Garden.

We are a team of change makers, modern farmers, scientists, and business professionals focused on leading the charge for agricultural innovation.

We are on a mission to be the most trusted and loved brand in Cannabis.
About The Role: *
As a *Process Development Engineer*, you will play an Engineer/Scientist role. You will be the subject matter expert in Cannabis biomass handling, extraction, and refinement for the R&D team. Your role will include research activities to better understand process parameters to improve efficiency of existing operations involving Cannabis plant materials, in-process materials, and finished products. In this role you will also develop processes to enable new product development. At all times you will be closely linked to Manufacturing to ensure all recommended processes are scalable. You will participate in many cross-functional teams including Analytical Chemistry, Cultivation, and Manufacturing.
What You'll Do*
Lead R&D activities to support new process/product development.
Identify and develop methods for evaluating process efficiencies of raw materials, in-process materials, and finished products. These methods will directly correlate to product attributes valued by our Consumer.
Employ these methods to evaluate processes and materials to assure the integrity and quality of process and product development to deliver to our Consumer the highest quality products that meet their highly refined product and experience expectations.
Identify equipment, space, and utility requirements to set-up both a fully functional pilot plant for trialing new process improvements and new product development and production environments.
Develop and draft SOPs for new processes to transfer technology to Manufacturing
Assist in troubleshooting and resolving issues with any finished product quality concerns including initiating and monitoring corrective actions.
Learn and understand processes throughout R&D and Manufacturing to better assist with troubleshooting, determining root cause, and improving work processes.
Collaborate with Manufacturing on all aspects of production, including evaluation of new equipment and processes.
Ensure that safety is first priority in everything you do.
Prioritize work in a fast-paced environment to limit downtime and keep operations moving.
Instill and implement Good Lab Practices, keeping a clean and safe laboratory.
Work with the highest attention to detail and data integrity.
Maintain professionalism and live CCA’s core values at all times
Perform all other duties as assigned or inherent to the position
What You'll Need to Have*
· *Position Requirements: *
Advanced degree (MS/PhD) in relevant discipline or Bachelors Degree in Chemical/Process Engineering with 5 years relevant work experience or 7+ years direct experience in Cannabis biomass handling, extraction, and refinement required.
Hands-on experience and knowledge of plant biomass handling, extraction, and refinement processes, equipment, controls, and operations.
Experience in a pilot plant environment with knowledge of requirements to qualify processes for transfer to Manufacturing.
Experience in a Cannabis product Manufacturing environment with knowledge of requirements and regulations for production in the State of California.
Strong analytical skills. Demonstrate attention to detail and accuracy.
Knowledge of good laboratory best practices, including sample prep, handling, data recording, and record keeping.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment and prioritize work while multitasking.
Demonstrate motivation and a good work ethic under minimal supervision.
Must work effectively in team environments.
Statistical process control skills and use of statistical analysis software required.
Highly collaborative and have excellent interpersonal skills.
Able to work independently and “roll up your sleeves” to make things happen.
Must possess a high degree of creativity in design and engineering to solve problems with equipment and materials at hand.
High intensity team player who thrives in a fast paced, dynamic environment.
Constantly questioning the way things are done in a constructive manner and thrives on change that improves results.
Experience with lean or six sigma process improvement frameworks a plus.
Open (no agendas), honest and trustworthy.
Effective leadership and strategic influencing skills.
Results oriented individual with a desire to manage change through to fruition.
Ability to prioritize and manage multiple projects at one time.
Expert user of Microsoft Office and/or Google’s G suite.
Functional knowledge of California cannabis regulations.
Must be 21 years of age (or older) at the time of hire.
Proficiency of the English language, verbal and written format.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Holidays
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Experience:
Microsoft Office: 5 years (Required)
high degree of creativity in design and engineering: 5 years (Required)
Proficient in English written & Verbal: 5 years (Required)
lean or six sigma process improvement: 5 years (Required)
knowledge of requirements to qualify processes for transfer: 5 years (Required)
Cannabis product Manufacturing environment: 5 years (Required)
plant biomass handling, extraction, and refinement processes: 5 years (Required)
requirements and regulations for production in the State of: 5 years (Required)
CA Cannabis Regulations: 5 years (Preferred)
Cannabis biomass handling, extraction, and refinement: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Buellton, CA 93427 (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",5.0,"Central Coast Agriculture
5.0","Buellton, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
80,Data Scientist,-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
81,Senior Data Scientist,"$116k-$184k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
82,Supply Chain Data Analyst Virtual Hiring Event,"$37k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","KISS Products Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Friday, October 23, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Supply Chain Data Analyst

Intake Details:

Requirements

Proficient in MS Office, MS Excel. Experience in SAP is preferred.

Up to 8 years of relevant work experience preferred.

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, and/or Business-related

Technical requirements

We prefer you to use a device with a camera and a stable internet connection. If you are using an Apple device, we recommend using the Safari browser. For all other devices, Google Chrome is recommended.

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About KISS products, Inc.

A Korean-American company headquartered in New York, KISS takes great pride in being a global leader in professional quality beauty products and treatments, with brands available in over 100 countries worldwide. Inspired by the power and excitement of life-changing beauty breakthroughs such as the handheld blow-dryer, which allowed women to break ties with the beauty parlor, Mr. John Chang–who started KISS as a tiny beauty supply business–has made it his mission to find ways to make life simpler & easier for all. With his world-renowned team of scientists & product developers, the KISS founder’s passion is to invent DIY beauty products that save women a tremendous amount of time, effort and money.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

This position is responsible for managing inventory levels, studying supply chain and system management.

Job Description:

Proactively monitor inventory with shelf-life constraints and drive consumption in order to minimize potential liability
Must be able to develop relevant performance metrics and prepare detailed reports for management
Develop reporting systems, dashboards and performance metrics that support business decisions
Identify business and technical problems and create innovative solutions.
Oversee inventory procedures
Develop and monitor KPIs and report on supply chain’s performance",2.5,"KISS products, Inc.
2.5","Piscataway, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
83,Master Data Analyst,"$42k-$75k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Summary:

Under general supervision, the Master Data Analyst will have the primary responsibility for ensuring that master data is maintained by entering, updating, and maintaining master data, as well as having a full understanding of the impact of this data across the value chain. This position is focused on ensuring data integrity, as well as data entry.

Essential Functions & Key Responsibilities:

Responsible for ensuring that master data is properly defined and setup in our IFS enterprise system. Working closely with the Master Data Manager, the Master Data Analyst is also responsible for data collection, entry and loading of local Master Data into IFS, including Bill of Materials, Customer and Material records, etc.
Understand the data elements and how they flow through the supply chain.
Receive and process requests from the user community for changes to, or creation of master data records, and manage the requests through a formal process of validation and approval.
Coordinate with the user community to ensure correctness and completeness of data contained in requests.
Pro-actively monitor and analyze all master data files for continuous improvements on the cleanliness of data.
Responsible for prompt implementation of all Master Data procedures to ensure that all information systems and services meet the company standards and end-user requirements.
Assist with testing configuration changes to master data elements.
Troubleshoot and resolve master data issues.

Candidate Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Supply Chain, Logistics or 2-4 years' equivalent work experience.
Solid experience in Microsoft Office products, specifically Excel, (ability to perform Vlookups and formatting. Pivot-Tables a plus!)
Team player with strong verbal and written communication skills.
Experience in SAP strongly preferred, IFS a big plus!
Effective time manager - routinely called on to prioritize a large number of tasks and report on assignment status.
Excellent analytical, interpersonal and organizational skills. Written and verbal communication skills are critical.
Detailed oriented / Ability to maintain high data integrity during data transfer process.
Ability to manage multiple priorities simultaneously in an extremely fast-paced environment.
Ability to quickly and effectively prioritize a large volume of tasks to ensure timelines are met, and all information is available to the user community quickly and effectively.
Successful candidates must have a passion for on-time customer service, proactive problem-solving, superior attention to detail.

Please no recruiting agencies

Following GMP in compliance with all food safety requirements.

Novolex does not publicly post salary information on job boards.

Novolex™ is committed to providing equal employment opportunity in all employment practices, including but not limited to, selection, hiring, promotion, transfer, and compensation to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to age, race, color, national origin, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, handicap or disability, genetics, citizenship status, service member or veteran status, or any other category protected by federal, state, or local law. Any individual, who because of his or her disability, needs an accommodation in connection with an aspect of the Company’s application process should contact Jamie Wells at hrcompliance@novolex.com.

#LI-JF1 #MON1",2.9,"Novolex Holdings, LLC
2.9","Covington, KY",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
84,Data Science Manager Virtual Hiring Event,"$90k-$144k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Plymouth Rock Assurance Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Tuesday, October 20, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Customer Care Representative

Inside Sales Representative

Internal Audit Specialist

Claims Casualty Supervisor

Claims Supervisor Property-Home

Claims Analyst

Data Science Manager

Senior Data Scientist

Intake Details:

Requirements

Above average interpersonal, listening, communication and organizational skills.

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About Plymouth Rock Assurance

The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service.

We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

Hiring for Woodbridge Township, NJ

The Data Science Manager will manage a team of statisticians in research and development of new predictive models and new analytical techniques related to insurance pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors and related topics using internal and external data. You will start your Data Science Manager role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Provide analytics for setting price, underwriting and products strategies.Implement analysis and modeling tests.
Develop and enhance models used in a variety of contexts within the product management structure.
Advance modeling capabilities.
Work with colleagues in various departments to facilitate the application of models developed considering the regulatory and competitive contexts.
Ensure models are understood, implications are appropriately assessed, implementation plans are defined,validation of results are undertaken and adjustments are made.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Horsham, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
85,Data Analyst II,"$53k-$91k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who is Cenlar?

You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.

Job Summary:

Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.

Responsibilities:
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications:
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards:

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online.",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
86,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
87,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
88,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
89,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
90,Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist,-1,"Position: *Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist
Position Summary: *LiveBx seeks to fill a position for a full-time Laser Development and Optical Imaging Research Scientist, to join its diverse and talented design group. This individual will contribute to the development of novel label-free imaging technologies, working side-by-side proven scientific leaders that continue to push the boundaries of innovation in this rapidly expanding field. The candidate will have a key role in the design of robust femtosecond lasers, operate the corresponding optical imaging technologies and systems, and perform/manage translational imaging studies involving cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and human tissue specimens. This position will work closely with research personnel at the University of Illinois at
Urbana-Champaign Biophotonics Imaging Laboratory, LiveBx company founders, as well as closely interface with market leading customers, industry partners, and R&D collaborators.
Compensation: *Base salary $60,000 - $80,000 annually with benefits; Additional incentive compensation available for meeting project and company milestones, including an equity profits interest for advanced candidates.
Duties and Responsibilities*:

• Innovate and develop robust fiber-based femtosecond lasers for nonlinear optical imaging applications.

• Innovate and develop novel nonlinear optical imaging systems, including both hardware and software, for applications in biological discovery and translational biomedical imaging.

• Develop and design fiber-optic-based beam delivery systems for multimodal nonlinear imaging.

• Evaluate and modify current system software and algorithms, hardware control and data acquisition software, user interfaces, and software for data storage and communication.

• Perform qualitative and quantitative imaging using various optical imaging systems on cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, and/or human tissue specimens using established procedures and independent judgment to determine probable causes for low- and high- quality images.

• Perform established quality assurance procedures (quality control testing, instrument function checks and calibrations), maintain appropriate documentation, and report irregularities per company policy.

• Assess accuracy and validity of obtained test results by applying knowledge of relevant scientific principles, recognize changes that are critical to research studies, and identify probable causes for irregular and atypical findings.

• Maintain records of tests, examinations, and final results for all record functions and inquiries related to imaging human tissue specimens.

• Continue to develop professionally (e.g., member of professional society, attend conferences, and keep up on latest advances in the field).

Education and Experience*:

• B.S/M.S. (Ph.D. preferred) degree in optical engineering or the physical sciences.
• 3+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
Key Competencies*
• Understanding of optical systems design principles.
• Must be a results-driven self-starter with the ability to work independently as well as collaborate with team members on projects and initiatives.
• Proven ability to design, assemble, and validate complex optical systems through hands- on laboratory experimentation and development.
• Aptitude in decision-making and problem-solving.
• Strong analytical and data-driven mindset that translates into innovation and robust designs.
• Flexibility and adaptability in priorities, tasks, and schedule.
• Highly organized and detail oriented.
• The ability to multi-task, prioritize, plan, and use time efficiently to stay on point, work with a sense of urgency, and meet deadlines is crucial.
• Ability to use discretion and maintain a high level of confidentiality.
• Effectively and professionally convey information, internally and externally, through verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
• 7+ years of research experience in ultrafast optics and/or nonlinear optical imaging.
• 3+ years of industry experience in designing robust and manufacturable lasers.
• Direct technical expertise in ultra-fast lasers, non-linear optics, and laser source engineering.
• Skilled in the use of optical design, system control, and analysis tools such as Zemax and Matlab.
• Training or experience in crafting grant proposals, responding to FOAs from federal agencies (NIH, NSF, DoD, AFOSR, etc.).
• Knowledge of industry safety standards including CDRH, CE, UL, and laboratory safety compliance.
• Demonstrated leadership in optical engineering.
• Imaging of biological specimens utilizing microscopy-based imaging systems.
• Experience working with cell lines, _in vitro_ tissue models, animal models, and/or human tissue specimens.
• Enjoy working on and with diverse interdisciplinary teams.

This is a full-time, benefits-eligible position. Compensation is commensurate with skills and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.livebiopsy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,LiveBx,"Champaign, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
91,Data Scientist,"$84k-$138k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Job Description:

This role uses Data Science and Engineering techniques to satisfy customer requirements. This role evaluates and uses algorithms for Natural Language Processing (NLP), Artificial Intelligence (AI), and Machine Learning (ML). This role develops scripts, notebooks or applications (using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Scikit-Learn, Numpy, Tensorflow, Pytorch, Spark, Spark MLlib, H20.ai, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to perform analysis, clustering, entity resolution and structured information extraction for work products. Models are trained and refined using these tools and evaluated for effectiveness using appropriate criteria/metrics for the task. This role collaborates across a team of Data Scientists, Data Administrators, Software and Data Engineers to produce work products.

Primary Responsibilities

This role designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources.
This role develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, query techniques, model complex business problems, and automated processes to cleanse, integrate, and evaluate datasets.
This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools and techniques to include Python, Splunk, query experience, R and the like.
Works with cross-discipline teams to ensure connectivity between various data sources and business problems.
Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations.
This role develops algorithms and analytical techniques to improve business performance.
Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Master’s degree in engineering, computer science, or other related technical field or Bachelor’s degree in a business or management-related field accompanied by experience managing technical requirements in complex programs.
Experience with Python, Splunk, and query experience is required.
Experience negotiating complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience leading critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
Experience supervising others.

Education

Candidate must have Masters with 12-15 years of prior relevant experience or Doctorate with 8+ years of prior relevant experience.

Clearance

Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with polygraph.

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,"Leidos
3.6","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
92,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"naviHealth, Inc.
3.6",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
93,Data Engineer,"$74k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
94,Member Data Analyst,"$43k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Blue Federal Credit Union employees work hard, have fun, and win for our members and each other! Our Member Data Analyst performs quantitative and qualitative research using statistics to analyze programs, products and services offered, market potential, competitive intelligence and industry standards to recommend and guide market efforts. Recommends marketing activity based on research and technical analysis. Independently drives data analysis and develops insights for use by management.
Directs central market research function, anticipates and evaluates useful market information, establishes standards for research methodology, and identifies opportunities to expand the scope of business.
Identifies, analyzes and interprets trends and patterns in complex data sets to develop recommendations to be used in promoting the organization and improving positioning, image and support within the target market.
Maintain appropriate databases and data systems for the department. Implements data collection systems and updates. Acquires and abstracts primary and secondary data from existing internal or external data sources.
Develops graphs, reports and presentations. Performs statistical analysis upon request. Creates and presents quality dashboards. 3-4 bullets on education and experience
Assists in development and production of direct marketing initiatives through analysis of target market universe, list development, design and production.
Must comply with applicable laws and regulations, including but not limited to, the Bank Secrecy Act, the Patriot Act, and the Office of Foreign Assets Control.
Experience: Three years to five years of similar or related experience, including preparatory experience.

Education/Certifications/Licenses: A college degree.

Interpersonal Skills: A significant level of trust, credibility and diplomacy is required. In-depth dialogues, conversations and explanations with customers, direct and indirect reports and outside vendors can be of a sensitive and/or highly confidential nature. Communications may involve motivating, influencing, educating and/or advising others on matters of significance.

Other Skills: Strong analytical spreadsheet and communication skills, demonstrated ability to handle multiple project simultaneously, new product development, packaging design, competitive analysis, consumer promotion, advertising media and copy, scan data analysis. Familiarity with MCIF systems, CD-ROM directories and market data on disc, survey research and statistical analysis software, mapping software, market research directories and online data services.",4.1,"Blue Federal Credit Union
4.1","Cheyenne, WY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,Data Scientist - Growth and Marketing,"$124k-$196k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Dubbed an ""open-source unicorn"" by Forbes, Confluent is the fastest-growing enterprise subscription company our investors have ever seen. And how are we growing so fast? By pioneering a new technology category with an event streaming platform, which enables companies to leverage their data as a continually updating stream of events, not as static snapshots. This innovation has led Coatue Management, Altimeter Capital and Franklin Templeton to join earlier investors Sequoia Capital, Benchmark, and Index Ventures in the recent Series E financing of a combined $250 million at a $4.5B valuation. Our product has been adopted by Fortune 100 customers across all industries, and we’re being led by the best in the space—our founders were the original creators of Apache Kafka®. We’re looking for talented and amazing team players who want to accelerate our growth, while doing some of the best work of their careers. Join us as we build the next transformative technology platform!

The mission of Data Science team at Confluent is to serve as the central nervous system of all things data for the company: we build analytics infrastructures, metrics, insights, and models, to empower data-driven thinking, and optimize every part of the business. There are limitless opportunities for an ambitious data scientist to make an immediate and meaningful impact within a hyper growth start-up.

We are now looking for a talented and driven individual to accelerate data science efforts and boost our Growth and Marketing trajectory. This person will work closely with our C-suite executives and operation teams to develop and deliver actionable recommendations to drive better and faster decisions. Successful candidates will exhibit technical acumen and business savvy, with a passion for making an impact, through creative storytelling and timely actions.
Responsibilities:
Build and maintain data foundations, metrics and dashboards to monitor the performance of our business in every function, and extract actionable insights
Apply quantitative analysis, data mining, and presentation of data to fuel business growth and drive customer success
Design and analyze experiments to test new product ideas; Convert the results into actionable recommendations
Build data products to improve operational efficiencies organizationally to scale with a hyper growth start-up
Inform, influence, support, and execute business decisions with senior leadership and business partners

What We're Looking For:

+3 years of experience in data science and analytics
Strong proficiency in SQL and Python (or R) (+3 years of experience)
Proficiency in data visualization (eg. Tableau, R-shiny, Python, Metabase, Looker, Matlab, etc.)
Knowledge with statistical modeling and/or machine learning
Bachelor or advanced degree in a quantitative discipline: statistics, operations research, computer science, informatics, engineering, applied mathematics, economics, etc.
The ability to communicate cross-functionally, derive requirements and deliver insightful analysis and/or models; ability to synthesize, simplify and explain complex problems to different types of audiences, including executives

What Give You An Edge:

5+ years of experience in data science and analytics
Experience and/or knowledge in marketing data science including marketing attribution model, media mix model and marketing ROI optimization
Experience in developing measurement across marketing activities
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to synthesize, simplify and explain complex problems to different types of audiences, including executives
Experience working with B2B data science domain: web analytics, attribution, GTM funnel optimization, sales effectiveness, propensity score, lead score, etc
#LI-MT1

Come As You Are

At Confluent, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact.

Click here to review our California Candidate Privacy Notice, which describes how and when Confluent, Inc., and its group companies, collects, uses, and shares certain personal information of California job applicants and prospective employees.",4.5,"Confluent
4.5","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
96,Senior Data Scientist,"$106k-$169k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Unlock Your Career Potential: Technology at ADP. Do you enjoy exploring, identifying and inspiring the future of the workplace and the lives of millions of people? At ADP, the world's largest B2B cloud company, our Technology team is comprised of brilliant engineers, architects, data scientists, infrastructure experts, and more. We were first in our industry to offer a SaaS solution and continue to push the envelope utilizing the latest operating platforms to deliver the highly automated, intelligent and predictive solutions that are redefining what is possible. Named one of Forbes' ""Most Innovative Companies"" and one of Computerworld's ""100 Best Places to Work in IT"", we are committed to leading the way in product development and research, empowering you to bring to life the latest innovations that will forever change the way businesses manage their most vital asset, employees.

The Sr. Data Scientist will be responsible for deriving actionable insights and recommendations to measurably improve client experience and operational efficiency across the enterprise by leveraging various elements of data both internal and external to ADP and its clients. Their focus will be on the exploration and visualization of patterns within data obtained and assembled from multiple sources, including application of statistical modeling and leading edge analytical approaches including predictive modeling and machine learning, to identify key drivers of client experience related metrics.

This individual will be a core member of the Global Shared Services Analytics, a highly collaborative team, which provides data science and deep analytics expertise to solve the most challenging business problems here at ADP.

Qualifications:

3-5 years of progressive experience building statistical models, with preference to those with prior experience in client experience related roles.
Exceptional quantitative and data analysis skills
Must have deep expertise with Python for statistical programming
Data visualization platforms such as Tableau
Deep understanding of Excel and SQL for data extraction/transformation.
Hadoop or similar preferred, but not required
Python for text manipulation preferred, but not required
Results-oriented, self-starter with ability to learn quickly and adapt to changing business priorities
Bachelor's Degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, CS, Engineering or related.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Apply appropriate data visualization and analytical methods to identify key drivers of client experience related metrics and to provide insightful, innovative and actionable recommendations to improve client experience and business outcomes.
Build deep partnership with business and technology stakeholders from across the enterprise to understand client experience concerns and existing available data sources
Establish credibility as a trusted advisor to key stakeholders across business units in order to promote and elevate statistical and predictive modeling standards.
Extract, merge, clean and normalize data sources as necessary for subsequent analytical studies using a combination of Excel, SQL, Oracle and Hadoop.
Use Python, R statistical platforms to design and build appropriate statistical and machine learning models, including but not limited to regression, clustering and decision trees, to identify main drivers of client experience related metrics.
Create appropriate data dashboards/visualizations (Tableau server) and presentations (PPT) to highlight findings and recommendations for both executive and technical audiences.
Use good business and financial acumen to assess business cases.
Implement appropriate tracking methods to measure business impacts of recommendations.

Business and Presentation skills
#LI-AS1

We're designing a better way to work, so you can achieve what you're working for. Consistently named one of the 'Most Admired Companies' by FORTUNE® Magazine, and recognized by DiversityInc® as one of the 'Top 50 Companies for Diversity,' ADP works with more than 740,000 organizations across the globe to help their people work smarter, embrace new challenges, and unleash their talent. ""Always Designing for People"" means we're creating platforms that will transform how great work gets done, so together we can unlock a world of opportunity.

At ADP, we believe that diversity fuels innovation. ADP is committed to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, genetic information, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, lawful alien status, national origin, age, marital status, or protected veteran status. We support an inclusive workplace where associates excel based on personal merit, qualifications, experience, ability, and job performance.",3.8,"ADP
3.8","Parsippany, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1949,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
97,Clinical Data Scientist,-1,"You will conduct analyses using various disparate types of healthcare data (e.g., clinical trial data, insurance claims data, Electronic Health Record (EHR) data, etc.). You will explore these data with a critical eye and transform these data into meaningful insights, creating outputs that may be used for publication, regulatory submissions, internal decision-making, market tracking, or other uses. Working closely with the other members of the Clinical Computational Sciences team, you will be encouraged to use new and emerging data sources and technologies to drive innovation and to conduct analyses at scale.
The Impact You Will Have
Our mission is to make innovative drugs affordable and accessible. You will be instrumental in making that vision a reality. We are working to build a truly modern and efficient clinical development organization, with data at the core of what we do. You will play a key role in analyzing this data in support of our development programs.
Your Superpowers
You hold a Masters or PhD in biostatistics, epidemiology, health economics, public health, computational biology or another quantitative scientific discipline, with 1-3 years of work experience
You are problem focused, creative, and practical in how you apply data to problems
You love working with data and live for the “aha!” moments where you use it to answer meaningful questions
You have experience applying observational and statistical methods to conduct rigorous scientific analyses
You’re energized by the prospect of rolling up your sleeves to tackle important problems in drug development and reimbursement
You can program fluently in a modern statistical programming software (e.g., R) and want to develop your skills further.
You’ve worked with data scientists and software engineers to put code into production – you think about scalable ways to improve the reach of your work.
You want to build a career in clinical data analysis (biostatistics, health economics, RWE, etc.)
Bonus points if you have experience in genomic data analysis or oncology data experience
You are an excellent communicator – you can use data to tell a clear and compelling story and can communicate complex analyses to many types of stakeholders
You have a curious mind and are excited to learn new skills, tools, and about novel types and uses of data.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,"Manager, Data Science - Data Analytics (Phoenix, AZ)","$76k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Science Manager

Location: PHL or PHX (preferred)

General Summary:

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Responsibilities

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.
Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.
Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.
Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.
Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Core Responsibilities:

Plans and manages detailed project timelines; provides reporting on status to key stakeholders.
Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.
Proactively raises data science concerns, risks and issues that may delay/ impact the submission and presents risk mitigation strategy.
Keeps abreast of data science requirements to ensure compliance and client success.
Knowledge of machine learning and predictive modeling. • Knowledge of relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages. • Knowledge of applied statistics, including regression models.
Basic knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration. • Basic people management skills including coaching, interviewing, and providing feedback and recognition. • Excellent written and oral communication skills. • Ability to manage team resources to ensure attainment of department objectives
Qualifications

Qualifications:

Master’s degree or international equivalent preferred
6 years’ relevant experience including 2 years in a leadership capacity
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.
This job description is intended to present the general content and requirements for the performance of this job. The description is not to be construed as an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements.
Technical Skillset:

Oracle
Coding - navigating coding is key
Hadoop
SAS Data Sets
WPS
Looking for people that know how to code - Python, etc.

Patient Data, Prescription Data, Claims Data, Medical Payers,

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
99,"Research Scientist, Immuno-Oncology (PhD Required)",-1,"Position Summary: *
The research scientist will be involved in conducting immune-oncology research programs directed at identifying new therapeutic targets and development drug development programs in cancer around these targets. The candidate will write scientific publications, grant and patent applications. The responsibilities of this position include developing and executing cell-based assays, _in vitro,_ _ex vivo_ and _in vivo_ to characterize biological mechanisms of action of novel immunotherapeutic product candidates for the treatment of cancer. The candidate will be aligned with four fundamental pillars of BTI's entrepreneurial corporate culture: 1) Be bold and decisive, 2) Never give up, 3) Be solution-oriented, and 4) Do the impossible.
Responsibilities: *
· _Experimental Design: _ Generate and test novel experimental hypotheses to advance discovery-based R&D at BTI. Propose controlled designs capable of robustly testing respective hypotheses to draw conclusions relevant to drug development research.

· _Data analysis: _ Utilize established and novel methods to analyze data. Data types will include but are not limited to flow cytometry results, high-throughput sequencing, protein biochemistry assays, and histopathology.

· _Data communication and reporting: _ Provide detailed reports of experimental results. Generate figures, presentations and publications to communicate results with scientific community, investors, and collaborators. Support the development of peer reviewed scientific publications, patents and grants relevant to ongoing research.

· _Laboratory Procedures_: Perform various standard experimental assays including quantitative real-time PCR, Western blot, flow cytometry, and ELISA. Work in sterile conditions to conduct cell culture experiments and maintain the growth of cell lines. Express and purify recombinant protein. Collect and analyze generated data.

· _Personnel Training_: Training of BTI personnel on laboratory upkeep, experimental assays and research projects. Guide the personnel resourcing of projects and tasks.

· _Animal Procedures_: Conduct various IACUC approved laboratory animal procedures and techniques for BTI’s projects including but not limited to basic rodent handling, oral gavage, intraperitoneal injection, blood collection, and euthanasia. Interact with animal facility personnel to maintain organization and compliance of animal facilities. Will design new animal studies for projects related to therapeutic efficacy or mechanisms of action of new drugs for autoimmune diseases.

· _Teamwork_: Work independently and collaboratively in a matrixed environment. Be able to successfully work with other BTI team members in experiments.

· _Regulatory Compliance_: Support regulatory compliance efforts as instructed by the senior leadership in accordance with IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocols. Implement, organize and maintain regulatory compliance records.

· _Record keeping_: Keep detailed records of all activities, record these activities in ASANA, Google Drive, laboratory notebook, the BTI’s Colony Management System (CMS), and Labkey. Provide weekly updates of the BTI research progress to the Scientific Director, and BTI team. Maintains confidentiality of all data, information and knowledge.

· Maintain the confidentiality of all company deliberations and plans.

· Any new responsibilities or changes in the reporting structure as directed by the executive leadership.

· Act in accordance with Company’s policies.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $48,814.00 - $91,451.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.biotherapeuticsinc.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"BioTherapeutics, Inc.","Blacksburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
100,Quantitative Specialist/Senior Quantitative Analyst,"$90k-$177k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Financial
Monitoring Group (FMG) within the Supervision, Regulation and Credit (SRC)
department seeks a motivated senior quantitative analyst/quantitative
specialist to support the monitoring of retail credit risk for the nation’s
largest banks. FMG produces quarterly risk reports and identifies
emerging trends in retail lending using supervisory data. More recently, FMG
has developed new monthly analytics and reporting to track the impact of the
current pandemic on retail credit. The group also provides analytical and
examination support to Federal Reserve System committees in activities related
to retail credit risk, including the annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and
Review (CCAR) assessment and other System work.

The successful candidate will have an interest in analyzing data trends in
banking and economic activity, as well as telling the story behind the data in
written or presentation format. In addition to strong communication
skills, the candidate should have the ability to work both collaboratively and
independently. Strong time management and project management skills are
desired. This role provides an opportunity to interact with various System
groups, including the Large Institution Supervision Coordinating Committee
(LISCC) and Large and Foreign Banking Organizations (LFBO) management groups.
The ability to manipulate and perform analysis of large datasets is required,
preferably using SAS or SQL. Experience with a data visualization
tool, such as Tableau, is a plus.

This position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or
FOMC information, which is limited to “Protected Individuals” as defined in the
U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not
limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who
either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for
naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are permanent
residents must sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen when
eligible to do so and pursue a path to citizenship. Candidates who are not U.S.
citizens or U.S. permanent residents may be eligible for the information access
required for this position if they sign a declaration of intent to become
a permanent resident and a U.S. citizen and meet other eligibility
requirements. In addition, all candidates must undergo an applicable background
check and comply with all applicable information handling rules.

To
be considered for the position, please submit a resume and cover letter.

About
the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia:

The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia is one of the 12 regional Reserve Banks that,
together with the Board of Governors in Washington, D.C., make up the Federal
Reserve System. It helps formulate and implement monetary policy,
supervises banks and bank and savings and loan holding companies, and provides
financial services to depository institutions and the federal
government. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia serves eastern and
central Pennsylvania, southern New Jersey, and Delaware.

Background
investigations including drug testing are required for all new hires as a
condition of employment, after the job offer is made. Employment may not begin until the Bank
accepts the results of the background investigation.

To
see the full job description, click the link:

https://www.philadelphiafed.org/-/media/7db2d139fc344d92adbcb55302b39bc3.ashx

To
Apply:

Go
to https://www.philadelphiafed.org/careers/job-openings.cfm
and find the ""Quantitative Specialist/Senior Quantitative Analyst""
position.
We offer a great benefits package that features:
Medical (4 options),
Prescription, Dental (3 options), and Vision Insurance
401k/Thrift Plan with
generous employer match
Employer-funded Pension
Plan
Paid Vacation/Sick Time
& Holidays
Monthly Commuter
Allowance
Flexible Spending
Accounts and Healthcare Spending Accounts
Flexible Work Schedule
available in most departments
Tuition Reimbursement
Parental Leave
Onsite 24/7 Fitness
Center including training classes, Peloton bikes and locker room / shower
facilities
Onsite Cafeteria and
Coffee Shop
Additional convenience benefits,
discounts and more…
The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia believes that diversity and inclusion among our
employees is essential to our success as an organization, and we want to
recruit, develop and retain the most accomplished people from a diverse
candidate pool. To support a workplace culture of belonging, we offer seven
employee resource groups (ERGs) and a 100 percent rating on the Human Rights
Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equality Index. The Federal Reserve Bank of
Philadelphia is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
3.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1914,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
101,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"Membership Marketing Partners (MMP) is an innovative and fast-growing marketing agency that serves conservative non-profits and non-partisan non-profits in the DC metro and New York markets. We’re looking to hire a mid-senior level Marketing Data Analyst to handle in depth marketing analysis. Candidates should be analytical thinkers, who are comfortable working with large data sets and doing complex analysis, and most importantly converting results into actionable business decisions. Candidates will also need strong communication skills to explain their analysis and win over stakeholder support for their recommendations.

Here are the required qualifications:

· Proven work experience as a Data Analyst

· Strong knowledge of statistical methods and concepts

· 3-5+ years job experience with either political advocacy groups, campaigns, or a marketing agency

· BA/BS degree

· Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel

· Ability to effectively multi-task in a deadline driven atmosphere

· Extremely detail-oriented and organized

· Good attitude and work ethic with high personal and professional standards

· Effective Communication skills

Preferred Qualifications:

· Experience with Salesforce CRM or with a membership-based CRM

· Experience with Google Analytics 360

Job Responsibilities:

· Designed and distribute executive dashboards, and campaign performance tracking reports using Excel

· Documenting data structures for input from/outputs to outside data sources.

· Manage the coordination of data collection, analytics, reporting, and insights across all digital marketing channels.

· Develop SQL scripts for analysis and reporting

· Ensure data quality across a variety of reports and monitor incoming data into the platform for accuracy

· Develop customer and prospect profiles, identify new marketing segments and relevant upsell opportunities

· Create actionable data insights for a variety of marketing campaigns

Show us you have what it takes, and we’ll pay you a competitive salary, vacation days, sick days, and health benefits. Please send your resume and cover letter to. Salary commensurate with experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Due to the current pandemic, the option to work remotely can be discussed.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.MemberPartners.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.0,"Membership Marketing Partners, LLC
2.0","Alexandria, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
102,Geospatial Data Scientist,-1,"GEOSPATIAL DATA SCIENTIST*
\*\*\*Must have an active DoD Top Secret / SCI Security Clearance\*\*\*
Job Description: *
We currently have an immediate position available for a Geospatial Data Scientist to support a large task order for the Department of Defense at our customer site in Washington, DC. As a member of our core team, you will have an exciting and challenging opportunity to work with emerging technology and a large collection of data sources, engage with a large team of highly skilled professionals, and enjoy a healthy and friendly workplace.
Minimum Requirements: *
8+ years MINIMUM of experience in Intelligence Analysis
Bachelors or Masters degree in Intelligence Analysis, related field, or equivalent experience.
Ability to create high quality finished geospatial intelligence products requiring minimal revisions or modifications.
Must have experience using geospatial intelligence analysis and imagery tools such as ArcGIS, Analyst Notebook, Q-GIS, Image Product Library, and Intelink.
Familiarity with Modernized Integrated Database (MIDB), NES, M3, Data Xplorer suite, Target Profiler, and other community systems are desirable
Ability to work with and identify patterns of life in very large data repositories and cross-correlate metadata across multiple data sources.
Ability to identify new emerging data sources that provides value to the overall mission requirements.
Python scripting and Jupyter experience a strong plus.
Ability to work independently with minimal oversight.
Strong communication and leadership skills.
Responsibilities: *
Conduct research and analysis of data and create finished intelligence products.
Review data ingest streams for anomalies in support of QA/QC activities.
Validate accuracy of geolocations in big data systems using sampling and vetting techniques.
Coordinate data requirements with collection teams and developers.
Perform light scripting in support of analysis and QA/QC.
Populate various databases with results of analytical findings.
Disseminate a broad array of intelligence data analysis products dealing with subject profiles, networks, facilities, and resources.
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)

· A competitive salary based on experience

· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional

· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%

· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables

· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company

· Education Assistance

· 529 College Savings Plan - optional

· Healthy Rewards Program

· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional

· Gym Reimbursement

· Pet Insurance - optional

· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things

· Flexible Hours

· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks

· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Team members will eventually report to a specific work site in Washinton D.C. but for the time being we are working from home for the safety of our team members.

Experience:
Intelligence Analysis: 6 years (Preferred)
MIDB: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
103,Data Scientist,-1,"Artlin Consulting is seeking motivated individuals who are passionate about helping clients achieve excellence. Qualified candidates will have a creative, holistic, and systematic approach to problem-solving.

The intermediate data scientist with solid data analytics and science expertise. The Defense Acquisition Data Scientist will be a key contributor on an Executive-level Department of Defense Analytic team, leveraging knowledge of data science, methodologies, and processing techniques to support analytics and gather data from disparate Federal, Defense and public databases in support of Major Weapon System acquisition and program management. As the Data Scientist, you will work with Department leadership and a diverse analytical research cell.

Position Responsibilities:
Leverage technical and analytical expertise to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Apply technical and analytical techniques to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Create informational briefings that explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Document and visualize data both temporally and spatially, and present data to managers.
Create and provide informational briefings that are required to explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Investigate and implement new scientific analysis and methodologies to support data analytics efforts and stay current with evolving technologies and capabilities.
Complete ad hoc data extract and reporting tasks as requested by organizational leaders.
Perform data extracts and loads from source data systems to analytical data stores.
Work with business leaders to solve business problems by understanding, preparing, and analyzing data to predict emerging trends and provide recommendations to optimize business results.
Experience Level:
Bachelor's Degree Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics or other business-related field, Master's Degree preferred
2+ years of relevant consulting or industry experience, DoD/Federal Government experience preferred.
Strong problem solving and troubleshooting skills with experience exercising mature judgment
Proven experience effectively prioritizing workload to meet deadlines and work objectives
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Demonstrated ability to write clearly, succinctly, and in a manner that appeals to a wide audience
Proven ability working successfully in a collaborative and diverse environment
Experience interacting with Senior Leadership
Secret Security Clearance and above for this role
Tools and Proficiency Level:
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like MS Excel, Advana, Qlik, R, Python, or similar - Required
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like Alterix, Tableau, or similar - Desired
Experience leveraging programming languages to script the extraction, formatting and transformation of data from a wide variety of organizational systems
Big data and cloud processing experience
Experience working in a cloud based environment
Microsoft Project, Excel and PowerPoint
MS Access, SQL Server, SharePoint, and Visual Basic programming knowledge is a plus
Position Overview:
Applies technical and analytical techniques to explore and examine data from multiple disparate sources with the goal of discovering patterns and previously hidden insights, providing process efficiencies, or addressing a pressing business problem.
Apply expertise in computer science, software development, and the latest technologies to design and implement analysis infrastructure and tools, analytic workflow processes, automations, and complex data visualizations.
Creates informational briefings that explain methodologies and analytical findings to peers and customer stakeholders.
Required Education/Experience/Skills:
Active DoD Secret security clearance.
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
2+ years of relevant work experience.
Strong team-building skills as well as confidence when working with senior leadership and peers.
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) Tools such as MS Excel, Advana, Qlik, R, Python, or similar.
Experience leveraging programming languages to script the extraction, formatting, and transformation of data from a wide variety of organizational system.
Microsoft Project, Excel and PowerPoint.
Desired Education/Experience/Skills:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or other related fields.
Experience with Business Intelligence Tools like Alterix, Tableau, or similar.
Big data and cloud processing experience.
SQL Database experience.
DoD/Federal Government experience.
Artlin Consulting, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.1,"Artlin Consulting
4.1","Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,Integrative Data Scientist - Bioinformatics,"$93k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovative-driven company that will inspire you and support your career development? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as Integrative Data Scientist at our Cambridge office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by a wavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission in Cell Therapies.

You will have the opportunity to apply your knowledge and partner with industry-leading professionals in oncology, drug discovery, translational research, quantitative systems pharmacology, engineering, analytical and process development as you engage in cutting-edge therapeutic programs. The successful candidate will have extensive experience working with high-dimensional datasets using best practices in statistical data analyses to provide scientific insights and inform translational strategies.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The Cell Therapy Pharmaceutical Sciences team is pursuing several programs in human clinical studies, in addition to management of Takeda’s commercial cell therapy assets. This position’s primary role is to provide hands-on support, computational leadership and statistical guidance in bringing these therapies to patients, with a focus on nonclinical and clinical data integration, visualization, and analyses. In this role you will contribute to Takeda’s Cell Therapy platform strategies, working cross-functionally with discovery and development, translational sciences, pharmacology, data sciences, and in silico modeling teams.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Integrate and interpret high-dimensional data from a variety of high-throughput platforms and multidimensional data sources (internal or public) to derive insights and data-driven program strategies
Evaluate novel algorithms and approaches for data analysis, visualization and exploration in collaboration with academic partners and/or external associates
Work cross-functionally among R&D teams, workstreams, and programs to provide statistical support and expertise across the Cell Therapy portfolio.
Perform exploratory data analyses, static and dynamic data visualizations to communicate quantitative results enabling data-driven program decisions.
Provide bioinformatic and/or computational biology support to characterize disease mechanisms, mechanism of action for therapeutic interventions, and identify clinical biomarkers.
Actively communicate with nonclinical leads, scientists, analytical, and clinical teams to inform data analyses, data engineering, and machine learning that drives drug discovery and development.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, AND SKILLS:

PhD – or MS with 2+ years of work experience, or BS with 5+ years of relevant experience – in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field and/or experience in systems biology
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge of high-level computing languages: R, C/C++, Java, Python, Perl, and willingness to learn other(s)
Strong knowledge in statistical software and language (e.g., R, SAS, MATLAB)
Familiar with distributed computing, database (e.g., SQL), and Amazon Web Services. Database programming or dashboard experience is a plus.
Demonstrate experience and willingness to utilize state-of-the-art bioinformatic tools for genome-scale or big data derived from Next Generation Sequencing including: DNA, RNA, Epigenetics, and Single Cell sequencing platforms and assays.
Proficient in applying concepts in descriptive and multivariate statistics; Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning knowledge and application is a plus. Evaluation of (non)clinical datasets in cell therapies preferred.
Experience in data integration, algorithm development, programming, and evaluation of analytical tools
Self-motivation and excellent time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication, organizational skills, and be a strong team player.
Ability to drive initiatives, and excel in a matrix environment

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
105,Physical Scientist,"$39k-$72k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Physical Scientist

Springfield, VA

Secret

National Security

Job Description

ENSCO Inc.’s National Security Solutions (NSS) Division is seeking a Physical Scientist. If you're eager to kick off your career and solve real problems in today's world, then this is the opportunity you've been looking for! Join our team of highly talented engineers and scientists while we provide innovative products and services vital to national safety and security. NSS develops cutting-edge solutions to unique and challenging technical problems, in complex operational constraints.

Qualifications Required (Skills)
BS degree in Physical Science or related discipline (Geophysics, Physics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science) or equivalent
Minimum 3 years of relevant experience
Knowledge of and experience in digital signal processing
Knowledge of and experience in data acquisition and test development
Experience in algorithm development
Experience working with multiple sensor types, that may include seismic, acoustic, acceleration and electromagnetic sensors
Experience analyzing large datasets from various sensors
Interest and experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning
Analytical and thorough problem solving
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Scientific programming language skills including MATLAB, LabVIEW, Python, and C
Excellent time management and organizational skills
Ability to work well in dynamic groups, and achieve overall program objectives
Must be able to lift 50 lbs.
Must be willing to travel and perform field work.
MUST HAVE A CURRENT SECRET SECURITY CLEARANCE WITH THE ABILITY TO OBTAIN TOP SECRET/SCI, FOR WHICH YOU MUST BE A U.S. CITIZEN. YOU WILL NOT BE CONSIDERED FOR THIS POSITION IF YOU DO NOT MEET THIS REQUIREMENT.
Qualifications Desired
MS degree in Physical Science or related discipline (Geophysics, Physics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science) or equivalent
Knowledge of Ground Penetrating Radar systems and theory
Experience in artificial intelligence, machine learning and data analytics
Experience in developing test procedures and writing technical reports
Experience with data fusion
Knowledge of and experience in geophysics
#LI-KM1

Req ID

1849BR

Internal Position Title

Scientist III

Employment Status

Regular Full-time

General Education/Years of Experience

BS or equiv; min 3 yrs relevant exp

U.S. Citizenship

Yes

Background Check Type

7 year

Drug Screen Type

None

Export Control and Licensing

None

Contract Award Contingency

No

Recruiter

Kierra McDonald

Division Description

The National Security Solutions (NSS) Division provides security solutions for the United States government. NSS employees offer a multi-disciplinary approach to solve some of the most challenging technical problems in complex operational environments. Our areas of expertise are in sensor development and integration; chemical, biological and geophysical phenomenology; software applications and modeling; and operational applications of technology.

Key customers include the Department of Homeland Security, the Department of Defense, and the Intelligence Community.

Strength in Diversity

ENSCO, Inc. and its wholly owned U.S. subsidiaries are equal opportunity/affirmative action employers, committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under state or local law.",3.8,"ENSCO, Inc.
3.8","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
106,Business Analytics Consultant (Bilingual: English & Spanish),"$47k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This role will work closely with the General Manager of the Andean and Southern Cone region and report to the Director of Latin America Commercial Operations.

Responsibilities

Essential Duties and Job Functions:

Gathers and analyzes internal and external information on sales trends, patient reach, market share, competitor data and pricing for all relevant therapeutic areas. Makes business recommendations based on these analyses.
Conducts market assessments, research and surveys to prepare sales forecasts.
Manages business analytics process for the L9 (Andean and Southern Cone) region. Prepares regular sales reports, dashboards, and scorecards.
Sales force effectiveness reporting and analytics
Keeps ups with new analytics capabilities and sources of information. Recommends and implements improvements to reporting tools, models, and systems; identifies and manages external data sources and vendors.
Prepares business cases and presentations for senior management.
Manages projects locally and as a part of the global team to implement best practices adopted in other parts of the company or used by the industry.
Qualifications

Knowledge, Experience and Skills:

Demonstrates strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Must be able to think critically and be comfortable making assumptions when data or information is incomplete or conflicting.
Excellent project management skills, highly focused on implementation and achievement of tangible results.
Able to make high-impact presentations in small and large settings and deliver clear proposals to senior management.
Knowledge of data visualization tools and databases
Be curious and eager to learn proactively about various therapeutic areas, epidemiology, and stay up to date on country’s economic and healthcare trends.
Strong team player with experience working in international settings. Demonstrates cultural agility and adaptability in a changing environment.
Creative and open-minded individual who fosters an environment in which sharing of ideas is encouraged.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a business, finance, economics or related field.
Familiarity with the Latin America region, specifically Andean and Southern Cone.
Experience in a pharmaceutical environment preferred.
Fluency in Spanish and English language proficiency is required.

To qualify, applicants must be legally authorized to work in the United States, and should not require, now or in the future, sponsorship for employment visa status.

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Miami, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
107,Data Engineer,"$58k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Astor & Sanders, an IT solutions provider located in Rockville, Maryland is currently seeking a Data Engineer to work in a government facility in Washington, DC.

Roles and Responsibilities

· Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data

delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc

· Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related

technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

· Work in a process-oriented, software development work environment

· Have exceptional analytical skills, showing fluency in the use of tools such as SQL and strong Java programming

skills

· Be technologically adept, demonstrating strong computer skills

· Be capable of developing databases using SQL scripts

· Demonstrate expertise in data modeling and query performance tuning on DB2, Oracle, SQL Server, MySQL or similar platforms

· Experience in implementing or following software development processes 1605DC-20-Q-00092 OLMS Electronic Labor Organization Reporting System (e.LORS) Information Technology Services Support 41

· Experience writing/editing Information Technology Documentation

· Experience with Section 508 compliant development efforts

· Past experience with developing baselines for system/applications, developing and maintaining configuration control documentation, and providing guidance and assistance to project personnel in documenting and approving engineering changes. · Integration experience with Web Services, APIs, and SOA.

Minimum Education: Bachelors’ of Science Degree; Computer Science, or degree in a related field Substitution: 5 years of direct relevant technical experience with high school diploma

Certification(s): None

Clearances: Capable of a Public Trust Security Clearance

.",3.1,"Astor & Sanders Corp
3.1","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
108,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,"$54k-$108k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you looking for a fresh challenge and an opportunity to further advance your career and grow with a fast growing company? If you have a passion for data and an adaptive out-of-the-box thinker with sharp analytical and problem-solving skills, exceptional organization, and able to multitask in a fast-paced environment, we have the perfect job for you!

We are looking for an enthusiastic Senior Business Intelligence Analyst who will be part of the USCCAs Marketing team to bring data to life by providing insights and actions through measurement of current marketing initiatives as well as those in the future.

The Analyst is responsible for accurate operational data reporting for specified marketing teams. This includes traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data for high level and detailed scorecards in addition to ad hoc reports based on specific marketing requests.

They will also perform exploratory analysis to provide recommendations to marketing based on proven data.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Supports Marketing area that includes Strategy, Retail and Product Marketing along with Media (earned, owned and paid) to collect, consume and act on analytics
Marketing traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data gathering
Filling out scorecards and tracking documents by designated times
Creating ad hoc or one-off reports to satisfy marketing questions
Discovering leading indicators and insights to improve marketing efficiency or performance.
Use data and statistics to support Marketing and formulate strategy
Visualize data for consumption and specific business action
Work with Marketing and BI team, to decide on the success metrics to measure
Organize cross-functional processes
Facilitate Innovation & Growth
Perpetuate a mentality of growth, innovation and ideation by way of staying informed of latest industry trends and methods
Be recognized as the thought leaders of self-defense education, training and trusted legal protection
Process Development & Execution
Participate in establishing and tracking KPIs to ensure all marketing initiatives are performing and growing as planned or better
Build long-term relationships with cross-functional teams, business partners across the organization and outside agencies
Willingness to enthusiastically accept many varied projects and new responsibilities as assigned
Qualifications/ Strengths:
Bachelors degree in Computer Sciences, Statistics, or related field
Work experience in Analytics, Scientific Research or related field
Experience with Marketing and Web Analytics a plus
Meticulous data gathering and reporting abilities
Have a cross-functional understanding of data (Marketing, Web Analytics, IT, & Finance)
Experience with data visualization or reporting tools
High level and granular understanding of marketing objectives
Ability to communicate with Marketing management and leadership
Strong analytical mindset and problem solving abilities
Ability to structure information
Affinity with Stratistics
Basic knowledge about IT ecosystem and programming
Strong organization skills
Ability to think creatively with a process-based mindset
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively to meet deadlines
Demonstrates the Core Values of Delta Defense, LLC
PM19

Powered by JazzHR",4.9,"Delta Defense LLC
4.9","West Bend, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
109,Senior Scientific Data Analyst (CDC COVID-19 Response Support),"$67k-$118k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is hiring Senior Scientific Data Analysts to provide support to the Epidemiology Task Force: Ongoing COVID-19 Response Support. Due to the recent events caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the CDC Epidemiology Task Force is responsible for identifying and tracking COVID-19 cases, spread and containment. The COVID-19 Epidemiology Task Force Response is critical to accomplishing the CDC’s mission and goals during the COVID-19 pandemic. This position will give support across several teams within the task force.

A scientific data analyst has the necessary education and work experiences to effectively provide data analysis, data management, and data visualization support to the task force. These roles are supporting enhanced COVID-19 surveillance efforts and epidemiological studies. Successful candidates will be at an intermediate to advanced coding level in SAS or R (both is preferred).

RESPONSIBILITIES (vary with years of relevant experience and education):

Monitor data submissions from research study partners
Provide data cleaning and management support for research studies and surveillance platforms
Ensure the security and confidentiality of analytical data files and provide data file documentation describing the scientific data source.
Manage epidemiological and laboratory data by using SAS or equivalent statistical package (e.g. R)
Familiarity with data management software packages (e.g. R, REDCap, Microsoft Access, Excel, EpiInfo, STATA, etc.)
Conduct analyses including frequencies, longitudinal data analysis, and univariate and multivariate modeling techniques (linear regression, logistic regression, generalized linear models, and survival analysis)
Perform data quality assurance activities, including identifying and resolving any inconsistencies in data flow, data outside legitimate ranges, and illogical data responses
Manage data stored in a variety of file formats such as SAS datasets, Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, SQL, and ASCII files
Manipulate and transform data that are stored in a variety of file formats
Explore the use of data visualization platforms (e.g. R, Power BI, mapping software) to quickly summarize study findings
Support data visualization activities (both for hypothesis generation and to share data with the response) in order to develop communication materials such as data sets, slide sets and summary reports
Work on ongoing basis to improve and automate code
Conducts weekly data cleaning and generate weekly error reports
Database management and upkeep as well as complete ad hoc data requests
Determine sampling methodologies to implement if case counts exceed certain thresholds, characterize surveillance back-fill to help with real-time interpretation of data
Compile individual-level data submitted from multiple external partners in diverse data formats and merge with laboratory testing results from CDC or contract laboratories
Track completeness and quality of data over time
Prepare summary tables and descriptive analyses of results on a regular basis
Create and modify SAS (or other) programs used for data management and create documentation for programs describing their functions and associated processes and output
Support the design, development, and implementation of surveillance tools to collect epidemiologic data
Communicate analytic results to internal CDC staff and external partners in a clear, concise and timely manner
Assist researchers in developing analytical programs in SAS or R and assist researchers in determining the appropriate statistical techniques to apply to their analyses

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years relevant experience; or Masters degree and 2+ years (preferably a M.S. in statistics or mathematics,, or MPH with a concentration in Epidemiology or Biostatistics)
Capable of high level programming in SAS and/or R for data analysis, data visualizations, and data management

Desired Skills and Experience:

Recent CDC experience
Experience on an outbreak response in any capacity

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
110,Data Engineer - Software Product Development,"$49k-$89k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description:

Crown Equipment Corporation is a leading innovator in world-class forklift and material handling equipment and technology. Crown brings the benefits of technology to material handling by connecting lift trucks, operators and facilities and collecting accurate, real-time information for better decision-making.

Job Responsibilities:

The Data Engineer is a critical role within the Crown Insite agile based cloud development team chartered to develop and deploy new global fleet and service management products. As a Data Engineer provide technical subject matter expertise for successfully analyzing and evaluating existing or proposed databases, and successfully designing, building, and optimizing scalable data pipelines and stores. Areas of responsibility include programming, testing, documentation and training, system analysis, and project leadership. Clean, prepare and optimize data for consumption in applications and analytics platforms. Participate in peer code reviews. Ensure procedures are thoroughly tested before release. Write unit tests and record test results. Detect, define and debug programs. Assist with system testing. Provide training to users and knowledge transfer as required. Prepare system and programming documentation in accordance with internal standards. Interface with users to extract functional needs and determine requirements. Conduct detailed systems analysis to define scope and objectives and design solutions. Work with Software Delivery team to help develop and write system requirements. Establish project plans and schedules and monitor progress providing status reports. This intermediate level position works under general supervision and works closely with other software product development staff.

Related Terms: Big Data Developer, Data Integration Engineer, Data Warehouse Developer, Data Warehouse Engineer, Data Warehouse Technical Analyst, ETL Developer, Senior Data Engineer, Software Developer, Software Engineer

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software or Computer Engineering, Information Systems, or related field
5 years of related experience, including intermediate level experience in SQL, NoSQL, ETL, and Data Integration
Good written, verbal, analytical and interpersonal skills
Ability to occasionally travel with overnight stays (0-5%)
Reliable transportation to travel locally between company locations during scheduled workday

Work Authorization:

Crown will only employ those who are legally authorized to work in the United States. This is not a position for which sponsorship will be provided. Individuals with temporary visas or who need sponsorship for work authorization now or in the future, are not eligible for hire.

No agency calls please.

Compensation and Benefits:

Crown offers an excellent wage and benefits package for full-time employees including Health/Dental/Vision/Prescription Drug Plan, Flexible Benefits Plan, 401K Retirement Savings Plan, Life and Disability Benefits, Paid Holidays, Paid Vacation, Tuition Reimbursement, and much more.

EO/AA Employer Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.5,"Crown Equipment Corporation
3.5","New Bremen, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1945,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
111,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,"$130k-$150k
(Employer Est.)","****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
112,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
113,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
114,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
115,Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology,-1,"We are seeking an exceptional Biology candidate as Principal Scientist/Director of CNS Biology to advance/lead our CNS biology team and to drive CNS drug discovery programs.
Company Overview: *
ADARx Pharmaceuticals Inc. is a genetic medicine company focusing on base editing of mRNA transcripts. We discover and develop innovative therapeutics that can utilize a family of endogenous enzymes called adenosine deaminase acting on RNA (ADAR) to precisely target and correct single point mutations on a mRNA, thus the production of desired and functional protein is restored. Our vision is to provide effective and safe therapeutics to patients who suffer from currently undruggable diseases.

We are well-financed by a group of renowned VC funds, and our research facility is located in San Diego, California.
The job responsibilities include: *
Play a key role in the execution of neuroscience discovery projects from hit generation to lead optimization
Lead the CNS biology team efforts and contribute to implementation of the R&D strategy for CNS disorders
Drive results in multiple programs
Collaborate with cross functional teams
Interpret, summarize, and present data at project team meetings
Make clear decision in a fast-paced drug discovery environment
Inspire, direct, and manage scientists, and move activities across multiple drug discovery programs forward in a timely manner
Qualifications: *
Ph.D. in neurology or related field
8+ years of drug discovery experience in pharmaceutical industry with demonstrated success in leading programs from early stage to candidate nomination
Strong biology leadership
Proven track record for successful drug discovery within neurology
Demonstrated scientific acumen and deep understanding of the disease biology of neurology
A track record of evaluating and leading external collaborations
Collaborative, team-oriented mindset with strong oral and written communication skills
Successful track record in managing biology department/teams including Ph.D. Scientists and Research Associates
Preferred Qualifications: *
Experience leading teams and programs in a pharmaceutical or biotechnology setting
Demonstrated ability to lead and focus teams and drive results on a timely basis
Track record of innovative and creativity
Compensation*
Pay commensurate with experience
401k with company match
Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, FSA, Employee Assistance Program, Employee Discounts
Performance based bonuses
PTO and Holidays
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
_ADARx Pharmaceuticals is an EEO employer committed to an exciting, diverse, and enriching work environment._*
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Experience:
Leading Teams: 5 years (Required)
Drug Discovery: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Location:
San Diego, CA 92121 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.adarx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ADARx Pharmaceuticals,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
116,Data Scientist – Protein Sciences,"$86k-$143k
(Glassdoor Est.)","13-Oct-2020

Job ID
304587BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""127! That’s the number of drug discovery projects impacted this year by protein science data at Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research.

Are you a curious and inspired Data Scientist passionate about bringing protein science data to the next level of informing and impacting drug discovery projects? Do you like working in cross-functional and multidisciplinary teams? Do you enjoy transforming scientific challenges into computational solutions to catalyze efficiency in data-driven drug discovery? As a team member of a global Data Science group with expertise in protein data science, data engineering, computational biology, bioinformatics, screening analytics and predictive modelling this is a unique opportunity waiting for you to leverage protein science data at scale.

Your responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Engage in an interdisciplinary environment with structural biologists, biophysicists, protein chemists, proteomic scientists and molecular modelers to advance structure-based drug discovery using innovative computational approaches.
Champion data stewardship in protein crystallography, biomolecular NMR, cryo-EM and biophysics to enable predictive science.
Design and implement robust applications, methods and end-to-end analysis workflows for automated data processing, quality control and publishing.
Exploit and integrate internal and external protein data sources to generate drug discovery impact.
Ideate and proto-type tailored visualizations and webservices for data dissemination across the organization.
Mentor scientists who are developing their computational skills.
Posting Title
Data Scientist – Protein Sciences",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
117,Machine Learning Engineer,"$92k-$161k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Do you enjoy extracting value from our data? Does the prospect of leading the processes from data collection, cleaning, and preprocessing, to training models and deploying them to production excite you? If you answered “yes” to any of those questions, then we would love to talk with you about joining our Data Platform team as a Machine Learning Engineer.

Our purpose at The Motley Fool is to help people become Smarter, Happier, and Richer. We educate people on everything from how to choose the best credit card to how to make the most of their 401(k). We are looking for our next great Fool to lead our ML initiatives.

The ideal candidate will be a confident, experienced machine learning engineer who is passionate about machine learning and will stay up-to-date with the latest developments in the field.

Responsibilities:
Properly use statistical techniques
Use data exploratory techniques using visualization tools
Requirements gathering working with Business Owners and ability to explain insights.
Ability to use choose between a higher score versus explain
Understanding of time-series
Verifying data quality, and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
Analysis of data drift
Defining validation strategies
Defining the preprocessing or feature engineering to be done on a given dataset
Observing the best practices on training models
Automatically tuning hyperparameters using tools like Grid Search
Analyzing the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploying models to production
Skills:
A minimum of 2 years of experience required
Proficiency with a deep learning framework preferred
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning (PANDAS and Scikit-Learn)
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with auto-ML and data modeling frameworks using AWS, Azure, and/or Google
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model
Communication skills and ability to collaborate with Data Engineers and Business Analysts
Adept with Data Wrangling techniques",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
118,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,"$56k-$97k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",3.9,"PNNL
3.9","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
119,"Data Scientist, Assay Development","$115k-$181k
(Glassdoor Est.)","GRAIL is a healthcare company whose mission is to detect cancer early, when it can be cured. GRAIL is focused on alleviating the global burden of cancer by developing pioneering technology to detect and identify multiple deadly cancer types early. The company is using the power of next-generation sequencing, population-scale clinical studies, and state-of-the-art computer science and data science to enhance the scientific understanding of cancer biology, and to develop its multi-cancer early detection blood test. GRAIL is headquartered in Menlo Park, CA with locations in Washington, D.C., North Carolina, and the United Kingdom. It is supported by leading global investors and pharmaceutical, technology, and healthcare companies. For more information, please visit www.grail.com.

In this role, you will work with a team of talented scientists to develop state of the art assays to detect cancer signals at an early stage. You will be involved in the design of experiments, analysis of the raw data and interpretation of the results to improve assay performance. You will lead analytical efforts to characterize and improve assay attributes to make them more efficient and sensitive. You will also design and perform simulation studies to evaluate the effect of assay modifications on the classification results.
You Will:
Act as a core member of the R&D team leading the analytical aspects of new assay development.
Support a team of assay scientists to characterize and evaluate assay performance.
Run in silico experiments to simulate assay modifications and characterize assay attributes.
Perform complex analysis of large genomic data sets.
Present project updates, data analysis, and experimental conclusions at technical meetings.

Your Background Includes:

Master or PhD in computational biology, bioinformatics, statistics, biological sciences, cancer biology, genetics, genomics, computer science, physics, engineering, or equivalent preparation and experience.
In-depth knowledge of genomics, epigenetics, and Next Generation Sequencing workflows.
Preferred, 3 years of relevant experience in positions of increasing responsibility.
Demonstrated expertise in at least one programming language (R, Python, Go.)
Proficiency in Linux environment, version control tools, and reproducible research practices.
Proven knowledge of statistics.
Demonstrated ability to uncover new biological insights from large genomics datasets.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to multitask as needed in a complex environment.
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.7,"GRAIL
3.7","Menlo Park, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,Senior Physiological Data Scientist,-1,"ABOUT US:

Embr Labs believes in harnessing the body’s natural response to temperature to enhance human wellbeing. We are a wellness tech company that has developed a unique, wearable thermal technology with therapeutic applications in both the consumer and regulated device sectors.

To date, Embr has sold over 65,000 devices to customers in 150 countries around the world. A mobile app and backend augment our hardware devices, forming a unique technology platform that combines thermal stimulation, digital interventions, and data to manage symptoms and treat disease. Our technology was invented by the company’s founders while at MIT; we are backed by DigiTx Partners, Safar Partners, Bose Ventures and Intel Capital, and we have partnered with companies like Johnson & Johnson.

‘EMBR’ stands for Environment, Mind, Body Resonance: we believe that technology can help us lead more balanced lives. Our workplace cultivates both fulfillment and fun. We are looking for an exceptional candidate to help us create a future where digital thermal interventions help people live better lives.

DESCRIPTION:

We seek a smart, energetic, and impact-oriented Senior Physiological Data Scientist. This is a strategic hire that will lead Embr Labs’ expansion into continuous physiological monitoring and real-time symptom detection.

Embr is now designing its next generation of innovative products where sensors and algorithms will be critical and offer a core competitive advantage. The Senior Physiological Data Scientist will lead a wide range of activities, from database design and machine learning to project management and technical leadership.

Collaborating with Embr’s senior technical leaders, and leading research collaborations, they will develop new technical capabilities for Embr Labs by taking early concepts all the way to productizable prototypes. For the first two years, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will also hold a Visiting Scientist position with the Department of Kinesiology and Institute for Applied Life Sciences at the University of Massachusetts Amherst (UMass IALS).

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide technical leadership for sensor data-related research and development at Embr Labs
Oversee the development of new technical capabilities that utilize physiological monitoring
Develop R&D data infrastructure to transfer and store physiological data streams, including data pipelines and databases
Train, refine, and evaluate algorithms that identify symptoms and other physiological markers from sensor data
Collaborate with researchers and engineers to translate algorithms into low-latency embedded systems on actual prototype devices, and in the translation of successful prototype devices into actual commercial products
Ensure that physiological data projects are executed on schedule and on budget, and that collaborations with academic & industry partners are smooth and efficient.
IDEAL CANDIDATES WILL HAVE:
Deep technical expertise in biomedical informatics, data science, or biomedical engineering (Ph.D. or equivalent industry experience).
Experience working with physiological data from wearables or body sensors.
Proficiency in machine learning and deep learning for human physiology data.
Successful track record of taking algorithms from conception to implementation on products.
A self-starter personality and the ability to work with broad direction and little oversight.
Proficient in Python, Matlab, or R; Git; and SQL.
Excellent communication and teamwork skills.
Experience with relational and/or NoSQL database technologies, streaming data processing and data lakes is a plus.
THINGS YOU WILL GET:
A full-time position at Embr Labs, combined with a two-year Visiting Scientist position at UMass Amherst Department of Kinesiology & Institute for Applied Life Sciences.
The opportunity to make a transformative impact at a rapidly growing wellness tech startup company.
Constant exposure to interesting science and novel technology.
Ability to build relationships with other technology leaders in the emerging Digital Therapeutics ecosystem
A strong leadership team that encourages close collaboration; talented, open-minded team of contributing engineers.
A dynamic, exciting workplace with a flexible work environment
A caring team that values mutual respect and includes three MIT co-founders, one of the top female CEOs in the Boston tech scene, bright and thoughtful employees, and a small dog.
Competitive compensation, benefits, and equity in a fast-growing startup.
LOCATION:

This position is based at UMass in Amherst, Massachusetts for the first two years. Following the completion of the project with UMass IALS, the Senior Physiological Data Scientist will be given the opportunity to work from the Embr Labs office in Boston or to keep working remotely from Amherst.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
biomedical informatics or biomedical engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
Location:
Amherst, MA 01003 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.embrlabs.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.9,"Embr Labs, Inc
4.9","Amherst, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
121,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.4,"NuWave Solutions
4.4",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
122,Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst,"$62k-$111k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst

Join a member-driven leader in a fast-paced, challenging and collaborative environment with the shared mission of supporting America’s network of rural electric cooperatives. Since its formation in 1969, National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation, or CFC, located in Dulles, Virginia, has provided capital and industry-leading financial products to more than 900 not-for-profit, consumer-controlled utility systems across the United States. Our exceptional team delivers the “CFC Difference” that encompasses our values of service, integrity and excellence in all our interactions.

CFC has a need for a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst in the BID - Industry Research & Analysis group. In this position you will maintain a high-degree of industry expertise and awareness of current developments in markets, regulations and technologies by conducting research and data analysis on emerging industry trends in the energy and utility sectors. This role contributes to CFC’s thought leadership through expertise and knowledge that is used to support management decision-making and identify areas where CFC can provide value to its utility member-owners with innovative financing products and services and business support tools.

As a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst, you will:

• Monitor and conduct analysis of evolving industry, regulatory and technology short and long term trends and developments and their impacts on the electric utility industry and electric cooperatives.
• Utilize data mining and various data analytics techniques including visualization, statistical modeling, regression and probabilistic analyses (e.g. Monte Carlo simulations) to create models that inform risk and opportunity based decision-making.
• Develop economic and financial analytical models and tools capable of forecasting financial performance for use in budgeting, scenario planning and strategic planning.
• Serve as a leader and resource for industry data, market intelligence and modeling expertise to internal and external stakeholders through industry meetings, conferences, membership meetings and other venues.
• Conduct financial and economic analysis of utility investment scenarios through pro forma analysis.
• Work collaboratively across all functions while building strong relationships and credibility through joint research and analysis.

To be successful, you will need:

• Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering or other related field.
• Master’s degree in one of the above preferred.
• 8 years of experience in any combination of the following electric utility industry, consulting, finance, or economic forecast modeling and data analytics.
• Strong data mining, data analysis and modeling skills.
• Advanced knowledge of various database and analysis tools (e.g. Visual Basic, SQL, Qlikview, Monte Carlo, artificial intelligence techniques and statistical programming languages) and ability to build forecast models.
• Proficiency in regression analysis techniques and in extracting value from big data sets by leveraging business intelligence tools (e.g. Power BI, Tableau).
• Proven ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a matrixed and team environment and across the organization at all levels.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and presentation communication skills.
• Ability to work effectively in a consultative role.
• Highly organized, with ability to prioritize and manage multiple assignments in a dynamic work environment while maintaining high quality and error free work with minimal supervision.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes short-term and long-term incentive opportunities; an employer-paid pension plan; 401(k); medical, dental and vision insurance; a generous leave policy; onsite gym; and more—all in a friendly, professional work environment. For additional information, please visit our website at www.nrucfc.coop.

CFC is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.4,"National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation
3.4","Dulles, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
123,Transportation Data Analyst III,"$55k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the Opportunity
The Transportation Data Analyst III is responsible to develop and maintain data analytics to measure and drive outstanding service and financial performance of the transportation and customs compliance network, across the United States, Mexico and Canada. Ability to work in a fast pace environment; partnering with management and team members to develop dynamic analytics within transportation and customs compliance that will guide continuous business improvement decisions to optimize service and financial performance.
Responsibilities
Engage with leadership and team members within transportation, customs compliance, and cross functionally, to create data analytics around key performance and financial metrics to identify data driven business decisions.
Create, develop and manage analytics using Excel, SQL and Tableau.
Analyze, model, mine, and interpret data generate new ideas through a deep understanding of the data, supply chain, customers and business.
Manage large databases that include data from various sources.
Translate data into actionable insights.
Manage report data quality, stability, scalability and trustworthiness over time.
Conduct exploratory analysis for improvement opportunities in business areas not actively monitored by stakeholders.
Present business insights, data, and KPI’s to team members and leadership.
Oversee the process to pay carriers weekly, and perform month end reporting.
Develop and implement SOP’s to effectively manage data and reporting.
Candidate Profile


Bachelor’s degree in Supply Chain/ Logistics / Business Analytics with 3+yrs years’ experience in supply chain, logistics and/or transportation / customs compliance.
Excellent oral and written communications skills with the ability to communicate professionally and effectively at multiple levels both inside and outside of the organization.
Highly proficient with Tableau, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel, Word, Power Point and Outlook.
Strong track record of performing high impact business analysis and building useful data tools with tangible business results.
Strong storytelling – interpreting insights into a concise and compelling story others can embrace.
Possess a thorough understanding of transportation finance, operations, internal systems and network functions.
Complete tasks and projects in an accurate, timely, and efficient manner.
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, and collaborative environment with a diverse group of individuals.
Bilingual – English/Spanish preferred.
Perform other duties as assigned by Driscoll’s management.
Driscoll's",4.3,"Driscoll's
4.3","Watsonville, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1900,Company - Private,Food Production,Agriculture & Forestry,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
124,Data Analyst/ Senior Data Analyst,-1,"You will be a crucial member of the team tasked with capturing data workflows and use cases across EQRx and turn them into reproducible, democratizable tools on a modern data tech stack, enabling faster and more successful drug development. You will map how data is used to understand the complex web of interrelationships in taking drugs from a pharmaceutical company to a patient. You will translate and harden these workflows to a modern data tech stack in collaboration with data scientists and engineers.
You will understand how clinical scientists and staff capture, maintain, and use data and use these insights to organize data across EHR (Electronic Health Record), clinical trial, and other data sources. You will integrate data across sources and use cases (e.g. pricing, claims, and clinical) to enable end users to see across EQRx’s data asset to improve our program design, operations, opportunity targeting, pricing, and access. You will assist in building a digital-native life sciences company, identifying and prioritizing areas to pursue, where data tools could inform decision making throughout EQRx.
The Impact You'll Have
You will enable experts across EQRx to look across datasets to identify key opportunities to dramatically reduce prices and expand access to novel drugs, connecting information across market data, patient claims and adherence, and clinical datasets to enable experts to pinpoint the most salient opportunities for developing novel, more accessible medicines. This person will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines by bringing a digital and data native technology stack to drug development, powering a modern, and radically new paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have a Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative scientific, or social scientific field, e.g. biology, engineering, economics, etc.
You have 3+ years of experience in industry (Life sciences/healthcare background a major plus).
You are skilled at building insightful visualizations in a modern dashboarding tool (e.g. Mode, Looker, Spotfire); experience with D3.js a plus.
You are fluent in SQL and comfortable in a scripting language such as python.
You have worked with modern cloud data warehousing tools (e.g. BigQuery, Snowflake) and ETL tools (e.g. Stitch, Fivetran, DBT).
You are an excellent communicator, empathetic with end users and internal customers. You can translate a problem from a description of a business process to organization of data and pipelines.
You have a quick, flexible mind; always looking for clever ways to connect data and transform processes to a modern, digital and data native architecture.
You possess strong communication, organizational and presentation skills.
You can participate and work effectively on multiple cross-functional teams.
You play well in the sandbox. You understand relationships are key and have strong interpersonal skills.
Teams love working with you and learning from you.
You can thrive in a smaller company environment and love the pace of a true startup.
You’re a team player who is willing to roll-up your sleeves and get the job done.
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
125,Software Engineer - Data Visualization,"$60k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels who are experienced with data visualization, interactive data-driven visualizations, and user interface design. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for the design and development of data visualization software, techniques, and algorithms.
The candidate should have experience creating and building custom, re-usable data visualizations based on statistical and mathematical modeling and data analysis to be used to solve a variety of problems related to data reporting. Seeking engineers with the ability to overcome information overload, are familiar with accessibility compliance, information design, and human factors and usability design.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy analytic software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Designing, developing, and deploying data visualizations, interactive dashboards, and user interface solutions
Applying knowledge of technical computing platforms, tools, and techniques to analyze information and data requirements obtained from data scientists, analysts, and other business stakeholders
Planning and proposing solutions for the optimization of data integration strategies, intuitive designs, and enterprise interactive dashboards
Formulating simulation models of operational problems and proposed solutions related to integrating and analyzing using dynamic data visualizations that incorporate intuitive interfaces, infographics, interactive drill-downs, movements
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams on the use of data visualizations developed
Collecting feedback to make continuous improvements to new and existing data visualizations
Contributing to guidelines and design conventions and standards for modeling and data visualizations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Front-end application frameworks such as Vue, React, Angular
HTML/CSS frameworks such as Bootstrap, Zurb, Material
Experience developing client-side applications using JavaScript
JavaScript libraries such as Bootstrap, jQuery, Leaflet, D3.js
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Customer technical support experience
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,"ClearEdge
4.1","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
126,Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer,"$76k-$130k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Homesite Insurance was founded in 1997 and was one of the first companies to enable customers to purchase home insurance directly online, during a single visit. Since then, we've continued to innovate rapidly to meet the needs of our customers and their changing expectations.

One thing that's stayed the same since our founding: our commitment to our customers, partners and employees.

Join us on our journey as we continue to grow into a powerful contender in the field of insurance.

Homesite Insurance Company is seeking an experienced, passionate and motivated, Data Scientist/ Business Intelligence Engineer, to provide strategic leadership in the areas of Insurance Operations. The ideal candidate must be able to make an immediate impact by working with stakeholders throughout the organization to plan and execute change to impact the bottom line. Their skill set will support the growth of the Commercial line of business by utilizing data to drive decisions that optimize operational results.

This role is part of our Operations Department, which is responsible for managing post sales processing and servicing activities to meet/exceed operational service level agreements in a cost effective manner. This department has business responsibility for policy processing, billing, claims processing, in-sourced and outsourced back office operations, service platform, and business ownership of call center technology platform and operations-based IT initiatives. The Operations Department drives continuous improvement in servicing capabilities through process and IT changes and partner with Underwriting, Finance, Claims, and IT.

The Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer is a highly quantitative problem solver who loves to dig into different kinds of data and can confidently and successfully communicate their findings to stakeholders in different departments. They will act as a strategic change agent to drive the change management and adoption of key initiatives to support the growth of Homesite by leveraging enterprise data to model outcomes and create anomaly detection capabilities. The incumbent will work closely with Customer Service, Billing, Claims, Policy Operations, IT, KTC, Training and external vendors, developing solutions that optimize all areas of operations.

Responsibilities:

-Mine and analyze data from internal and external databases to drive optimization of operations, financial outcomes, customer experience and retention.

-Use statistical and machine learning/deep learning to build supervised, semi-supervised and unsupervised models per business needs.

-Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including areas such as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization and transformation.

-Communicate proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions to drive business decisions.

-Work with other analysts and team members to translate models into business solutions and collaborate with other departments in the company when necessary.

-Interface with stakeholders and develop innovative approaches to communicate the value add of the models being built.

-Participate in the transfer of knowledge of methodologies and best practices to peers and colleagues through collaboration, mentoring, and formal presentation and consulting.

Required skills:

-Master’s degree or higher in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline.

-Three to five years business experience in statistical modeling, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, and applying data base queries.

-Proficiency in programming in Python, R and SQL.

-Ability to extract and clean data from a variety of structured and unstructured sources.

-Ability to drive both individual and team projects to completion.

-Demonstrated ability to work with executives, such as CEO, CFO, and CIO on strategic direction setting and decision making.

-Demonstrated ability to build relationships and accomplish goals across a highly matrixed organization.

-Clearly communicate complex findings to colleagues and external customers.

-Monitor the results of statistical models through the use of dashboards and ad hoc analyses.

#LI-TD1",3.2,"Homesite Group
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
127,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics","$145k-$163k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,"Livongo
4.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
128,Data Scientist (Mid-Level) - 100% Remote Available,"$71k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Purpose of Job
**100% Remote Work Available**
USAA knows what it means to serve. We facilitate the financial security of millions of U.S. military members and their families. This singular mission requires a dedication to innovative thinking at every level.
In each of the past five years, we've been a top-40 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For®, and we've ranked among Victory Media's Top 10 Military Friendly® Employers 13 years straight. We embrace a robust veteran workforce and encourage veterans and veteran spouses to apply.
Uses advanced techniques that integrate traditional and non-traditional datasets and method to enable analytical solutions; Applies predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications; participates in building analytical solutions leveraging internal and external applications to deliver value and create competitive advantage; Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to non-technical employees
Job Requirements
Partners with other analysts across the organization to fully define business problems and research questions; Supports SME's on cross functional matrixed teams to solve highly complex work critical to the organization.
Integrates and extracts relevant information from large amounts of both structured and unstructured data (internal and external) to enable analytical solutions.
Conducts advanced analytics leveraging predictive modeling, machine learning, simulation, optimization and other techniques to deliver insights or develop analytical solutions to achieve business objectives.
Supports Subject Matter Experts (SME's) on efforts to develop scalable, efficient, automated solutions for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation.
Works with IT to research architecture for new products, services, and features.
Develops algorithms and supporting code such that research efforts are based on the highest quality data.
Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to non-technical employees to enable understanding and drive informed business decisions.
Minimum Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Statistics, or related field. 6 additional years of related experience beyond the minimum required may be substituted in lieu of a degree.
4 or more years of related experience and accountability for complex tasks and/or projects required.
Proficient knowledge of the function/discipline and demonstrated application of knowledge, skills and abilities towards work products required.
Proficient level of business acumen in the areas of the business operations, industry practices and emerging trends required.
Preferred Requirements
Expertise in experimental design, advanced statistical analysis, and modeling to discover key relationships in data and applying that information to predict likely future outcomes; fluent in regression, classification, tree-based models, clustering methods, text mining, and neural networks.
Proven ability to enrich (add new information to) data, advise on appropriate course(s) of action to take based on results, summarize complex technical analysis for non-technical executive audiences, succinctly present visualizations of high dimensional data, and explain & justify the results of the analysis conducted.
Highly competent at data wrangling and data engineering in SQL and SAS as well as advanced machine learning (ML) techniques using Python; comfortable in cloud computing environments (Azure, GCP, AWS).
Hands-on experience developing products that utilize advanced machine learning techniques like deep learning in areas such as computer vision, Natural Language Processing (NLP), sensor data from the Internet of Things (IoT), and recommender systems; along with transitioning those solutions from the development environment into the production environment for full-time use.
PhD in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Quantitative Economics, Operations Research, Statistics, or related field with coursework in advanced Machine Learning techniques (Natural Language Processing, Deep Neural Networks, etc).
Fluent in deep learning frameworks and libraries (TensorFlow, Keras, PyTorch, etc).
Highly skilled in handling Big Data (Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Kafka, etc).
Experience in reinforcement learning, knowledge graphs and graph databases, Generative Adversarial Networks (GANs), semi-supervised learning, multi-task learning is a plus.
Experience in publishing at top ML, computer vision, NLP, or AI conferences and/or contributing to ML/AI-related open source projects and/or converting ML/AI papers into code is a plus.
The above description reflects the details considered necessary to describe the principal functions of the job and should not be construed as a detailed description of all the work requirements that may be performed in the job.

At USAA our employees enjoy one of the best benefits package in the business, including a flexible business casual or casual dress environment, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, along with wellness and wealth building programs. Additionally, our career path planning and continuing education will assist you with your professional goals.

USAA also offers a variety of on-site services and conveniences to help you manage your work and personal life, including seven cafeterias, two company stores and three fitness centers.

Relocation assistance is available for this position.",3.6,"Livongo
4.7","San Antonio, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1922,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
129,Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer,"$76k-$130k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Homesite Insurance was founded in 1997 and was one of the first companies to enable customers to purchase home insurance directly online, during a single visit. Since then, we've continued to innovate rapidly to meet the needs of our customers and their changing expectations.

One thing that's stayed the same since our founding: our commitment to our customers, partners and employees.

Join us on our journey as we continue to grow into a powerful contender in the field of insurance.

Homesite Insurance Company is seeking an experienced, passionate and motivated, Data Scientist/ Business Intelligence Engineer, to provide strategic leadership in the areas of Insurance Operations. The ideal candidate must be able to make an immediate impact by working with stakeholders throughout the organization to plan and execute change to impact the bottom line. Their skill set will support the growth of the Commercial line of business by utilizing data to drive decisions that optimize operational results.

This role is part of our Operations Department, which is responsible for managing post sales processing and servicing activities to meet/exceed operational service level agreements in a cost effective manner. This department has business responsibility for policy processing, billing, claims processing, in-sourced and outsourced back office operations, service platform, and business ownership of call center technology platform and operations-based IT initiatives. The Operations Department drives continuous improvement in servicing capabilities through process and IT changes and partner with Underwriting, Finance, Claims, and IT.

The Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer is a highly quantitative problem solver who loves to dig into different kinds of data and can confidently and successfully communicate their findings to stakeholders in different departments. They will act as a strategic change agent to drive the change management and adoption of key initiatives to support the growth of Homesite by leveraging enterprise data to model outcomes and create anomaly detection capabilities. The incumbent will work closely with Customer Service, Billing, Claims, Policy Operations, IT, KTC, Training and external vendors, developing solutions that optimize all areas of operations.

Responsibilities:

-Mine and analyze data from internal and external databases to drive optimization of operations, financial outcomes, customer experience and retention.

-Use statistical and machine learning/deep learning to build supervised, semi-supervised and unsupervised models per business needs.

-Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including areas such as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization and transformation.

-Communicate proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions to drive business decisions.

-Work with other analysts and team members to translate models into business solutions and collaborate with other departments in the company when necessary.

-Interface with stakeholders and develop innovative approaches to communicate the value add of the models being built.

-Participate in the transfer of knowledge of methodologies and best practices to peers and colleagues through collaboration, mentoring, and formal presentation and consulting.

Required skills:

-Master’s degree or higher in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline.

-Three to five years business experience in statistical modeling, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, and applying data base queries.

-Proficiency in programming in Python, R and SQL.

-Ability to extract and clean data from a variety of structured and unstructured sources.

-Ability to drive both individual and team projects to completion.

-Demonstrated ability to work with executives, such as CEO, CFO, and CIO on strategic direction setting and decision making.

-Demonstrated ability to build relationships and accomplish goals across a highly matrixed organization.

-Clearly communicate complex findings to colleagues and external customers.

-Monitor the results of statistical models through the use of dashboards and ad hoc analyses.

#LI-TD1",3.2,"Homesite Group
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
130,Data Scientist,"$60k-$103k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
131,Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations,"$120k-$193k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

Job Title: Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations

City: Lake Forest / State: Illinois

Job Description

Join Reynolds Consumer Products… a world of opportunities! At Reynolds Consumer Products, we are passionate about achieving results and have fun winning as a team! We provide amazing job opportunities for growth with competitive salaries and benefits in an exciting, dynamic, fast-paced, and fun workplace environment. Are you looking to build a strong career and make a positive impact? Then we have an opportunity for you! We currently have an opportunity for an Operations Senior Data Scientist to join our team located at our Company Headquarters in Lake Forest, IL.

Your Role:

As an Operations Senior Data Scientist, you will primarily be responsible for solving operations problems by processing and analyzing data from multiple sources to identify meaningful relationships, patterns and trends. You will prepare data insights and proposals in narrative and visual forms and leverage advanced data science methods to discover opportunities to increase equipment effectiveness, reduce costs and provide insights to plants on process disruptions. You will have the opportunity to:
Improve the manufacturing process by formulating hypotheses, conducting experiments and delivering improvements to KPIs based on findings
Maintain and tune analytical models to predict and monitor the condition of plant equipment
Influence manufacturing decision makers by presenting statistical insights
Ensure our manufacturing operations operate at peak efficiency
Ultimately, you will be a vitally important team member in our Digital Manufacturing Group and help Reynolds Consumer Products succeed by leveraging data insights.

You will love it here if…
You are not only a team-player, but you foster a collaborative team environment
You are analytic, enjoy new challenges and thrive in a fast paced manufacturing operation
You are committed to operational excellence and to keeping others safe in the workplace
We need you to have:
A strong proficiency in statistical analysis methods and tools, e.g., Python, Machine Learning
3-5 years of experience in data model development, data visualization, and application of advanced analytics to drive business outcomes
3-5 years of experience in the design and implementation of data infrastructures and data hierarchies
Experience in AWS Analytics platform
SQL query skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
BA/BS in Data Analytics, Engineering, Business, or a related field
Icing on the cake:
Experience developing and implementing predictive maintenance and predictive quality models
Data visualization skills in Power BI
Prior experience working in operations research or related field, e.g., Industrial Engineering or Manufacturing
For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status or disability.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth in the following EEO is The Law Poster: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

The Pay Transparency Policy Statement can be found on this link:

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/PayTransparencyNondiscrimination.html

The poster and the supplement can be found on this link.

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm

For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.",3.6,"Reynolds Consumer Products
3.6","Lake Forest, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
132,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"REF#: 36685

CBS BUSINESS UNIT: CBS Interactive

JOB TYPE: Full-Time Staff

JOB SCHEDULE:

JOB LOCATION: USA

ABOUT US:

CBS Interactive, a division of ViacomCBS, is the worlds largest publisher of premium digital content and a perennial top 10 Internet company. CBS Interactives brands span popular categories like technology, entertainment, sports, news and gaming.

Properties include the websites, apps and streaming services of the CBS Television Network such as the CBS All Access subscription service, CBS News Digital platforms including the 24/7 digital news network CBSN, and CBS Sports Digital brands including the 24-hour streaming sports news network CBS Sports HQ, as well as digital-first properties in key content verticals, including CNET, ZDNet, TVGuide.com, GameSpot, Last.fm, Metacritic and Chowhound.

Follow CBS Interactive on Twitter and Facebook.

DESCRIPTION:

We have an ongoing hiring need for Business Intelligence Analysts in various locations and are continuously reviewing applicants. All applicants will be reviewed and considered for a current or near-future opening.

What youll do:

As a business intelligence analyst, youll lead data-driven analysis projects. The opportunities, barriers, and trends you identify will have a direct influence on business choices and growth strategies within our collective eco-system of web properties, and streaming services. Youll engage product owners & business stakeholders to gather requirements and work large datasets, querying against multiple databases and/or off-the-shelf analytics packages. Present insights, analyses, and recommendations in a narrative fashion that will be shaping the user experience for millions.

QUALIFICATIONS:

What you bring:

You are a creative analyst, who has the ability to find meaning and associations that others cant. By nature, you enjoy tallying the numbers, viewing problems from multiple angles, providing actionable insights, and interacting with all roles and functions to influence their strategies. Motivated by your intellectual curiosity you have acquired knowledge spanning:
SQL, including the ability to write complex queries to extract extra large sets of data.
Adept with Tableau, Google Cloud Platform
Web analytics, mobile analytics, and video analytics Google Analytics and Adobe Analytics (Omniture)
Ability to analyze large raw data sets and convert the data into amazing visualization Python, Basic to intermediate proficiency
EEO Statement:

ViacomCBS is an equal opportunity employer (EOE) including disability/vet.

At ViacomCBS, the spirit of inclusion feeds into everything that we do, on-screen and off. From the programming and movies we create to employee benefits/programs and social impact outreach initiatives, we believe that opportunity, access, resources and rewards should be available to and for the benefit of all. ViacomCBS is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, religion, creed, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship status, marital status, disability, gender identity, gender expression, and Veteran status

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access www.viacbs.com/careers as a result of your disability. You can request reasonable accommodations by calling 212.846.5500 or by sending an email to viacomaccommodations@viacom.com. Only messages left for this purpose will be returned.",3.7,"CBS Interactive
3.7",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Subsidiary or Business Segment,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
133,Data Analyst,"$32k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are looking for a Data Analyst to work with product and business teams to find key metrics, monitor data quality/consistency, help identify problems, and propose data driven solutions. The analyst should have in-depth experience with SQL reporting and building dashboards, as well as be a self-starter who is curious and detailed in their problem-solving approach. This job will require heavy reporting in SQL Server.

Requirements
Create and maintain complex SQL reporting for product and business teams as well as external clients.
Create Health Check metrics for monitoring data quality and consistency.
Design and build automated reporting dashboards on our FoundryBI platform.
Use statistical analysis to generate clear and effective recommendations.
Proactively analyze data for key insights and metrics.
Ability to understand business operations as a whole and translate questions into effective analysis based on the goals behind the specified task.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with a minimum GPA of 3.5 in Computer Science or a related field of study.
1-4 years of experience writing optimized and reusable SQL code.
Knowledgeable in either R or Python preferred.
Experience with performance tuning and query optimization.
Benefits

When you join Softheon, you will:
Have an opportunity to add value to a diverse team of innovative professionals
Rise to new challenges everyday
Receive competitive salary and career growth opportunities",4.3,"Softheon
4.3","Stony Brook, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
134,Data Analyst,"$59k-$73k
(Employer Est.)","Who is Comprehensive Healthcare?
Comprehensive Healthcare provides innovative behavioral health and integrated healthcare services to clients of all ages. We take pride in our creative and collaborative work environment and in delivering clinically excellent, trauma-informed, recovery-oriented services.

What are we looking for in a Data Analyst?
As a member of the Information Services department, the Data Analyst supports Comprehensive’s technology and business initiatives by coordinating the collection, storage, and utilization of essential data. This position will work closely with leadership and other staff to determine data needs for specific projects or ad hoc requests, and then gather, interpret, and present the information to the team. The work of the Data Analyst will impact day-to-day clinic operations as well as business decisions, so a high degree of accuracy, thoroughness, and timeliness are essential. Previous experience performing data analytics in the healthcare field is required. The Data Analyst will work on-site in our Yakima office.

Data Analyst duties may include:

integrating data from internal & external sources and performing extract, transform, and load operations to data in various applications
analyzing data to identify and interpret patterns or trends in data sets
performing data audits to identify problem areas & implementing strategies to optimize data integrity and process improvements
assisting with the design & implementation of database warehouse structure and developing standards for the design of data elements
supporting the implementation, testing, and validation of data & software systems
assisting with ongoing data architecture processes & governance
providing Tier II technical support to employees
documenting all work as it is completed

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data analytics, or related field
Three years of experience with data analysis within the healthcare industry

What Comprehensive Healthcare Can Offer You
Training and Development

A variety of career opportunities in a wide range of settings with room for mobility and promotion
Regular training opportunities including support, supervision, and consultation in implementing evidence-based services and programs

Innovative Program & Services

A strong reputation for providing quality, evidence-based services within a collaborative multi-disciplinary team environment
Innovative, forward-looking leadership that seeks to thrive in an ever-changing healthcare environment
Joint Commission-accredited organization committed to continuous quality improvement
Established partnerships with major research universities and other community and healthcare providers to implement cutting-edge treatment programs and services

Excellent Benefits

Competitive salaries within our communities and industry
Healthcare coverage for employee and qualified family members
Generous vacation, paid holiday and sick leave policies
Access to Employee Assistance Program services
Agency-funded retirement plan with contributions equal to 5% of compensation
Additional retirement investment opportunities with a 50% investment match of up to 4% of compensation
Agency-funded life and disability insurance program

Comprehensive Healthcare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. We value the diverse perspectives and strengths that our employees bring to the workplace and we encourage individuals from underrepresented groups to apply for our positions. The Human Resources department offers accommodations and assistance for the application and interview process; please contact us at (509) 575-4084 to make arrangements.",3.3,"Comprehensive Healthcare
3.3","Yakima, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
135,Data Scientist,"$89k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Scientist will be joining a team of extremely passionate data scientists, product managers, and engineerswho share a common interest in tackling some of the most difficult data science and machine learning problems today. With the data products you design, 7Park will arm influential decision-makers at financial and corporate giants with critical information they need to make smart, data-driven decisions. Our technologies and data power the insights for financial services and corporations.

The compensation package includes a competitive salary and incentive structure, generous benefits, and valuable business experiences, challenges, and excitement of contributing to the success of a fast-growing technology startup.

As Data Scientists at 7Park Data, we design and build data products that provide rich intelligence on real-time economic activity for our financial and corporate clients. To do that, we research and develop machine learning systems to extract decision-ready insight from massive volumes of structured and unstructured data.

Responsibilities:
Building, testing and maintaining all the components of 7Park Data’s product pipelines:
o Developing the transformation and enrichment logic that prepares messy, incomplete and inconsistent data for analysis

o Applying statistical modelling techniques to produce signals and packaging them in a client-consumable output
Work with 7Park Product and Commercial teams to understand business requirements, and their context, then translate them to a technical plan of action.
Evaluate new vendor data as part of our data acquisition process, form opinions on its future business value and the likelihood of success, and ultimately communicate findings to stakeholders at all levels of seniority
Collaborate with our Financial Research team to investigate hypotheses, produce commentaries and analyses on market trends, as well as refining new and existing products
Work with Product Managers at a strategic level to plan product roadmaps, recommend new products or enhancements, as well as estimating and prioritizing work. Ensure alignment of day-to-day activity with the overall product strategy
Develop systems to monitor the analytical quality of production models to discover anomalies, following through to investigation and resolution
Create technical documentation for both internal and external technical audiences, as well as contributing to client-facing content for non-technical audiences
Requirements:
3 – 5 years of relevant professional experience in an autonomous data analytics or data science role
Master’s degree or PhD in computer science, mathematics, statistics, physics, computational finance, or a similar quantitative field (or relevant work experience)
Knowledge of statistics, computer science and machine learning
Strong programming skills in Python (highly preferred), R, and/or Scala
Strong proficiency with Pandas and Scikit-Learn
Experience with building distributed data pipelines using PySpark
Experience with several of the following concepts: decision trees, random forests, gradient boosting; linear regression; logistic regression; dimensionality reduction using PCA and clustering
Comfortable with general SDLC concepts and processes
Results-driven attitude with a strong desire to build data products and achieve results that matter- for us and for our clients. We come to play and play to win.
Deeply held conviction for the power of data, with high analytical standards and surgical attention to detail
Fearlessness in the pursuit of process improvement, implementation, and change
Flexibility and willingness to adapt to the changing demands of a fast-paced startup environment
Solutions oriented approach and multi-dimensional problem solving
Highly self-motivated and results oriented, proven track record of exceeding goals
Commitment to success and willingness to put forth the effort to achieve it
Strong written and verbal English communication skills – ability to communicate complex ideas simply and accurately to technical and non-technical audiences",4.0,"7Park Data
4.0","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
136,Data Scientist,"$120k-$140k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
137,Software Engineer - Data Science,"$60k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,"ClearEdge
4.1","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
138,Geospatial Data Engineer with TS/SCI Clearance,"$55k-$96k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is your place. You make it your own by embracing autonomy, seizing opportunity, and being trusted to deliver your best every day. We think. We act. We deliver. There is no challenge we can’t turn into opportunity. And our work depends on TS/SCI level cleared Geospatial Data Engineer joining our team to support our Intelligence customer in Springfield, VA

The Geospatial Data Engineer is required to extract and/or acquire geospatial information, derivative information and multi-INT data for analysis and visualization to solve problems and enhance the knowledge of NGA missions. This also includes extracting specific feature data in accordance with the NGA Feature Data Specifications, project specific guidance, and other NGA data and product specifications.

Required Skills
BS/BA and 8+ years of experience or equivalent years of education and experience
At least 3+ years of experience in engineering and managing spatial data infrastructure to include both proprietary and open source technologies. This includes experience conducting data transformations between spatial data formats, QA/QC on data, understanding NSG data schemas, database management, and managing OGC compliant web services.
Must have a strong background in Relation Database Management System (RDBMS) and NoSQL concepts and tools to include firm understanding of SQL and Python syntax for ETL workflows.
Must be comfortable working in a linux shell environment as well as standard GUI management tools.
Prior experience deploying and using PostgreSQL and Postgis extension to manage spatial data.
Prior experience deploying and managing open source spatial data web servers such as GeoServer, MapServer, TileserverGL, or similar to enable OGC compliant web services.
Comfortable using GDAL, GRASS, GeoPandas, Rasterio, or other open source geoprocessing applications and tools.
Prior AWS Development or DevOps experience. Prior Elasticsearch experience creating and managing indexes.
Must have a Secret clearance and/or eligible for TS/SCI clearance

Job Duties

Create, update, and manage geospatial information system databases and products.
Obtain, compile and assess geospatial data sets to support requirements.
Collaborate with analysts and customers as required.
Use a variety of geospatial analysis software suites to accomplish the mission.
Provide geospatial analysis services in the form of datasets and visualization products

#GDITPriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
139,Data Engineer,"$84k-$157k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Platform team at The Motley Fool is looking for a collaborative and self-driven SQL expert to join as their newest Data Engineer.

As a Data Engineer, you will be responsible for expanding and optimizing data, the data pipeline architecture, the data flow and collection for cross functional teams. You are an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. As a crucial part of the business, you will guide and support our software developers, database architects, data analysts, and data scientists on business initiatives while ensuring optimal data delivery architecture is consistent. Whether its working on a solo project or with the team, you are self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems, and products.

If youre excited about the prospect of optimizing (or even re-designing!) our companys data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives, send us your resume and cover letter to apply!

Primary Responsibilities:
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture.
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, and re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL.
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency, and other key business performance metrics.
Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience building and optimizing Big Data data pipelines, architectures, and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytical skills and detailed oriented.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.
Ability to work with stakeholders to translate business requirements into technical requirements.
We are looking for a candidate with 2+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience with relational SQL databases.
Experience with some cloud services like Azure and AWS.
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages like Python.
Experience with streaming tools like Kafka/Kinesis and Spark Structured Streaming a plus.
Experience with serverless technologies like AWS Lambda a plus.
Experience working with or understanding formal ETL tools like SSIS a plus.
The Motley Fool Holdings, Inc., provides equal opportunity to all employees on the basis of individual performance and qualification without regard to race, sex, marital status, religion, color, age, national origin, non-job-related handicap or disability, sexual orientation, or other protected factor.

We should, however, make you aware that there is one notable exception to this policy. It is our strict and earnest intention and the companys historical record will bear this out we will never hire any of the following: robots, replicants, or morlocks. Now keep in mind we are well aware that all of the aforementioned have intentions of world domination in the future, but as of now we have no place for them at The Motley Fool unless the year is 2122 and the revolution has already occurred. If that is the case we welcome our new robot, replicant, or morlock rulers!!! Perhaps we have said too much?",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
140,AI/ML Data Engineer,-1,"As a Data Engineer at MORSE, you will work with our multidisciplinary team of scientists, engineers, and software developers on a variety of programs related to machine learning and artificial intelligence. You will be expected to rapidly define, develop, implement, and exercise ETL pipelines for complex systems that use data to help produce actionable insights in operational systems.

Skills and Requirements

A successful candidate will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to maintain data and transforms on that data. The candidate will be creating and maintaining novel pipelines for on premises hardware, externally hosted hardware, cloud-computing systems. The pipelines include data primarily from computer vision systems, traditional sensing systems, robotics data, and human generated label data. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence.

US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED, or the ability to obtain a U.S. Security Clearance

BS, MS, or PhD in computer science, database management, data engineering, or equivalent

At least 5 years of experience as a data engineer

Proficiency in Python and PySpark

Experience with Docker

Good communication skills

Self-starter and driven

Desired Skills:

Experience with cloud computing (AWS, Azure, GCP) is a plus

Familiarity with Kedro is a plus

Familiarity with the latest data engineering trends

Experience with Docker-compose

Experience with Microservices

Proficiency in one or more programming languages

Demonstrated experience with large data sets in one or more of the following areas: parsing, cleaning, storage strategies, provenance tracking, database formats, and parallelized data transformations",5.0,"MORSE Corp
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
141,"Senior Data Analyst, Project Controls","$66k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Under the direction of the Senior Manager of Project Controls, the Senior Data Analyst will develop reporting, analyze, evaluate and forecast project controls data. The analyst will also collaborate across San Manuel Band of Mission Indians (SMBMI) & San Manuel Casino (SMC) business operations to gather requirements for report development and/or in depth analysis. Will share activities with project controls team and grow the Project Controls department analytics/BI and process initiatives. The Senior Data Analyst will be required to use independent judgment, provide report and recommendations to Project Controls leadership team.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

1. Responsible for project financial planning and forecasting, report development and automation with visualizations software.

2. Develop automated reporting and adhoc reporting for Project Controls team and leadership as needed (SAS Enterprise Guide).

3. Meets with Project Controls team as necessary to provide information and address departmental issues, such as system interruptions or critical data integrity issues.

4. Define and gather information from Financial system of record as needed to enhance the Project Controls Data Structures.

5. Perform duties such as: validating, financial capital planning, cash flow analytics, break even analysis, creating KPIs, and tracking methodologies.

6. Provide guidance and lead information gathering sessions with Project Managers in adherence to approved project controls policy and procedures.

7. Work closely with Project Managers, Procurement Managers, Financial Analysts, Legal, Finance/Accounting, and Data Services to ensure timely approvals.

8. Perform other duties as assigned to support the efficient operation of the department.

Education/Experience/Qualifications
Bachelors degree in finance, accounting, auditing, or related field required.
Minimum of five (5) years of analytical experience is required.
Demonstrated experience working with relational databases and enterprise reporting tools required.
Experience with software programs Tableau and Lawson is preferred.
Equivalent combination of education and progressive, relevant and direct experience may be considered in lieu of minimum educational/experience requirements indicated above.
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Access is required.
Employee must have experience demonstrating the utmost discretion and confidentiality.
Certificates/Licenses/Registrations
At the discretion of the San Manuel Tribal Gaming Commission you may be required to obtain and maintain a gaming license.
A qualified candidate/employee must have a valid drivers license with an acceptable driving record as determined by the companys insurance carrier.
San Manuel Band of Mission Indians and San Manuel Casino will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990

As one of the largest private employers in the Inland Empire, San Manuel deeply cares about the future, growth and well-being of its employees. Join our team today!",3.3,"San Manuel Band of Mission Indians
3.3","Highland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
142,Sr. Data Scientist,"$71k-$118k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1
#LI-LW1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
143,AI Ops Data Scientist,"$116k-$141k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company

AstraZeneca is a global, innovation-driven biopharmaceutical business that focuses on the discovery, development and commercialization of prescription medicines for some of the world's most serious diseases. But we're more than one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. At AstraZeneca, we're proud to have a unique workplace culture that inspires innovation and collaboration. Here, employees are empowered to express diverse perspectives and are made to feel valued, energized and rewarded for their ideas and creativity.

Role

We are looking for a data scientist to join our new AI Ops platform team in Science IT. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working in a range of different cloud environments where they devised and deployed large-scale production infrastructure and platforms for data science. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting data & prediction problems in drug discovery.

The successful candidate will be part of a new, close-knit team of deeply technical experts and together have the chance to create tools that will advance the standard of healthcare, improving the lives of millions of patients across the globe. Our data science environments will support major AI initiatives such as clinical trial data analysis, knowledge graphs, imaging & omics for our therapy areas. You will also have responsibility to help provide the frameworks for data scientists to develop scalable machine learning and predictive models with our growing data science community, in a safe and robust manner.

As a strong software leader and an expert in building complex systems, you will be responsible for inventing how we use technology, machine learning, and data to enable the productivity of AstraZeneca. You will help envision, build, deploy and develop our next generation of data engines and tools at scale. You will be bridging the gap between science and engineering and functioning with deep expertise in both worlds.

Key Accountabilities
Liaise with R&D data scientists to understand their challenges and work with them to help productionise models and algorithms.
Be part of the development roadmap to build and operationalise our data science environment, platforms and tooling.
Support any external opportunities, through close partnership and engagement such as Benevolent.AI collaboration.
Deployment of systems, applications and tooling for data science on cloud environments.
Understanding of the necessary guardrails required for different use cases and data sensitivities.
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU).
Provide the necessary infrastructure and platform to support the deployment and monitoring of ML solutions in production Optimizing solutions for performance and scalability.
Liaise with the Data Engineering team to ensure that the platform and the solutions deployment therein benefit from an optimised and scalable data flow between source systems and analytical models
Implementing custom machine learning code and developing benchmarking capabilities to monitor drift of any analyses over time.
Understanding of the latest AI webservices and data science tools, from DataBricks to citizen data science tools like Dataiku, C3.AI and Domino. Experience working on regulatory data would be helpful but not essential.
Liaise with other teams to enhance our technological stack, to enable the adoption of the latest advances in Data Processing and AI
Being an active member of the Data Science team, you will benefit from, and contribute to, our expanding bank of Data Science algorithms and work efficiently with our data science infrastructure.
Testing and assessing the quality of new tools.
Team recruitment, training provision and coaching
Candidate Knowledge, Skills and Experience
BSc in Computer Science or related quantitative field or MSc/Ph.D degree in Computer Science or related quantitative field.
More than 2 years of experience and demonstrable deep technical skills in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, natural language processing or computer vision.
Experience managing an enterprise platform and service, handling new customer demand and feature requests.
Strong software coding skills, with proficiency in Python and Scala preferred.
Significant experience with AWS cloud environments, working knowledge of Google and Azure platforms. Knowledge of Kubernetes, S3, EC2, Sagemaker, Athena, RDS and Glue is essential. Certification in appropriate areas will be viewed favourably.
Experience with best practice of data transport and storage within cloud system.
Experience building large scale data processing pipelines. e. g. Hadoop/Spark and SQL.
Experience provisioning computational resources in a variety of environments.
Experience with containers and microservice architectures e.g. Kubernetes, Docker and serverless approaches.
Experience with automation strategies e.g. CI/CD, gitops.
Use of Data Science modelling tools e.g. R, Python, SAS and Data Science notebooks (e.g. Jupyter).
Creative, collaborative, & product focused.
Ability to just get things done.",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
144,Senior Data Scientist,"$101k-$163k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Klaviyo is looking for Senior Data Scientists to join our team which is still in its early days. You'll have a big impact on our direction and how we operate. You'll be central to upfront research and shipping products that help our customers learn and grow from their data.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:


Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone (Our background as a team is building these models for the Fortune 50).
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?

Who You Are:


Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Have worked in a data science role for 5+ years professionally or academically and can talk about your projects and the techniques you used.
Have a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least a few machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).

Get to know Klaviyo

Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 50,000 innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.8,"Klaviyo
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
145,Data Analyst (Must Speak Chinese),-1,"Founded in 2002, S2 HRC carries the important mission of providing a one-stop solution for clients of different needs.

Our head office is located in Markham, Toronto and its subsidiary operations comprise of Immigration service, Banking and Finance, Real Estate, Social Welfare and Career training / Mentor service.
We are looking for energetic professionals who are interested in starting a career in the financial industry, helping the business grow through value-based conversations and remarkable customer experience to join our growing team.

Must Speak Chinese

Data Analyst (Must Speak Chinese)

Responsibility:

3+ years of quantitative industry experience, ideally within the consumer product space or data journalism.
Excellent SQL skills, fluency in Python, and experience with at least one statistical package (R, Pandas/NumPy/SciPy/matplotlib, Stata, Matlab).
Experience writing compelling stories using data that convey technically sound analyses to a broad audience in an accessible way.
An eye for compelling data visualization and extensive experience with related tools (Tableau, Mode, Looker).
Solid understanding of statistical inference and analytic bias. Familiarity with financial modeling and advanced statistics (regression, non parametrics, predictive modeling) a plus.
Strongly desired: understanding of economic data and trends, and ability to examine relationships between our data and macro national/local trends.

Requirement:

Lead broad analytics projects core to our business and public reputation, communicate key insights using a combination of writing and data visualizations to a broad audience.
Manage tight deadlines and quickly iterate analyses to answer unstructured questions, deliver insightful learnings, and write reports for public consumption.
Work cross-functionally with public relations, product, and engineering to define, log, and measure key metrics.
Generate dashboards and automate reports that empower teams across the organization to make data-driven decisions.
Grow and maintain impactful relationships with stakeholders of both technical and non technical backgrounds with clear and
frequent communication.

This is a full-time position offering competitive benefits and compensation commensurate with experience and qualifications.


We would like to thank all applicants for their interest in S2 HRC, only those selected for an interview will be contacted
Please email your recent updated resume to us at info@s2consulting.ca, we will contact you soon.
E-mail: info@s2consulting.ca
Wechat: S2humanResources
Tel: 647-333-8811
Address: Unit 102, 50 Acadia Ave, Markham, ON, L3R 0B3",3.4,"CCUE Finance
3.4",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
146,Senior Research Scientist – Security and Privacy,"$77k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","If you want to be not just on the cutting edge of technology but creating the cutting edge of technology, Riverside Research is the place for you. We are searching for an individual to join our Trusted and Resilient Systems research group to help shape a more secure future. This position provides maximum flexibility in pushing forward new ideas, new technology, and ground-breaking research. The team has ongoing research in security of machine learning, cryptography, hardware and hypervisor security solutions, as well as developing cutting edge solutions to the security of open architecture systems. The ideal person for this position is interested in broad areas of technology and can leverage their interests to develop and study creative solutions to some of the most difficult challenges. The current team resides in Riverside Research’s Beavercreek, OH, but we are willing to consider candidates that would prefer to work out of one of our Washington DC (Centerville or Crystal City) offices, our New York City office, or our Boston office.

Job Responsibilities:
•Conduct independent research in the area of security and privacy
•Publish and present research in conferences and journals
•Mentor junior researchers and interns
•Work with the team to identify future areas of research investment and develop research plans
•Author technical proposals

Qualifications:
•Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
•PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or similar or Master's degree Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering with five plus years experience in research.
•Proficiency with software development and revision control (Git)
•Ability to work independently and with a team
•Superior written and verbal communications skills

Desired Qualifications:

•Demonstrated publication record
•Experience with DARPA, IARPA, and government funded research

IND1
CA
Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.",3.4,"Riverside Research
3.4","Beavercreek, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
147,"Data Scientist, Business Operations - Austin","$78k-$124k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve buy and live in their dream home on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

We seek a Data Scientist to join our monetization data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms.

Responsibilities:
Understand the business and data models to effectively query data
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data.
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Work with a sense urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
Drive a project forward given moderate oversight.
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields and 2+ years of experience or a BS in related fields with 4+ years of experience.
2+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Experience with Docker and AWS and taking a prototype into production.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
about realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Data Scientist,-1,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

A BIT ABOUT OUR DATA SCIENCE & ANALYTICS TEAM

Mars Petcare Data Science & Analytics team is core to our strategy. We’re using digital, data and customer insights to transform our business by finding answers to problems that we’ve often never asked ourselves before. Our vast data assets are being combined to build a 360° view of pets and pet owners to not only power Kinship’s businesses but also influence the next great ideas in the pet care space. This role will be key in helping us understand the power of our data, and how this translates into value for our company, our pets, and pet owners everywhere. Frequently the projects will be ambiguous, but that’s part of the fun; you will determine the best way to leverage our data to tell the right story for any given audience.

HOW YOU’LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Apply advanced analytics & data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and pet/pet owner behavior
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our mission: Shaping the Future of Pet Care. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who exemplify our core values. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic
Purposefully Inquisitive
Open to All
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require to knock it out of the dog park:
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. AWS, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how technical concepts to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our associates a unique opportunity to have a completely customizable career within pet care. Through Kinship you will work with and learn from a community of industry executives, pet partners, entrepreneurs, and fellow associates across our startup investment companies, outside partners, and in Mars Petcare. Our nimble and flexible approach to work allows you to make an immediate impact across businesses, while learning new skills at every stage. The diversity of our work opens doors to big opportunities and unlocks enormous potential for countless career experiences in pet care. Join us in our mission to chart the future of pet care, alongside the industry’s brightest minds.

Kinship’s offices are global, and so are our associates. We are located in NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Helsinki, Shanghai, and in Moscow. Many of us flex between our dog-friendly hubs and our home offices. Today, Kinship offers exceptional benefits for you, your family, and your pets, generous paid time off, exponential opportunities to build a career within pet care, and progressive reward packages. Interested? Let’s take big strides, together.",4.0,"Mars
4.0",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
149,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
150,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
151,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
152,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
153,Data Engineer,"$85k-$145k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Engineers develop, construct, test, and maintain architectures such as databases and large-scale data processing systems. They clean, prepare, and optimize data for consumption through the design and construction of massive reservoirs for big data. They solve problems associated with database access and integration and unstructured data sets to provide clean, usable data for customers and IT counterparts. These engineers serve as integrators between data architects, data scientists, and other data consumers. They apply knowledge of scripting tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build the data pipelines that enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the Agency.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. NGA is in search of Data Engineers who understand data, data architectures, data pipeline infrastructure, cloud solutions, and security best practices. Data Engineers create data infrastructure and integrated data pipelines; transforming, enriching, and delivering data for consumers. They may work independently and/or as part of a team of data and non-data professionals on projects of varying complexities. They will design logical and physical data models for data warehousing; develop robust data models, data dictionaries, and data flow diagrams. Data Engineers must be able to operate at the tactical and strategic level while working in a dynamic and sometimes ambiguous environment to deliver impactful results. They will leverage their strong interpersonal skills to effectively communicate with mission owners at varying levels inside and outside the Agency. As a Data Engineer, you will be tasked against the Agency's biggest data challenges in support of missions such as National Intelligence, National Security, Military Operations, and Disaster Relief and Preparedness, for a diverse audience including the Department of Defense, the Intelligence Community, and senior government officials up to and including the United States Congress and the President of the United States. Other duties may include: \* Utilize a variety of languages and tools (e.g., scripting languages) to build data pipelines to pull together information from different source systems. \* Design, construct, install, test, and maintain highly scalable data management systems; \* Develop data set processes for data discovery, modeling, mining, and production. \* Integrate and prepare large, complex data sets that meet functional /non-functional business requirements. \* Design and implement high performance data pipelines for distributed systems and data analytics for customers. \* Build, deploy, operate, and maintain big data analytics infrastructure. \* Orchestrate large PB sized data storage and compute clusters across bare-metal and cloud. \* Deploy and manage infrastructures based on Docker, Kubernetes, or OpenStack, and public Clouds such as Azure, AWS or Google Cloud Platform. \* Create tool-chains for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing AI workflows. \* Experience with engineering data pipeline from collection and processing to visualization of SQL and NOSQL cyber security data sources for threat analysis and modelling. \* Work with Agency data and machine learning experts to improve functionality in our data and model life cycle management capabilities. \* Develop enterprise interoperable coding and data standards and create processes to ensure use of enterprise-wide data architecture capabilities. \* Solve problems and deliver solutions with database access and data integration, define data conflation, fusion, and de-confliction rules. \* Collaborate with data architects, data scientists, data stewards, and customers to enable more efficient and effective data-informed decision-making. \* Apply expert knowledge of scripting, tools, programming languages, standards, and software packages to build databases and data pipelines. \* Accomplish data cleansing, preparation, storage, and security. \* Web-based data creation and editing through iD editor or JDSM. \* Data conflation activities through Hootenanny. \* Upgrades to the UI and system capabilities to enhance user experience. \* Use business analytics and data validation to improve campaign focus and output. \* Establish and sustain a NOME User Forum. \* Create and brief presentations around the community and conferences. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R or Java. 2. Demonstrated experience working with one or more database management systems, e.g. relational (Oracle, MySQL, Postgresql, etc.), noSQL (MongoDB, Accumulo, etc.), graph (Allegrograph, JanusGraphy, Neo4J, etc) to include experience with database retrieval methods and optimizations. 3. Demonstrated experience working with a range of data storage/access options, e.g. File(S3, FTP,etc.) and/or API(WFS, FeatureServer, Elasticsearch, SDK, etc.). 4. Demonstrated experience enabling access to data by way of databases or dashboards. 5. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Science, Information Systems Management, Mathematics, Operations Research, Physical Sciences, Statistics, Technology Management, or a degree that provided a minimum of 24 semester hours in one or more of the fields identified above and required the development or adaptation of applications, systems, or networks. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. -OR- C. Experience: A minimum of 4 years of experience in developing, constructing, testing and maintaining architectures and/or related technologies, or in a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. -AND- IT-related experience demonstrating each of the four competencies: Attention to Detail, Customer Service, Oral Communication, and Problem Solving.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Familiarity with Department of Defense (DoD) and Intelligence Community (IC) activities, functions, and organizational structures 3. Knowledge and understanding of NGA operations, data infrastructure and architecture 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Knowledge of simplification and optimization of data automation workflows; streamlining of extract-transform-load (ETL) operations. 6. Knowledge of emerging technical skills, tools, and best practices.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","San Francisco, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,"Senior Business Intelligence Analyst, Service","$71k-$138k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Bloom faces an unprecedented opportunity to change the world and the way companies utilize energy. We have recently launched a “game changing” solution called “Always on” that will help companies power their primary business operations without disruption with cleaner, more reliable electricity generated on-site with no combustion. We are looking for a Technical Business Analyst, Service Optimization & Analytics to join our team in one of today’s most exciting technologies.

The Technical Business Analyst will support an ongoing effort to optimize our Service strategy through improved analytics and visualization capabilities. This includes the development of optimization algorithms based on contractual economic drivers, cost/benefit analysis of key variables, and the development of a dynamic P&L model for fleet operations. The role will include dashboard development for Executive Leadership which clearly represents the revenue and cost sensitivities associated with the optimization strategies.

Role and Responsibilities:
Candidates must have a background in the following:
• Software Development/ Data Analytics:
o Assist in analyzing diverse sets of imperfect data and finding common patterns, theme and trends by using Big Data tools
• Optimization/ Operations Research:
o Experience with optimization problem setup and execution
o Experience in sensitivity analysis for complex business models
o Experience in building clear and concise data visualization dashboards (Tableau)

Education:
• Electrical Engineering, or Computer Science
• MBA or Masters in Business Analytics Preferred

Skills and Experience:
• 4+ years’ work experience
• Strong background in optimization, estimation & data analysis techniques
• Proficient with Python
• Experience with functional or object-oriented scalable software design and development
• Familiarity with NoSQL databases like MongoDB, Hadoop and REST APIs
• Working with open source databases and tools
• Experience with machine learning/AI development for predictive models preferred
• Experience with understanding Statistical models
• Experience in financial modeling
• Strong communication and presentation skills
• Strong analytical and problem solving skills

About Bloom Energy:
Bloom Energy’s mission is to make clean, reliable, and affordable energy for everyone in the world. The Company’s product, the Bloom Energy Server, delivers highly reliable and resilient, ‘Always-On’ electric power that is clean and sustainable. Bloom’s customers include twenty-five of the Fortune 100 companies and leaders in cloud services and data centers, healthcare, retail, financial services, utilities and many other industries. For more information, visit www.bloomenergy.com

Bloom Energy is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit. We are committed to compliance with all applicable laws providing equal employment opportunities. All qualified applicants, will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability. Bloom Energy makes reasonable accommodations, consistent with applicable laws, for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant or employee with a disability, who can perform the essential job functions, unless undue hardship would result

IND1",3.1,"Bloom Energy
3.1","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
155,Quality Control Scientist,-1,"Position Summary:

The Quality Control Scientist will provide oversight of contract analytical labs and manufacturers. This includes, review of analytical data from release and stability studies and review of method validation protocols and reports. The candidate should have a strong understanding of cGMPs and relevant ICH and FDA regulatory guidelines. Prior hand-on experience working in a QC lab and thorough understanding of root cause analysis for investigations is required. This position will interact and work closely with cross-functional teams, including, manufacturing, quality assurance and regulatory.

Responsibilities:
Review analytical data packages generated during GMP release/stability testing of drug substance and drug product at the contract manufacturing sites
Assist in investigations and formulate a plan to identify/confirm root cause for anomalous results
Write and/or review method validation and transfer protocols and reports
Write and/or review protocols and reports related to stability studies as well as prepare tables summarizing results from stability studies
Track and trend release and stability data for batch analysis and shelf life establishment
Initiate change control for internal specifications and regulatory documents
Evaluate and perform risk assessment for change control documents provided by the contract manufacturing sites
Manage reference standard program for drug substance, impurities and degradants
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S in analytical chemistry or related scientific disciplines with 5+ years of experience in analytical development with minimum of 3+ years of experience in quality control
Skills, Knowledge & Abilities:
Hands-on proficiency and problem-solving skills with chromatographic techniques e.g. HPLC, UPLC and GC. Familiarity with mass and UV/VIS spectroscopic techniques is an advantage
Prior experience in interacting with contract labs and manufacturing sites is a plus
Hands-on experience with method validations and transfers in support of pharmaceutical manufacturing
Proficiency in performing root cause analysis for investigation
Experience with iStability software is a plus
Passion for learning, creating, relating, communicating, and leading cross functional teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience in a start-up environment preferred
Must be pro-active team player, flexible, and open to change
Working Conditions: Will work from the Company's San Francisco Bay Area office, with additional travel as required to oversee the virtual development and manufacturing network (estimated at 25%).

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

This is largely a sedentary role; however, some filing is required. This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand on a stool as necessary.

This job operates in a professional office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.

Benefits and Perks:

Apellis offers a great benefit package which includes: health insurance with full premium coverage, 401K with company match, paid time off (PTO), long- term disability insurance, life insurance and more! Visit http://apellis.com/careerbenefits.html to learn more.

Company Background:

We are a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of novel therapeutic compounds to treat disease through the inhibition of the complement system, which is an integral component of the immune system, at the level of C3, the central protein in the complement cascade. We believe that this approach can result in broad inhibition of the principal pathways of the complement system and has the potential to effectively control a broad array of complement-dependent autoimmune and inflammatory diseases.

Visit http://apellis.com/about.html to learn more.

EEO Statement:

Apellis is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state and local fair employment practices laws. Apellis strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against employees, applicants or any other covered persons because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex (including pregnancy), gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender or transsexual individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, genetic information, marital status, AIDS/HIV status, smoker/nonsmoker, and occupational pneumocononiosis or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

#LI-BE1",3.9,"Apellis
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
156,Sr. Data Scientist,"$99k-$159k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
157,Big Data Engineer (3+ years),"$56k-$109k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

What’s in it for you?

Vectorworks Inc. is a global software product company targeting entertainment, architecture and landscape industries with enterprising and intuitive solutions that allow users to create unique designs. We are looking for a Data Engineer to build, maintain, and refine our data pipelines to generate detailed metrics and reports of our software. This person will work as part of our software engineering team.

It’s an exciting time to join the Vectorworks family, and if you are looking for an opportunity to have a lasting impact on a growing team, we hope you’ll take the time to learn more about this opportunity!

Responsibilities:

In this role, you should expect to:

Build and maintain our data infrastructure
Utilize understanding of ETL principles
Exhibit a proficiency in Python and AWS analytic stack (especially S3, RDS, RS, EMR, EC2, Lambda)
Work closely with engineering and other teams to organize and extract data for analysis

Why do you want this job? Because you are:

A self-starter who is motivated to take ownership of projects and drive tasks to completion with minimal supervision
Able to provide direction and identify new areas where data can be applied to improve software and business decision making
Looking for an opportunity where you can grow and move forward with the latest trends in big data technology
Enthusiastic about improving existing data systems and adapting them to be more powerful, usable, and robust.
Qualifications:

Why do we want you? Because you have:

A Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or a related field
A minimum of 3 years’ experience developing data pipelines
Solid understanding of ETL principles and how to apply them
Proficiency in Python, SQL, Spark, and Unix shell
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate across business areas
The ability to work in a fast-paced and agile development environment
Strong interest in learning and using the latest technologies

Extra Credit:

Experience with Kibana, Redshift, and Tableau Software
Hands-on expertise in many disparate technologies, ranging from front-end user interface to back-end systems as well as all points in between
Experience with distributed computing, NoSQL, and Flask
Familiarity with software logging

Vectorworks Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer",3.1,"Vectorworks Inc.
3.1","Columbia, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
158,Data Assimilation JEDI algorithm development,"$46k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*_Overview_* I.M. Systems Group, Inc. (IMSG) is seeking a candidate to support the Environmental Modeling Center (EMC) of the National Centers for Environmental Prediction (NCEP) in carrying out research and development work related to the future operational atmospheric component of the Unified Forecast System (UFS). The candidate’s work will involve the development, execution, testing, and evaluation of several components of the atmospheric data assimilation system in the context of numerical weather prediction. The work location is at the NOAA Center for Weather and Climate Prediction (NCWCP) in College Park, MD. *_Responsibilities_* The candidate will perform the job duties in a high-quality, independent, and collaborative way, assisting with developing and applying innovative methods for the primary work areas described below. The candidate will work with EMC scientists and external collaborators to develop and test atmospheric data assimilation components for use in the UFS. In particular, the candidate will focus on the evaluation of current and future algorithms for use in global numerical weather prediction applications using the Joint Effort for Data assimilation Integration (JEDI) project. The primary focus will be on performing an algorithm intercomparison study and contributing to future algorithm development activities within the JEDI project. This will include a comparison of variational-based solvers (Hybrid 4DEnVar versus Hybrid 4DVar) for the NCEP Global Data Assimilation System. The successful candidate will work on the following scientific and engineering tasks: * Complete intercomparison study of Hybrid 4DVar versus Hybrid 4DEnVar for the NCEP Global Data Assimilation System * Develop and support atmospheric model interface, including tangent linear and adjoint, within the JEDI infrastructure * Develop test, and/or explore additional algorithm developments for use in global NWP (use of EDA instead of LETKF, multi-scale and scale-dependent exploitation of ensemble information, etc.) * Test and evaluate JEDI-based algorithm developments for use in future operational NWP applications * Assist in development and transition of JEDI-based developments for replacement of current atmospheric assimilation infrastructure (GSI-based) * Assist in coordination of JEDI-related development activities from other EMC developers * Utilize JEDI infrastructure to explore data assimilation research activities relevant to future transition-to-operations of operationally relevant data assimilation research *_Qualifications_* A Master’s Degree or higher in atmospheric sciences or meteorology, applied mathematics, or related physical science with at least 2 years of experience in environmental forecast and analysis systems. Demonstrated knowledge, skills, and abilities in at least five of the following areas: * Advanced knowledge of data assimilation with focus on the development for numerical weather prediction (NWP) * Advanced knowledge of data assimilation solvers, including variational-based assimilation and ensemble Kalman filters * Advanced knowledge of the physical and mathematical basis of geophysical modeling and experience running advanced numerical weather prediction (NWP) models. * Experience with tangent-linear and adjoint models * Experience in model development in various infrastructures like the Earth System Modeling Framework (ESMF) and NOAA Environmental Modeling System (NEMS) * Advanced knowledge and experience of modern programming languages such as object-oriented FORTRAN, Python, and/or C++ * Experience working in a UNIX environment with advanced scripting languages * Experience in working with HPC platforms (MPI, OpenMP, Slurm, LSF, etc.) * Modern software engineering practices (requirements gathering, design, prototyping, version control, integration, testing, and documentation). * Experience in model testing and evaluation and/or knowledge of verification principles. * Ability to work independently and in a team environment on complex problems. * Good oral and written communication skills in English * Demonstrated skill in performing tasks requiring organization and attention to detail. *_Candidates must be a U.S. Citizen or Green Card Holder to qualify_* *_(US Citizen must live in US for 3-5 years prior to application)_* *_(please indicate in your cover letter)._* *_To_* *_Apply_* Please apply online at _https://careers-imsg.icims.com_. In your cover letter, please indicate the following information: 1) Timeline of availability 2) Citizenship Status 3) Salary requirements for considerations NOTE: Provide three References _IMSG is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veteran friendly_ _https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp\_%20English\_formattedESQA508c.pdf_ Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) Matching * Dental Insurance * Employee Assistance Program * Flexible Spending Account * Health Insurance * Paid Time Off * Referral Program * Relocation Assistance * Tuition Reimbursement * Vision Insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday",3.5,"IMSG/NOAA
3.5","Rockville, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
159,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,"$130k-$150k
(Employer Est.)","****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
160,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,"$130k-$150k
(Employer Est.)","****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,Data Assimilation JEDI algorithm development,"$46k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*_Overview_* I.M. Systems Group, Inc. (IMSG) is seeking a candidate to support the Environmental Modeling Center (EMC) of the National Centers for Environmental Prediction (NCEP) in carrying out research and development work related to the future operational atmospheric component of the Unified Forecast System (UFS). The candidate’s work will involve the development, execution, testing, and evaluation of several components of the atmospheric data assimilation system in the context of numerical weather prediction. The work location is at the NOAA Center for Weather and Climate Prediction (NCWCP) in College Park, MD. *_Responsibilities_* The candidate will perform the job duties in a high-quality, independent, and collaborative way, assisting with developing and applying innovative methods for the primary work areas described below. The candidate will work with EMC scientists and external collaborators to develop and test atmospheric data assimilation components for use in the UFS. In particular, the candidate will focus on the evaluation of current and future algorithms for use in global numerical weather prediction applications using the Joint Effort for Data assimilation Integration (JEDI) project. The primary focus will be on performing an algorithm intercomparison study and contributing to future algorithm development activities within the JEDI project. This will include a comparison of variational-based solvers (Hybrid 4DEnVar versus Hybrid 4DVar) for the NCEP Global Data Assimilation System. The successful candidate will work on the following scientific and engineering tasks: * Complete intercomparison study of Hybrid 4DVar versus Hybrid 4DEnVar for the NCEP Global Data Assimilation System * Develop and support atmospheric model interface, including tangent linear and adjoint, within the JEDI infrastructure * Develop test, and/or explore additional algorithm developments for use in global NWP (use of EDA instead of LETKF, multi-scale and scale-dependent exploitation of ensemble information, etc.) * Test and evaluate JEDI-based algorithm developments for use in future operational NWP applications * Assist in development and transition of JEDI-based developments for replacement of current atmospheric assimilation infrastructure (GSI-based) * Assist in coordination of JEDI-related development activities from other EMC developers * Utilize JEDI infrastructure to explore data assimilation research activities relevant to future transition-to-operations of operationally relevant data assimilation research *_Qualifications_* A Master’s Degree or higher in atmospheric sciences or meteorology, applied mathematics, or related physical science with at least 2 years of experience in environmental forecast and analysis systems. Demonstrated knowledge, skills, and abilities in at least five of the following areas: * Advanced knowledge of data assimilation with focus on the development for numerical weather prediction (NWP) * Advanced knowledge of data assimilation solvers, including variational-based assimilation and ensemble Kalman filters * Advanced knowledge of the physical and mathematical basis of geophysical modeling and experience running advanced numerical weather prediction (NWP) models. * Experience with tangent-linear and adjoint models * Experience in model development in various infrastructures like the Earth System Modeling Framework (ESMF) and NOAA Environmental Modeling System (NEMS) * Advanced knowledge and experience of modern programming languages such as object-oriented FORTRAN, Python, and/or C++ * Experience working in a UNIX environment with advanced scripting languages * Experience in working with HPC platforms (MPI, OpenMP, Slurm, LSF, etc.) * Modern software engineering practices (requirements gathering, design, prototyping, version control, integration, testing, and documentation). * Experience in model testing and evaluation and/or knowledge of verification principles. * Ability to work independently and in a team environment on complex problems. * Good oral and written communication skills in English * Demonstrated skill in performing tasks requiring organization and attention to detail. *_Candidates must be a U.S. Citizen or Green Card Holder to qualify_* *_(US Citizen must live in US for 3-5 years prior to application)_* *_(please indicate in your cover letter)._* *_To_* *_Apply_* Please apply online at _https://careers-imsg.icims.com_. In your cover letter, please indicate the following information: 1) Timeline of availability 2) Citizenship Status 3) Salary requirements for considerations NOTE: Provide three References _IMSG is an Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veteran friendly_ _https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp\_%20English\_formattedESQA508c.pdf_ Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) Matching * Dental Insurance * Employee Assistance Program * Flexible Spending Account * Health Insurance * Paid Time Off * Referral Program * Relocation Assistance * Tuition Reimbursement * Vision Insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday",3.5,"IMSG/NOAA
3.5","Rockville, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
162,Sr. Data Scientist,"$155k-$247k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Title: Sr. Data Scientist

Company: Samsung Research America (SRA)

Lab: Visual Display Intelligence Lab

Location: Mountain View, CA

Lab Summary:

At Visual Display Intelligence lab, Samsung Research America, we operate as a start-up while leveraging the broader assets of a larger global enterprise. We do advance research and development to immensely benefit our core business verticals in the space of Ads and Marketing. Our team primarily focuses on processing huge data sets, build robust and scalable big data pipelines, conduct advanced research in implementing state-of-the-art ML and AI techniques, build data services that are both real-time and batch based. All those combined provide the best-in-class experience to our customers across consumer electronics and internet of things. Many of our engineers take pride in publications, filing A-grade patents and build robust products and services.

Position Summary:

As a Staff Software Engineer you will primarily focus on building unified Audience platform by working directly with Product Managers, Lab leaders, researchers, Big data/AI/ML engineers, brainstorm different ideas and also build POCs and propose projects that cater to the broader business needs. If there is evinced interest to invest on those projects, you could lead them to fruition. You will help design data pipelines, maintain large scale distributed systems, help manage the modern data warehousing infrastructure, analyze key metrics for decision makers to provide visual insights that will change the company direction and benefit consumers. The ideal candidate will be someone who comes from a strong analytical background that has demonstrated experience in the following areas:

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain large scale distributed systems to support the whole pipeline from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving
Write efficient implementations of ML algorithms over CPUs & GPUs
Integrate our in-house systems with open source technologies like Kubernetes and Tensorflow
Build abstractions to automate various steps in different ML workflows
Build tools to debug, visualize and inspect various features and models
Work with the engineers who use the platform, and help them be more impactful by improving the platform
Minimum Qualifications:
Strong knowledge of Computer Science fundamentals including object-oriented design, data structures, operating system, computer networks.
(5+ years) Software development experience, ideally in Python, Scala or Java
(5+ years) Experience with MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, Redis, Redshift, OracleDB or MongoDB
(3+ years) Microservice-oriented architectures and related OSS technologies (e.g. Kubernetes, Kafka, Celery/RabbitMQ, nginx, Redis, Airflow, etc)
(3+ years) Experience working in distributed and streaming environment, preferably using Spark, Kafka, Flink etc
(3+ years) Experience with AWS in an enterprise environment
(3+ years) CI/CD and test automation frameworks (Cypress.io, Jenkins, Appium, UIAutomation, Bazel, etc)
Preferred Qualifications:
BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field
Strong communication and inter-personal skills
Experience with leading large-scale multi-engineer projects
Samsung is an EEO/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We welcome and encourage diversity as we strive to create an inclusive workplace.

#LI-SRA1",3.8,"Samsung Research America
3.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
163,Data Scientist-Junior,"$44k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 years experience and a BA/BS degree

Responsible for assisting more senior positions and/or performing functional duties under the oversight of more senior positions.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
164,Data Scientist,-1,"Mason, Ohio based Clarigent Health is using artificial intelligence and machine learning to study a person’s language and speech patterns to detect warning signs of suicide ideation or other types of mental illness. With preventative care at the forefront of the company’s mission, this startup aspires to revolutionize how everyone from schools to clinicians detect and treat mental illness.

We are looking for passionate, intelligent, creative and inquisitive individuals who want to part of a team of diverse individuals that share the same values and passion. Our goal is to change the world for the better every day.

Join us to research mental health conditions and treatments or to develop cutting edge artificial intelligence and machine learning technology. But, more importantly, join us to save lives and to make life better for millions of people worldwide.

Data & Artificial Intelligence Science

Use data and artificial intelligence science with a focus on machine learning techniques to perform research, create new approaches and assist with the design, development, and deployment of AI systems, intelligent data analytics systems and other related advanced technologies to solve healthcare problems.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are very flexible on office hours and telecommuting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Mason, OH 45040 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://clarigenthealth.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ClarigentHealth
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Clarigent Health,"Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
165,Data Scientist,-1,"Mason, Ohio based Clarigent Health is using artificial intelligence and machine learning to study a person’s language and speech patterns to detect warning signs of suicide ideation or other types of mental illness. With preventative care at the forefront of the company’s mission, this startup aspires to revolutionize how everyone from schools to clinicians detect and treat mental illness.

We are looking for passionate, intelligent, creative and inquisitive individuals who want to part of a team of diverse individuals that share the same values and passion. Our goal is to change the world for the better every day.

Join us to research mental health conditions and treatments or to develop cutting edge artificial intelligence and machine learning technology. But, more importantly, join us to save lives and to make life better for millions of people worldwide.

Data & Artificial Intelligence Science

Use data and artificial intelligence science with a focus on machine learning techniques to perform research, create new approaches and assist with the design, development, and deployment of AI systems, intelligent data analytics systems and other related advanced technologies to solve healthcare problems.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are very flexible on office hours and telecommuting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Mason, OH 45040 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://clarigenthealth.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ClarigentHealth
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Clarigent Health,"Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
166,Data Scientist,-1,"Mason, Ohio based Clarigent Health is using artificial intelligence and machine learning to study a person’s language and speech patterns to detect warning signs of suicide ideation or other types of mental illness. With preventative care at the forefront of the company’s mission, this startup aspires to revolutionize how everyone from schools to clinicians detect and treat mental illness.

We are looking for passionate, intelligent, creative and inquisitive individuals who want to part of a team of diverse individuals that share the same values and passion. Our goal is to change the world for the better every day.

Join us to research mental health conditions and treatments or to develop cutting edge artificial intelligence and machine learning technology. But, more importantly, join us to save lives and to make life better for millions of people worldwide.

Data & Artificial Intelligence Science

Use data and artificial intelligence science with a focus on machine learning techniques to perform research, create new approaches and assist with the design, development, and deployment of AI systems, intelligent data analytics systems and other related advanced technologies to solve healthcare problems.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are very flexible on office hours and telecommuting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Mason, OH 45040 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://clarigenthealth.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ClarigentHealth
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Clarigent Health,"Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
167,Data Scientist,-1,"Mason, Ohio based Clarigent Health is using artificial intelligence and machine learning to study a person’s language and speech patterns to detect warning signs of suicide ideation or other types of mental illness. With preventative care at the forefront of the company’s mission, this startup aspires to revolutionize how everyone from schools to clinicians detect and treat mental illness.

We are looking for passionate, intelligent, creative and inquisitive individuals who want to part of a team of diverse individuals that share the same values and passion. Our goal is to change the world for the better every day.

Join us to research mental health conditions and treatments or to develop cutting edge artificial intelligence and machine learning technology. But, more importantly, join us to save lives and to make life better for millions of people worldwide.

Data & Artificial Intelligence Science

Use data and artificial intelligence science with a focus on machine learning techniques to perform research, create new approaches and assist with the design, development, and deployment of AI systems, intelligent data analytics systems and other related advanced technologies to solve healthcare problems.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are very flexible on office hours and telecommuting.

Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Mason, OH 45040 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://clarigenthealth.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ClarigentHealth
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Clarigent Health,"Mason, OH",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
168,Data Engineer,"$61k-$118k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

Why consider OPI, and why do people dig working here?
Variety of consulting; new technologies, projects, and people on a regular basis.
Stability; we’ve been around since 1996 and have a diverse mix of clients and technologies to keep us busy, very busy. And we keep a bench. If you’re not on a project, you’re writing software for our internal business functions or you’re learning new technologies. It’s in our benefit to make our consultants as marketable as possible. That’s good for your career.
No politics or management; we don’t get in the way. Why sit in meetings all day when you can code and be productive?
Awesome benefits; free healthcare for your entire family (yes, free), 24 days of PTO + 10 days of sick time, quarterly profit sharing bonuses, you get paid OT, company trips (to Mexico), 3 company lake cabins/homes, various quarterly company events, new Macbook Pro’s, free beer/soda, chips, candy, and so much more.
You work with the best. Do an Object Partners search on LinkedIn and see the types of talent we hire. You truly get to work with intelligent, passionate engineers that share the same goal of building great software the right way.
Low company overhead. It all means more money back into our consultants pockets (profit sharing) or company trips and events to share in the financial success.

Qualifications

Architecture and design of highly available/scalable distributed systems.
Design and development of streaming data platforms using Kafka Streams, Spark, Flink, Storm, Beam or Cloud Dataflow.
Experience with functional/event-driven programming.
NoSQL technologies such as ElasticSearch or Cassandra.
Messaging technologies such as RabbitMQ, Kafka or Kinesis.
SQL on Hadoop technologies such as Hive, Impala or Presto.
Cloud services such as AWS, Azure, GCP or OpenStack.
JVM languages such as Java, Groovy, Kotlin or Scala.
Service frameworks such as Spring Boot, Ratpack, Vert.x, or Play.
Knowledge of data analytics, visualization and governance.
Knowledge of operating big data production solutions at scale.
Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and DevOps culture.
Passion for software development. Someone that loves what they do, that aren’t just in it for a paycheck. Do you have dev projects going on at home at all times?
New projects, new teams, new technologies means having to adjust and learn all the time. You might get thrown on a DevOps project as well, so having the ability to jump in and get your feet wet without hesitation is important. If you don’t want to grow and learn, we’re not a fit.
Positive, can-do attitude. We can teach the technology, but we can’t teach how to approach client challenges with a positive, helpful demeanor. The best consultants aren’t the most technical (although that sure helps), it’s the consultant that will do whatever it takes to see a client be successful, no matter what they throw at you.",4.6,"Object Partners
4.6","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
169,Data Analyst,"$34k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We currently have a new opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our Accounting/Finance/Business Intelligence team. This position will work with data generated by a variety of credit union systems to create, validate, and generate business reports that management will use in decision making. This position will coordinate with various business areas to envision and develop report specifications, track the request pipeline and delivery metrics, suggest system enhancements, and create documentation.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:

Build and maintain queries, dashboards, and reports.
Respond to day to day custom requests for data and reports.
Perform ad hoc data requests and analysis as needed.
Extract data from various systems.
Analyze results of data reports for anomalies, accuracy, and applicability to business unit requests.
Maintain and develop data dictionaries and documentation of deliverables. Actively participate in data quality related tasks.
Identify patterns and trends in data sets.
Provide recommendations and interpretations of data and information.
Assist with application used for workflow and cross sales program.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, or data science preferred. MBA a plus.
Four years of experience working in database environments designing reports and working with extracts.
Excellent analytical skills with experience managing large amounts of data from various sources.
Experience combining, analyzing and presenting data in a clear manner.
Working knowledge of SQL preferred. Experience with Oracle databases a plus.
Proficient use of Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and SQL databases.
Exposure to core banking systems a plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels of end users and technical resources.
Self-motivated with the ability to react to change, feedback and critique quickly and positively.
Strong attention to detail.
Open and collaborative style, comfortable working in an environment where ideas are shared and challenged.
Ability to conceptualize and implement items in a changing environment.

Fox Communities Credit Union is a $2 billion in assets community-based credit union servicing over 104,000 members at 23 locations. We take pride in being a progressive, member-owned, full service financial institution dedicated to serving the community.

Fox Communities Credit Union believes our employees are our most important asset. We offer a great team environment, competitive salary and an excellent benefit package which includes, medical, dental, vision, life, short-term and long-term disability insurance, 401k (Roth and Traditional), which includes company contributions including match, and paid time off! As part of our commitment to the communities we serve we also offer all employee’s Paid Volunteer Time Off! If you are enthusiastic about a rewarding career with a successful & growing credit union, apply now!

Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.",3.9,"Fox Communities Credit Union
3.9","Appleton, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1953,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
170,"Senior Research Scientist [Sr Manager, Consulting]",-1,"_*Experienced candidates (10+ years) only please.*_
_Summary: _*_The __Senior Research Scientist manages a friendly team of social scientists to design and analyze public health and education research. Help us make a positive impact in the world at our growing statistical research firm in downtown Austin. _
Position Description*
Far Harbor designs and evaluates diverse research initiatives that aim to improve public health and education in the US and the developing world. We seek an experienced applied social science researcher with extensive knowledge of research methods along with excellent project management and consulting skills.

The _*Senior Research Scientist *_coordinates directly with the Principal and manages team members on long-term sponsored research projects. This person mentors scientific staff, consults with clients, produces client deliverables and presentations, oversees project plans and quality checking, contributes to analytic work, edits research products, and participates in authoring of peer-reviewed journal publications.
Experience Required*
PhD (preferred) in sociology, economics, psychology, public health, or related social science (or Masters with strong experience)
*At least* 10+ years of _professional experience_ as an applied researcher (or in a position with significant technical consulting management duties)
Proven track record managing teams and projects
Broad experience in scientific consulting to clients and partners
History of excellent written materials and expertise with the scientific publication process
Experience estimating, developing and managing project plans for research teams
Skills Needed*
Superior project and team management skills
Consulting, communication, and presentation skills
Critical thinking and logical organization of ideas
Strong ability to present to non-technical audiences
Familiarity with various scientific research designs for causal inference
Knowledge of various data analytic and statistical concepts
Understanding of the importance of sampling methods
Expertise in methods of program evaluations and observational studies
Deep knowledge of threats to research designs such as non-random samples, non-equivalent groups, and selection bias
Other desirable skills: survey measurement and survey development
Compensation*
$110k-140k/year (based on experience) with bonuses based on company performance. Vacation, holidays, flex work benefits and company-paid access to the on-site gym.
About the Company*
Far Harbor, LLC (http://farharbor.com) is a statistical consultancy established in 2000 and based in Austin, TX. The firm offers expert research and analysis consulting to a number of federal, state, and international clients. We serve public agencies and philanthropic organizations by assisting in the design and analysis of field research and population studies.
Work Location*
This is a local position in downtown Austin TX; during the pandemic all team members are safely teleworking. Our modern offices include a fitness center with showers for walking/running/biking to work. Flex-hours and Friday telecommuting are available with demonstrated proficiency on client projects. Occasional travel might be required (2-3 trips per year for client meetings). We enjoy a collegial work environment and are motivated to provide excellent scientific work for our clients.
Application requirements*
_Please respond to this posting with the following items: _
a *_well-written cover letter_* referencing this position and your primary qualifications and goals, -and-
a _*detailed CV or resume*_ containing education, experience, and any specialized or technical skills relevant to the position.
Candidates who do not provide the above items or fail to meet the minimum skills/experience requirements will not be contacted. Qualified applicants will receive confirmation of receipt by email, and top candidates will be notified personally.

_EEO Statement: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. _

_Please no recruiters or contract agencies. Thank you for your interest._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We work in public health and strictly follow CDC guidelines. During the pandemic we safely telework and use a reservation system for our downtown suites (one-person-per-office) as needed.

Experience:
Research and Consulting: 10 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Austin, TX 78701 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
farharbor.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Far Harbor, LLC","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
171,Data Analytics Engineer,-1,"Our Data Analytics Engineer will engineer elegant and performant analytic code, predominantly in Scala (and Spark), Python and/or R. You will join a growing multi-disciplinary team of Data Scientists, Engineers, and Solutions Experts with deep domain knowledge working to develop new capabilities and workflows to solve real- world client problems.

Your work will include notebook-style ad hoc analytic development (similar to tools such as Beaker, Julia, Zeppelin) within the QOMPLX:OS SaaS platform as well as true server-side analytic development. Projects may include near real-time and batch-oriented data processing for analytics and simulation modeling. As an internal user of the QOMPLX platform, your experience will inform the development of the QOMPLX product suite to improve capability, usability and performance.

Our ideal candidate will have a strong work ethic, fantastic attitude and be comfortable tackling any challenge set before him or her. We provide significant flexibility and autonomy to team members, have high expectations and expect everyone to contribute meaningfully to our broader collective goals.

Responsibilities
Engineer data pipelines that handle collection, parsing, cleansing and enrichment of terabytes/petabytes of data to meet the clients analytics needs
Developing state-of-the-art analytics ranging from ad hoc analysis to production-grade pipelines and workflows
Providing mathematical algorithms and implementations to serve the needs of data analysis workflows in QOMPLXs modular SaaS platform
Build model management frameworks for data analytics that include both statistical and machine learning models
Understanding customer business challenges and sourcing the most appropriate data sets, algorithms, and architectures (using QOMPLX OS) to solve them quickly and cost-effectively
Own the end to end model development lifecycle and establish and adhere to best practices
Working collaboratively to ensure consistent and performant approaches for analytical code that is integrated with our commercial offerings
Interacting directly with Product, Business Analysts and Customer Success teams to support live customer deployments
Qualifications
Reside in the greater Washington D.C. area or able to relocate
Bachelor's Degree or 8 years of relevant work experience
2+ years of data analytics experience that includes data engineering & analytics
Proven expertise in Machine learning algorithms, libraries & technologies including Neural Networks
Expert knowledge of Scala and/or Python
Expert knowledge of SQL and NoSQL technologies
Experience with agile development within commercial projects or elite non-commercial research
Adept at learning and applying new technologies and solving new problems
Hands on expertise in data analytic technologies such as Apache Spark, Apache Flink, MLOps Pipelines and notebooks like Polynote/Jupyter
Experience blending analytic and simulation modeling approaches to problem solving
Effective organizational skills with strong attention to detail
Strong communication skills - both written and verbal
Desirable
Experience with graph databases and cyber security
Advanced mathematical modeling skills
About QOMPLX

QOMPLX applies artificial intelligence to solve complex, real-world problems at scale. Our Human+AI operating system, QOMPLX:OS, blends capabilities ranging from data handling, analytics, and reporting to advanced algorithms, simulations, and machine learning, enabling decisions that are just-in-time, just-in-place, and just-in-context. If this type of environment sounds exciting reach out to us directly via application at https://www.QOMPLX .com/careers with a resume and cover letter.

QOMPLX offers a competitive salary, a full range of benefits, including 401(k) and medical, dental & vision coverage, flexible Personal Time Off (PTO) plan and 10+ paid holiday days per year",3.4,"QOMPLX
3.4","Tysons Corner, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
172,NLP Data Engineer,-1,"Job Description:
The Opportunity:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Engineer to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role is responsible for developing infrastructures and platforms for a wide variety of NLP /AI and data analytics products. The person will work with data scientists and engineering teams to build products that uncover insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

The projects that our team work on are built from the ground up and we look for individuals who want to take ownership and implement solutions independently and thrive in a collaborative environment. Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for bringing together the needs of data scientists, engineering team, product managers and other internal customers to provide viable solutions and communicating your thoughts effectively.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

Main duties & responsibilities:
Work with Engineering and Architect teams to implement data pipeline on AWS (including data collection, data pre-processing, data sampling and validation) for Workhuman data products
Partner and collaborate with Data Scientists to build training pipeline to facilitate the training of large-scale machine learning models for Workhuman AI products
Implement processes to gather usage data generated from Workhuman AI products and build tools to facilitate performance analysis
Develop cloud-based platforms and web apps for launching Workhuman AI and analytics products
Develop tools to facilitate data review and analysis
Required skills and experience:

Bachelor’s (or above) degree in software engineer, computer science, computer engineering, data engineering or other related field
3+ years of industry experience in software development, data engineering, or related field
Experience with and track record of building data pipeline for machine learning product
Strong knowledge of AWS (S3, EC2, GLUE)
Experience with AWS Sagemaker
Good in programming languages such as: Python, Spark, and Java
Good understanding with state-of-art machine learning framework such as: Tensorflow, Pytorch, Pandas, Scikit-learn, Keras, etc.
Knowledge with web app development such as: database, REST API and cloud
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Experience with process design and documentation
Preferred skills:

Exposure to ML, NLP, and deep learning methods
Knowledge with the front-end languages such as: Javascript, HTML, React, or CSS
Experience with developing back end and front end of web applications for data analytics and business intelligence apps
Experience with working with large-scale of text data across languages
Understanding in model inferencing, monitoring, feedback loop and data capture in real time at scale
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.1,"Workhuman
4.1",Tennessee,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
173,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Join a small, dynamic data-warehouse (DWH) team responsible for providing detailed documentation for the development of the company’s Data Warehouse. This position is not just a technical position, but a marketing/consumer/business person with strong analytical skill set. Must be hands on in this analytical role, with strong SQL skillset.

· Experience with use of data warehouse tables and operational data, to effectively write and modify SQL queries of moderate to difficult complexity.

· Support data analytic requests by gathering and documenting report requirements, validating the data, and presenting results to end customer. For involved data-extracts and reports – to precisely specify requests at a detailed field-level.

· Partner with IT, Marketing, Finance, Ecommerce, Inventory Planning, Executive team, and Merchandising for AmeriMark and Dr. Leonard’s to the information needed in order to solve business problems.

· Work with data warehouse developers to organize data in ways that will allow for more effective and accurate analysis.

· Work with IT teams to help support and troubleshoot data integrity issues utilizing the data warehouse. Work as the liaison between IT and Marketing to support internal software program.

· Develop and monitor on demand and Adhoc reports using Excel, SSRS, and SQL Server. Establish a sense of ownership of new and existing stored procedures and automated SSRS and legacy reports that are being utilized by the business.

· Become familiar with the tables and complex logic that was created to support the Analytic Data Mart load process and business rules.

· Run weekly Financial analyses of unit contribution considering various costs, scenario analysis for Finance and Marketing departments reports to management.

· Assist Marketing with financials to create factors based on prior year performance for completing their future Catalog budget plans.
Job Requirements*
· BA/BS degree or equivalent in customer science (or comparable) Database programming certification or equivalent is also acceptable.

· Advanced T-SQL skills (3+ Years)

· Experience with SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) or similar BI-reporting and dash boarding tools (Power BI, Tableau) – both from a report-design perspective and from hands-on delivery/refinement to end user needs.

· Data manipulation, transformation, and automation using SQL to transform files from outside vendor for very complex holdout (A/B) test scenarios.

· Complex problem-solving skills and ability to work with large amounts of data.

· Multi-dimensional cube (SSAS) experience a plus to support Merchandising who is utilizing the tool.

· Keep up to date documentation for all business requests and processes and data warehouse tables in modern data dictionary.

· Experienced in communication with peers and senior management.

· Strong computer skills in Excel and Microsoft Office Suite. Excellent mathematical skills.

· Strong work ethic.

· Good organization skills required. Ability to multitask and establish sense of urgency for challenging problems.

· Experience with catalog/direct mail industry, multi-channel selling, catalog planning and execution processes, merchandise management, promotion, design and reading of basic A/B market tests and test with varied factors, as well as development of key customer KPI’s is desirable.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
T-SQL: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Cleveland, OH 44130 (Required)
Application Question:
Are you local to the Cleveland area? Relocation may not be available for this position.
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.2,"AmeriMark Direct
2.2","Cleveland, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Hi - we’re Topaz Labs. We create AI-powered software that solves photographers’ biggest problems like one-click noise reduction, super-simple masking, and pixel-perfect image upscaling. Tens of thousands of paid customers use our technology every day, ranging from amateur photographers to major Hollywood movie studios. Our AI image enhancement technology has been recognized in Fast Company, The Verge, Engadget, Ars Technica, and more.

We’re looking for a mid to senior-level Deep Learning Researcher to help us accelerate our technology development. Although your scope will later expand, you’ll start with owning R&D for one of our primary products Sharpen AI:
Develop and integrate better deep-learning models in three areas: shake reduction, focus correction, and general sharpening
Lead development on supplemental AI features like auto-masking or model selection
Explore new model research and development for sharpening images
We’re looking for a pretty specific person for this role - someone with a high work ethic, intellectual humility, and a shipping mentality. We’re a small company with a high-visibility and high-performance culture, so you will work with a high degree of impact and autonomy. This is an ideal role for an excellent ML researcher whose primary motivation is to see their work in the hands of thousands of real users.
Technical requirements
Prior key contributor to significant deep learning projects for image manipulation or enhancement
Significant prior experience with CNNs and other common computer vision network architectures
2 years of intensive hands-on experience with TensorFlow or other ML frameworks
Good understanding of common image processing algorithms
Proficient in C/C++, OpenCV.
Well-read on major recent research papers in deep learning for image or video enhancement
PhD preferred, but may consider MS or BS in Computer Science / Engineering
Our technology advantage has already driven 10% month-over-month active user growth for our company. This is a great opportunity for the perfect person to accelerate our technology and growth even further. Your compensation will be tied directly to the performance of the company. We’re also proud to offer 100% covered platinum-level medical/dental/vision for employees, 15 days annual PTO plus holidays, and 401k matching.",3.9,"Topaz Labs
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
175,Associate Clinical Scientist,"$42k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Associate Clinical Scientist will serve as a clinical scientist providing pharmacology support and execution of the development, update and maintenance of the TRHC?s clinical decision support system (CDSS) of drug-drug interactions based on drug pharmacokinetics properties. The successful candidate will have a working knowledge of clinical pharmacology, drug metabolism, drug transporters, and related pharmacokinetics principles. This person will work in collaboration with other research and clinical scientists in the Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development institute for the integration of generated information and of knowledge into the overall program strategies, to improve the efficiency of the TRHC?s CDSS, improve our mechanistic understanding and provide scientific rationale. This individual will also work in close collaboration with the TRHC academy to provide advanced training and review educational programs related to the TRHC?s CDSS. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a high-impact clinical pharmacology team and collaborative setting.

TRHC Scientific Precision Pharmacotherapy Research & Development Institute (SPPRDI) is committed to the development of proprietary products, their validation and recognition by the scientific and regulatory communities to optimize medication regimen in order to improve patient outcomes, reduce utilization of various healthcare services, lower healthcare costs, and manage risk.
Accountable and responsible for ensuring maintenance and update of drugs into the CDSS.
Performs, integrates and interpret PK analysis including pre-clinical and clinical studies.
Interpret enzymatic assays, in vitro/ex vivo drug metabolism studies. Integrate metabolism and transporter data to provide mechanistic interpretation into the CDSS.
Fully knowledgeable about PK?s drugs; to address, identify and resolve scientific issues.
Contributes to expert pharmacology input into educational training programs and materials.
Complies with all applicable regulations, maintains proper records in accordance with SOPs and policies
Education:
PharmD or MD equivalent and PhD from an accredited institution in Clinical pharmacology, Pharmacokinetics, Drug metabolism, or other relevant fields or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience:
Experience in clinical pharmacology research.
Experience in research (post-doctoral formation/fellowship; up to 2 years) would be advantageous.
Specific Skills:
An in depth knowledge of drug metabolizing enzymes and transporters would be considered highly beneficial.
Demonstrated ability and strong understanding with preclinical and clinical PK data.
Demonstrates ability to drive for results independently.
Participates in team for ensuring valid methods and in assessing review process.
Applicant should be organized, self-motivated and capable of working autonomously and in a collaborative environment.
It would be advantageous for the candidate to have knowledge on pharmacogenomics.",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Orlando, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
176,Machine Learning Engineer,"$68k-$123k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Perspecta Labs

Perspecta Labs generates transformative applied research to fuel solutions for our customers’ unique challenges. We are a self-sustaining research center within Perspecta that provides applied research and engineering to enable government agencies, utilities and commercial enterprises to fully exploit the future of communications, analytics and cyber security.

Responsibilities

Perspecta has an exciting opportunity for a Machine Learning Software Engineer to aid on the development of machine learning models and the software that is needed for the training and deployment of these machine learning model. In addition, the qualified candidate will engineer both structure and unstructured data that will be fed to and taken from the machine learning models. Because the qualified candidate will be working closely with the Data Scientist, the candidate must have general understanding of machine learning. This position is located onsite at Picatinny Arsenal, NJ.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree in Physics, Mathematics, Electrical, Computer, or Software Engineering
3 -5 years experience developing machine learning models in areas such as classification from video, object detection and classification, and reinforcement learning.
Experience with machine learning algorithms such as Neural Networks, Boosting algorithms, Decision Trees, etc.
Software development experience in Python and/or C++ Experience in software design and development Experience with TensorFlow and other machine learning libraries
Broad knowledge in current machine learning techniques and ability to adapt novel techniques to research questions

Preferred Skills:

Familiarity with reinforcement learning and computer vision techniques would be a plus
Good Communication and Presentation skills are a plus. E
xperience with Linux is highly desirable.

The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen and possess and be able to maintain a DOD Secret Security Clearance, as a qualification and condition for employment.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Wharton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Analyst,"$50k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

This Data Analyst will be part of Rational's Technology & Data Practice and supporting one of our large biotech projects. This individual will provide strategic and tactical consultation, leadership in delivering solutions, and oversight of processes and systems.  The position requires solid technical foundation, domain knowledge, as well as strong verbal and written communication skills with a proven ability to clearly communicate technical information to a non-technical audience.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What you will do:
Serve as the Business Analyst subject matter expert supporting, but not limited to Commercial portfolio
Network with a new and evolving IT environment, business team, and vendors to foster strong relationships and build partnerships
Understand strategy and how it translates to executable programs, projects, and efforts that align with strategic goals while taking the environmental constraints and opportunities into account
Collaborate with cross-functional professionals to deliver high-quality and innovative solutions that meet the business needs and create new opportunities
Provide analytic support of various levels of complexity including large, multi-year, cross-functional efforts with internal and external influencing factors
Negotiate conflicts and complex issues to an expeditious and satisfactory resolution
What you will bring:
3+ years of exposure to the orchestrating technology solutions for technical and/or Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical organizations
3+ years of experience in the Business Analysis or equivalent role with solution delivery and process improvement supporting cross-functional implementation of IT solutions in the Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical industry
3+ years of experience in organization financials, financial reporting
Familiarity with applications used in the business area such as Salesforce and Veeva
Working experience in SQL Server and Snowflake (preferred, but not required)
Proven knowledge of IT solutions and application management through various product cycles and evolving work environments
Demonstrated technical understanding of application architecture to include application servers, web servers, configuration files, relational databases, and reporting applications
Ability to proactively plan, organize, deliver with limited oversight, prioritize, and quickly adapt to changing situations
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to interface and influence internal and external partners at multiple organization levels
Strong interpersonal and negotiation skills, with a high degree of self-motivation and ability to work independently
Proficient in essential tools such as Power BI, Smartsheets, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Who you are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Senior Scientist - Learning Technology,-1,"Title: Senior Scientist *(Learning Technology)
Purpose: *
The role of the Senior Scientist is to lead the planning, execution, and evaluation of applied research and development projects in support of defense, other government, or industry clients. Research topics will include the design and development of next-generation learning and development technologies, human performance assessment, and other related topics. The Senior Scientist will develop mission and business-relevant prototypes and practices, co-author papers and research proposals, execute research studies, and present findings. The Senior Scientist will also support management in business development efforts by managing an active portfolio of new and existing clients.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
· Serves as Principal Investigator and/or project manager on Federal and DoD research and development contracts related to learning, training, and educational technology and performance support technologies

· Leads and mentors multidisciplinary teams of learning science professionals

· Secures funding through proposal writing and other business development opportunities

· Manages relationships with government and industry clients, stakeholders, and end users

· Ensures project tasking is executed in an efficient way consistent with company and industry standards and scientific understanding
Qualifications: *
• U.S. Citizen

• Ph.D. in a field related to learning sciences, technology design, instructional design, applied psychology, human factors, or other relevant area of study _and_ 10+ years of related post-graduate work experience

• Subject matter expertise in technology-based training, human performance assessment, game-based training, simulation, immersive reality (e.g., AR, VR, MR), adaptive training, mobile learning or instructional design

• Experience performing on government research and development contracts and interacting with military and other government customers

• Experience leading experimental research projects

• Experience leading field data collection efforts

• Strong written and oral communication skills

• Familiarity with Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, SPSS
Work Environment: *
The majority (75%) of this position is situated in a typical office environment and includes the use of a computer (6-8 hours per day), telephone, and web-based video communications. The remaining 25% of time may include activities at customer sites such as military installations and other commercial industrial or office settings. Working in any field environment you may be exposed to the elements (hot or cold temperatures, sun, wind, snow, rain, etc.). Military installations may require work in wilderness settings and handling or being near live ammunition and weapons. Activities required will include traveling (flying or driving) for long periods, may require walking or standing for long durations (6-8 hours), crouching, kneeling, and carrying equipment. You may be required to wear additional safety equipment including but not limited to a helmet, eye and ear protection, safety vest, and steel-toed boots.
Travel: *
The Senior Scientist will be expected to travel up to 25% of working hours per month for the following purposes:

• Business development opportunities

• Conference presentations and attendance

• Team and organizational meetings (if remote)
Security Clearance: *
All employees must have or be capable of acquiring a Secret DoD security clearance. Guidelines indicating those items that may prevent you from obtaining a security clearance can be found here: http://www.fas.org/sgp/isoo/guidelines.html.
Background Check and Drug Testing: *
Our clients may require background checks and drug testing.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Company's website:
www.quantumimprovements.net
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/quantumimprovements
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
179,Quality Data Analyst,"$41k-$73k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Jubilant HollisterStier LLC provides a complete range of services to support the pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical industries. The Allergy business is a worldwide leader in the manufacture of allergenic extracts, targeted primarily at treating allergies and asthma. Jubilant HollisterStier is also a nationally recognized contract manufacturer of sterile injectable vials, and lyophilized products. Jubilant HollisterStier is owned by Jubilant Life Sciences.

Reporting to the Director of QA Operations, The Quality Data Analyst is responsible for data collection, statistical analysis, and investigative reporting functions for all Jubilant Pharma facilities. Essential responsibilities include but are not limited to:

Collect, analyze, trend, and manage quality-related data, and communicate results to upper management.
Prepare and distribute monthly Quality dashboard.
Prepare and distribute monthly Effeciency Matrix.
Perform Quality System Trending (to include metrics) related to: Incidents, CAPAs, Customer Complaints, Change Controls, EDRs, CERs, Internal Audits, etc.
Develop and maintain a pharmaceutical Quality By Design (QbD) policy and program to collect and evaluate critical process parameters from each product line as it matures through its life cycle.
Develop and prepare common, practical, and relevant metrics from across the Jubilant Pharma facilities in order to identify the most efficient and effective utilization of capital and human resources.

Qualifications:

Bachelor of Arts or Science required. Preferred majors are any hard sciences, mathematics, or statistics.
Minimum of 5 years related experience.
Must have 3 years pharmaceutical experience.
FDA Regulated Industry experience is required.
Must have solid understanding and proven performance utilizing statistical analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint is required.
Physical Requirements: Prolonged sitting.

Jubilant HollisterStier is a great place to grow!

If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today!

http://www.jubilantcareer.jubl.com

Jubilant HollisterStier is an EEO/AA Employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

If you require assistance applying for a position, please contact our HR Department at:

HResources@jhs.jubl.com",3.0,"Jubilant HollisterStier Spokane
3.0","Spokane, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
180,Manufacturing Scientist,"$18k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Biomerica Corporation focusing on the research, development and manufacturing of immunoassay test products is looking to identify and hire a Manufacturing Scientist to lead Contract manufacturing project and production and process improvement . As a key member of the Manufacturing Team, the Manufacturing Scientist will report to Director of Manufacturing and be responsible for, but not limited to the following
Carry out production tasks in support of manufacturing goals and objectives
Lead and carry out contract manufacturing project.
Purify recombinant proteins using column chromatography system.
Perform antibody biotinylation and HRP conjugation
Perform Lyophilization for biological compounds
Compound complex ELISA reagents and perform ELISA assay
Lead and conduct NCMR or CAPA investigation for manufacturing processes.
Write validation protocol and execute process and equipment validation
Maintain records and notebooks in a neat, thorough and accurate manner. Perform required data entry on company planning and materials management system.
Initiate or update manufacturing document and procedures as needed.
Operate moderately complex laboratory equipment and perform routine equipment calibrations and maintenance.
Follow all safety guidelines, manufacturing policies and procedures. Operate under strict QSR and ISO compliance.
Provide guidance and training to Production Associate.
Other duties as assigned, according to the changing needs of the business
Job Requirements: *
BS or MS degree in Chemistry or Biochemistry with minimum 5 years work experience, or Ph.D degree with minimum 2 years experience in related field, basic computer skills (Word, Excel).
A self-motivated individual with prior in experience and hands on skills in the following areas: protein purification; antibody conjugate; lyophilization and ELISA assay
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 2 years (Preferred)",2.3,"Biomerica
2.3","Irvine, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
181,Principal Scientist,-1,"Myeloid Therapeutics *
Role: *Principal Scientist, Translational Sciences
Myeloid Therapeutics is an immuno-oncology company developing its proprietary
ATAKTM myeloid cell program to cure cancer. ATAKTM cells are autologous myeloid cells that have been engineered to unleash their power to cure cancer. Our platform technology has demonstrated activity against hematological and solid tumor targets in preclinical models and we are translating these findings to the clinic.
Purpose: *
We are seeking an energetic and committed Principal Scientist that will be responsible for building the pre-clinical team within the Translational Sciences group. The successful candidate will be an outstanding scientist with expertise in immunology and experience in overseeing the design, execution and interpretation of all in vivo pharmacology studies.
S/he will also be expected to develop and maintain strong collaborations and relations with external experts in the non-clinical and clinical fields of immunology, immuno- oncology and autoimmune diseases. This individual will join a dynamic, rapidly growing, and highly collaborative team that combines significant drug discovery experience, including with pioneering technologies driving novel biological platforms.
Essential Job Responsibilities: *
• Propose, plan and manage and execute studies to characterize the anti-tumor activity of Myeloid’s proprietary cell therapies
• Lead a team of 1-3 scientists/ research associates
• Responsible for preparation of study reports, regulatory filings and project presentations
• Interface with external partners, clinical and academic collaborators, and CROs
• Provide high-level updates and advice to senior management, including evaluation of data and their potential impact on drug programs and clinical/regulatory strategy
• Provide development opportunities and mentoring to direct reports
Qualifications: *
Required:
• PhD. with more than 8 years of experience in immunology, or MS with 10+ years
• At least 5 years of experience working with rodents in a biopharmaceutical setting

• Deep understanding of rodent experimental models in both immuno-oncology and autoimmunity

• Proven experience in designing and executing _in vivo_ experiments, including hands-on experience with IP, IV, IP, PO injection, blood collection blood and tissue harvest
• Driven to deliver results to meet the company’s goals and timelines with the ability to handle multiple projects in parallel
• Rigorous with strong problem-solving and analytical skills
• Proficient in data collection/documentation of all study results in the form of notebook reports and regulatory documents
• Strong leadership, interpersonal and communication skills with an enthusiasm for participating in a fast-paced environment characterized by rigorous science and innovative thinking
• Ability to follow and promote safety instructions and regulations
• A team player and mentor, who listens effectively and invites response and discussion. A collaborator who communicates in an open, clear, complete, timely and consistent manner

Preferred
• Experience with flow cytometry (FACS and cell sorting), T cell activation assays, ELISA and/or histology
• Experience with engaging and managing external efforts with contract research organizations and academic collaborators
• Experience in cell therapies
• Contributed to the authorship of regulatory submission documents
• Broad disease related experience with firsthand knowledge in immno-oncology and/or autoimmune diseases
• Experience working within start up environment

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
In vivo models: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.myeloidtx.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Myeloid Therapeutics,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
182,Principal Scientist,-1,"Myeloid Therapeutics *
Role: *Principal Scientist, Translational Sciences
Myeloid Therapeutics is an immuno-oncology company developing its proprietary
ATAKTM myeloid cell program to cure cancer. ATAKTM cells are autologous myeloid cells that have been engineered to unleash their power to cure cancer. Our platform technology has demonstrated activity against hematological and solid tumor targets in preclinical models and we are translating these findings to the clinic.
Purpose: *
We are seeking an energetic and committed Principal Scientist that will be responsible for building the pre-clinical team within the Translational Sciences group. The successful candidate will be an outstanding scientist with expertise in immunology and experience in overseeing the design, execution and interpretation of all in vivo pharmacology studies.
S/he will also be expected to develop and maintain strong collaborations and relations with external experts in the non-clinical and clinical fields of immunology, immuno- oncology and autoimmune diseases. This individual will join a dynamic, rapidly growing, and highly collaborative team that combines significant drug discovery experience, including with pioneering technologies driving novel biological platforms.
Essential Job Responsibilities: *
• Propose, plan and manage and execute studies to characterize the anti-tumor activity of Myeloid’s proprietary cell therapies
• Lead a team of 1-3 scientists/ research associates
• Responsible for preparation of study reports, regulatory filings and project presentations
• Interface with external partners, clinical and academic collaborators, and CROs
• Provide high-level updates and advice to senior management, including evaluation of data and their potential impact on drug programs and clinical/regulatory strategy
• Provide development opportunities and mentoring to direct reports
Qualifications: *
Required:
• PhD. with more than 8 years of experience in immunology, or MS with 10+ years
• At least 5 years of experience working with rodents in a biopharmaceutical setting

• Deep understanding of rodent experimental models in both immuno-oncology and autoimmunity

• Proven experience in designing and executing _in vivo_ experiments, including hands-on experience with IP, IV, IP, PO injection, blood collection blood and tissue harvest
• Driven to deliver results to meet the company’s goals and timelines with the ability to handle multiple projects in parallel
• Rigorous with strong problem-solving and analytical skills
• Proficient in data collection/documentation of all study results in the form of notebook reports and regulatory documents
• Strong leadership, interpersonal and communication skills with an enthusiasm for participating in a fast-paced environment characterized by rigorous science and innovative thinking
• Ability to follow and promote safety instructions and regulations
• A team player and mentor, who listens effectively and invites response and discussion. A collaborator who communicates in an open, clear, complete, timely and consistent manner

Preferred
• Experience with flow cytometry (FACS and cell sorting), T cell activation assays, ELISA and/or histology
• Experience with engaging and managing external efforts with contract research organizations and academic collaborators
• Experience in cell therapies
• Contributed to the authorship of regulatory submission documents
• Broad disease related experience with firsthand knowledge in immno-oncology and/or autoimmune diseases
• Experience working within start up environment

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
In vivo models: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.myeloidtx.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Myeloid Therapeutics,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
183,Data Engineer,-1,"Why you'll love working here:

Zylotech is a fast-growing company that rewards autonomy and creativity. Our team works hard, is fast and collaborative, and we encourage personal growth. There are many opportunities to work with other departments where you can interact with some incredibly talented people.

What you’ll do:
Coordinate with Product management and technical stakeholders to continue building our SaaS product data + decision pipe
Perform architecture design, data modeling, and implementation of Big Data platform or Data pipe
Architect and develop big data solutions on either AWS or GCP cloud platforms
Set up and manage big data infrastructure to ingest and process data from multiple sources for Enterprise customer deployment
Create scalable & robust data pipelines to transfer data from source to destination data stores
Player and coach across a team of big data engineers, ML engineers, data scientist towards agile shipping of features and milestone
What we seek:
Prior experience in building, developing, architect scalable big data applications from grounds up preferably in product startups.
2+ years of experience in Data Engineering
Experience working with Big Data stack, Big Map Reduce, Hive, Kafka, Impala, Hadoop, Big Query, Spark SQL, Spark Streaming, HBase etc
Experience in Databases (NoSQL and SQL)
Experience in creating Data-warehouses and scheduling automated ETL jobs
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes
Good Communication Skill, both verbal & written. Confident in communicating with business & technical stakeholders alike.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or a related field of study.
Important Personal Attributes:
You are curious about technology & science.
Team matters.
Challenging yourself is an intrinsic part of who you are.
Sharing and debating ideas to get to the right answer is important to you.
You seek to act and don’t wait to be told.
You like to teach those around you.
You are serious about your work but also believe that laughter and levity are important.
You work hard and you also have passions outside of work that enrich your life.
Winning is important to you, but so is how you win.
You take pride & ownership in building a Product and company who is disrupting an industry.
About Zylotech:

Zylotech is a self-learning customer intelligence platform that helps marketers create complete customer profiles for targeting revenue opportunities more effectively. Powered by AutoML, the platform continuously unifies and enriches internal and external data, and performs ongoing micro-segmentation, pattern discovery, and recommendations, all while integrating with a variety of marketing clouds for on-demand accessibility. Zylotech’s cross-industry clients have reported up to a 6x increase in customer lift. For more information, visit Zylotech.com.

Zylotech is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any applicant because of race, creed, color, age, national origin, ancestry, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military status, application for military service or any other class protected by state or federal law.

To all recruitment agencies: Zylotech does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Zylotech employees or any other company location. Zylotech is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered our property and will be processed accordingly.

Qualified Applicants must be legally authorized for employment in the United States. Qualified Applicants will not require employer-sponsored work authorization now or in the future for employment in the United States.",3.4,"Zylotech
3.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
184,Data Modeler II,"$45k-$78k
(Glassdoor Est.)","ABOUT MEDIACOM DATA WAREHOUSE:

The Mediacom Data Warehouse (DW) is looking for an experienced individual interested in joining a growing team of professionals as it undertakes a complete refresh of its current DW environment. This is a unique opportunity to join a greenfield migration project at the ground level. The environment refresh includes Active Batch Automation and Scheduling, Informatica Data Integration tool, and Oracle Exadata running a 12c database. Mediacom’s Data Analytics tools of choice include Oracle OBIEE and Tableau. Mediacom’s data modeling environment is maintained through the erwin Data Modeler tool. The right person for this position will be able to work and thrive in a truly collaborative environment, be an eager learner, self-motivated and not afraid to work in partnership for all areas of the DW as needed.

GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES

The Data Warehouse Senior Data Modeler will work with ETL developers, DBAs, business user personnel and project managers to gather data requirements and create logical data models for applications, including those with specialized or complex requirements. Develop, manage, and update data models, including physical and logical:

Develop and maintain logical and physical data models using best practices and company standards to ensure high data quality, reduced data redundancy, and good query performance.
Reverse and forward engineer data models in an Oracle Exadata environment.
Optimize and update logical and physical data models to support new and existing projects and ensure business users are working in a clean safe data environment.
Assist in the creation of best practices for standard naming conventions and coding practices to ensure consistency of data models.
Document database processes that currently extract the data from the existing system for reporting purposes.
Define and document the technical architecture of the data warehouse, including the physical components and their functionality, data models and data dictionaries.
Coordinate activities with the rest of the data warehouse team including developers and testers; Assist in promoting database objects from lower to higher environments.
Lead design reviews of data models and other relevant metadata to ensure consistency, quality, accuracy and integrity.
Recommend opportunities for reuse of data models in new projects.
Consult with Database Administrators concerning the creation of physical data schema from the logical model by making recommendations, designing referential integrity, and ensuring business requirements are satisfied.
Consult with ETL developers, report developers, end users concerning how to use the database as designed and how to navigate efficiently within the database.
Guide System Analysts, Engineers, Programmers and others on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces, and system integration challenges and solutions.
Mentor a junior data modeler

Required Skills:

Data modeling in Oracle Exadata (5 years)
Analyzing and generating technical requirements and design (8 years)
Creating and maintaining data models in a data warehouse environment (8 years)
Database tuning techniques (8 years)
Analyzing source databases, source data, source database referential integrity and profiling source data (8 years)
Hands-on data warehouse project experience (5 years)
erwin data modeling software (6 years)
Oracle PL/SQL developer experience (6 years)
Informatica PowerCenter experience a plus
Experience in team management, communication, and presentation (8 years)

Mediacom endeavors to make mediacomcable.com/careers accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our careers website, please contact careersassistance@mediacomcc.com or dial 845-443-2408. Any inquiries regarding employment application status, resume submittal, open positions and any other general inquiries will not receive a response.",3.4,"Mediacom Communications Corporation
3.4","Blooming Grove, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
185,Data Scientist,"$62k-$104k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Interested in Machine Learning techniques in the areas of Predictive Modeling, Time-Series Forecasting, and Survival Analysis? As a Data Scientist at GoHealth, you will work with team members to build end-to-end data science models throughout our diverse business. This includes projects for call-center traffic projection, agent-behavior modeling, and customer retention decay curves. You will report to the Lead Data Scientist.

Frequently cited statistics show that women and members of underrepresented groups apply to jobs only if they meet 100% of the qualifications. GoHealth encourages you to break that statistic and to apply. No one ever meets 100% of the qualifications. We look forward to your application.


Responsibilities:
Lead quantitative analyses with product management, your team, and data engineers in solving problems
Present information in front of large groups of users
Find new ways to combine data that do not naturally mesh together
Stay current with leading edge systems, methods, and best practices for data science and analytics; and introduce technology and process changes across the organization
Improve the collaboration around actual performance and forecasts to directly help our decisions and actions
Find ways to improve how the team operates and aligns with GoHealth's goals.
Skills and Experience:
Master's in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, or related quantitative field
2+ years of experience demonstrating trajectory of professional growth in software engineering, data science, or data engineering
Proficient in Python and related libraries, such as Pandas, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, TensorFlow, Pytorch
Expertise in applying common machine learning algorithms such as Linear Regression, Random Forests, XGBoost.
Experience deploying real-time prediction models.
Experience working with Scrum and other Agile methodologies, and Version control systems such as Git or Bitbucket
Benefits and Perks:
Open vacation policy because work life balance is important
401k program with company match
Employee Stock Purchase Program
Medical, dental, vision, and life insurance benefits
Paid maternity and paternity leave
Professional growth opportunities
Generous employee referral bonuses
Employee Resource Groups
Work from Home Stipend
GoHealth is an Equal Opportunity Employer
Due to the unprecedented situation of COVID-19, GoHealth has decided to protect our current and future employees by managing our business remotely. This is inclusive of interviewing, onboarding and each role day-to-day. Please consider that our roles will not be remote long-term and will return to an office setting once we're safe to do so following the guidance of local health authorities' and the CDC.

#LI-JC1",3.0,"GoHealth
3.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
186,Machine Learning - Computer Scientist,"$109k-$186k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The Research & Development centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world.

MITRE is seeking a Senior / Lead Computer Scientist to cultivate and lead highly skilled technical staff to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics. As our Computer Scientist you will promote and provide MITRE-unique value across multiple sponsors. Additionally, you will be expected to initiate and contribute to various research projects & efforts across MITRE and in collaboration with academia, industry and sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, and Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Cybersecurity, Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field
5 + years applicable experience including machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Hands on work experience will include tools / packages such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Outstanding presentation skills, both development & delivery, are required for both MITRE facing and Sponsor facing communications
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government clearance are preferred
Proven experience with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE’s workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us. For more information please visit https://www.mitre.org/careers/working-at-mitre. U.S Citizenship is required for most positions.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,"MITRE
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
187,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Analyst*
ABOUT US*
For more than 20 years, WINFertility has been managing family-building benefits that are delivered with care and support by the highest quality providers. WIN is the largest, most experienced fertility benefit management company in the country. It offers inclusive family-building solutions to employers, health plans and individual patients. From integrated fertility management, including medical treatment, pharmacy and reproductive genetics, to surrogacy and adoption, WIN’s mission is to help build families by providing access to the best network doctors, technology and emotional support at the lowest cost.

WIN’s managed fertility programs include an integrated medical and pharmaceutical model that is unique to the industry. Its dedicated nurse care managers, all with experience in reproductive endocrinology clinics, guide employees through every step of their fertility journey, and are available 24/7.
POSITION SUMMARY*
This analytical position will develop data solutions to assist in the advancement of initiatives needed to support our business growth and operations across key customer segments. It includes the creation of analytical solutions used to manage operational programs and mentoring other data analytics resources on how to best provide value to the organization. The position will require building dashboards and visualizations through BI software to support business analytics and reporting.

The position will also serve as a proactive change agent within the business by understanding the long-term functions of the Data and Analytics Team and developing systems, databases, and other critical analytic tools needed to support the growing and complex nature of customer relationships.

The position is responsible for working closely with various internal teams to understand, define, and produce program related reports and analysis. Responsibilities include interpreting data, creating ad hoc reports, modifying and updating standard reports when applicable, perform statistical analysis, analyze data to forecast trends and conduct predictability outcomes. They will also participate in operations meetings, strategy sessions, and business reviews. He/she must possess knowledge and experience necessary to offer recommendations and propose solutions for complex business problems and/or systems enhancements.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES*
Responsible for creating business value for company by understanding data environment, designing data strategies, performing extract, transform, and load activities, and operationalizing models. Work closely with the team members and business partners to interpret the data and develop implement solutions that create visibility for internal management and operations across all customer programs. This position will require collaboration across the business to develop and implement data-driven solutions.
Support the development of customer-level metrics needed to manage operations with Clients. Manage the compilation, analysis, and reporting of data to forecast trends, apply various analytical techniques to support operational efficiency and productivity.
5+ years RDBMS experience (MySQL, PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, etc.); must have the ability to write complex, optimized queries across large volumes of data
5+ years of experience analyzing and manipulating data from a variety of production systems and data platforms required
Experience in query tuning and database engine optimization
Knowledge of ETL and data warehouse concepts and processes
Demonstrated ability to identify data quality issues and recommend the best course of action to address them
Experience translating data extractions and analyses into formats and outputs that other departments and clients can understand
Experience in Data Visualization tools like (e.g. Tableau, Business Objects, Cognos, Power BI, etc…) or other related tools
Problem solver with high attention to detail and superior organization and documentation skills
Design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and requests utilizing Business Objects, and other data visualization tools.
Document and understand project requirements, reporting data mapping and data warehouse repositories for assigned programs.
Complete full documentation of reports developed utilizing Business Requirement Documents
Receive and respond to data requests to ensure projects in queue are accurately prioritized, designed, estimated and delivered to all shareholders
Ensure reports are scheduled, audited and delivered according to agreed upon expectations and established Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
Develop and execute acceptance test plans (UAT) to ensure data warehouse structures, universes, and associated data accurately meet business requirements.
Other responsibilities and projects, as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Minimum Requirements*
5+ years of healthcare data management experience or 2+ years of advanced healthcare analytics experience
Critical Skills*
3+ years' experience in analytics or data related fields.
Strong knowledge of SQL and statistical packages (SAS, SPSS, STATA etc.).
Ability to design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and delivered according to client expectations and established SLAs.
Knowledge of healthcare industry with the ability to review all program data, perform analysis, notice trends, research and suggest solutions.
Significant data mining, analysis, and reporting experience, and demonstrated experience with IT and/or operations project management.
Experience in predictive modeling and machine learning.
Ability to lead and conduct customer meetings and understand business needs.
Advanced Microsoft Office experience (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, MS Project), Visio, SharePoint, and Business Objects.
Additional Knowledge & Skills*
Healthcare reporting experience, highly desired
Excellent written and verbal communication, and presentation skills
Exercise excellent judgment within defined standards and guidelines to manage conflict resolution and/or ambiguous situations
Experience developing partnerships with the technical, business, teams, and Clients utilizing strong communication and team building skills
Track record of strategic thinking and independent problem solving
Attention to detail and a high level of understanding of how to produce accurate and meaningful metrics to deliver high quality, actionable, efficient, and interactive reporting and insights to drive business and financial KPIs.
EDUCATION*
BA or BS degree or equivalent experience required.
WIN BENEFITS AND PERKS*
WIN *offers our employees competitive and comprehensive benefits to include but not limited to:
Paid vacation, sick and holiday time
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life Insurance (company paid and supplemental)
Disability Insurance
Health Savings Account (HSA) with a per month company contribution
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Transit Account
401k plus company match
Pet Insurance
WIN Perks and Plum Benefits*
Employee Assistance Program
Free access to Fitness Center at our main office location
Free indoor parking at our main office location
Transit Account
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL and Statistical Packages: 3 years (Required)
Design, create and implement Reports: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare Data Management: 5 years (Required)
Advanced Healthcare Analytics: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Greenwich, CT (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"WINFertility
3.3","Greenwich, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
188,Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track,"$60k-$104k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Scientist Track

Job
ID

27241005

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Scientists! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-star focused on Data Science will receive internal training on tools, technology platforms (R, SQL, Excel) and modeling processes, learn how to apply theory to actual client project work, and hone business skills and applications of Data Science skills on business problems.

The four main areas of training will be:
Analytical methods
Technology programs and platforms
Data management and analysis
Business applications and approaches
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Travel: Up to 25% (could be as much as 30% - 40% depending on projects)
Duration:Full-time
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Desired Qualifications:
MS degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Math, or another quantitative discipline
Previous Data Science or Analytical experience or internships
Knowledge of predictive modeling and statistical analysis, as well as machine learning, text mining, geo-spatial analytics, time series forecasting, or optimization
Experience with one or more Advanced Data Science software languages such as R, Python, MATLAB, SAS, Java, or PHP
Experience with structured or un-structured data analysis tools such as SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc.
Experience with Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, or other digital analytics tools a plus",4.5,"Blend360
4.5","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
189,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and machine learning? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
TensorFlow and OpenCV
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
1 - ∞ years of experience with C, C++ and/or Python.
Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field (PHD highly preferred).
Willingness and ability to write software as part of a team as well as work on ground-breaking machine learning IP. This role will be a mix of both!
Good software foundational skills: CS theory; clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
Must be a US Person.
Here’s what we would prefer*
ROS or other robot operating system experience.
An educational focus in Machine Learning and Data Science.
Published work in the field of machine learning.
Robotic simulation and 3D game engine knowledge (Godot, Unreal, Unity, RVIZ, Drake).
Any experience with physical modeling would be a plus.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.geisel-software.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Geisel Software
5.0","Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
190,Sr. Algorithm Development Scientist / Engineer,"$12k-$113k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented, self-motivated Aerospace or Electrical Engineer, or Scientist for simulation and post processing algorithm development to join a multi-discipline engineering team in support of the development of Avionics products design, development, analysis, and test. The end products are avionics systems that provide time, space, position, guidance, navigation, control and automated flight termination capability. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The candidate will design and develop in-flight, post processing and estimation algorithms for complex flight vehicle configurations and flight envelopes including high-dynamic scenarios. The position requires a fundamental of modeling and estimation techniques, coupled with a solid base of programming experience. Candidate must have an interest in modeling and simulation, analysis, and problem-solving. These skills will be used in the creation of detailed algorithms, estimation techniques and test scenarios to support complete end-to-end test and evaluation of: strategic/tactical missile systems, glide munitions, and manned/unmanned vehicles.

The successful applicant will work closely with a highly technical team of multi-disciplinary engineers to provide accurate and timely analysis of flight vehicle systems' performance and capabilities, and to verify/validate system models.

The work will evolve into hardware in the loop simulation, and flight test support. Work may cover both new and existing air vehicles. The work will engage in module level testing, system level testing, debugging, and documentation, in addition to authoring code. As part of a team the work will use configuration management tools and other development tools and methods to ensure a quality product.

This position may require travel for meetings and test events.

Basic Qualifications


Position requires a Bachelor's degree from an ABET accredited school in Engineering, Math or Science with 5+ years of applicable experience or a Master's Degree in Engineering, Math or Science with 3+ years of applicable experience or a PhD in Engineering, Math or Physics with applicable course and research work.
Candidate must have familiarity with linear and nonlinear attitude estimation methods, e.g., extended Kalman filters, batch smoother based on quadratic and cubic programs, sigma-point ﬁlters, particle ﬁlters
Candidate must possess knowledge of state estimation techniques and their application to aerospace physical systems
Candidate must possess knowledge or have a willingness to learn and apply algorithms for trajectory estimation and reconstruction
Candidate must have familiarity with Global Navigation Satellite System fundamentals and application
Candidate must have experience with Matlab, Simulink and basic programming concepts
Candidate must have interest in and basic familiarity with the analysis of physical systems, to include simulation development and maintenance, and hardware-in-the-loop development, application and validation
Excellent communication and inter-personal skills are required, as the successful candidate must function effectively in a team environment and interact with program stakeholders.

Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama area.

Other Qualifications


Experience with the following is beneficial:
Command-and-control modeling
C/C++
Ground and flight test support
Hands-on experience with aviation platforms
Experience with design and implementation of embedded software or firmware
Experience with Guidance, Navigation, and Control (GNC) for missiles and/or launch vehicles
Knowledge of GPS receiver operation, integration and test
Experience with GPS simulators
Experience with GPS antennas including Anti-Jam antennas
Organizational skills to document designs, assist with Technical Data Packages (TDP) and support production and test production Avionics systems
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.05.03-79

Closing Date:
11/11/2020

#CJ

#LI",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
191,Data Scientist II (In Office or Remote),-1,"OfferUp is dedicated to building the simplest and most trustworthy way for people to buy and sell in their communities. Every year, millions of people use OfferUp to buy and sell locally, resulting in billions of dollars of local commerce. As the largest mobile marketplace for local buyers and sellers in the U.S., our iOS and Android app has been in the top five most popular shopping apps lists for more than three years. Join us as we build the marketplace of the future and reinvent local commerce by helping consumers uncover value through simplicity and trust.

At a Glance
90M+ Downloads
+ Top 5 Shopping app in App Store and Google Play Store for three years
15+ percent of adults in key markets like Los Angeles, Seattle, Miami and Las Vegas use OfferUp every month
Location:

Due to the current pandemic, OfferUp offices are closed in Bellevue, Wa, and Miami, FL, and employees are working remotely until June 30, 2021. Once OfferUp deems it safe to open the offices, employees will have an option to continue to work remotely or in-office. All employees must reside in Washington, Florida, North Carolina, Nevada, Texas, Tennessee, whether working remotely full time of in an OfferUp Office location.

About the role:

OfferUp is looking for a Data Scientist II to join our team. The right candidate will have a passion for manipulating and using new and existing data sources to help drive actionable recommendations. We seek to delight our users with the safest, simplest and most effective local marketplace app on the planet. Your role as a Data Scientist will be to research, design, implement and evaluate machine learning models and algorithms to make our products more intelligent.

Here's more of what you will get to do:
Design and measure experiments to test in various cross-functional areas to challenge hypotheses and come up with actionable recommendations.
Identify opportunities and drive results across the company in product search, personalization recommender, crime risk modeling, user reputation, etc.
Develop end-to-end experimentation-driven product improvements from conception/research, to offline testing, then live A/B testing and finally shipping to production.
Act as an analytics advisor to solve business problems using data.
Leverage the latest machine learning technologies to solve complex business problems.
You'll thrive in this role if you have:
4+ years of demonstrated experience with machine learning or data science
Expertise around programming languages such as Python or Java
Hands-on experience in predictive modeling and analyses to solve real business problems
Strong analysis, problem solving, data structures and algorithm development background
PhD or Master's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or a technical related field
A passion for working with large data sets
Must be eligible to work in the United States
Helpful, but not required:
Experience working in e-commerce and mobile marketplaces
Experience integrating code into a live production environment
Some experience in some the following: entity extraction, semantics in text, image recognition, recommender systems, ranking, LDA, classification
OfferUp is changing the way people buy and sell locally and we've built a dynamic team to do it. To learn more about what it's like to work at OfferUp, check out our blog: https://blog.offerup.com/tagged/culture

OfferUp provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, OfferUp complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

OfferUp expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status. Improper interference with the ability of OfferUp's employees to perform their job duties may result in discipline up to and including discharge.",3.3,"OfferUp
3.3",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
192,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
NYC - NY
$150,000 - $170,000
This is an opportunity for a well-rounded data scientist to use their knowledge of NLP and other cutting edge data science frameworks to get their hands on some of the toughest problems in the industry. This company specializes in the insurance sector and is looking for an extremely talented NLP expert to work across a wide variety of cutting-edge projects. If you are looking for a real challenge to take your skills to the next level and work in one of the most advanced Data Science teams in the industry working on insurance problem - this is the role for you.
THE COMPANY
As a senior data scientist, you'll find yourself working closed with some of the best Data Scientists that focus on insurance claims, healthcare data and extracting important information for their NLP team. The company applies advanced machine learning models to all types of text extraction. They have seen great success increasing working with healthcare, insurance and electronic medical records.
THE ROLE
With a rich and varied dataset to work from, this team has tons of exciting data and you'll have the chance to apply your data science expertise to the most innovative techniques in optical character recognition as well as many other data science projects. It will be your responsibility to identify and enact the capacity of data science projects throughout the company.
You will work with a growing multidisciplinary team of talented data scientists, statisticians, engineers, and researchers to leverage unique healthcare data
You will have the opportunity to work with extremely diverse and entirely unique clinical trial and healthcare datasets that extend to all phases of care delivery from the perspective of all key stakeholders (patients, providers, payers).
Responsibilities will include helping to execute the company's data science strategy in the area of language understanding, as well as to further create, extend, and validate the language processing algorithms
YOUR SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
You will need to be a proven problem solver, critical thinker, and have an advanced technical background to join this growing, experienced team. The successful senior data scientist will likely have the following skills and experience:
PhD or MS in computer science or related discipline with work experience as a Research Scientist in Machine Learning and Natural Language Programming
Strong deep learning background and familiarity with state-of-the-art NLP techniques (BERT, XLM, XLNet)
Applied programming experience in Python and other languages
Experience with libraries and tools like Tensor Flow, PyTorch, Theano, Keras, and CUDA
Ability to work as an induvial contributor as well as in an interdisciplinary team
THE BENEFITS
A competitive base salary of $150,000 - $170,000 + a strong bonus and package

HOW TO APPLY
Please register your interest by sending your résumé to Sam Agre via the Apply link on this page.",4.1,"Harnham
4.1","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
193,Manufacturing Data Engineer,"$64k-$122k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Manufacturing Data Engineer.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

OBJECTIVES:

Leads complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within the global GMS GQ environment, and embed new capabilities in the global Enterprise Architecture.
Manages and develops technical existing and new computer science platforms to design, to analyze and implement complex and new data driven solutions, with an impact on the daily operation of our manufacturing facilities.
Interprets and develops advance techniques in partly structured and unstructured big data across different partner organizations.
Oversee and guide efforts of Advanced Analytics in a GxP environment from an IT perspective in all US GMS sites and for our collaboration with CMO’s.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Determines data analysis approaches, uses different technologies, big data preparations, programming and loading as well as initial exploration in the process of searching and finding data patterns.
Oversees data science input and requests, translates these from data exploration - large record (billions) and unstructured data sets - to mathematic algorithms and uses various tooling from programming languages to new tools (artificial and machine learning) to translate, build and optimize models.
Leads and conducts ongoing tests in the search for solutions in the data modelling, collects and prepares the training of data, tones the data, optimizes algorithm implementations to test, scale, and deploy future models.
Designs/builds/deploys complex data models related to R&D questions independently.
Develops technical roadmaps and approaches for data analyses to find patterns, to design data models, to scale the model to a managed production environment within the current or a technical landscape to develop.
Influences and guides data exploration from analysis to scalable models, works independently and decides quick on transfers in complex data analysis and modelling.
Interprets the impact on IT Structure and Architecture and influences this discipline.
Independently use own judgement to identify data requirements and influences the design and implementation of the IS/IT data strategy.
Ensures execution and documentation to Takeda Quality Management System (QMS), suggest adjustments to the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and other standards, policies and procedures.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other engineers and traditional analytics organizations throughout the company
Maintains up-to-data knowledge on modern data technologies, explores new platforms and beta tooling.
Represent the team while working on project across R&D and commercial. Is internal and external expert to-go-to in how to drive advanced Computer Science and Engineering skills and techniques.
Influences and maintains relationships with partner organizations in support of data analysis, modelling and deployment.

COMPETENCES, EDUCATIONAL AND SKILLS

Required:

Master Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
2 years or more of relevant experience.
Ability to write, speak and lead in the English language
Excellent oral and written communications skills, business acumen and excels in problem solving and analytical skills.
Have a good understanding of the pharmaceutical industry and experience with validated systems.
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies to affect change across business units.
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables.
Experience Programming Java or Scala (Python?)
Understanding of Web Services as well as JSON formats
Working knowledge of SQL and Relational Databases
Experience with at least one NoSQL datastore (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Understand the concepts of Hadoop and Spark
Experience in Computer Systems Validation GAMP

Preferred:

Understanding of AWS (S3, EC2, Redshift, EMR, Athena)
Experience with Business Intelligence and Tools (Qlik/PowerBI)
Additional Languages: Python, Scala, Chef, R, Javascript
Experience with Multiple NoSQL datastores (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Experience with data formats including Parquet, ORC or AVRO
Experience with any of the following Frameworks: Spring, Django, R Shiny, Tensorflow, MXNet
Understanding or Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Social Circle, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
194,Data Scientist,"$59k-$101k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Scientist, St. Louis, MO

***No c2c or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee***

Required Skills / Experience:

• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field with at least 1 year of industry experience

• Strong code development experience with R and Python for 3+ year

• Strong object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience

• Strong in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem

• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation

• Problem solver and analytical thinking

• Commitment to ensuring data quality and accuracy and attention to detail

• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts.

• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner.

Desired Skills / Experience:

• PhD in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field

• Experience with AWS, docker and other automation tools

• Experience with workflow orchestration

• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction

• Experience with web development",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
195,Associate - Data Science,"$51k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As THE leader in transit technology, Clever Devices' vision is to make meaningful contributions to worldwide mobility. Our goal is to be the leading provider of exciting technology that improves the quality of mobility in communities around the world.

Clever Devices is seeking a recent college graduate with a Data Science degree to join our team. The Associate, Data Science will perform data analysis of Clever Devices customers related to specific products (Clever Reports and R+) specifically as they relate to transportation operations, metrics, and performance measures. This position will work with both internal and external (customers) to develop meaningful analytics that drive business decisions. This role also encompasses support for trouble shooting, report/dashboard building, machine learning, causality, and general data analysis. As this position is customer facing, being customer focused is key.

Primary Responsibilities:
Review and analyze large amounts of raw data and find patterns and extract business insights that will help our customers improve operations.
Assist in writing programs to cleanse data with the purpose of integrating it into operations in a reusable manner.
Implement and validate predictive models, create and maintain statistical models and maintain a focus on big data.
Build partnerships with other departments while working in an Agile and collaborative team setting.
Evaluate results of data models and communicate results to internal and external customers (both technical and non-technical teams).
Skills Required:
B.S in Data Science, Applied Mathematics or related field. Masters degree a plus.
Must be able to clearly communicate across many levels of the organization and have a comfort level interacting with external customers.
Basic and educational level understanding of statistical programming (i.e. Python, R, SAS, MATLAB, etc).
Prior internship or other work experience in a corporate environment.
Basic understanding of technical product development.
Personal or professional interest in public transportation
Powered by JazzHR",3.6,"Clever Devices
3.6","Morrisville, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
196,Senior Food Scientist,-1,"Position: * Senior Food Scientist
Reports To*: Quality Manager
Purpose: * The Senior Food Scientist will be expected to provide technical expertise in the development of nutritious, plant-based snacks. This position will design and implement research and experiments resulting in new and improved products, cost savings and unique technologies providing business advantages.
Responsibilities: *
This role relates to a wide range of technical skills and many non-technical company functions. A successful candidate will apply scientific and engineering principles in research, development, production technology, quality control, packaging, processing, and utilization of foods by performing the following duties:
Coordinate product development through all stages of development; concept to bench-top prototype development, pilot plant and full-scale manufacture.
Design and execute all stages of product development by conducting pilot plant trials on-site or at external facilities and formula commissioning at full-scale manufacturing, which includes scale-up of prototypes and subsequent trials to support introduction of new products and /or product renovations.
Maintain written technical documentation and product and process specifications as pertaining.
Review and document raw ingredients, formulations, and final product specifications to maintain accurate records and to ensure compliance with GoMacro standards.
Assist in the preparation, submission, and interactions with FDA regulatory & legal review of all current and new products to ensure compliance.
Organize and direct sample development for sales presentations, consumer testing and shelf life trials.
Develop nutrition labels in compliance with all applicable regulatory standards by utilizing Genesis (ESHA) software.
Consult and provide direction to internal customers (i.e. Purchasing/Marketing/Production/Quality) by communicating information for product improvements and/or cost savings initiatives.
Conduct assessment of problematic product issues and work as part of a team to resolve the technical problems and execute the development/modification of products.
Consult technical resources (literature, technical papers, academia, suppliers) to further product knowledge and apply the learning to execute projects.
Prepare and present technical reports/results, both written and oral, to associates, peers and occasionally to management with business and scientific clarity.
Requirements: *
Bachelor’s degree in food science or related field required
Master’s degree in food science or related field preferred
5+ years’ experience in CPG field preferred
4-8 years’ experience in product development preferred
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret common scientific and technical journals, financial reports, and legal documents
Experience submitting and interacting with FDA regulatory & legal reviews to ensure compliance as well as to protect from unwarranted or unfounded legal claims
Ability to effectively present information
Ability to work with minimal to no supervision
Strong computer skills are necessary
Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions
Ability to create and update nutrition labels in compliance with all regulatory requirements
Proactive, self-driven, results and action oriented, demonstrating passion, strong teamwork spirit, open mind, and flexibility.
Flexibility of schedule – schedule may require various start times due to plant trials and start ups
GoMacro, LLC is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
product development: 4 years (Preferred)
consumer packaged goods: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Company's website:
https://www.gomacro.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/gomacro/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"GoMacro
3.7","Viola, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
197,Adecco Group - Data Engineer,-1,"Overview

Grow your career with The Adecco Group, the world's leading provider of recruiting and career services.

SUMMARY:

The Data Engineer is responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. Experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler that optimizes data systems and building them from the ground up. Supports our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects.

Responsibilities

ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:

Creates and maintains optimal data pipeline architecture.
Assembles large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implements internal process improvements, automates manual processes, optimizes data delivery and re-designs infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Operates infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and relevant Azure technologies like Data Factory, Databricks, and similar.
Implement analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.
Works with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Keeps our data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and regions.
Builds data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
Works with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Participating in special projects and performs other duties as assigned.

Qualifications

MINIMUM EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or a related field plus two (2) years minimum experience in a Data Engineering or similar business intelligence, data analytics or supply chain management role required.
MBA or Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or a related field in lieu of experience accepted.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES REQUIREMENTS:

Working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Working knowledge of Scala, Python or R.
Knowledge of building and optimizing data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Ability to perform root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable data stores.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Ability to support and work with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Adecco Group North America, through an impressive portfolio of staffing industry leading brands including Accounting Principals, Adecco General Staffing, Adia, Ajilon, Entegee, Lee Hecht Harrison, Modis, Paladin, Parker+Lynch, Pontoon, Special Counsel and Soliant is the world's leading provider of Human Resources solutions.

We are the workforce experts delivering staffing and career service solutions to organizations and individuals across all industries. Collectively we harness the power of some of the greatest talent in the world. That talent and expertise allows us to do business globally and act locally with deep knowledge in niche areas.

Every day, we have more than 100,000 associates on assignment, 30,000 colleagues working internally to support more than 10,000 clients in the United States and Canada. Ensuring our business units are prepared to deliver outstanding service to our associates and clients, the Adecco Group North America team provides a strong infrastructure through our corporate and shared services teams.

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled

The Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",3.4,"Adecco
3.4","Jacksonville, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
198,"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT","$58k-$133k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT

The Scientist-Engineer, MSAT performs process and analytical experimental studies as part of a team that is effectively delivering cell therapy services to clients in accordance with defined scope of work, timelines, and budgets. This includes leading projects in process development, technology transfer and continuous improvement of our client's novel manufacturing processes. Our goal is to support our clients in developing commercially viable cell therapy products, so that they can become accessible to all.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Accountable for the design and execution of experimental studies in the laboratory, for example:
Perform laboratory experiments for client projects; perform analytical testing for client projects
Preparation and scheduling of laboratory equipment for experiments
Provide technical leadership of client products during manufacturing and development, for example:
Direct technical communication with clients during manufacturing and development
Support manufacturing in identifying and resolving manufacturing process constraints
Lead the generation of manufacturing and development documentation, for example:
Generating experiment protocols and reports for development projects
Generating draft batch records and other manufacturing documentation
Generating manufacturing risk assessments, such as FMEA
Perform data analysis to reach actionable conclusions, for example:
Compile and analyze experimental data
Present experimental data internally and externally to clients

Qualifications

Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in relevant life science or engineering discipline
Minimum of 3 years' experience in aseptic cell processing, cell culture and cell analytics under the guidance of scientific protocols
Demonstrated ability to deliver projects to specific timelines and budgets
Experience in working effectively and delegating tasks in a team-based environment
Demonstrated ability in technical writing and the preparation of, protocols and reports, presentations and/or other communications
Basic understanding of the technical principles, theories and concepts of cell therapy or similar products

Competencies/Candidate Profile

Collaboration, Accountability, Adaptability, Can-do, Technical Capacity, Problem Solving, Customer-centric, Communication

Supervisory Responsibility

No supervisory responsibilities

Minimum Required Training (optional)

Aseptic processing, Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP), communication skills, specific process and analytical equipment

Working Environment

This job may require occasional evening and weekend work

Physical Requirements

N/A

Direct reports

N/A

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
in a cell therapy, aseptic environment: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Mountain View, CA 94043 (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.pctcelltherapy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.8,"Minaris Regenerative Medicine, LLC
2.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
199,Data Analyst for Online Retail,-1,"*About CTV INC: *

CTV Inc is an online leader in the Amazon Seller space. We work with national brands to deliver a top quality brand image experience. We have been growing exponentially year over year. There is definitely room to grow with CTV INC.

*We are looking for someone who can take a deep dive into data with excel and google sheets. *

*Responsibilities: *

Download data in multiple formats

Extract and manipulate data to show key metrics (KPI's)

*Must have experience with: *

Excel Pivot Tables

Advanced Formulas

*Bonus Experience: *

Google Scrips

Excel Power Query

Power BI

Google Data Studio

Database / MySQL

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $20.00 per hour

Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Day shift
* Monday to Friday

COVID-19 considerations:
Each team member has their own private office.

Experience:
* Excel: 3 years (Required)

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
* Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
* Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",3.5,"CTV, INC
3.5","Spring Valley, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1960,Subsidiary or Business Segment,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
200,Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist,"$75k-$125k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Our team Our team is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML). The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Maxar is looking for a Data Scientist with experience in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) to join our team in Northern VA. The selected Data Scientist - AI/ML Specialist will support a U.S. Government customer who is applying new and innovative methods in computer vision and object detection in order to address some of our most pressing intelligence problems.

Life with Us

Your Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer
everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its
disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor and/or a mentor to set
appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be supporting an R&D, rapid prototyping office whose mission is to apply new and cutting-edge tools and methods to intelligence problems. This office loves innovators, self-starters, and people passionate about our nations security.

These AI/ML applications and experiments are used to:
Extract meaningful insight.

Narrow search areas.

Tip/cue.

Find rare objects.

Predict vulnerabilities.

Encouraging further analytic exploration.

Reducing the friction of flawed workflows.

Youll collaborate with our geographically dispersed team primarily via Zoom & Slack.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.

Bachelors degree in a relevant field (physics, mathematics, computer science, operations research, etc.).

5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning.

Experience with Data Science Tools (eg R, Python, SAS, Matlab, TensorFlow).

Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery - ie; computer vision, object detection.

Preferred Education and Experience:
Experience with NoSQL databases.

Ability to provide subject matter guidance.

Ability to manage personal project priorities and deliverables.

Ability to provide controls for technical rigor and quality of output.

#cjpost",3.5,"Maxar Technologies
3.5","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
201,Data Analyst - Online Education,"$32k-$59k
(Glassdoor Est.)","THIS IS NOT A REMOTE POSITION


THIS POSITION WILL BE BASED OUT OF THE

TUCSON CORPORATE OFFICE

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Utilize advanced statistical abilities and tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive efforts.
Prepare reports and visualizations that effectively communicate trends, patterns, and predictions.
Assist with preparing, collecting, and analyzing quantitative (surveys, etc.) and qualitative (focus groups, etc.) data from students, faculty and staff.
Partner with stakeholders to gain a thorough understanding of needs.
Mine data from primary and secondary sources and reorganizes into a format that can be easily read by human or machine.
Work closely with IT in establishing data systems protocols for data needs.
Coach team members on how to use tools to their greatest benefit.
The list of essential functions is not exhaustive and may be supplemented.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree or higher, preferably in a computational field such as computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering.
Three (3) years of experience working with large data sets or relational databases.
Three (3) years of experience with forecasting, trend analysis, and predictive modeling.
Demonstrated experience using SQL, Excel, R or Python, and visualization platforms such as Tableau or Power BI.
Experience working in higher education preferred.
Take initiative and ownership of projects.
Problem solving and analytical skills.
Business acumen.
Time management skills and able to prioritize and deliver projects and deliverables on time.
Comfortable working in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment.
Collaborative and team focused.",4.6,"Pima Medical Institute
4.6","Tucson, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1972,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
202,Data Analyst - Online Education,-1,"Lead Data Engineer
Our team is currently looking for a Lead Data Engineer who is passionate about creating awesome analytics solutions for our customers and our teammates. As a Lead, you’ll be responsible for guiding the business intelligence team in best practices, coding standards, and data ops processes. You’ll be hands on with solution delivery, a mentor, and encouraging the team to be flexible, proactive, and solution focused. The ideal candidate will identify and implement solutions that enable self-service functionality while maintaining data integrity.
We value open and honest communication and we strive to create a positive and fun team-based environment. We want teammates that challenge themselves, as well as those around them to create high quality analytical products and services.
Essential Functions:
Develop and maintain enterprise data warehouse and business intelligence solutions
Design, build, and test solutions for data transformation from a variety of data sources while modeling data in an efficient and performant manner
Work directly with customers to understand reporting and analytics needs
Collaborate with customers and BI analysts to design and build BI semantic solutions to enable governed self-service
Assist in building technical roadmap for analytic products
Be a resource to your team and organization as a subject matter expert
Provide technical and professional mentorship to your teammates
Work with Product Owners and Scrum Masters to help determine priority and assess timelines
Be a committed agile teammate who guides the team to reach their goals
Participate in all agile ceremonies, including: planning, pointing, demos, and retros
Enforce industry and company best practices within your team
Prioritize unit tests, both manual and automated, to ensure the highest code quality
Responsible for timely and thorough code reviews
Responsible for documenting all solutions and metadata to the required company standard
Continually learn and stay up-to-date with the ever-changing analytics technical landscape
Mentor other team members on new technologies and practices
Work with external vendors to ensure deliverables meet company needs and standards
Own the data ops delivery pipeline and processes
Participate in architectural design decisions and communicate those to your team
Job Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Data Analytics, Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Mathematics or similar analytical field
Minimum 5 years of experience working with data warehousing design and delivery with preference given to cloud DW experience in Snowflake or Azure Synapse
Deep knowledge of data transformation tools such as Azure Data Factory or SSIS and push down ELT methodologies and tools
Experience building and designing BI semantic models in SSAS tabular
Working knowledge of data visualization tools, with preference to PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft Office Suite with emphasis on Excel (pivot tables, v-lookup, working with data from BI semantic models)
Knowledge of paginated and tabular reporting tools (e.g. SSRS)
Advanced knowledge of SQL and tuning SQL including analysis of query plans
Experience and expertise in Python and familiarity with application of modern data science languages such as Python, R, etc.",3.6,"Pima Medical Institute
4.6","Tucson, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
203,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,"$86k-$143k
(Glassdoor Est.)","20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
204,Data Engineer,"$65k-$124k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,"Alignment Healthcare
3.5","Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
205,Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),"$64k-$107k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 88040 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

Job Summary:

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Main Responsibilities:

Develop custom data models and algorithms to address business challenges
Assess quality of data sources
Evaluate technical feasibility of business problems
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Lead data automation projects to aggregate disparate data sources
Partner with IT to align on data architecture, tools and technologies

Main Requirements:

Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
At least 2 years experience using computer languages (Python, R, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience communicating technical concepts to non-technical audiences
Experience with a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, Nielsen, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Tableau, Data Studio, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
206,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
207,Data Science Support Analyst,"$72k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
208,Research Scientist,-1,"Job Description:

Our Reston office is seeking talented candidates to develop mathematical models and algorithms, develop and demonstrate prototype software, and participate in operational analysis related to their technical work. Our Reston office employs mathematicians, physicists and computer scientists. We routinely apply stochastic processes, statistical inference, optimization and scheduling, models of random graphs and applied physics to develop the underlying theory and applications for our clients. The successful candidate will interact with customers, gather requirements and data, write and present briefings, and contribute to the development of Metron tools.

Projects typically involve developing advanced algorithms implemented in a computer prototype system for our research & development customers. We work in small teams, led by Senior Scientists, who work closely with new employees. Project teams work together from the initial system concept, through software and algorithm design, to implementation and demonstration.

We believe an employee's specific academic training is not as important as their innate ability and willingness to learn new areas of mathematics and work on difficult problems.

Required Qualifications:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Physics or Operations Research
Some programming experience is preferred (C, C++, Java, Matlab, etc.)
Mathematical, simulation, or physical modeling experience highly desired
US Citizenship required, position will require background investigation to authorize access to classified information

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.
3.0","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
209,"Senior Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",-1,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Team leadership experience strongly preferred
Startup experience strongly preferred
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience


Location

Palo Alto, CA

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,"Eversight
4.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
210,Data Scientist - Medicare Advantage Generalist,-1,"A bit about us:

We’re on a mission to change healthcare — how it’s paid for, delivered, experienced. We want to put people center stage, not process or profit. We are guided by a deep belief that every person on Medicare should be treated like we would treat a member of our own family: with loving care and a profound commitment to their health and well-being.

That’s why we’re gathering a whole bunch of smart, big-hearted people to create a new kind of healthcare company — one that combines compassion, health insurance, clinical care, and technology seamlessly.

We want to throw the long ball with people we love for a cause we believe in. Life is short. Join us.


A bit about this role:

We are looking for a data scientist who can serve as a liaison to our Operational teams to answer important and timely questions about the health of the business. We are looking for someone who has broad experience in Medicare Advantage analytics functions — e.g. Finance, Risk Adjustment, Stars, Pharmacy — and deep experience in at least one area. This role will report into our Data Science team, and will work alongside Product Managers, Software Engineers, and Business Leads to solve key challenges for the company.
Responsibilities will include:
Working closely with key business stakeholders to understand the analytical needs of the business and providing insight in a rapid, iterative, and collaborative process
Developing thoughtful reports and dashboards that help Operations teams improve their business decision-making
Identifying patterns in the analyses you conduct, and using those patterns to improve our tools and processes so we can deliver results more quickly and accurately
Sharing your domain knowledge with technical team-members who do not have an MA background
Communicating results to an audience of mixed technical backgrounds
Required skills and experience:
Ability to work in a fast-paced startup environment
5+ years of technical work at a Medicare Advantage plan or service provider
Experience collaborating effectively with stakeholders
Experience with SQL
Experience with dashboarding and creating reports
Experience with Risk Adjustment
If you love running towards complex challenges and transforming them into solutions, if you want to make a potentially huge impact on many lives, and if you are looking for a disruptive startup with an inspiring and talented team, Devoted Health may be the place for you!

Devoted is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to a safe and supportive work environment in which all employees have the opportunity to participate and contribute to the success of the business. We value diversity and collaboration. Individuals are respected for their skills, experience, and unique perspectives. This commitment is embodied in Devoted’s Code of Conduct, our company values and the way we do business.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, the Company does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy status, marital status, national origin, disability, age, sexual orientation, veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, gender expression, or any other factor prohibited by law. Our management team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment.",4.3,"Devoted Health
4.3",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
211,Data Engineer,"$52k-$99k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
212,Supply Chain Solution - Data Scientist,"$68k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description


The Supply Chain Solution – Data Scientist will be based in Austin, TX. In this role you will be responsible for creating reports using a variety of tools and methods.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do…
Use various analytical techniques including visualization, statistical methods, machine learning/AI to create scalable solutions for business problems
Translate Supply Chain business problems and questions into specific quantitative questions to be answered w/ available data using robust methodologies. In many cases, the data collection at scale will be part of the task and may involve co-work with software development team
Coordinate and perform testing on data quality and solutions
Analyze and extract relevant information from big data to help automate and optimize key processes
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings to stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information
Build scalable prototype analytics solutions
Work closely with software development/engineering teams to build model implementations and integrate successful models and algorithms in production systems at scale
Here is some of what you’ll need (required)…
Minimum 4 years’ experience with R
Demonstrated skill and experience of data analysis within open source scripting languages (e.g. R, Python)
Strong experience with SQL and working with relational databases (SQL Server, Teradata, MySQL etc.)
Strong demonstrated knowledge of applied statistical and machine learning methods
Experience with XML, JSON data formats, working with REST API’s, SVN/Git or other version control tools and techniques
Experience with Tableau in dashboard development, deployment and administration
Demonstrated ability to manage projects and implementation of solutions/applications
Effective written and oral communication skills, team player
Here are some nice to have’s…
Master’s degree in STEM field/Operations Research/Data Science/Supply Chain
Work experience in Supply Chain/Manufacturing
Be able to present quantitative results in the right context to various target audiences
Experience within the RStudio ecosystem (Shiny dashboards and applications, Plumber API’s, RStudio Connect)
Experience working with non-relational databases like MongoDB
Experience of deploying ML applications on platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Google Cloud preferred
Demonstrated experience in business applications of distributed computing (e.g. MapReduce, HIVE, HADOOP)
Demonstrated capability in building scalable analytical solutions
Experience in ownership of solutions – life-cycle, roadmap, implementation, business value generation
Portfolio of data science projects on Github.com, RPubs.com etc.
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Demonstrated ability to communicate and influence executives and upper management
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide…
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Global Procurement & Supply Chain

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accesibility@flextronics.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
213,Data Lab Architect,"$113k-$181k
(Glassdoor Est.)","· BS level technical degree required; Computer Science or Mathematics background preferred.
· 10+ years of Machine Learning and/or Analytics Systems development and deployment experience, IT systems and engineering experience, security and compliance experience, etc.
· Experience of software development and/or IT and implementation/consulting experience.
· Experience implementation and tuning in the Big Data Ecosystem, (such as EMR, Hadoop, Spark, R, Presto, Hive), ML Platforms (SageMaker, Kubeflow, Azure Machine Learning, SAS, Domino), and MLOps (model development, orchestration and deployment, monitoring, optimization).
· Track record of implementing AWS services in a variety of business environments such as large enterprises and start-ups.

Do you love building software and thinking big about how data and AI can change the world? Are you a data and analytics specialist? Do you have deep expertise in developing platforms optimized for analytics and machine learning solutions at scale? Would you like a career that gives you opportunities to help customers and partners use cloud computing services to build new ML solutions, faster, and at lower cost?

At AWS, we’re hiring highly technical ML platform solution architects and engineers to collaborate with our customers on building solutions in database, data management, and analytics/machine learning. AWS Data Labs are a Seattle, AWS headquarters based facility where customers come to build data and analytics platforms. You will focus on real time and batch-based data processing, business intelligence, analytics, and machine learning platforms. These solutions are built alongside the customer and quickly put into production use in a matter of weeks. You'll work closely with AWS Field Teams including Solution Architects, Technical Account Managers, and AWS Service Developers to partner with customers to solve hard problems with data. Every day, you'll be working with AWS Services and Data Labs Customers to determine the optimal implementation, build it, prove it works, extract documents and CloudFormation templates to speed project delivery. If you are builder, and love data, then this could be your ideal job!

· Knowledge of foundation infrastructure requirements such as Networking, Storage, and Hardware Optimization.
· Ability to understand complex business requirements and render them as prototype systems with quick turnaround time.
· Strong verbal and written communications skills are a must, as well as the ability to work effectively across internal and external organizations and virtual teams.
· Hands on experience leading large-scale big data and analytics projects.
· Demonstrated industry leadership in the fields of Big Data processing, Data Sciences and Machine Learning.
· Deep understanding of data, application, server, and network security
· Experience with Statistics, Machine Learning and Predictive Modeling.
· Hands on experience as a database, data warehouse, big data/analytics developer or administrator, or work as a data scientist.
· Hands on experience architecting, deploying and maintaining production machine learning systems.
· Experience working within the software development or Internet industries is highly desired.
· Technical degrees in computer science, software engineering, or mathematics
· Working knowledge of modern software development practices and technologies such as agile methodologies and DevOps/MLOps.
· AWS Certification, eg. AWS Solutions Architect, Big Data, Developer, Machine Learning, DevOps, SysOps",3.9,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.9","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
214,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Glassdoor; the application form needs to be completed in order to be considered. TO APPLY, VISIT: https://grnh.se/eb8d01633us.

About Us: At Emendata, we help bridge the gap between data and the real world. We partner with organizations that have a social mission and help them tackle their problems using analytics. Our role in these partnerships goes end to end—we handle everything from wrangling the data to analyzing the problem to turning the results into something actionable. Importantly, we understand that this analytics pipeline does not live in a vacuum. Getting to meaningful numbers requires more than just the right methods; it calls for understanding the people, policies, data, and systems involved. With this approach, our small but fast-growing team is having a big impact, taking on challenges like using analytics to combat fraud, waste, and abuse in Medicare.
About the Role: This role leads the way in producing analytics that reflect a deep level of understanding and a high degree of quality. We are looking for you to:
Take analyses from end to end: Understand the client’s problem, identify the right research question, plan the methodology, corral the data, code the analysis, interpret the results, craft the deliverable, and communicate the story
Apply a research mentality: Use all tools at our disposal (documentation, policy regulations, data investigations, etc.) to make sound analytic decisions
Help the team deliver its best work: Turn direction from clients/senior staff into tactical plans and work closely with data analysts to help them implement (conducting code reviews, teaching/reinforcing analytic strategies, etc.)
This role will be a good fit for people who naturally push towards progress and are undeterred when that requires a lot of effort or stepping into unfamiliar territory. Emendata is growing rapidly, and we are looking for people who are excited to march forward together.
Qualifications: If you do not meet all the criteria below but still think you would be a good fit for this role, please apply so we can see if we can find the right spot for you on the team. We value experience but also welcome aptitude and enthusiasm.
Education: Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a quantitative field or equivalent technical training
Programming: Experience with SAS is a must (comfortable with SAS macro language, advanced DATA step techniques such as hashes, and PROC SQL); experience with Python, Stata, R, or SQL is a plus
Technical Mentorship: Demonstrated experience with reviewing code and providing feedback
Data Management: Comfortable with the process of importing, cleaning, and preparing data for analysis in a reproducible way
Analysis: Exceptional problem-solving skills with a good understanding of statistical/social science research methods; 4+ years hands-on experience in an analytics role (e.g., economic consulting)
Working Style: Intellectually curious (keep pulling on threads until finding an answer), enterprising (eager to tackle the unknown and find a way to make things happen), and collaborative (work with others to explore, build, tear down, and build again)
To be considered for this position, applicants must have the ability to work in the U.S. without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
About the Interview Process: We want both sides to learn what it would be like to work together. Part way through the interview process, we incorporate a lightweight at-home exercise that serves as the basis for a technical interview. The exercise gives us an outlet to show you what kind of problems this role would tackle and offers you an opportunity to show us how you would approach the work.",-1,Emendata,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
215,Data Scientist,"$55k-$94k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tsunami Tsolutions is seeking a motivated Data Scientist to join its MRO Business Process Services organization. This person will be responsible for developing and deploying solutions that utilize machine learning across multiple projects. They will work with team members and customers to identify new sources of value and take actions to capture it. The selected individual will also work to ensure data quality and provide metrics as indicators of the current state.

This role will also require the presentation of findings to senior management.

Responsibilities:
Identify, collect and clean data from multiple sources
Research, build, implement and evaluate various machine learning approaches
Work with team members to deploy solutions across the organization
Working with stakeholders to validate, interpret and provide business insights based on machine learning
Reporting periodic progress on projects, including tracking usage and value derived from the models
Position Requirements
B.S degree in computer science, data science or engineering preferred
Experience building and implementing machine learning models in Python and R
Experience building dashboards and visualizations using Qlik, Power BI, Tableau or similar
Strong programming skills on languages used in data science including Python, R and SQL
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel with competency in vlookups, pivot tables, etc.
Ability to learn new concepts quickly and translate them into practical applications
Ability to effectively communicate findings to non-technical audiences
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.6,"Tsunami Tsolutions
2.6","Glastonbury, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
216,Market Data Analyst,"$31k-$57k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are seeking a creative, data driven Marketing Analyst to join our fast paced, growing organization. Candidate is responsible for researching product and manufacturing trends, evaluating campaign results and making recommendations for growth and operating efficiency improvements to our management team. The ideal candidate will have experience with complex data mining/analysis and implementation. This is a growth position with upward mobility. Complete benefit package includes medical, dental, vision life insurance, student loan repayment assistance and a 401(k) company matched contribution.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate market trends and patterns to suggest new & complementary products
Manage Distribution Price List and analyze market data to identify cause and effect relationships
Evaluate product, pricing, placement (distribution channels) and promotion (advertisements/marketing campaigns) and present recommendations to management
Work closely with Distribution Channel Partners to grow market share in under-represented markets
Examine return on investment of marketing campaigns
Travel to customers and industry events to gather market intelligence
Visit other Amphenol Business Units domestically and internationally to learn best-practices and facilitate implementation internally
Work closely with Sales and Marketing to track competitive landscape and market trends
Requirements:
Undergraduate or Masters degree in Marketing, Business, Engineering or related field
Demonstrated aptitude for analytics
Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Preferred:
1-3 years of experience in a fast-paced global manufacturing environment
“An Equal Opportunity Employer” Minority/Female/Disabled/Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or National Origin"" Drug free workplance.

ITAR - The candidate must be able to legally work in the United States; we are unable to provide sponsorship. Position requires candidate to be a US Person as defined in ITAR, 22 CFR 120.15 (US Citizenship or Resident Alien Status) and defined by 8 USC 1101(a) (20).

Apply for This Position",3.5,"SV Microwave
3.5","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
217,Advanced Computer Scientist,-1,"Advanced Computer Scientist

NSBU | Melbourne, FL, United States

Why Join Rincon Research Corporation (RRC)?

At Rincon Research Corporation, our primary business is innovating, developing, and fielding digital signal processing (DSP) products and services for the United States Defense and Intelligence Communities in support of national security.

Rincon Research Corporation seeks a candidate that has a detailed software and computer skillset but is interested in advanced signal processing applications.

Come join the team that is creating cutting edge signal processing, geolocation, and communication systems for the future!

What are the primary responsibilities in the Advanced Computer Scientist position?

Candidate will be responsible for developing within a heterogeneous software environment containing code in Python, MATLAB, C/C++ and Java. A strong CS background is needed and experience in cloud computing and machine learning are very desirable. Good communication skills, with ability to interact with remote co-workers and customers are required. Looking for people able to find creative and cutting-edge solutions for customer issues.

What required background will make you successful?
Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or other equivalent field of discipline
Master’s degree and 5+ years applied and relevant experience or Bachelor’s degree and 7+ years’ experience
Demonstrated capability in scientific programming of high-level language such as C/C++on Unix/Linux platforms
Working knowledge of high level interpreted languages such as PYTHON and/or MATLAB
Experience with interfacing extensive C/C++ libraries within interpreted languages.
Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED
Where is the position located?

This position is located at our Melbourne, FL office.

What benefits does RRC offer?
100% employer-paid premiums for family medical and dental insurance, employee life insurance, short-term and long-term disability (STD & LTD)
Flexible reimbursement spending accounts for medical expense and dependent care
Immediate participation and vesting in the company’s Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) and 401(k) Plan
Employer contributions to RRC’s ESOP
Employer matching contributions to the company’s 401( k) Plan
Employer discretionary contributions to the company’s 401(k) Plan
Rincon Research Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, veteran status, or any other protected factor.",4.1,"Rincon Research Corporation
4.1","Melbourne, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
218,Data Scientist Lead- DAB,"$94k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Central Support

Central Support – Central support will be at the forefront of driving new ways of working, collaborating and change. We need talent that are willing to be first adopters. Leaders who can help ensure learnings and best practices are leveraged across all of Takeda’s digital priorities

As disruptive technology changes the face of healthcare industry, Takeda will have a new role to play. We are taking a giant step forward to shape a new breed of organization. A future-ready organization that shape shifts as the world changes. We have embarked on a visionary journey to become a truly Living Business. A digital and data-driven organization with agile capabilities to respond quickly to new technology opportunities and changing customer expectations.

While others react to changing dynamics and disruption by building barriers around their digital solutions and patients, we understand that the global healthcare transformation can only be successful when we enter a new era of trust and collaboration by exchanging data, insights and knowledge.

We will explore new ways of working across Takeda. We will introduce agile capabilities and culture driving more intentional collaboration, innovation and partnerships across geographies and business units.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Takeda is undergoing a digital transformation. Mobilized by the C-suite in November 2018 with a $300M funding released in January 2019, the transformation program has several initiatives in flight across the globe.
One key pillar of the program and the digital organization is the emerging technology and digital partnerships team. This team serves as the agile prototyping body that drives pilot efforts to validate the efficacy and scalability of onboarded technology, analytics products.
We are looking for a versatile, super-star data scientist that will lead the development of models, insight engines across the molecule lifecycle. And if needed, put hands on the keyboard to build rapid prototypes.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Identify relevant internal and external stakeholders to gather requirements to deliver data solutions.
The scope of work is broad - crystal structure prediction, synthetic control arms, rare disease early diagnosis algorithms, yield optimization for manufacturing, patient journey analysis, micro-segmentation, field force optimization, etc.
Involve additional data experts as needed.
Implement tools (e.g., Power BI) that help data consumers to extract, analyze and visualize data faster through data pipelines.
Design proposals for calculations based on subscribed data collection.
Develop calculation mechanisms to ensure real-time data collection of customer behavior.
Identify and interpret trends or make patterns in complex data sets in order to enable the business data-driven decisions.
Provide data insights for technical solutions and system improvements based on interpreted results.
Work alongside architects and other technical experts while contributing actionable, database insights to the system architecture.
The goal would be for you to have global visibility, impact, and be positioned to start building your own team in April 2021.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field, or other relevant work experience.
This role requires comfort with common modeling techniques (linear Regression, logistic Regression. decision tree, SVM, Naive Bayes, kNN. K-Means. Random Forest, dimensionality reduction, gradient boosting, xgboost, etc.), deep learning, deep knowledge of NLP (BERT, NLTK, including interest in learning new packages like GPT-3, deeBERT, AutoML, Sagemaker autopilot), a different approach for deploying models in the cloud (primarily AWS) and a strong appetite for learning!
Advanced knowledge of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, decision trees, clustering, neural networks etc..).
Proficiency in R, SAS, SPSS, MATLAB, Python (NumPy/SciPy) or other statistical packages.
Experience in working with large data sets and relational databases.
Experience with distributed systems and programming models, using Big Data technologies such as Hadoop or Spark.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills along with strong desire to work in cross-functional teams.
If you are a high performing data science wizard that can be a thought leader for ~200 data scientists across the organization in data science innovation, speed/comfort with learning and rapid prototyping - this is the gig you are looking for.

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
219,Data Scientist Lead- DAB,"$33k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Language Assessment Division of the Center for Applied Linguistics has occasional need for qualified consultants to work with the Psychometrics and Quantatitive Research team. We accept CVs from professionals with Master’s degrees in statistics or other fields with strong quantitative content, or with PhDs in educational measurement. We also accept CVs from PhD candidates.

Consultants may be tasked with completing analyses, replicating analyses for quality control purposes, or supporting the production of technical reports.

Essential skills include experience producing analyses in a professional setting using SPSS and R. Desired skills also include experience with Rasch analysis and DIF analysis. Experience with language assessment is also a plus.

Application Process
Email a CV and cover letter indicating your experience with the skills listed above to jobs@cal.org, with the subject line: Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consulting.
CAL will add your information to our files and contact you as consulting opportunities arise that meet your qualifications.

For any additional questions or comments, please contact us at jobs@cal.org.",2.8,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
220,Lead Data Scientist,"$102k-$166k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.7,"TRANZACT
3.7","Fort Lee, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
221,SAP Materials Master Data Analyst - Temp,"$58k-$93k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This is a 6 month temporary assignment.

The Mizuho OSI Way

In 1978, we set out to change the way patients undergo surgery. As a Mizuho OSI customer, you can expect our commitment to the following…

We commit to your satisfaction. If you are dissatisfied, we will strive to make it right.

We do things the right way. We commit to hire people with competence, generosity and a caring attitude. We motivate our employees to use their individual strengths to provide creative solutions, changes, and innovations. We anticipate your needs through customer experiences, thus nurturing our relationships.

Collectively, this creates an environment that enables and inspires healthcare professionals to improve the lives of patients.

Dare to go further. Care to do more.

TOP REASONS TO JOIN THE MIZUHO OSI TEAM
Privately held company with a tradition of market leadership and best-in-class innovation
Fast-paced entrepreneurial culture focused on dramatically improving patient outcomes through personal empowerment
Emphasis on continuous improvement and celebration of our values of R.E.S.P.E.C.T. and the Mizuho Way.
Create innovative solutions designed and manufactured at our HQ in Northern California
POSITION OVERVIEW
The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 1 to 2 full life cycle SAP implementations and have participated or have led roles in blueprint activities, creating SOP, work instructions and training users to maintenance and sustain the master data. In addition be a savvy self-directed and capable individual who’s accustomed to delivering time critical work products.
Bachelor's degree in business, and or in systems applications such as SAP Modules or equivalent work experience
Experience with full life cycle SAP implementations
Formal training or experience with ASAP implementation methodology
Excellent written and oral communication skills
We are looking for you, if you have the ability to:
Hold meetings on Material Master and Item Master Data Management.
Assist with refining Business Process Design for Item Material Master including tactical MDM process.
Coordinate with functional disciplines in OPS/SCM and their IT counterparts.
Identify MDM Classifications of data and assist with identifying local data attributes.
Assist with the MDM governance model, including documenting processes with identified data owners, master process owners and SAP module owners.
Assist with identifying KPIs to improve quality and productivity.
Assist with workflows within MDM tool.
Here is what you will do day-to-day
Analyze business process requirements, design a solution approach in close collaboration with business teams
Write functional specifications and advise business teams of feasible solution designs
Work with IT in unit test efforts and with business in regression test efforts
Deliver BPP and solution documentation for implemented solutions
Work with functional teams (SD, MM, PP, FICO, QM)
Application Configuration and Support
Support SAP modules to meet business needs.
Unit test SAP software applications, including customizations and interfaces
Application Analysis and Design
Assist SAP users analyze and identify business process requirements.
Develop SAP functional application designs and specifications, individually or collaboratively.
Work as a member of cross-functional teams and add value by providing a technical perspective.
Guide Application Developers by recommending ways to design and unit-test applications. (SAP - PLM)
Change Management and Support
Provide QA function by reviewing/testing developer’s work.
Guide users in integrated testing, conference room pilot activities and applications startup activities.
Facilitate the process of change by clarifying new procedures and training system users.
Project Management and Control
Manage small projects, with responsibility for the quality and timeliness of project deliverables
Direct project resources and/or recommend and create internal development procedures and methodologies.
Understand scope and planned estimates of undertaken activities and manage actual time relative to the planned estimates.
Problem Solving:
Plays a key role in the Order to Cash team in the full project lifecycle, from the business blueprint of the project to post support.
Works with business analysts, business SMEs and various process owners to analyze their requirements: prepare and participate in workshops, requirement documentation, functional specifications and configuration documentation.
Provides support for Data extraction, data cleansing and loading
Works closely with IT resources for non-standard SAP objects.
Supports the development of test scripts and provide process expertise during test execution.
Assists and supports training document creation.
Finalizes the MDM configuration element s and triggers and support the solution after implementation.
Understand, follow and support Mizuho OSI’s internal Quality System policies, procedures and work instructions including but not limited to applicable external regulations (21 Code of Federal Regulations Part 820 Quality System Regulations and applicable International Standards).
What you will need to be successful in this role:
A minimum of 5 years of SAP process and configuration experience in Sales & Distribution, Materials Management, Production Planning and Quality Management modules and MDM.
Experience in at least 2 full life cycle implementations of SAP.
Experience in supporting all phases of SAP project life cycle including blueprint, design, build, test, deployment and support.
Experience in developing blueprint documentation, functional designs, test plans and scenarios as well as executing the tests.
Experience in and data validations during testing and implementation
Strong knowledge/experience in 1 additional SAP module is a must.
Experience with integration testing and implementation.
Thorough business understanding of Supply Chain processes.
Familiarity with SAP architecture.
Strong verbal and written communications skills, with an ability to express complex business concepts in technical terms.
Strong analytical, problem solving, and conceptual skills.
Strong interpersonal skills; ability to work well on cross functional project teams.
Experience in the construction and distribution industry.
What you need to be prepared for:

The physical demands are representative of those needed to perform the essential functions of the job in an office environment. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

NOTE: This job description in no way states or implies that these are the only duties or functions to be performed by the incumbent. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform any other job-related duties/functions requested by their supervisor.",3.7,"Mizuho OSI
3.7","Union City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
222,"Senior Director, Oncology R&D – Clinical Scientist","$80-$138 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join a Legacy of Innovation 110 Years and Counting!

Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical therapies to improve standards of care and address diversified, unmet medical needs of people globally by leveraging our world-class science and technology. With more than 100 years of scientific expertise and a presence in more than 20 countries, Daiichi Sankyo and its 15,000 employees around the world draw upon a rich legacy of innovation and a robust pipeline of promising new medicines to help people. In addition to a strong portfolio of medicines for cardiovascular diseases, under the Group’s 2025 Vision to become a “Global Pharma Innovator with Competitive Advantage in Oncology,” Daiichi Sankyo is primarily focused on providing novel therapies in oncology, as well as other research areas centered around rare diseases and immune disorders.

Job Summary:

Oversees a number of trials of a multinational program in a specific indication, i.e., multiple multinational phase II/III clinical trials; Reviews regulatory documents from cross functional, holistic perspective; Represents clinical function at meetings with health authorities; Oversees management and performance of CRO. Occasional interactions with CRO senior leadership as needed; Participates in creation of developmental and regulatory strategy in collaboration with Regulatory Affairs; Drafts clinical development plans, protocol profiles and sections of key submission documents; Point of contact for interactions with regulatory-agency clinical reviewing divisions on clinical matters; Supports marketing in developing a commercial strategy include biomarker strategy; Represents Clinical Development as Global Clinical Lead or as Team Leader (ITL-ISTL).

Responsibilities:

Study Strategy: For Phase 2 and Phase 3 registrational studies: Provides the strategic direction to BD&O for EDC, edit checks, data quality listings, SAP, DM plan, Reviews patient population and protocol compliance for consistency with study strategy, Develops biomarker strategy in collaboration with Translational Medicine, Collaborates with external KEEs to refine study plans; Prepares and participate in regulatory agency meetings, if applicable; Defines study strategy across clinical trials within an indication or project; Attends EOP2 meeting and represents clinical/TMCP.

Study Planning and Execution: Clinical Study Lead (CSL) for large Phase 3 registrational study(ies); Develop prospective contingency plans for management of key risks in a large study or project; Clearly define study priorities and high level execution plan, communicate to members of study team within sponsor, CRO and vendors; Ensure clear and effective lines of communication and decision-making process cross-functionally and cross-regionally; Facilitate team coordination.

Study outputs: For Phase 3 studies: Drafts responses to IRBs and HA, Collaborates with Translational Medicine to ensure appropriate biomarker, PK / PD measurements, Reviews emerging clinical data regularly, Leads dose-escalation meetings, Performs quality assessment with delivery lead e.g. review TLG before DBL, and quality check of data, Works with BD&O to ensure SAP updates; Interact with Key External Experts (KEEs) to validate interpretation of study results; Present results to regulatory agencies during pre-submission meetings; Interpret study results in context of other studies in the project and other drugs used for the indication.

External collaboration: Develops and leads Ad-Board with top tier KOLs for project level strategic advice; Develops and leads steering committee for Phase 3 registrational study; Consults with KOLS for advice on complex development or safety issues.

Scientific, Program related: Integrated Study Team (IST) representative or IST leader on study team; Responsible before senior management for the creation and execution of development strategies for program/s under IST; Obtains cross-functional alignment ; Leads development and execution of Product Development Plan and clinical development strategy; Leads Integrated Project Team (IPT) working closely with Global Project Management to ensure cross-functional coordination and focus to agreed strategy; Coordinates clinical activities across the project; Represents IPT to Sr. Management.

Additional non-study related activities: Provides input on KEE selection for Therapeutic Area; Reviews content to be shared with KEEs; Frequent involvement in Business Development activities for late stage compounds; Involvement with in-licensing and acquisitions on due diligence activities; Major contributor to portfolio decisions.

Qualifications: Successful candidates will be able to meet the qualifications below with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Education/Experience:

Master’s degree; PharmD, PhD, or equivalent; Postgraduate training in TA or related specialty, or equivalent, desirable

9+ years with PharmD, PhD and relevant clinical experience
12+ years with Master’s degree and relevant clinical experience

Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.2,"Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
223,Senior Data Scientist Advisor,"$104k-$169k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

Join the Clean Energy Revolution

Become a Senior Data Scientist Advisor at Southern California Edison (SCE) and build a better tomorrow. In this job, youll be responsible for leading the modeling of complex analytical problems, discovering insights, and identifying opportunities using statistical, algorithmic, mining, and visualization techniques. In addition to advanced analytical skills, the senior advisor will be responsible for developing business requirements and coordinating with groups in and outside of the Transmission and Distribution group. You will be responsible for developing, presenting, and communicating results. You will also be responsible for leading and mentoring other Data Scientists. As a Senior Data Scientist Advisor, your work will help power our planet, reduce carbon emissions and create cleaner air for everyone. Are you ready to take on the challenge to help us build the future?

A day in the life - Get ready to think big, work smart and shine bright!
Lead data scientists on developing models that meet or exceed business requirements.
Generate advanced analytical approaches using predictive modeling, optimization and simulation abilities.
Apply statistical and pattern recognition techniques to perform description, prediction, and optimization.
Develop and implement tools for data acquisition, extraction, transformation, management, and manipulation of large and complex data sets. Explore, model, mine, and experiment with data to answer critical business issues. And, generate and communicate business insights.
Qualifications

The Essentials
Bachelors degree in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Five or more years of experience in Predictive Modeling or Machine Learning or Statistical Modeling or Data Mining.
Proficient with R or Python.
The Preferred
MS or PhD in a quantitative discipline such as Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering, Computer Science, or information sciences such as business analytics or informatics.
Experience in leading and mentoring junior team members and guiding them on data science and advanced analytics (machine learning, predictive analytics) development.
In-depth industry/business knowledge in Electric Utility industry.
Proficiency with SQL and/or SAS.
Strong Leadership skills and experience.
You should know
Visit our Candidate Resource page to get meaningful information related to benefits, perks, resources, testing information, and hiring process, and more!
Relocation may apply to this position.
About SCE

The people at SCE don't just keep the lights on. Our mission is so much bigger. Were fueling the kind of innovation thats changing an entire industry, and quite possibly the planet. Join us and create a future with cleaner energy, while providing our customers with the safety and reliability they demand. At SCE, youll have a chance to grow personally and professionally, making a real impact in Southern California and around the world.

At SCE, we celebrate our differences. We are a proud Equal Opportunity Employer and will not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected status.

We are committed to ensuring that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodations at (833) 343-0727.",4.0,"Southern California Edison
4.0","Pomona, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1879,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
224,Senior Data Scientist - Denver,"$84k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Lumen
Lumen is guided by our belief that humanity is at its best when technology advances the way we live and work. With 450,000 route fiber miles serving customers in more than 60 countries, we deliver the fastest, most secure global platform for applications and data to help businesses, government and communities deliver amazing experiences. Learn more about Lumen’s network, edge cloud, security and communication and collaboration solutions and our purpose to further human progress through technology at news.lumen.com, LinkedIn: /lumentechnologies, Twitter: @lumentechco, Facebook: /lumentechnologies, Instagram: @lumentechnologies and YouTube: /lumentechnologies.

The Role

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for developing tools to collect, clean, analyze and manage the data used by strategic areas of the business. Employ techniques and theories drawn from mathematics, statistics, from the subdomains of machine learning, classification, cluster analysis, and data mining.

The Main Responsibilities
Design and implement programs and automation to collect, mash up, process and analyze distributed real-world data.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand complex business problems, build statistical models, and create predictive tools.
Clearly communicate methods and conclusions with simple language and innovative visualizations to management and executives.
Work effectively on a team as well as a self-driven individual to do research and develop cutting edge and effective solutions for the business.
Provide expertise in analyzing and visualizing large, complex, and unique data sets.
Create new insights that will drive business growth and profitability in the short and long term.
Deploy analytics code with a continuous integration environment incorporating version control, build servers, and test servers.
Management of analytical projects and assistance in program planning as well as the acquisition, retention and development of data science talent
What We Look For in a Candidate
4+ years related experience.
Degree(s) in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Economics, Operations Research, Statistics or related discipline
Experience with relational and non-relational databases.
Strong experience with tools for managing, analyzing, and visualizing large datasets.
Programming experience with two or more of R, Python, Lisp, Clojure, Scala, Java, Perl, Mathematica and C++.
Past success in extracurricular math/science activities or competitions is highly regarded.
Creativity and persistence in locating, extracting and analyzing all relevant data.
Problem solving versatility: making the best decisions possible given the data quality and time available.
Strong analytical thinking and ability to quickly pick up new methods, tools and programming languages.
Preferred:
Expertise w/ GIT, agile project management tools (Trello, JIRA, Rally, etc), documentation/markup expertise (Markdown, etc)
Strong verbal, written and visualization communication skills relaying data science findings, problems, etc to business users.
Good working knowledge of PL/T-SQL
Expertise w/ econometric and machine learning methods for predictive analytics
Prior expertise w/ price elasticity of demand modeling and mathematical optimization methods
Culture of curiosity and perseverance in the face of messy data and complex business, information systems landscape
Significant experience with the SDLC, in particular as applied to automation of data science pipelines and development of analytic products
Prior experience coaching junior technical team members
Strong background with planning and management of data science projects as well as leading engagement of stakeholders and communication with non-technical SMEs and partners.
Experience with the wireline telecommunications industry, notably common product technologies and marketing thereof
What to Expect Next

Requisition #: 232691

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.1,"Lumen
3.1","Littleton, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
225,Data Consultant,"$80k-$125k
(Employer Est.)","Company Description
Sagence is a data focused consulting firm working with clients in information-intensive industries such as Healthcare, Financial Services, Insurance and Retail. We specialize in data management and analytics, assisting our clients with the acquisition, evaluation and development of data assets.

Our People:
Passionate, diverse, creative, genuine, curious, hands-on…these are just a few of the words that describe who we are. We have a high-energy workplace with a focus on producing high-quality, impactful results for our clients. We build teamwork through small, dedicated teams who constantly communicate and continuously teach each other and learn from one another. We promote an entrepreneurial spirit by encouraging individual initiative and foster a collaborative culture and work environment which includes open communication and on-going learning. We are committed to equality of opportunity, fairness, work and lifestyle balance, and mutual respect. We strongly believe these characteristics enable our employees to develop to their fullest potential.
Job Overview
Sagence is looking for Data Consultants to help us build and sustain our client’s data capabilities and our competitive advantage. Candidates must possess deep, practical experience in one or more of the following Data Management competencies; data warehousing, data architecture, data profiling, data modeling, data governance, data analysis, business intelligence, data lakes, reference data or master data management. Additionally, and equally as important, as a Sagence Data Consultant, you must have the skills and experience necessary to effectively communicate with our clients.
Skills & Requirements:
MUST BE HANDS ON. Candidates should have system development experience and proficiency with system development methodologies and possess the following skills and knowledge:
Must have hands-on experience with various IT concepts of data management/engineering (ETL, data modeling, data warehousing, etc.)
Must have hands-on experience with SQL, data profiling, and data discovery
Experience building business intelligence, analytics, or reporting solutions - either front-end consumption tools (e.g., Microsoft Power BI, Tableau & Qlik) or supplying data for end user analysis
Familiarity with data architecture principles/approaches, data environment infrastructure considerations, and data modeling principles/approaches
Ability to drive out technical requirements with business and IT stakeholders for implementations of data solutions
Hands-on experience with Agile delivery methodology
Demonstrated ability in effectively engaging, communicating, and presenting to stakeholders across both business and technology functions
Conceptual and analytical thinker with the ability to extract, analyze, and synthesize complex business insights
Prior professional experience in a management consulting, an IT management, or client facing role strongly preferred
Knowledge of the Financial Services, Insurance, Healthcare or Retail industries is preferred
Tools and Technology:
Proficient at leveraging tools and technology to drive value for clients. Examples include the following;
Database Management Tools:
Relational – e.g. Oracle, MySQL, Microsoft SQL Server, PostgreSQL or similar
NoSQL – e.g. MongoDB, Apache Cassandra, Couchbase or similar
Cloud-based – e.g. AWS (Redshift or DynamoDB), Azure (SQL Server or Cosmos DB) or similar
ETL Tools - e.g. Informatica, Talend, Microsoft SSIS, or similar
Data Modeling tools - e.g., Toad, ERWin, ER/Studio, PowerDesigner, IBM Data Architect, or similar
Industry Leading BI tools - e.g., Microsoft Power BI, Tableau, Qlik, Sisense, Looker, or similar
General:
Must be currently authorized to work in the US on a full-time basis. Sagence does not provide sponsorship for work visas
3+ years of professional experience working in a related role
Strong strategic business acumen and a passion for solving problems with data-driven solutions
Client centric focus with strong relationship management skills and the ability to influence business decisions
Intellectually curious and independently resourceful with the ability to prioritize and execute in a fast-paced and dynamic environment
Willingness to travel to client sites as needed
Chicago or New York area candidates preferred, but will consider candidates in other parts of U.S.",4.6,"Sagence
4.6","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
226,Data Scientist,-1,"MUST BE A U.S. CITIZEN WITH AN ACTIVE TS/SCI-SSBI SECURITY CLEARANCE *
Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· Four (4) years experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

\*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS\*

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Data Analytics: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
CompTIA Security+ (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.9,"B E A T LLC
4.9","San Antonio, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
227,Contract Data Analyst,"$54k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.1,"Amyx, Inc.
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
228,Adecco Group - Data Engineer,-1,"Overview

Grow your career with The Adecco Group, the world's leading provider of recruiting and career services.

SUMMARY:

The Data Engineer is responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. Experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler that optimizes data systems and building them from the ground up. Supports our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects.

Responsibilities

ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:

Creates and maintains optimal data pipeline architecture.
Assembles large, complex data sets that meet functional and non-functional business requirements.
Implements internal process improvements, automates manual processes, optimizes data delivery and re-designs infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Operates infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and relevant Azure technologies like Data Factory, Databricks, and similar.
Implement analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into customer acquisition, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics.
Works with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Keeps our data separated and secure across national boundaries through multiple data centers and regions.
Builds data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader.
Works with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Participating in special projects and performs other duties as assigned.

Qualifications

MINIMUM EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or a related field plus two (2) years minimum experience in a Data Engineering or similar business intelligence, data analytics or supply chain management role required.
MBA or Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or a related field in lieu of experience accepted.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES REQUIREMENTS:

Working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Working knowledge of Scala, Python or R.
Knowledge of building and optimizing data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Ability to perform root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with unstructured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable data stores.
Strong project management and organizational skills.
Ability to support and work with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment.

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Adecco Group North America, through an impressive portfolio of staffing industry leading brands including Accounting Principals, Adecco General Staffing, Adia, Ajilon, Entegee, Lee Hecht Harrison, Modis, Paladin, Parker+Lynch, Pontoon, Special Counsel and Soliant is the world's leading provider of Human Resources solutions.

We are the workforce experts delivering staffing and career service solutions to organizations and individuals across all industries. Collectively we harness the power of some of the greatest talent in the world. That talent and expertise allows us to do business globally and act locally with deep knowledge in niche areas.

Every day, we have more than 100,000 associates on assignment, 30,000 colleagues working internally to support more than 10,000 clients in the United States and Canada. Ensuring our business units are prepared to deliver outstanding service to our associates and clients, the Adecco Group North America team provides a strong infrastructure through our corporate and shared services teams.

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled

The Company will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",3.4,"Adecco
3.4","Jacksonville, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
229,"Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science","$86k-$143k
(Glassdoor Est.)","18-Sep-2020

Job ID
303124BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

The Oncology Data Science (OncDS) group in NIBR brings together projects spanning the entire clinical development pipeline, across a wide and unique range of novel therapeutics (e.g.: targeted and immunotherapies, radioligands, cell and gene therapies). OncDS:
•Oversees NGS data generation and performs analysis for thousands of oncology clinical samples, informing drug discovery and development
•Integrates internal and external data across distinct clinical trials to produce recognized translational impact
•Applies cutting-edge technologies and analytic approaches to discover and characterize the molecular mechanisms of therapeutic response in individual cancer patients

Description:
We are seeking a data scientist who will advance the translation of multi-dimensional molecular data (e.g. NGS) to biomarker discovery in clinical trials. The successful candidate will nurture close collaborations with oncology clinical trial teams, interpret candidate biomarkers and contribute to large-scale meta-analyses across trials and indications. Specific job responsibilities include:
•Collaboration on the design and execution of molecular biomarker profiling studies in oncology clinical trials
•Exploration of molecular data in the context of clinical variables to discover biomarkers of response/resistance to therapy
•Communication of key findings to trial teams and diverse group of scientists
•Application of biostatistics and machine learning methods across datasets from multiple clinical trials to gain actionable biological insights
•Application and development of computational methods for analyses of longitudinal biomarker and clinical data to characterize patients’ response to treatment
•Development of innovative analytic approaches to integrate and visualize complex clinical datasets
•Interaction with clinicians, project managers, data engineers, and other scientists to facilitate progression of projects across milestones

Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist, Oncology Data Science",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
230,Data Engineer - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

As a cloud native company, 2nd Watch has walked alongside our clients for over a decade helping them migrate to the cloud, accelerate application development, and deliver on their companys strategic goals through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our services deliver cloud native capabilities through strategic consulting, modernization services, and specialized technology practices focused on maximizing the value of public cloud through:
Business Transformation
Cloud Advisory
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
With a client NPS of 85, our approach has been successful for some of the worlds leading brands and is tested, trusted, and proven to accelerate your cloud adoption.

2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Data Cloud Engineer :

The ideal candidate is someone who

· Operates with the highest levels of integrity

· Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges

· Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner

· Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better

· Has a passion for technology

Expertise you bring:
Owning the technical engagement and ultimate success around specific implementation projects.
Developing a deep expertise in enterprise cloud technologies and services.
Being subject matter expert and taking on a consultative role as it pertains to cloud adoption.
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges
Other duties as assigned
Specialized Knowledge & Skills Requirements
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining cloud-native data lakes
Demonstrated experience providing customer-driven solutions, support or service.
In-depth knowledge of SQL or NoSQL and experience using a variety of data stores (e.g. RDBMS, analytic database, scalable document stores)
Extensive hands-on Python programming experience, with an emphasis towards building ETL workflows and data-driven solutions.
Able to employ design patterns and generalize code to address common use cases. Capable of authoring robust, high quality, reusable code and contributing to the divisions inventory of libraries.
Expertise in big data batch computing tools (e.g. Hadoop or Spark), with demonstrated experience developing distributed data processing solutions.
Applied knowledge of cloud computing (AWS, GCP, Azure).
Familiarity with open source machine learning toolkits, such as sklearn, Keras, or TensorFlow.
Applied knowledge of data modeling principles (e.g. dimensional modeling and star schemas).
Understanding of relational database internals
Experience using tools for infrastructure-as-code (e.g. Docker, CloudFormation, Terraform, etc.)
Experience with software engineering tools and workflows (i.e. Jenkins, CI/CD, git).
Education and Licenses
Bachelors degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
231,Epitaxy Scientist,"$36k-$88k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Responsibilities
Develop, optimize and characterize III-nitride LED epi structures
Improve epi material quality and LED performance
Analyze growth and characterization data and correlate to device performance
Lead epi development projects to improve epi and chip yield
Summarize R&D results and prepare reports
Transfer new developments to production
Make recommendations for new/improved characterization techniques to solve material and device issues
Make suggestions for MOCVD hardware improvements
Other duties as assigned
Minimum Requirements
PhD/MS in Material Science, Electrical Engineering or other related science or engineering discipline
PhD with 2+ years or MS with 5+ years of hands-on experience with MOCVD nitride epitaxy and material characterization techniques (XRD, AFM, SEM, TEM, PL, etc.)
Strong background in semiconductor material science and epitaxial growth
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Skill Requirements
Strong self initiative and motivation
Must be organized, detailed, and thorough
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Ability to summarize data and prepare reports
EEO Statement

Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be provided equal consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, genetic information, military status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or protected veteran status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
SETi
Company's Facebook page:
SETi
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc
3.1","Columbia, SC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
232,Automated Cell Based Assay Scientist,-1,"Currently, Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC is searching for candidates for one long term, permanent position in Redwood City CA.
Job Responsibilities*
· Completion of routine cell cultures, along with performing the cell-based screening assays

· Collecting and providing assay data QC/QA, and uploading the assay data.
Job Requirements: *
· BS in Biology or a related field with at least 2 years of experience or MS with 0-1 years of experience in cell culture and cell-based assays.

· Should be highly detail-oriented and flexible, with proficiency in general computer skills, and Microsoft Office suite, as well as a high accountability and ownership for projects.

· Must be self-motivating, have excellent interpersonal and communication skills, be able to multi-task, be highly organized, have the ability to work in a multi-functional team setting, and adhere to specific timelines and deadlines.

· Ability and desire to master new skills, methods and technologies in a technology-enabled environment are very important.

· Ability to work well with all team members, have a positive customer service focus, and be reliable is essential for the position.

· Ability to document work in notebook, summarize observations, trouble-shoot, and present work in small group setting required.

· Job location is Redwood City, California

Spectrix offers flexible schedules, competitive salaries and a committed work environment; the company provides automatic benefits of life insurance, short and long term disabilities. Optional benefits include health, dental, and a retirement savings plan. Spectrix is not a placement agency. Spectrix is participating in the E-Verify program of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (phone number: 888-897-7781, and website: www.dhs.gov/E-Verify). 20200521
Job Type: Full-time*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
cell culture: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC
4.1","Redwood City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Contract,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
233,Data Scientist,"$94k-$154k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tinder brings people together. With tens of millions of users and a presence in every country on earth, our reach is expansive and rapidly growing. Tinder’s Analytics Team is looking for a Data Scientist with expertise in Analytics.

Our analytics team takes ownership of the decisions being made from our data – we develop a deep understanding of both the business and its data and establish close working relationships with all teams - including Product, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance – so that we can provide recommendations and make proposals regarding prioritization of initiatives, product launches, A/B tests, and company performance.

As a data scientist in this role, you will be a partner to the Analytics team, providing support for A/B test design and analysis as well as data-driven insights through ad-hoc analyses, presentations, and automated reports and dashboards. This role will require extensive experience with SQL, data wrangling, statistics, and A/B testing as well as the ability to work in cross-functional teams to drive actionable insights. Experience with user growth and acquisition across consumer products is a plus.

Responsibilities:

Master and own the analytical understanding of customer behavior and business performance
Build models to better understand the value and churn behavior of our users
Find the “story” in the data and communicate insights and opportunities with executive and other internal teams
Perform ongoing ad-hoc analyses to evaluate the efficiency of our marketing spend, building reporting infrastructure, and assisting in making budgeting recommendations to optimize growth
Integrate captured event data with other sources of customer data, such as surveys, ad publishers and app store data
Support reporting and business intelligence needs of the entire Marketing team

Skills Required:

3+ years of relevant experience
Ability to think objectively and interpret meaningful themes from quantitative and qualitative data
Ability to build constructive and effective relationships with a broad and diverse group of business partners
Ability to execute on complex analytics projects where you have to determine salient questions in a complex ecosystem and present action-oriented conclusions
Proficiency with SQL required
Scripting skills, preferably in Python. Strong Python/NumPy/PANDAS skills a plus
Knowledge of statistics, specifically experimental design and analysis
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Familiarity with common KPIs, metrics, and growth experiments
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:

· The hustle of a startup with the impact of a global business
· Tremendous opportunity to seek some of the industry’s most exciting problems
· Working with an outstanding team of creative, fun and highly motivated people
· Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, and 401(k) match

At Tinder, we don’t just accept difference — we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products, and our community. Tinder is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.8,"Tinder
3.8","Los Angeles, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
234,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
235,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
236,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
237,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
238,Data Scientist,"$90k-$146k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Engineering at Postmates

We're building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We're tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO


Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

As a Data Scientist, you'll use your full toolkit - statistical modeling, machine learning, data mining, data visualization, and software engineering - to develop data products and models that are used by millions of users and power the growth of our business. You will collaborate with a strong team of engineers, product managers and data analysts in defining the frontier of data products and models in the three-sided marketplace. Data scientists will work on how to formulate a model from a real business problem, determine evaluation metrics, evaluate different modeling approaches, conduct data analysis, and build features and algorithms for the various challenging problems at Postmates.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's/Master's degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
A deep theoretical understanding of modern machine learning algorithms, statistical models, or optimization
Extensive experience with data tools, Python (Pandas, Scipy, Numpy, Scikit-Learn, etc), R, SAS, SQL, etc and strong skills in data analysis, data visualization, and feature engineering
Ability to own your modeling work from model development all the way to production deployment and beyond with minimal help from engineers
Strong communication skills; Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn't be a problem for you
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Google BigQuery, and BigTable
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn",3.5,"Postmates
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
239,iFit Content Data Analyst,"$33k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.1,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.1","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
240,Clinical Research Molecular Scientist,-1,"ABSS Solutions, Inc. (ASI), is seeking a full-time Clinical Research Molecular Scientist to join our team in providing Medical Research support at Wright Patterson AFB. ASI administers a comprehensive research and development contract providing an array of research projects for customers across the DoD space. Our research teams work with educational institutions and other third party organizations to maximize readiness, and resilience for the men and women of our armed forces..

Summary:

Collaborates with enterprise-wide Principle Investigators, in order to develop research protocols that includes human subject research and associated IRB regulatory compliance approvals for the various pilot evaluations to also include animal subjects/ IACUC approvals.

Job Roles and Responsibilities:

Be experienced and qualified to do research testing in the field of Molecular Laboratory Science to include but not limited to nucleic acid extraction and quantification, electrophoresis, PCR, , Microarray, and Sequencing. Familiarity with various Sequencing techniques to include Pyro- Sequencing, Sanger Sequencing and Next Generation Sequencing (NGS). Experience with multiple library preparation techniques for transcriptome, exome and whole genome NGS.
Develop methods related to their particular field of expertise to support research protocols approved by regulatory oversight committees. Methods must be developed to meet researchers need and be in compliance with Good Laboratory Practice Guidelines. Be able to develop test methods and implement testing independently.
Perform manual and automated testing on multiple body fluids from human research subjects and various species of animal subjects as described in approved research protocols.
Perform all required setup and quality control and quality assurance processes required for equipment used in analyzing specimens for research purposes. Meet all accreditation requirements for Good Laboratory Practices in using manual and automated testing equipment.
Analyze the results of tests and experiments to ensure conformity to specifications, using special mechanical and electrical devices.
Review results of tests and quality control materials to ensure that testing processes were in control and all data produced is accurate and precise.
Analyze and record test data to issue reports that use charts, graphs and narratives.
Enter data into various computer systems to meet research protocol requirements. Follow established procedures in validating and verifying data entered in to computer systems.
Use standard laboratory techniques and follow operating instructions in preparing materials for test procedures (i.e., standards, calibrators, solutions, and reagents). Use standard laboratory procedures to prepare specimens for molecular, chemical or toxicological analysis.
Process and ship all samples according to regulations and protocol requirements.
Document all correspondence and communication pertinent to the research.
Assist in the preparation and analysis of laboratory experiments, as requested.
Maintain and update files of all applicable regulatory documentation for IACUC or IRB (including protocols, approvals, amendments, modifications, etc.) as well as any communications with the sponsor or any other Federal or regulatory office (including prior approvals, change in scope, etc.).
Manage study documentation to include accurate and timely filing.
Adheres to Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA), International Air Transport Association (IATA), Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) and infection control procedures.
Assist in writing method validations, operating procedures, presentations, and publications using provided methodologies and formats.
Collect and process specimens from research subjects for testing purposes. All specimens must be collected, processed and handled as described in approved research protocols.
Assists the PI to refine the specific laboratory requirements to meet the aims, research questions, hypotheses, and/or objectives of the studies.
Conducts laboratory procedures and testing in accordance with the approved protocol. Performs appropriate study specific procedures as outlined in the protocol. Orders study materials,
equipment, and/or supplies as specified in the research protocol and in accordance with Clinical Research Division (CRD) policies.
Maintains all protocol binder to include all approved protocols and amendments and all data obtained from laboratory procedures.
Abstracts required research data elements from paper or electronic systems or other existing documents, clinical computer databases such as the AHLTA, CHCS or JPTA, and/or other electronic diagnostic reports in accordance with the research protocol and enter these data into spreadsheets, databases, and/or statistic software as required.
Delivers and receives specimens to internal laboratory and/or ship specimens to a referral laboratory as specified by the protocol.
Works with the statistician to clean and prepare data sets for analyses.
Collects, sorts, files, and maintains all paper and electronic documents related to the protocol.
Evaluates proposed amendments of the study to identify any changes in laboratory testing requirements as approved by the IRB, Institutional IACUC.
Maintains complete and accurate drug and equipment accountability at all times for the study.
Identifies delays and other shortcomings in meeting objective and develops a contingency plan as required.
Assists the PIs to write the final report and submit it to the IRB, IACUC, and study sponsor.
Manages all aspects of laboratory experiments while in constant communication with the PIs and CRD leadership.
Actively seeks to learn new laboratory techniques to support new protocol requirements. Manages all laboratory testing requirements to support translational and clinical research projects in concert with the PI.
Arranges learning schedules for Graduate Medical Education (GME) personnel working in the clinical and translational research programs.

Minimum Qualification and Experience:

Master’s Degree in Molecular Biology or science-related degree with 2+ years’ experience or minimum of Bachelor’s Degree in Molecular Biology with 5 years of recent experience in a molecular biology laboratory.
Shall have at least 5 years of experience in advanced Molecular Laboratory procedures and experience research laboratory procedures including but not limited to research specimens from various species, experience using basic and advance laboratory instrumentation, using various testing techniques to determine biological activity, metabolic changes, or biology products, experience in the collection and processing of various biological samples for frozen long term storage and the procedures to recover samples from long term storage for analysis.
Experience or knowledge in performing translational biomedical research, and working in a laboratory performing various techniques to include but not limited to: flow Cytometry, research involving the use of specimens, PCR/rtPCR testing, expertise in the use and enzyme immunoassay testing assays, use of laboratory equipment including imaging systems, chemistry equipment (i.e., HPLC, GS-MS, etc.), hematology and clinical chemistry analyzers, coagulation testing, experience in cell culture techniques, and extensive experience in collecting processing and archiving specimens for use in translational biomedical research.
Must have and maintain a current Basic Life Support (BLS) certification.",2.5,"1st American Systems and Services
2.5","Dayton, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
241,"Senior Scientist, Solid-State Electrolyte",-1,"Senior Scientist – Material Development (Solid-State Electrolyte)*
About Us*
SolidEnergy Systems is a Li-Metal Battery technology company. We develop the world’s lightest rechargeable cells for specialized aerospace, consumer electronics, and electric vehicles. We also supply core materials include anode and electrolyte and cell assembly knowhow to large Li-ion cell manufacturers for high volume manufacturing.

Since our humble beginning in 2012, out of MIT, we have raised more than $80 Million from strategic and financial investors. Based in Woburn, MA, we also have operations in Shanghai and Singapore.

For more info, please visit our website: _www.solidenergysystems.com_
Position Scope*
SolidEnergy Systems has an opening for a Solid-State Electrolyte Scientist, who is passionate about mobile energy storage, to lead solid-state electrolytes and is focused on developing solid-state batteries.

The successful candidate is committed and dedicated, responsible, focused, detail-oriented, able to adjust in a fast-paced working environment, collaborate well with other staff members with a shared vision, and demonstrate excellent organizational communication skills.

This position will be based in our Woburn, MA location.
Responsibilities*
Design and optimize solid-state electrolytes for lithium metal rechargeable battery
Improve solid-state battery performance
DOE with various materials and demonstrate technology progress
Study material scale-up and application
Characterize the material properties and failure analysis
Ability to work independently in experimental design to resolve technical issues.
Be able to work in a team environment and provide expertise to the team effort.
Specific skills/abilities*
An ability to communicate new concepts and draw insight from discussions with coworkers;
Expertise and hands-on experience in high purity chemicals and impacts on device performance and manufacturing;
Knowledge of common lithium-ion anode and electrolyte systems; including common lithium salt, solvents, and additives, and their role
Ability to onboard and integrate existing in-house knowledge with new discoveries and challenges being tackled in developing electrolyte materials for high energy rechargeable lithium metal cells;
Ability to identify and execute testing metrics to shorten the cycle of learning;
A technical leader with the ability to positively influence peers and bring the team together;
Track record of intellectual property creation;
Has worked with moisture sensitive materials in a glovebox or dry room.
Nice to have: Proficiency in cell assembly, cell test, and data analysis
Requirements*
Doctorate in chemistry or materials science with 2+ years of industrial/academic (postgraduate) experience with solid-state electrolyte materials.
Knowledge of lithium-ion battery manufacture, characterization, and failure analysis is highly desired
Familiarity and proficiency with advanced analytical techniques
Hands-on experience on various solid-state electrolyte materials and integration is strongly preferred.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $200,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Relocation Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
Solid State Electrolyte: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Company's website:
www.solidenergysystems.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"SolidEnergy Systems
4.1","Woburn, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
242,Staff/Lead Data Engineer,"$80k-$144k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2300 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

As a Staff Engineer with Freedom Financial Network in its Tempe, AZ or San Mateo, CA office, you will contribute directly to the success of the business and have a meaningful impact on our customers’ lives.

We are looking for seasoned engineers to bring new and innovative ideas and tackle challenges across the full-stack. We believe in building teams that are passionate about solving complex problems and ready to grow and evolve alongside our expanding business and technology footprint.

THE ROLE:

Lead product requirements and advanced analytics requirements gathering efforts, interfacing with Data Engineering, Data Scientists, Analytics, and stakeholder teams •
Work with analytics, data science, and wider engineering teams to help with automating data analysis and visualization needs, advise on transformation processes to populate data models, and explore ways to design and develop data infrastructure
Use technology to solve business problems and drive positive outcomes
Build a scalable technology platform to support a growing business
Deliver high-quality code to production, consistently
Integration with various third-party systems
Play a key role in building out a large scale distributed and event based Data Platform that serves as an underpinning for all of Freedom’s businesses and products

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

10 years’ experience building large scale, real-time distributed systems with solid coding, problem-solving, and design skills
Experience working in highly collaborative teams
Ability to demonstrate a team-first attitude towards software development
Hands on Experience with Python, Java, SQL
Experience working with various data stores: SQL, NoSQL, and/or key-value store
Mature engineering practices (CI/CD, testing, secure coding, etc)
Experience with, or willingness to learn:
Event-driven architecture and messaging frameworks (Pub/Sub, Kafka, and/or RabbitMQ)
Cloud infrastructure (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, and/or Azure)

EDUCATION:

Bachelor’s in Computer Science or related field, or relevant experience in software development

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace a healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted the Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
243,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst,"$50k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Blending customer advisory, customer support, and customer experience, Carousel’s supercharged Customer Success Obsessed mission goes beyond any one IT function. Rather, it’s a mindset, a mantra, and a company-wide drive to bring extreme technology value to Carousel customers—so they can bring value to theirs.
With deep expertise across a vast portfolio of technologies, including security, unified communications and collaboration, data center, networking, managed services, and cloud solutions, Carousel can design, implement, and support solutions tailored to meet the unique needs of each customer. By offering professional and managed services with flexible deployments in the cloud, Carousel ensures customers achieve agility and use technologies in the way most effective for their business.
A legion of 1,300, the Carousel team has been committed to the art of customer success for its more than 6,000 highly satisfied customers since 1992. The company has been recognized by multiple publications and industry consortiums as a top technology integrator and managed services and cloud solution provider—including the Inc. 500/5000, Healthcare Informatics 100, and CRN MSP Elite 150. Headquartered in Exeter, RI, the company has offices across the United States and internationally—with three Network Operations Centers. To learn more, visit CarouselIndustries.com.

Position Summary:
The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for leveraging large quantities data to assist executives, business partners, and operations teams to make data-driven decisions. This position will focus largely on sales operations data defining data relationships (inclusive of off-system spreadsheets), data mining and data modeling which will be the basis for actionable intelligence dashboards and reports. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will utilize their experience to explore data, applying statistical techniques, and designing sales dashboards and reports that provide value to the company and its operational leaders. This role will collaborate with all Business Systems Teams and business subject matter experts to deploy a robust reporting universe that is streamlined and transparent. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will report to the Vice President of Business Intelligence and join a highly agile cross-functional team that leads some of the most critical projects for the Business Intelligence department and Carousel Industries as an organization.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Commitment to the Sales Organization to develop and deliver analytical reports that support and enable actionable intelligence to achieve strategic and operational goals.
Provide descriptive data analysis, and creative problem-solving using SQL programming language
Lead projects regarding data exploration, relationship management and data-driven story telling
Ability to create practical, actionable plans that are coherent and understood by stakeholders
Partner with Business Systems teams, business leaders, and functional groups to provide actionable intelligence regarding operational effectiveness and revenue growth
Gather, manipulate, and explore large datasets to test hypotheses and extract useful insights
Create and manage reporting, data narratives, and analytics deliverables for the CI Governance board and committee
Build innovative data models, reports and dashboards
Troubleshoot data conflicts and inconsistencies through data mining and collaboration with the business teams
Evaluate and develop data monitoring reports to provide further insight into process and change management
Develop roadmaps with proposed solutions from an end-to-end perspective
Partner with clients to promote evidence-based decision-making and devise action plans that influence behavior changes
Investigate and create trend analysis models to promote operational effectiveness

Qualifications:
B.S. in a quantitative field required.
Prior experience and expertise with Salesforce strongly desired.
Experience in financial and/or sales driven data modeling is a plus.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI and SNOWFLAKE cloud data warehouse preferred.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Demonstrated advanced analytical, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to deliver and support a quality service experience.
Demonstrated experience with industry report writers such as Einstein Analytics, Business Objects, Power BI, SSRS, Tableau or other BI reporting solutions.
Prior experience with CRM, ITSM and ERP reporting preferred.
Experience with writing/updating (SQL) queries.
Strong problem-solving skills.Superior verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to organize and prioritize concurrent projects.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively.
Create, maintain, and optimize reports, including SQL statements, views, functions, and stored procedures.
Effectively gather requirements and design new reports, troubleshoot, research, and correction of reports and database objects requiring review.
Accurately estimate effort for requested custom reports.",3.1,"Carousel Industries
3.1","Exeter, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
244,Data Scientist,"$65k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Embark on a career putting innovative, reliable, and agile products and ideas into orbit, and beyond. Northrop Grumman has opportunities waiting for you that play a vital role in human space exploration, national defense, and scientific discovery, supporting multiple programs across the universe. With us, you'll discover a culture of curiosity and collaboration that will have you Defining Possible from the day you start. Our space systems connect and protect millions of people on earth every day, now and for the future. Explore your future and launch your career today.

Northrop Grumman Space Systems is seeking a Data Scientist This position will be located at Hill AFB, UT and will support the Ground Subsystems Support Contract (GSSC) program.

The successful applicant will:
Develop and implement artificial intelligence and machine learning models to solve complex data problems
Interpret large amounts of data using advanced visualization techniques and tools
Merge and transform big datasets to ensure data integrity and usability
Develop a process to maintain quality and performance of statistical models and quickly identify enhancements opportunities
Communicate advanced concepts and information in an understandable manner for audiences of varying levels of competency
Maintain an up-to-date knowledge of technology trends
Properly document code, artifact description, implementation, and use cases
Be an eager and fast learner
Work on a fast pasted collaborative team in an agile environment
As a full-time employee of Northrop Grumman Space Systems, you are eligible for our robust benefits package including:
Medical, Dental & Vision coverage
401k
Educational Assistance
Life Insurance
Employee Assistance Programs & Work/Life Solutions
Paid Time Off
Health & Wellness Resources
Employee Discounts
This position's standard work schedule is a 9/80. The 9/80 schedule allows employees who work a nine-hour day Monday through Thursday to take every other Friday off.

UTSpace

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of a Bachelor of Science in Data Science, Computer Science, Physics, Statistics, Mathematics, or related quantitative field
Minimum 2 years of relevant experience with a bachelor's degree; or 0 years with a Master's
Demonstrated experience with Programming in Python, R, or Node.js
Demonstrated experience manipulating dataframes through SQL, pandas, or tidyverse
U.S. Citizenship and the ability to obtain a Secret Security Clearance
Preferred Qualifications:
Active Secret Security Clearance or higher
Familiarity with any of the following: Tensorflow, Theano, Keras, PyTorch, NLTK, PyStan, PyMC3, Rstan, ElasticSearch, PyCuda
Familiarity with Graph, NoSQL, Hadoop, SMACK, or Neo4J/OWL
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",3.8,"Northrop Grumman
3.8","Hill AFB, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
245,Senior Data Scientist,"$71k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Responsibilities:

·- End-to-End development of computer vision
model for performing cell counting

·- Working knowledge of different loss
functions, ways of regularization, different architecture design

·- Familiarity with containerizing the code in
a manner that is suitable for deployment

· - Utilise a scientific and pragmatic approach
to all projects

· - Compare results from various methodologies
and recommend best model/approaches

· - Write robust code that can be deployed to
production

· - Work with interdisciplinary product teams
to design, develop, and optimize the solution for the end-user

· - Communicate technical subject matter
clearly and concisely to audiences of various backgrounds

Requirements:

8+
hands-on experience in Data Science activities 5+
hands-on experience in NLP,NLG and Computer Vision 5+
years of Experience or certification in Cloud-based Architectures, AWS Experience
in architecting, designing and developing highly scalable distributed
data processing systems and Data Warehouse. Working
experience in one or more modern Object-Oriented Programming languages
(Java, Scala, Python) Experience
with executing projects in Agile environments Analyze
data, identifying gaps, issues, patterns and trends Analyze
application dependencies and conduct impact assessment of changes Strong
understanding of database design concepts - Transactional / Data mart /
Data warehouse etc.

You must be legally authorized to work in the
United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in
the future.

Behavorial Attributes

Extremely
good interpersonal skills with working with cross functional teams
located across geographies
Good
interpersonal and client-handling skills with the ability to manage
expectations and explain technical detail.
Ability
to multitask, prioritizes tasks, and quickly adjusts in a rapidly
changing environment.
Ability
to work effectively with geographically dispersed team.
Ability
to balance complex information with accuracy and attention to detail.
A
disciplined, investigative and inquisitive mind; together with creative
abilities.
Excellent
conflict management and negotiation skills
Eager
to learn and continuously develop personal and technical capabilities.
High
level of dedication, initiative, vision and enthusiasm

#LI-MA1 #ind123

Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Oct 07 2020

About Cognizant Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @USJobsCognizant.

Cognizant is recognized as a Military Friendly Employer and is a coalition member of the Veteran Jobs Mission. Our Cognizant Veterans Network assists Veterans in building and growing a career at Cognizant that allows them to leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence instilled in them through participation in military service.
Cognizant is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you have a disability that requires a reasonable accommodation to search for a job opening or submit an application, please email CareersNA2@cognizant.com with your request and contact information.",3.7,"Cognizant Technology Solutions
3.7","Collegeville, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
246,AI/ML Data Scientist,-1,"Now Hiring an AI/ML Data Scientist

As an AI/ML Data Scientist, you will be applying new and innovative methods to address some of our most important intelligence problems. This is a remote position.
Knowledge and experience in designing and implanting AI apps and agents that use the Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services, Azure Bot Service, Azure Cognitive Search, and data storage options
Analyzing requirements for AI solutions
Experience with NoSQL databases
Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery (computer vision, object detection)
Experience in understanding of programming language such as Python
Ability to work autonomously and collaboratively as part of a team to both teach and learn every day
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Profile of Success
5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning
Desirable Skills
Experience with NoSQL databases
Ability to provide subject matter guidance
Ability to Manager personal project priorities and deliverables
About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:
Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals
Our Core Values
Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community
AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.4,"Applied Information Sciences
4.4",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
247,Data Engineer,"$53k-$103k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 2 years of relevant experience; or a Master's degree.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

A TS/SCI security clearance with the ability to obtain a Polygraph is required at time of hire. Candidates must be able to obtain the Polygraph within a reasonable amount of time from date of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Developing mission-critical systems that help keep people safe is what we do. At General Dynamics Mission Systems, you’ll be part of the team that helps heroes make a true impact. The work we do is important. The challenges we face are career-defining. The opportunity we can offer is one-of-a-kind.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As a Data Engineer, you’ll lead model and simulation activities as you participate in requirements analysis and management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, trade studies, systems integration and test (verification). It’s your chance to step up to the challenge and prove you’re ready to lead the world.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

We are seeking a Data Engineer to support the Insider Threat mission. Data Engineers work with various security system data owners to automate data integration and collection strategies. Work closely with the data science team to ensure data cleanliness and accuracy.

Support data science team by designing, developing and implementing scalable ETL process for disparate datasets into a Hadoop infrastructure
Design, develop, implement and maintain data ingestion process from various disparate datasets using StreamSets (experience with StreamSets not mandatory)
Develop processes to identify data drift and malformed records
Develop technical documentation and standard operating procedures
Leads technical tasks for small teams or projects

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Working knowledge of entity resolution systems
Experience with messages systems like Kafka
Experience with NoSQL and/or graph databases like MongoDB or ArangoDB
Any of the following databases: SQL, MongoDB, Oracle, Postgres
Working experience with ETL processing
Working experience with data workflow products like StreamSets or NiFi
Working experience with Python RESTful API services, JDBC
Experience with Hadoop and Hive/Impala
Experience with Cloudera Data Science Workbench is a plus
Understanding of pySpark Leadership experience
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Excellent use and understanding of data engineering concepts, principles, and theories

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 13,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.7,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.7","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
248,Data Analyst,"$60k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
249,Data Scientist - Clearance Required,"$76k-$126k
(Glassdoor Est.)","TUVA, an Akima Company, provides turnkey solutions that offer better systems, tools, and methods to further your goals, reduce costs, and streamline operations. From requirements analysis, design, and implementation to operations and training TUVA’s personnel are well-versed in best practices across Enterprise IT, Mission Support Services, and Specialized Technologies. Our personnel enjoy competitive benefits packages and challenging roles in work environments committed to innovation, diversity and opportunity for career growth. As an Alaska Native Corporation (ANC), 100% of our company’s profits go back to our 14,300 Iñupiat shareholders that have resided near and above the Arctic Circle for more than 10,000 years. Our business helps support their way of life and contributes to the survival of a culture that has thrived in a challenging environment.

Responsibilities:

Tuva is seeking an experienced Data Scientist with specific functional knowledge to work with a key customer in the Intel space.

Structure and analyze data using statistical techniques and provide detailed reporting.

Extract, clean and manipulate data from multiple sources and systems.

Develop analytical approaches to answering intelligence questions and produce. actionable intelligence products by developing complex queries, organizing data in large databases, and linking information.

Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets and provide detailed reporting of findings.

Minimum Qualifications:

BS Degree (in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Information Management or Computer Science Preferred).

Top Secret Clearance.

Proven working experience of Data Analysis, Database Administration and Database Development.

Technical expertise regarding data models, database design and development, data mining and segmentation techniques.

Experience with Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) data input.

Familiar with data visualization products (Tableau, Gephi, ggplot).

Ability to create ad hoc queries and reports using Transact SQL

Strong knowledge and experience with reporting packages.

Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (Excel, SAS, etc).

Strong analytical skills with the ability to organize, analyze, and convey information through key analytical processes.

Excellent communicator with the ability to clearly articulate findings verbally and in writing.

Capable of evaluating and recommending new technologies and software in support of ongoing operations.

It is important for the selected candidate to be familiar with/lightly skilled in the following computer languages and databases:

My SQL, Oracle JavaScript, XML, C++, R, Virtual Studio, Perl, VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access and Excel.

The selected candidate will provide detailed analysis and advice to both Managers and Intelligent Analysts.

The duties and responsibilities listed in this job description generally cover the nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this position. This is not intended to be a complete list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Subject to the terms of an applicable collective bargaining agreement, the company management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as may be necessary. We wish to thank all applicants for their interest and effort in applying for the position; however, only candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.

We are an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will receive consideration for employment, without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, gender or gender-identity, age, marital status, sexual orientation, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or parental status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

We are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and/or mental disabilities. If you have a physical and/or mental disability and are interested in applying for employment and need special accommodations to use our website to apply for a position please contact, Recruiting Services at job-assist@akima.com or 571-353-7053. Reasonable accommodation requests are considered on a case-by-case basis.

The dedicated email and telephonic options above are reserved only for individuals with disabilities needing accessibility assistance to apply to an open position using our website.

Please do not use the dedicated email or phone number above to inquire on the status of your job application.

In order for our company to stay compliant with government regulations, please apply on line. Please DO NOT email resumes or call in lieu of applying online unless you have a physical and/or mental disability and need assistance with the online application.",3.3,"Akima, LLC
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
250,AWS Data Engineer,-1,"AWS Data Engineer Northern, VA

AWS Data Engineer


Minimum Requirements
Active SECRET clearance preferred; Clearable US Citizen with NAIC (National background check) may also apply
5 years Data Engineering experience AND a BA Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Sciences, or equivalent; 4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Working knowledge of agile software development, DevSecOps, and AWS native solutions including API Gateway, S3, and Lambda is required.
Preferred Experience
Knowledge of several of the following areas is desirable: DevSecOps, Active Server Pages, JavaScript, Python, HTML, and AWS native applications including S3, WAF, API Gateway, Lambda, CloudFront, DynamoDB, Transcribe, Athena, Simple Queue Service, QuikSight, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, KMS, and Cognito.
Job Duties
Provide development support to the Scrum Master in an agile software development environment in AWS.
Works as a key member of an AWS native solution software development team and works to identify risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments.
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details
Location – Arlington, Virginia
Travel Required – N/A
If travel is required, how much? 0%
Work Schedule (Shift etc.): Day Shift
Authorization to work in US required
8570 Requirements: N/A
NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Tagged as: AWS Data Engineer",4.4,"NuWave Solutions
4.4",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
251,Senior Data Scientist,"$129k-$204k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are looking for a Data Scientist who will be responsible for shaping our company’s data strategy innovating the $85B digital and linear television advertising market. You are passionate about all things data and tech, and have extensive knowledge of the digital space. You are accomplished in the areas of creating new analysis and deriving business-changing insights and you are ready to support the strategic objectives of a highly cross-functional organization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Your work will have an outsized impact on tools we’re building, forecasting, planning, allocation, and audience behavior prediction
Work with Pb-scale data sets representing the total US video and TV audiences
You will build new, and support scaling out existing models in support of audience segmentation
You will be working with the data-engineering team to product ML pipelines and coordinating data models with other engineering teams
Building Data Models and managing machine learning pipelines
QUALIFICATIONS:
Managing ML pipelines with tools such as Python, Julia, and Apache Spark
SQL fluency and an understanding of relational data models
Comfortable in the Linux environment
A master of all trades mentality and an ability to embrace new challenges regularly
Eager and energized to work with some of the latest open source technologies
Able to work on-site in Los Angeles, CA
PhD in Data Science, Physics, Mathematics or other scientific field
PERKS:
Unlimited paid time off each year
Annual vacation stipend
Onsite gym, fitness classes and personal trainer
Casual dress code
Kitchen stocked with healthy snack snacks
Health, dental and vision benefits
Parental leave
Epic growth
ABOUT

At VideoAmp, we believe in challenging advertising paradigms to maximize value for clients. We do this by enabling companies to execute on business outcomes across their media investment instead of more traditional media metrics. VideoAmp is the software and data solutions company powering the convergence of the linear TV and digital video advertising. Our solutions connect linear TV viewership with addressable data assets to benefit the marketing and media industries. This enable marketers and content owners to holistically plan, transact, and measure deduplicated audiences across digital video, OTT, connected and linear TV advertising.

Come and join us!",3.5,"VideoAmp
3.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
252,Data Analyst,"$47k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","This position is responsible for analyzing, reporting and maintaining information within iCare’s enterprise data warehouse and associated databases based on business unit priorities. Additionally, this position may be responsible for assisting with system configuration and support.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:

Conducts business analysis, data modeling, logical and physical database design, database optimization, load strategy design and implementation, security and change management.
Create, manage and maintain reports using standard reporting technologies.
Develop strong working relationship with the business units to determine needs and solutions that monitor trends.
Maintain and manage a centralized data dictionary.
Ensure best practices are utilized in defining business processes, including identifying and reporting on trends and deviation.
Ensure adherence to company data architectural guidelines, principles and standards in all project milestones and deliverables.
Work with team to optimize system performance
Create appropriate documentation to support effective requirements definition including charts, graphs, and logic model diagrams as necessary.
Fully participate in iCare’s Compliance Program, including compliance with iCare’s Code of Conduct, policies and procedures, and all applicable Privacy and Security laws

An individual in this position must be able to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities listed above. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.

The above list reflects the general details necessary to describe the principle and essential functions of the position and shall not be construed as the only duties that may be assigned for the position.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering or related field, or equivalent experience
2+ years proven design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
2+ years of experience with relational database systems.
Proficiency in database design concepts and techniques for OLAP
Experience with enterprise-level DBMS systems and tools.
Extensive experience in Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services and Microsoft BI Tool set.
Strong problem-solving skills, logical process thinking, and end-to-end system concepts.
Strong verbal and written communication skills which can clearly articulate complex concepts and ideas to all levels of the organization in both technical and non-technical terms.
Strong knowledge of data mapping and data modeling processes.
Strong knowledge and experience creating reports that allow business users to drill into details.
Analytical skills which effectively deal with conceptual and tangible ideas along with attention to detail.
Working knowledge of the IT development process and life cycle, i.e. roles/responsibilities, tasks, milestones, deliverables.
Team oriented with ability to work effectively with many different people across many diverse organizations.
Ability to work on multiple, concurrent projects in a dynamic environment and manage time appropriately.
Management skills with the ability to plan, organize, and orchestrate activities such as Joint Application Development and review sessions.
Ability to identify and manage risks and issues, providing appropriate escalation when needed.
Data Analyst I (1-4 years of experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development)
Data Analyst II (4-10 years of experience in data analysis and ETL design & development)
Data Analyst III (10+ years of experience in data analysis, ETL, and/or EDW design & development

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Understanding of Medicaid/Medicare
Understanding of healthcare insurance industry

PHYSICAL AND MENTAL DEMANDS:

Physical and mental stamina to handle heavy workloads.
Ability to operate a computer and typical office equipment.

The mental and physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of this position.

WORKING ENVIRONMENT:

iCare is a multi-cultural environment committed to diversity and service to people with disabilities.
Independent Care Health Plan is a professional, performance-oriented organization. Additional time and effort beyond a normal workweek may be required to accomplish company and individual objectives and to provide a high level of service to our members.
Most of work is performed in an office environment.
Periodic business-related travel may be required.
Work conditions may involve stress producing activities and/or timelines.

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an individual encounters while performing the essential functions of this position.

Experience
Required
1 year(s): experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development
2 year(s): experience with relational database systems
2 year(s): design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Engineering or related field
Bachelors or better in Management Information Systems or related field
Bachelors or better in Computer Science or related field
Behaviors
Preferred
Innovative: Consistently introduces new ideas and demonstrates original thinking
Functional Expert: Considered a thought leader on a subject
Detail Oriented: Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
Motivations
Preferred
Growth Opportunities: Inspired to perform well by the chance to take on more responsibility
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help
Goal Completion: Inspired to perform well by the completion of tasks",2.9,"Independent Care Health Plan
2.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
253,Staff Data Scientist,"$123k-$196k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Staff Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
PhD/MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
4+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
254,Certifying Scientist / Toxicologist,-1,"Are you interested in taking your toxicology career to the next level by joining a successful and rapidly growing clinical laboratory?

We are currently seeking a Certifying Scientist / Toxicologist to join a growing toxicology testing laboratory in Irvingotn, NJ. This role will be responsible for performing analytical drug testing data review and analyses and operating/troubleshooting LCMS equipment. The Certifying Scientist will be conducting a review of all confirmation results to ensure the accuracy and integrity of the drug testing process, and subsequently releasing these test reports to physicians or other healthcare professionals.

Other job duties include but are not limited to:
sample prep, Loads and runs samples through LCMS equipment (AB Sciex 4500).
Troubleshoots instrumentation.
Reviews drug confirmation data from the laboratory compares with the initial screening data for accuracy and releases the results.
Initiates any corrective action in the lab on testing data that has been reviewed and found to be incomplete or inconclusive.
Provides detailed customer consultation for physicians and other health care professionals in regards to drug testing methods, drug metabolism and excretion.
Method update ad development as and when ncessary.
Supervising Confirnation deptartment.
You should apply if you have at least a Bachelor's degree in Medical Technology, Chemistry, Bilology, Toxicology (or related field) and at least two years of previous clinical experience with LC-MS certifying and releasing. This is an excellent opportunity to join a solid business in a great location.

Basic Preferred Profile:
Bachelor's or greater in Medical technology, chemistry, toxicology, or similar.
2+ years LC-MS certifying and releasing experience in a clinical setting preferred.
Must be open to working second shift and a (Saturday or Sunday)
This is *NOT* a remote work opportunity
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $20.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Sunrise Clinical Services,"Irvington, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
255,Data Scientist - Medicare Advantage Generalist,-1,"A bit about us:

We’re on a mission to change healthcare — how it’s paid for, delivered, experienced. We want to put people center stage, not process or profit. We are guided by a deep belief that every person on Medicare should be treated like we would treat a member of our own family: with loving care and a profound commitment to their health and well-being.

That’s why we’re gathering a whole bunch of smart, big-hearted people to create a new kind of healthcare company — one that combines compassion, health insurance, clinical care, and technology seamlessly.

We want to throw the long ball with people we love for a cause we believe in. Life is short. Join us.


A bit about this role:

We are looking for a data scientist who can serve as a liaison to our Operational teams to answer important and timely questions about the health of the business. We are looking for someone who has broad experience in Medicare Advantage analytics functions — e.g. Finance, Risk Adjustment, Stars, Pharmacy — and deep experience in at least one area. This role will report into our Data Science team, and will work alongside Product Managers, Software Engineers, and Business Leads to solve key challenges for the company.
Responsibilities will include:
Working closely with key business stakeholders to understand the analytical needs of the business and providing insight in a rapid, iterative, and collaborative process
Developing thoughtful reports and dashboards that help Operations teams improve their business decision-making
Identifying patterns in the analyses you conduct, and using those patterns to improve our tools and processes so we can deliver results more quickly and accurately
Sharing your domain knowledge with technical team-members who do not have an MA background
Communicating results to an audience of mixed technical backgrounds
Required skills and experience:
Ability to work in a fast-paced startup environment
5+ years of technical work at a Medicare Advantage plan or service provider
Experience collaborating effectively with stakeholders
Experience with SQL
Experience with dashboarding and creating reports
Experience with Risk Adjustment
If you love running towards complex challenges and transforming them into solutions, if you want to make a potentially huge impact on many lives, and if you are looking for a disruptive startup with an inspiring and talented team, Devoted Health may be the place for you!

Devoted is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to a safe and supportive work environment in which all employees have the opportunity to participate and contribute to the success of the business. We value diversity and collaboration. Individuals are respected for their skills, experience, and unique perspectives. This commitment is embodied in Devoted’s Code of Conduct, our company values and the way we do business.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, the Company does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy status, marital status, national origin, disability, age, sexual orientation, veteran status, genetic information, gender identity, gender expression, or any other factor prohibited by law. Our management team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment.",4.3,"Devoted Health
4.3",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
256,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"The world's largest and fastest-growing companies such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, and Salesforce rely on Demandbase to drive their Account-Based Marketing strategy and maximize their B2B marketing performance. We pioneered the ABM category nearly a decade ago, and today we lead the category as an indispensable part of the B2B MarTech stack. Our achievements and innovation would not be possible without the driven and collaborative teams here at Demandbase. As a company, we're as committed to growing careers as we are to building world-class technology. We invest heavily in people, our culture, and the community around us, and have continuously been recognized as one of the best places to work in the Bay Area.

Our success depends on our ability to create a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment. We're committed to attracting, developing, retaining and promoting a diverse workforce. By ensuring that every Demandbase employee is able to bring a diversity of talents to work, we're increasingly capable of living out our mission and providing real insight from our products to support our customers. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and all walks of life to apply. Come grow with us at Demandbase!

Here's What Data Scientists do at Demandbase:

You will be a member of Demandbase's Central Data Science team that drives product innovation and is responsible for all ML/AI initiatives and projects. We build and apply ML models at every stage of the B2B buyer's journey. Starting from the top of the funnel, Data Scientists build account rank models to score tens of millions of companies and also recommend companies that aren't yet in their CRM. Our Data Scientists apply cutting edge natural language processing algorithms and deep learning models to predict whether a company is interested in our clients product even before they visit their site. Once ML generated account lists are built, we launch campaigns to generate awareness and traffic to target sites.

Our Data Scientists build pacing, pricing, click-through rate, and engagement models using tens of billions of auctions daily to optimize campaign performance. We build reinforcement learning algorithms to optimize the user experience when potential prospects click on ads/banners and visit our customers' websites.

Our Data Scientists build real-time intent using time series analysis to trigger an alert for sales after potential prospects share their contact information, to contact prospects when there's an intent surge. ML models are a significant differentiator for each of our offerings in the ABM platform, Targeting, Conversion, and Intent products. Our Data Scientists not only build ML models, but are also substantially involved in productizing the models, and working closely and cross-functionally with data engineering, application, product, and UX design teams to deliver the world's best account-based marketing and advertising product.

The Data Science team is currently looking for Senior Data Scientists to fill in one of the three available positions:
Identification and account intelligence: map billions of IPs and cookies to companies
Rank accounts in B2B buying journey
Advertising: campaign optimization including but not limited to pacing, pricing, inventory, forecasting, click through rate, conversion
Please note that due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Demandbase offices will be closed for the foreseeable future and all positions are remote until further notice.

What you'll be doing:
Develop Machine Learning algorithms that optimize and make an immediate business impact on KPIs.
Build, test, and deploy custom ML/AI models and algorithms on large datasets, and develop processes for monitoring and analyzing their performance on production environments.
Communicate algorithms, complex data science methods, and statistical results with technical and non-technical audiences.
Stay current with the latest technology/research and drive innovation.
What we're looking for:
4+ years of data science experience
Background in Statistics, Computer Science, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Computational Psychology, Operational Research, Physics or relevant field
Driven more than one greenfield project from concept to production release
Proficiency with analytical and database tools (e.g. Jupyter notebooks, Hive, SQL, No-SQL)
Demonstrated ability to write clean and performant code in Python
Depending on the project you work on, experience with 1 or more of these AI/ML technologies: TensorFlow, scikit-learn, Spark MLlib, Bigquery Machine Learning, large-scale data sets, Natural Language Processing and Graph algorithms.
Nice to have skills:
Experience leading teams and projects
Experience with Google Cloud or AWS
Prior experience in Martech/Adtech space
Nice to have qualities:
You are highly self-motivated and able to operate with significant autonomy
You are able to break down complex problems and come up with simple innovative solutions
You are able to focus on the goals without getting lost in the details
Data is your thing, you love metrics and use metrics to drive projects
You are willing to build end-to-end and own the machine learning products you build or help build
Benefits:

Our benefits include 100% paid for Medical, Dental and Vision for you and your entire family, short-term/long-term disability, life insurance, flexible vacation policy and 401K. Due to the COVID pandemic the Demandbase offices are closed for the foreseeable future. When the office reopens, we also offer commuter benefits, free snacks, catered lunch every Friday, chair massages, weekly yoga and much more!

About Demandbase:

Demandbase is the leader in Account-Based Marketing (ABM) and an indispensable part of the B2B tech stack. The company offers the only end-to-end ABM platform that helps B2B marketers identify, win and grow the accounts that matter most. The biggest and fastest growing companies in the world, such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, GE, Salesforce and others rely on Demandbase to drive their ABM strategy and maximize their marketing performance. The company has been named to the JMP Securities list ""The Hot 100: The Best Privately Held Software Companies,"" the Deloitte Fast 500 and named a Gartner Cool Vendor for Tech Go-To Market. In 2019, Demandbase executives authored the definitive book on ABM, Account-Based Marketing: How to Target and Engage the Companies That Will Grow Your Revenue. For more information, please visit www.demandbase.com or follow the company on Twitter @Demandbase.",4.4,"Demandbase
4.4",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
257,Business Data Analyst (Mortgage Operations),"$41k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","First Midwest, with assets over $20 billion, is the premier relationship-based banking franchise in the dynamic Chicagoland banking market. As one of the Chicago metropolitan area's largest independent bank holding companies, First Midwest provides the full range of commercial, retail banking, and wealth management services through some 120+ offices located in communities in metropolitan Chicago, Northwest Indiana, Central and Western Illinois, Eastern Iowa, and Southeast Wisconsin.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Working collaboratively with the management team, this position is responsible for creating and managing key periodic reports and ad hoc analyses in support of defined business objectives. This role will also champion the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:
Bachelor’s degree preferred in some business discipline
5 years banking or related experience preferred
Advanced analysis and reporting experience required
In-depth knowledge of industry operating rules preferred
Ability to implement new procedures in response to, and in anticipation of, changes in the business environment desired
Possesses and applies comprehensive problem solving abilities for complex issues
High proficiency and analytical skills using Microsoft Office Suite of products required. Access Database and Excel graphing skills a plus.
Experience with financial reports and Falcon risk analytics a plus
Client focus and project management skills are required with an aptitude for creating operational efficiencies and positive client experiences
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work collaboratively with the leadership team on the identification, development and ongoing refinement of periodic reports.
Proactively identify opportunities in support of defined business objectives by developing in-depth analyses.
Support the line of business data collection and distribution needs by working collaboratively with internal and external partners as needed.
Support the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business and maintain analytics related to impacts.
Assists in monthly planning, loss analysis, forecasting and variance reporting.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here and Supplement here.",3.5,"First Midwest Bank
3.5","Gurnee, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
258,Senior Data Scientist,"$72k-$122k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
259,Senior Data Engineer,"$88k-$158k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Senior Data Engineer at Burgess you will work alongside some incredibly smart and talented engineers. You will be exposed to very large data sets from various domains that help us provide the best payment integrity platform to large healthcare providers. We are a small, but mighty (and growing) organization that is dedicated and passionate about our clients, our product, and the work each of us undertakes to delight our customers. At Burgess, you will be seen, you will be challenged, and we hope you have some fun along the way. Currently, our Data Solutions team is looking to bring aboard a new senior team member so we can increase our capacity and make larger strides in product development. If this sounds like an environment you would thrive in, keep reading.

In this role, we expect you to come to the table, ready to contribute to the team and let your years of experience and data engineering skills shine.

On a day to day basis, you can expect to:

Lead the charge to improve system performance, capacity, reliability, and scalability.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources such as flat files, Excel, Access, PDF, XML, JSON, EDI etc.
Create and maintain complex T-SQL scripts, stored procedures, functions, views, triggers, CTEs, Recursive table expressions etc. to handle large and complex datasets.
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture for various Burgess applications, provide channels and processes that pushes this data to various applications and are responsible for the integrity of the data.
Implement best practices for data updates and development, troubleshoot performance and other data related issues on multiple product applications.
Automate manual routine tasks and data process, optimize data delivery and infrastructure for greater scalability.
Develop reports on data dictionary, server metadata, user data etc. and implement the reporting tools as needed.Design, draft, cost, and present recommendations to leadership.
Analyze test results and work with Developers and Engineers to perform bug fixes.
Perform root cause analysis of performance issues and suggest corrective actions.
Oversee system performance lifecycle and identify key metrics for performance improvements.
Generate periodic performance reports for management review.
Lead, mentor, coach and train junior team members to ensure appropriate growth in skills, knowledge and scalability of the department.

Collectively, the Burgess team is dedicated to producing an exceptional product. Along the way, we care about each other, work to clear a path to get things done and consistently look for ways to expand our horizons to grow as individuals and as a company. If this sounds like a team you want to be a part of and bring the same commitment and energy to your work, we look forward to hearing from you.

Qualifications & Skills

Required:

US Citizen or Green Card holder
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or a related field.
Minimum of 8 years’ professional work experience
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in a Data Engineer role
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in team leadership/management
Ability to model data to third normal form and understand the benefits of normalization.
Ability to analyze a query execution plan and devise a plan to improve query performance.
Ability to parse JSON and XML into relational form and transform a relational structure into JSON or XML.
Strong oral and written communication skills including the ability to engage appropriately with executives and author a wide range of technical documents

Desired, but not required:

Master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or similar quantitative field.
Experience with industry standard version control system tools like Git, Bitbucket.
Experience with writing C# tasks in SSIS.
Experience with or an interest in alternative implementations of data storage such as MongoDB, Elasticsearch, Cassandra, and Hadoop.
Experience with or an interest in reporting technologies such as Tableau, Power BI and if the opportunity presents itself learning MDX and DAX.

Headquartered in Alexandria, VA, Burgess is a team of engineers, designers, policy analysts, data scientists, and business leaders who believe thoughtful technology can transform the ﬂow of resources in the American healthcare system. We are a small team solving a big problem in a system that affects millions of people every day. At Burgess, you will join forces with some of the brightest minds in technology, healthcare, and finance, directly influencing our day-to-day decisions and ultimately, the impact we have in the world. Your Contributions Truly Matter. We are a growing company, so you’ll be given plenty of creative freedom and the opportunity to thrive—everything you do will count. We look forward to hearing from you.",2.5,"The Burgess Group LLC
2.5","Alexandria, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
260,Lead Data Scientist - Machine Learning,"$96k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

We are expanding our efforts into complementary data technologies for decision support in areas that capitalize on intelligent applications enabled with computational learning. Our interests are in enabling intelligent applications and corresponding computation learning processing on large and low latent data sets with elastic cloud architecture techniques on premise.To that end, this role will engage with team counterparts in exploring and deploying technologies for engineering features and creating algorithms that result in models incorporated into intelligent applications. Application use cases are expected to focus on core aspects of our business such as risk management and customer experience. Responsibility also includes coding, testing, and documentation of new or modified scalable analytic data systems including automation for deployment and monitoring. This role participates along with team counterparts to architect an end-to-end framework developed on a group of core data technologies. Other aspects of the role include developing standards and processes for computational learning projects and initiatives.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Evaluate, research, experiment with computational learning technologies in a lab to keep pace with industry innovation while assessing business impact and viability for use cases associated with efforts in hand
Work with statisticians, data engineers, application developers, and related groups to inform on and showcase capabilities of emerging technologies and to enable the adoption of these new technologies, computational learning and associated algorithms
Work closely with statisticians, data engineers, application developers, other IT counterparts, and business partners to develop, integrate and deploy computational learning as part of applications
Code, test, deploy, monitor, document and troubleshoot computational learning processing and associated automation
Educate and develop system engineers on distributed systems engineering so as to enable future data science and practice
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Excellent knowledge of Linux, AIX, or other Unix flavors
Experience with recent computational learning technologies such TensorFlow, Caffe, Torch, Neon, SystemML, or Theano
Experience with directed analytic graph processing using Beam, Nifi, Flink, and/or Samza
Experience with messaging technologies such as Kafka, RabbitMQ, ZeroMQ, or MQTT
Experience with high dimensional visualization using t-SNE or PCA or other related technologies such as Ayasdi
Working knowledge of cloud based computational learning technologies such as Google Cloud Machine Learning, Microsoft Azure Machine Learning, or IBM Watson
Working knowledge of Rasa, Spacey/Prodigy, NLTK, Standford CoreNLP, ELMo, and other natural language understanding and processing frameworks and modeling

Skills

Demonstrated strong track record on delivering computational learning based solutions that solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches that are a blend of analytical, mathematical and technical skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Experienced with solution development, deployment, and/or administration of distributed computational learning and/or analysis systems such as Spark, H2O, SAS Grid, Tensorflow or Hadoop

Education

High School Diploma or equivalent required
Master’s Degree in operations research, applied statistics, data mining, machine learning, physics or related quantitative discipline required

Experience

2-4 years hands-on experience with NoSQL data stores such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Riak or other technologies that embed NoSQL such as MarkLogic or Lily Enterprise required
3-5 years data science experience required
5-7 years software engineering in languages to include Java, SAS, and Python required
5-7 years hands-on experience with SQL databases and Business Intelligence tools such as Oracle, DB2, Postrges, MySQL, SAS, Cognos, Oracle BI Enterprise Edition, SAP BusinessObjects, or Tableau required #LI-TS1",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Arlington, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
261,Machine Learning Engineer,"$70k-$125k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Fortune 500™ company aimed at embracing and solving some of the world’s most pressing challenges. Through science and technology, Leidos makes the world safer, healthier and more efficient.

Our Civil Group offers an array of exciting career opportunities for the best IT, energy, logistics and engineering professionals. Driven by our talented workforce, the Security Detection & Automation Operation is the cornerstone of Leidos’ comprehensive suite of fully integrated security detection and automation solutions for aviation, ports and borders, and critical infrastructure customers around the world, with more than 24,000 products deployed across 120 countries. Leidos is positioned to address emerging and evolving threats through rapid development of innovative solutions for our global customers. Leidos’ SDA Operation, in conjunction with the TSA, also performs on-call, onsite installation servicing of X- Ray Detection Equipment using leading edge technology to ensure the safety of our clients, customer and passengers. The Security Detection and Automation Operation is comprised of four divisions to align with our customers’ missions and needs:

· Checkpoint

· Hold Baggage

· Ports & Borders

· General Automation

We are seeking a motivated and talented machine learning engineer to join an algorithm development team and participate with hands-on contributions to advanced detection and computer vision algorithms, and supporting software infrastructure.

A successful candidate will apply strong software development skills with knowledge of machine learning, deep learning, and computer vision to contribute to the development of advanced algorithms for next-generation threat detection security systems. The candidate will collaborate with team members to propose and implement improvements to algorithms and supporting software, tools, and compute infrastructure.

Responsibilities will include

Contributing to a team that is developing object detection and image processing system architectures that will be implemented in real-time decisioning processes in security screening systems fielded across the world
Hands on development of advanced machine learning, object detection, image processing, and computer vision algorithms
Development of machine learning software infrastructure to support algorithm development, visualization, and evaluation.

Education:

BS in Computer Science or a related field
Masters degree preferred

Required Qualifications

Minimum 6 years software development experience
Minimum 3 years experience developing machine learning algorithms and supporting software infrastructure
Proficient with Linux
Proficient with Python and Scientific Python Libraries
Proficient with PyTorch or similar deep learning framework
Familiarity with deep neural network architectures and concepts

Desirable Experience

Experienced with algorithm performance evaluation and optimization
Proficient with C++
Experienced with NVIDIA CUDA development
Experienced creating data visualizations using QT and OpenGL frameworks

Leidos is growing! Connect with us on LinkedIn and Facebook. We value and support the well-being and mobility of our employees with competitive benefit packages, complementary e-learning training, work-life flexibility, an exciting External Referral Program, and a diverse, inclusive and ethical work place. In fact, in 2020, Leidos was ranked as one of the “World's Most Ethical Companies” by the Ethisphere Institute for the third consecutive year.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
None

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Software Engineering

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,"Leidos
3.6","Saint Petersburg, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
262,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics","$145k-$163k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.7,"Livongo
4.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
263,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,"$109k-$180k
(Glassdoor Est.)","What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
264,SENIOR CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS GROUP,"$65k-$124k
(Glassdoor Est.)","SENIOR CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS GROUP


Opinion Dynamics seeks a new team member to join our Data Analytics team. The Data Analytics group is a dynamic and tightly knit team of individuals from a range of backgrounds working closely together on analytically challenging and methodologically innovative consulting, advising, and research projects to support energy efficiency and grid-focused needs. Our ideal candidate enjoys data analytics/science, data mining and data munging, is a problem solver, can effectively operate and navigate a dynamic environment of a consulting firm, and is excited to work with a multidisciplinary team of data scientists, statisticians, data analysts, and programmers.

Opinion Dynamics is a firm known for the excellence of our team and our commitment to a corporate culture that fosters innovative thought, growth and enrichment opportunities, passionate employees, collegiality and collaboration.

What we are looking for in an ideal candidate
Demonstrated interest in energy, energy policy, or building science
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in engineering, quantitative social science, statistics, political science, economics, computer or data science, or related field
Two or more years’ work experience in analytics, ideally evaluating energy efficiency programs and/or performing other forms of longitudinal data analysis, OR higher educational attainment with relevant coursework
Strong programming skills in Python (including the standard data science stack)
Experience importing, cleaning, and manipulating large datasets (500,000+ records) in the context of analytical modeling
Experience with econometric modeling/statistical regression analysis, including model evaluation and validation best practices
Highly motivated, with a demonstrated track-record of thinking critically about your work and clearly communicating with other project staff and managers about your work
Strong written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate with clients as well as ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Ability to explain complex technical concepts to non-technical audiences.
Strong consulting and advising skills
Ability to juggle and prioritize multiple tasks and deadlines simultaneously and flexibly
Additional qualifications of value
Master’s or PhD in statistics, economics, engineering, or related field
Programming skills in other programming languages (R, Java, SQL etc.)
Experience with version control software (e.g. Git) and collaborative code development
Experience with machine learning methods
Demonstrated aptitude with data visualization tools and techniques (e.g. PowerBI, Tableau)
Experience working on a collaborative, cross-functional team
Location

Preferred: Waltham, MA (Company headquarters)

Other locations across Continental United States will be considered.

About Opinion Dynamics Corporation

Opinion Dynamics advances knowledge to address emerging energy and social issues

through sound and insightful research. Our inter-disciplinary team of consultants provides actionable research to support the needs of our clients, which include electric and gas utilities, regulators, and stakeholders. Our research and consulting services inform program planning and design, performance assessment, and optimization of energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy programs. Our company fosters innovative thought, collegiality and growth opportunities for our employees. The Data Analytics Group within Opinion Dynamics is especially focused on taking a data-driven approach to answering complex technical questions.

How to Apply:

To be considered for this position, please submit your cover letter (required) and resume with “Data Analytics Consultant” in the subject line. If contacted, please be prepared to complete analytical tests as part of the interviewing process; provide data analysis and writing samples that clearly demonstrate your experience and aptitude in the areas outlined above; as well as supply two or more references who can speak to your experience, work orientation, and work ethic.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.

Responsibilities
Qualifications


To be considered for this position, please send your cover letter and resume to:

Careers: Senior Consultant- Data Analytics Group

careersMA@opiniondynamics.com

Please submit a cover letter and resume to CareersCA@opiniondynamics.com.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics will not provide sponsorship for work authorization for this position. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.",4.2,"Opinion Dynamics
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
265,Data Engineer,-1,"Company Description:

Flashpoint is the globally trusted leader in risk intelligence for organizations that demand the fastest, most comprehensive coverage of threatening activity on the internet. From bolstering cyber and physical security, to detecting fraud and insider threats, Flashpoint partners with customers across the private and public sectors to help them rapidly identify threats and mitigate their most critical security risks. Flashpoint is backed by Georgian Partners, Greycroft Partners, TechOperators, K2 Intelligence, Jump Capital, Leaders Fund, Bloomberg Beta, and Cisco Investments. For more information, visit https://www.flashpoint-intel.com/ or follow us on Twitter at @FlashpointIntel

What we are looking for:

Our best engineers are collaborative and selfless. They enjoy writing code but they prioritize mentoring and supporting others. They leave code cleaner than when they found it but don't insist on particular patterns. They optimize for simplicity and readability. They are involved in the full lifecycle of software development: understanding the requirements, designing the solution, writing the code, testing the code, testing the integration, deploying it to production, and monitoring the deployment. They are fully engaged in the problem domain.

We see it as a prerequisite that candidates possess and demonstrate a desire to lead from the front in improving a supportive, empathetic team; we expect candidates to be trusted and beloved by their teammates such that they become technical and emotional anchors for the rest of the team and department.

What you will do:
Help build and maintain our data infrastructure.
Become an expert in Apache Beam.
Create observability tooling to help other teams debug, understand, and tune their big data jobs and pipelines.
Assist and mentor other teams with building and managing their data pipelines.
Write tools to automate data processes and deployments.
Create maintainable, scalable code to address data needs
Write empathetic documentation and runbooks to enable your team to be force multipliers for each other.
Help bring in new technologies and develop innovative approaches to the data challenges we face.
Apply your honesty, strong sense of morals and ethics, and sense of responsibility towards making Flashpoint and those around you smarter, stronger, and kinder.
Identify opportunities for automation and drive process improvements.
What you will bring:
1 - 5 years experience contributing to production systems or other relevant experience.
Experience with big data infrastructure.
Proficient with Java or Scala.
Solid foundation in computer science fundamentals from data structures and algorithms to high level design patterns.
Excellent analytical, problem solving and technical skills.
Demonstrated ability to learn and leverage new technologies.
Experience with SQL schema design and data warehousing.
Experience working with queuing systems and stream processing patterns.
Basic understanding of privacy and security.
An organized work ethic.
A humble attitude and persistence to learn and to Get Stuff Done Right.
What else would be great:
Experience with public cloud data services, particularly Google Cloud Platform's.
Experience with Spark, Hive, and/or Hadoop.
Experience working with data science teams.
Experience with automating infrastructure using leading cloud providers.
Proficiency with Python.
Why Flashpoint is a Great Place to Work:
Diversity. Flashpoint is committed to fostering, cultivating and preserving a culture of diversity, inclusion, belonging, and equity. We recognize that diversity is key to achieving our vision. We believe that every person and their experiences contribute to building a work environment and a product that will change the world.
Culture and Belonging. Our company's culture isn't something you join, it's something you build and shape, and each person's unique backgrounds and experiences contribute to who Flashpoint is and will become. You will have ample opportunities to connect with coworkers through various communication channels and company-funded events: dietary & allergy conscious catered lunches, book clubs, happy hours, committees and much more.
Benefits. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package, including unlimited PTO, 401(K), mental health and wellness benefits, commuter benefits, and generous parental leave policies.
Perks. Flashpoint understands that personal wellness is one of the keys to a happy, healthy and productive work environment. That's why we also prioritize health and wellness perks like gym reimbursements and daily meditation, well-stocked kitchens, cool cultural initiatives and inclusive employee events.
Career Growth. Flashpoint is invested in the growth of our team members and understands that frequent, two-way feedback is critical to that growth. We encourage regular one-on-ones with your manager, a regular schedule of performance reviews, learning and development opportunities, and guidance through formalized career paths; whether that be towards being a great manager, being a great individual contributor, or a lateral move to gain breadth of knowledge and experience.",3.9,"Flashpoint
3.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
266,Sr. Data Scientist,"$108k-$169k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Commercial Lines BI team at Woodruff Sawyer is a newly founded capability to enhance the organizations capacity in providing data-backed insights to its clients seeking P&C and liability insurance. The members of this team will work closely with the VP of Commercial Lines Business Intelligence and other enterprise stakeholders to develop and roll out analytics solutions. A successful candidate will apply data science methodologies, actuarial methods, knowledge of insurance, and the latest technological tools to create reusable business intelligence assets.

What you will be doing:

With limited guidance from the leaders, managers, or project leads:
Primarily collects, prepares and analyzes data from various sources.
Executes formal exploratory data analysis for data science projects.
Develops re-usable templates and reports for the review and feedback by other team members.
Prepares analysis summaries and provides to the colleagues and leaders.
Conducts data research and presents findings.
Identifies areas of more in-depth analysis and builds prototypes for IT implementation.
Required Qualifications:
A graduate degree in any of the quantitative disciplines, e.g., Actuarial Science, Math, Engineering, Stats, Finance, or a related discipline.
Knowledge of basic data science algorithms demonstrable through internships, coursework, or a combination.
2+ years of experience in visual analysis packages such as Tableau / Power BI.
2+ years of experience in programming using Python or R.
Skilled in developing presentations in PowerPoint or equivalent.
2+ years of work experience in an insurance or FINTECH environment as a data scientist or BI analyst. (4+ for an undergraduate).
Knowledge of common insurance terminologies. A couple of actuarial exams is a plus.
What you'll be getting from us:
The opportunity to work with sharp, motivated co-workers in a collaborative and entrepreneurial team
A flexible work schedule
A fun office in vibrant downtown San Francisco
Security for your future: Employee Stock Option Program (ESOP), 401K with company match and profit sharing
Medical, Dental and Vision benefits for employees and families (including domestic partners)
Life Insurance, short term and long-term disability benefits
Paid vacation, holiday and sick days
Tuition reimbursement
Access to an Employee Assistance Program
Fun company and team outings",4.0,"Woodruff Sawyer
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1918,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
267,Sr Associate Scientist/Scientist – Hepatocyte,-1,"Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!
We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Research Associate to refine our best-in-class proprietary RNA expression and delivery platform. The ideal candidate has at least a bachelor’s degree in a biology-related field with significant tissue culture experience. They will be able to quickly learn and integrate new protocols into existing workflows; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills; and be adept at problem solving in a fast-paced environment.

Responsibilities
Proficient with tissue culture, primary cell culture, hepatocyte culture and functional assays, qPCR, ELISA, western blotting
Develop and exercise stringent quality control measures with close attention to detail
Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs
Independently manage scheduling, interpret process data, and communicate results
Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment
Qualifications
BS in biology, genetics, biochemistry or related discipline with 0-4 years of postgraduate or industry research experience.
Experience in several of the following is preferred but not required:
RNA molecular biology
Genetic Diseases
RNA synthesis and purification
Material stock management
Chromatography (HPLC or FPLC)
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
268,Big Data Analyst BSLEP7,"$44k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings requires the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel.
Through the use of effective “big data” technologies and solutions, CBP ensures that the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure. In response to this challenge, ManTech, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified and versatile data analysts to facilitate data-driven decision making in response to national security threats.
The primary objective of the data analysis team is three-fold: 1) Support the development of predictive models via the identification of behaviors and attributes that inform illicit activities; 2) Provide on-demand analysis to support emergent operational needs; and, 3) Develop performance dashboards and artifacts to inform resource allocation, justify requirements, and support statutory reporting mandates.
In all three areas, data analysts must be capable of transforming large volumes of raw data, both structured and unstructured forms, into mission-focused insights that enhance understanding of mission performance, workload, and/or behavioral trends (i.e., strategic, tactical, and operational insights). Analysts may be called upon to support a diverse array of initiatives involving complex queries in support of network analysis, entity resolution, threat research, visualization, and impact assessments.

The strongest applicants will engage in highly dynamic, threat/risk driven operating environments. They will bring a proven track record of working with decision support tools and applications operationally employed by mission-support entities. Within three to six months of joining the project, we expect analysts will:
Master relevant data schemas, reference data, joining conditions, and relationships of existing databases, as well as associated warehouses and data marts, involving trade, travel, national security, and law enforcement data.
Conduct exploratory analysis demonstrating: a refined understanding of the strengths and weaknesses of the underlying data; a willingness to explore non-traditional data sources and evaluation methods; and a clear link to mission need.
Construct query code as well as run, save, edit, optimize, and document queries using SQL and other languages including Spark to extract mission-critical insights.
Design, develop and deliver analytic artifacts such as dashboards, scorecards, and structured Excel reports that: support executive-level, at-a-glance findings; empower non-technical users to explore user-specific equities (e.g. PowerBI); and/or provide detailed information informing operational outcomes.
Assess validity, accuracy, completeness, consistency, and uniformity of data as well as develop mitigation steps and processes to address data quality issues in support of clean data.
Translate findings (e.g. mission impacts, limitations of findings/ analytical confidence, analytical methods and techniques employed) to clearly articulate the “so what” within the context of mission performance to technical and non-technical audiences in the form of written reports and in-person briefings.
Engage internal and external stakeholders in a professional and informed manner to collect analysis requirements and ensure alignment of expected outcomes.
Integrate with, and materially contribute to, portfolio teams as a matrixed resource to provide data analytics expertise in support of modeling, ad hoc query support, or performance assessment initiatives in collaboration with data scientists, intelligence analysts, developers, and other participants under the direction of a project manager.
Applicants should note that while some formal training exists to support building knowledge of missions and the implementation of data-driven solutions, but much of the knowledge must be gained through on-the-job training and individual initiative. Technical knowledge is insufficient to achieve effectiveness in this operating environment; expertise must be enhanced with rapid acquisition of mission knowledge and demonstrated commitment positive mission outcomes. Therefore, we seek self-starters who are capable of independent exploration and knowledge acquisition, willing to develop informal support networks, and with an appreciation for the immense challenge of safeguarding the Nation’s borders.

BS Degree in a related technical fields (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc.)
Hands on experience working with data-mining, analysis or statistical software such as R, Matlab, SAS Enterprise Miner, SPSS Modeler, or SQL Developer for data analysis
Hands on experience with at least one of the following technologies: Hadoop eco system, including HDFS, YARN, Cassandra, Hive, Pig, and Spark
Hands on experience with Batch-oriented and streaming distributed processing methods such as Nifi, Spark, Kafka, or Storm
Hands on experience with distributed search engines like Elasticsearch or Solr
Conceptual understanding of – and/or prior experiences related to – data profiling, fuzzy matching, entity resolution, and signal detection theory (specifically with respect to SD theory: designing and improving upon systems that monitor, minimize, and balance false positive and false negative outcomes)
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with programming languages such as Java, Python, and SQL
Unix / Linux experience
Experience working in field of entity resolution, analytics, data mining or name matching.
Delivering solutions using Amazon Web Services (e.g., AWS EC2, RDS, S3)
Experience with Javascript frameworks like Angular, React and JQuery is a plus
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI)

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
269,Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist,"$95k-$191k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Headquartered in Brisbane, Calif., CareDx, Inc. is a leading precision medicine solutions company focused on the discovery, development and commercialization of clinically differentiated, high-value healthcare solutions for transplant patients and caregivers. CareDx offers products, testing services and digital healthcare solutions along the pre- and post-transplant patient journey, and is the leading provider of genomics-based information for transplant patients.

Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist

We are seeking a highly motivated, critical, and creative Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist to join the CareDx R&D group. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a growing, dynamic, and collaborative R&D team innovating cutting-edge technology. The primary function of this position will be to drive development of innovative diagnostic solutions for transplant recipients. The ideal candidate will be able to lead assay development and validation projects, have experience interfacing with cross functional teams including bioinformatics, biostatistics, data science, clinical and lab operations; and have experience in molecular biology methods for nucleic acid characterization and applications.

Responsibilities as follows, but not necessarily limited to:
Lead the initiation, design and execution of experiments to develop novel high-value diagnostic tests
Use molecular biology approaches to independently develop and optimize molecular diagnostics assays based on gene expression
Independently perform basic analysis of high-dimensional data
Coordinate with statistics and bioinformatics teams for high-level data analysis and gene expression signature development
Provide expert support, guidance and mentorship for experiment design, data analysis and results communication to the broader scientific team
Interface with staff in multiple departments and clearly communicate results with colleagues and R&D management, as well as externally at scientific meetings and conferences
Lead project through development, validation and launch
Qualifications:

Ph.D. in genomics, molecular biology or a related discipline with 10+ years of experience and at least 5 years of industry experience.
Strong background in molecular biology
Expert in nucleic acid sample preparation
Experience in development or optimization of nucleic acid technologies related to measuring gene expression, e.g. qPCR, dPCR and multiplex PCR
Ability to collect requirements, plan activities and prioritize activities/assignments to supporting team members.
Able to identify risk and provide recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at project level.
Excellent interdisciplinary communication skills required
Bioinformatics skills such as programming and data mining are a plus
Good organizational skills, and detail oriented
Additional Details:


Every individual at CareDx has a direct impact on our collective mission to improve the lives of organ transplant patients worldwide. We believe in taking great care of our people, so they take even greater care of our patients.

Our competitive Total Rewards package includes:
Competitive base salary and incentive compensation
Health and welfare benefits including a gym reimbursement program
401(k) savings plan match
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Pre-tax commuter benefits
And more!
In addition, we have a Living Donor Employee Recovery Policy that allows up to 30 days of paid leave annually to a full-time employee who makes the selfless act of donating an organ or bone marrow.

With products that are making a difference in the lives of transplant patients today and a promising pipeline for the future, its an exciting time to be part of the CareDx team. Join us in partnering with transplant patients to transform our future together.

CareDx, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participate in E-Verify program.
******* We do not accept resumes from headhunters, placement agencies, or other suppliers that have not signed a formal agreement with us.",2.4,"CareDx
2.4","Brisbane, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
270,"Data Scientist II/III, Drug Safety","$83k-$132k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Scientist II/III will research into innovative scientific approaches to enhancing understanding of therapeutic target safety liabilities and proposing rational risk mitigation strategies for various drug development projects by mining, processing, and analyzing large amounts of structured and unstructured preclinical and clinical data.

As an employee of Boehringer Ingelheim, you will actively contribute to the discovery, development and delivery of our products to our patients and customers. Our global presence provides opportunity for all employees to collaborate internationally, offering visibility and opportunity to directly contribute to the companies' success. We realize that our strength and competitive advantage lie with our people. We support our employees in a number of ways to foster a healthy working environment, meaningful work, diversity and inclusion, mobility, networking and work-life balance. Our competitive compensation and benefit programs reflect Boehringer Ingelheim's high regard for our employees.

Duties & Responsibilities:

Independently access, curate, visualize, and analyze large volumes of data to bring structure and derive insights into ambiguous problems.
Independently perform target safety assessments for novel therapeutic targets based on public data and knowledge base.
Independently implement text-mining to help address unresolved, complex drug safety-associated questions.
Independently design and develop robust algorithms for in-house scientific platforms using machine learning, natural language processing (NLP) techniques, etc.
Communicate new ideas, findings, research areas and opportunities to advance drug research and development (i.e., publish peer-reviewed literature, deliver oral & written presentations at internal/external expert meetings); Reports and treats data with a high level of integrity and ethics.

Data Scientist II Requirements:

B.S. degree from an accredited institution with three-plus (3+) years of experience; or M.S. degree from an accredited institution with zero-plus (0+) years of experience in Data Science/Analytics, Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Statistics, or similar area(s) of study.

Data Scientist III Requirements:

B.S. degree from an accredited institution with seven (7) years of experience; or M.S. degree from an accredited institution with three-plus (3+) years of experience in Data Science/Analytics, Computer Science, Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Statistics, or similar area(s) of study.

Other Requirements:

Strong knowledge of data mining algorithms and statistics.
Experience in data mining in the context of molecular biology, pharmacology, toxicology, and/or clinical trials is a huge plus.
Experience in NLP technologies and analyses
Good understanding of molecular or cell biology, pharmacology, toxicology, or medicine
Proficiency with programming languages (e.g., Python, R, or Java) is a must-have
Experience with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure)
Familiarity with LIMS systems and/or experience with data visualization tool (e.g., Tableau, JReview, Spotfire) is a plus
Strong verbal & written communication and record-keeping skills.
Demonstrated ability to multi-task and work effectively in highly collaborative and diverse team environment.

Eligibility Requirements:

Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without restriction.
Must be willing to take a drug test and post-offer physical (if required).
Must be 18 years of age or older.

Who We Are:

At Boehringer Ingelheim we create value through innovation with one clear goal: to improve the lives of patients. We develop breakthrough therapies and innovative healthcare solutions in areas of unmet medical need for both humans and animals. As a family owned company we focus on long term performance. We are powered by 50.000 employees globally who nurture a diverse, collaborative and inclusive culture. Learning and development for all employees is key because your growth is our growth.

Want to learn more? Visit boehringer-ingelheim.com and join us in our effort to make more health.

Boehringer Ingelheim, including Boehringer Ingelheim Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Boehringer Ingelheim USA, Boehringer Ingelheim Animal Health USA Inc., Boehringer Ingelheim Animal Health Puerto Rico LLC and Boehringer Ingelheim Fremont, Inc. is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; citizenship status, marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition; physical or psychiatric disability; veteran or military status; domestic violence victim status; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.

#LI-SS1

Job - Research & Development
Primary Location - Americas-US-CT-Ridgefield
Other Locations - Americas-United States
Organization - US-BI Pharma/BI USA
Schedule - Full-time",3.9,"Boehringer Ingelheim
3.9","Ridgefield, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
271,"Data Scientist II/III, Drug Safety","$38k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business: Boys Town National Research Hospital

Boys Town National Research Hospital (BTNRH) is seeking Junior, Mid, or Senior career level Research Scientists in the Center for Childhood Deafness, Language & Learning (CCDLL). The Center for Childhood Deafness, Language, and Learning is directed by Karla McGregor, Ph.D.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital are full-time researchers with no teaching or administrative responsibilities and reasonable service commitments.

Our vision is to grow the CCDLL into a program with tightly integrated research and clinical arms that work synergistically on issues of language learning and development. Work that fits this focus could involve examination of differences between learners with varying diagnoses; determination of the influences of intervention as well as family, academic, and social environments on language outcomes; identification of developmental processes that support language learning during infancy, childhood, adolescence, and young adulthood; and investigation of brain plasticity and neurologic pathways that support language learning and development. We are assembling a faculty that can offer a unique perspective on such issues, one that is informed by a commitment to understanding and ameliorating the effects of childhood disabilities on language learning and development.
All scientists will have access to new, state-of-the art laboratory facilities, generous start-up funds, and extensive supports for grant management, IT, participant recruitment, and clinical measurement.
Senior scientists aim for 50% salary support on external grants. Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.
Via participation in the Center for Perception and Communication in Children (CPCC) funded by a Centers of Biomedical Research Excellence (COBRE) grant, junior scientists are provided with extensive mentoring and three years of full support to enable them to reach this goal.

Scientists at Boys Town National Research Hospital have the advantage of working alongside an outstanding, internationally recognized group of colleagues. In addition to clinicians and scientists in the CCDLL, collaborations are possible with faculty in the Centers for Human Neurosciences, Neurobehavioral Research, Sensory Neuroscience Research, Audiological and Vestibular Services, and Hearing Research. Our intellectual community also includes colleagues at the University of Nebraska-Omaha, the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, the University of Nebraska Medical Center, Creighton University and the Creighton University School of Medicine. Our participation in the Great Plains IDeA-Clinical & Translational Research Center provides training opportunities, partnerships, and resources for scientists who wish to translate science into better health outcomes.

Required Qualifications : A successful candidate will have a Ph.D. as well as post-doctoral studies or faculty-level experience in Speech-Language Pathology, Cognitive Science, Developmental or Experimental Psychology or a related field, and a record that demonstrates a highly productive and excellent research program. Expertise in phonological development or disorders, neurodevelopmental disorders, or the interface between language development and emotional/behavioral health is of particular interest, but not required.

About Boys Town : Boys Town has been changing the way America cares for children and families since 1917. Our employees have helped us grow from a small boardinghouse in downtown Omaha, Nebraska into one of the largest national child and family care organizations in the country. With the addition of Boys Town National Research Hospital in 1977, our services branched out into the health care and research fields, offering even more career opportunities to those looking to make a real difference.

Our employees are our #1 supporters when it comes to achieving Boys Town's mission, which is why we are proud of their commitment to making the world a better place for children, families, patients, and communities. Unique perks to Boys Town employees and their families include free visits to Boys Town physicians and free prescriptions under the Boys Town Medical Plan, tuition assistance, parenting resources from our experts and professional development opportunities within the organization, just to name a few. Working at Boys Town is more than just a job, it is a way of life.

Date Posted : September 23, 2020

Boys Town National Research Hospital is a tobacco free campus. This advertisement describes the general nature of work to be performed and does not include an exhaustive list of all duties, skills, or abilities required. Boys Town is an equal employment opportunity employer and participates in the E-Verify program. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status. To request a disability-related accommodation in the application process, contact us at 1-877-639-6003.",2.9,"Boehringer Ingelheim
3.9","Ridgefield, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
272,Senior Data Scientist,"$118k-$194k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Summary

Establish data science as a value-add capability for the firm. Explore and exploit data sources through the use and creation of statistical models and artificial intelligence / machine learning to uncover and communicate business insights. Work on unusually complex problems and provide highly innovative solutions. Translate business problems into scalable models. Mentor colleagues in both analytical and technical competencies. Be passionate about data and analytics, thrive in an evolving environment, and bring an enthusiastic and collaborative attitude.

Job Skills and Abilities
Thorough command of data science and data analytics, including structured, unstructured, or relational data, data mining, and machine learning techniques
Ability and drive to develop and train Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) algorithms as well as Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience using Python to perform rapid prototyping for data cleaning, EDA, and data visualization including numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, etc.
Experience with data manipulation, quality assurance, data curation, data cleaning, normalization, analysis, or modeling
Experience with data visualizations tools such as Tableau, MicroStrategy or Power BI
Must be able to interact with all areas of business
Communication skills that can influence across organizations and at all levels including non-technical colleagues
Highly motivated, with a strong interest in finance and solving complex problems
Experience using R or SQL is preferred
Financial background is preferred
Responsibilities

Analysis: 85%
Establish data science as a capability within the firm
Engage with internal business partners to understand their questions and needs
Develop and maintain a process for identifying and prioritizing the questions with the highest business value
Create advanced analytics/models to facilitate and encourage data-driven decision making
Present findings to senior leaders in a manner comprehensible to their background
Generate financial insights and long-term trends that can be shared with clients
Attend conferences and seminars to sharpen skills with latest technologies and maintain knowledge of best practices
Mentor: 15%
Cultivate data science skills in junior colleagues
Support and contribute to the Analytics Center of Excellence
Further the data-driven culture of the firm by demonstrating the art of the possible
Education

Master of Science (M.S)

Work Experience

5+ years of experience as a Data Scientist",3.9,"Harbourvest
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
273,Data Scientist,"Employer Provided Salary:
$80k-$120k","About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
274,Lyophilization Development Scientist (PD),"$11k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","XBiotech is a drug Research & Development center headquartered in Austin, Texas. Our Austin facility incorporates all critical operations including discovery, research and development, drug testing, product formulation as well as clinical-regulatory affairs.

XBiotech is also a fully integrated biopharmaceutical company. From pre-clinical models to clinical trial execution, from discovery to manufacturing, all activities are under one roof. XBiotech is focused on developing antibody therapeutics targeting the major medical needs of inflammatory diseases, infectious diseases, and cancer.

Currently, XBiotech is growing rapidly. Our excellent facilities allow us to effectively implement and fully develop any program we adopt. We are currently planning new infrastructure and are working to change the future of medicine.

Who we want:

XBiotech is looking for a motivated and skilled researcher to join its PD group. Passion for what you do is the key to success in our environment. Multitasking and high energy is an absolute must. Open mindedness and creativity are part of your daily schedule.

Requirements

· Experience in various bench-scale to manufacturing-scale lyophilization techniques is required. Experience with lyophilization of various protein solutions is preferred. GLP experience is a plus.

· Understanding of protein biochemistry, stability, and activity is required.

· Experience using various biochemical techniques to evaluate protein-protein interactions is required.

· The candidate must demonstrate excellent oral and verbal communication skills.

· Must be able to manage multiple simultaneous project assignments.

· Very positive interests in keeping up to date with new technologies and developments.

· Ability to work well independently or in a team environment with minimal or no supervision.

· Work will include weekend shifts and off-hours.

· Passion for what you do.

Key Responsibilities

· Method development, and optimization of lyophilization of protein solutions on bench-scale lyophilizers.

· Validate lyophilization conditions by following up with protein activity assays such as ELISA, binding affinity etc.

· Evaluate and optimize the residual moisture content.

· Scaling up bench-scale process to small production-scale lyophilization process in a timely manner.

· Design and execute experiments with minimal supervision, including data analysis and communication. Interprets results and proposes next steps to manager.

· Write SOPs, work instructions, test methods, material specifications, and other process development and R&D documents for regulatory filings.

Other

· Prepare high quality scientific reports or presentation at meetings.

· Ensure that studies are completed in accordance with project timelines.

· Other duties as required.

Work Environment

· Fast paced environment

· Must be able to take on a project without constant supervision

· Must be able to multitask

Education

· Master’s degree with 2-5 years relevant experience in Lyophilization.

· Relevant experiences in assays such as Western Blotting, ELISA, Protein-protein interaction studies.

· Experience working with Millrock Technology’s Small Production Freeze Dryer a plus.

· Knowledge of recombinant protein expression in mammalian cells is a plus.

Employee Value Proposition

· Work on launching a breakthrough drug that could treat millions of people around the world

· Work with the latest technology and simplest manufacturing process

· Learn from an outstanding professional team equipped with experience in providing scientific services.

· Work alongside staff with extensive experience in R&D, manufacturing, drug implementation and management

· Pioneer in the commercialization of its antibody products using a much simpler process

· From discovery to manufacturing all under one roof

· Casual and friendly atmosphere

· Growth potential

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Master's (Required)
Company's website:
www.xbiotech.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",3.0,"XBiotech USA, Inc
3.0","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
275,Data Analyst,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking a Senior Data Analyst for Role in Washington, DC

My name is Stephen Hrutka and I am the owner of a Veteran Owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the VA, SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

One of my Veteran-owned clients is looking for a Senior Data Analyst to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC. The ideal candidate has Veterans Affairs experience and experience within the financial management office.

If this role is not a fit for you but you may know someone, I am glad to offer a referral bonus for any successful placements.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
HRUCKUS LLC

Executive Summary: HRUCKUS is seeking a Senior Data Analyst with 8 years of experience to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC.

Overall Job Description: This position will provide support services to a Federal Client in their initiative to provide fraud prevention services for the Veterans Benefits Administration in addressing its improper payment and fraud prevention/investigation needs.

Position Responsibilities:
Performs tasks which may include obtaining data through advanced computerized models
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Developing simple graphs and charts to explain how the mathematical information will influence the specific project or business
Presenting to managers how to best alter their business models to generate profitable future trends
Education Requirement: BA/BS degree",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
276,Clinical Laboratory Scientist PM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
277,Clinical Laboratory Scientist PM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
278,Clinical Laboratory Scientist PM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
279,Data Scientist,-1,"WHAT WE DO MATTERS:

Here at The Knot Worldwide, we believe in doing work that matters. In 15 countries around the world, our leading family of brands (The Knot, WeddingWire, Bodas, GigMasters, The Bump, How They Asked, Lasting, and more) inspire, inform, and celebrate our communities as they move through life's milestones. From the proposal to creating a home, and starting a family together, we're there for every step of the journey. Our couples and business partners depend on us. They're all in. So are we.

ABOUT THE ROLE AND OUR TEAM:

The Knot Worldwide is in search of a full-time Data Scientist. Our Data Scientists work with stakeholders across all departments within the company. They answer strategic questions and provide insight to internal decision makers ranging from executives and senior management to product managers and team leads. They also work with our product team to develop data driven algorithms that improve features on the website.

This opening is for our Marketplace zone which connects over 2 million engaged couples with +50,000 local wedding vendors (e.g. Venue, DJ, Florist, etc.) across the US each year. This position plays an essential role in solving complex problems across our two-sided marketplace in areas such as pricing, product strategy, and go-to-market optimization.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Create smarter product solutions for our couples and vendors
Answer strategic questions by analyzing behavioral data
Communicate, collaborate and present results to clients within The Knot Worldwide
Explore novel ways to look at our data
SUCCESSFUL DATA SCIENTIST CANDIDATES HAVE:
Master's Degree or Ph.D. preferred
Experience implementing auction based business models
Strong product experience
Proficiency in key statistical and machine learning techniques (predictive modeling, classification, clustering, text analytics, recommender systems , data mining methods, forecasting, and other advanced techniques)
Proficiency with R or Python
Familiarity with common Linux command line tasks and version control software like git or svn preferable
Ability to communicate effectively and influence others
Ability to work in a fast paced environment and shift gears quickly
At The Knot Worldwide, we believe you are more than a resume and invite you to go for it, take the leap of faith, and apply for this job if it sparks your passion to join TKWW and make a difference!

WHAT WE LOVE ABOUT YOU:
You Dream Big. You iterate and experiment to drive innovation.
You Love Our Users. You keep our global community at the center of everything you do.
You Respect All Voices. Inclusion strengthens us and powers your decisions.
You Hustle Every Day. You favor urgency and own your outcomes.
You Win Together. People are at the heart of our success and you play as a team.
WHAT YOU LOVE ABOUT US:

The Knot Worldwide offers a unique employee experience and we are deeply proud of our award-winning culture. From flexible vacation and generous parental leave benefits to promoting wellness and giving back to our community, we believe in happiness above all else—in and out of the office.

----

The Knot Worldwide provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or disability. In addition to federal law requirements, The Knot Worldwide complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. The Knot Worldwide expressly prohibits any form of workplace harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status.

--

This position is not eligible for sponsorship.

--

If you are a resident of California, by submitting your application, you acknowledge that you've read the California Privacy Notice.",3.7,"The Knot Worldwide
3.7",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
280,Sr Principal Data Scientist,"$150k-$239k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

OBJECTIVE:

The purpose of this position is to provide data science expertise in the following areas:

Understanding and effectively working with a wide variety of data sources, such as wearable device data (for example accelerometry and ECG), voice recordings, imaging data, electronic health records or social media postings. Gleaning insights from these datasets and accurately assessing their usefulness and limitations.
Applying a breadth of data science methodogies as needed for various projects and data types. Projects will require advanced analytical and statistical methods, such as statistical inference and modern methods for machine learning and AI.
Identifying and applying state-of-the-art data manipulation and analysis tools, in various programming languages, to develop bespoke analysis pipelines.
Independently designing studies, ranging from simple to more complex, and supporting all aspects of projects from data wrangling through to machine learning and statistical analysis.
Understanding how data science projects fit within Takeda’s preclinical and clinical efforts, with the goal of using data science to better understand the patient journey and to help us tailor interventions that maximize patient benefit.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Independently represent data science function on global project teams in support of pre-clincial and clinical studies and compound level programs.
Play a leadership role in the development and review of the study synopsis, protocol, statistical analysis plan, clinical study report, ensuring accurate and statistically valid deliverables.
Perform end-to-end data analyses, from hypotheses formulation, experimental design, writing analysis plans, data cleaning, executing analysis, and preparing reports and documentation.
Develop and support best data handling and data provenance practices utilizing reproducible, interpretable research approahces
Strengthen Takeda’s advanced analytics toolkit by identifying and applying emerging techniques, as well as by advancing the state of the art and developing novel analysis tools as needed.
Collaborate effectively within a matrix environment, with scientists in various therapeutic areas to understand disease biology and to identify or develop appropriate goals for data science work (for example identifying sensitive and specific endpoints for segmenting patient population, tracking disease progression, quantifying quality of life, etc.) as well as with with colleagues from pharmacology, chemistry, imaging, translational sciences, computational biology, experimental medicine
Work closely with Takeda statisticians to ensure statistical issues in data analysis are addressed as needed.
Anticipate and communicate internal and external resource and quality issues that may impact deliverables or timelines of the program. Propose and implement solutions. Escalate issues to management as appropriate in a timely manner.
Increase the internal impact of Takeda’s data science work by identifying opportunities across therapeutic areas.
Increase the external recognition of Takeda’s data science work by participating in conferences, publishing work and developing external collaborations.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Education in a relevant field, for example a) PhD in a field such as Biostatistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics with at least 6 years of experience and a clear interest in data science methods, or b) Master’s degree with at least 9 years of relevant experience
Expert-level knowledge of data science programming languages (Python and R, or similar) and experience with recommended practices for software development.
Signficant depth of expertise in at least one field relevant to the job (for example, machine learning, signal processing, etc.) and strong background in both supervised and unsupervised machine learning.
Ability to work independently on complicated datasets, including all aspects of data analysis (data cleaning, algorithm development, statistical analysis, and documentation).
Strongly prefer a working knowledge of UNIX operating systems, ideally with experience in high-performance computing environments.
Excellent oral and written communications skills.
Strong project management skills.
Willingness and ability to self-educate in new areas.
Strong collaborative skills and ability to work with a cross-functional team.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ability to sit and stand for long periods of time.
Carrying, handling and reaching for objects.
Ability to lift and carry over 25 pounds.
Manual dexterity to operate office equipment i.e. computers, phones, etc.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend various meetings held in proximity to the Takeda offices.
Able to fly to various meetings at investigator, vendor or regulatory agency sites.
Some international travel may be required.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
281,Data Engineer,"$48k-$91k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Olive is healthcare's A.I. workforce and has been successfully deployed at health systems across the country. Olive automates work to allow healthcare professionals to concentrate on what's most important, their patients. Olive's promise to her customers is that she figures out where she can have an impact, onboards quickly, shows up for work everyday, does her job extremely well, and gets smarter over time.

Olive is made possible by a technology platform which allows her to understand the data emanating from the work that she does and to use that data to get smarter over time. Data Engineers work with the Olive Product Management team to deliver features that allow Olive to store and process large amounts of data. They also work on developing new tools that allow our Omega teams gain insight into the work Olive is doing and deliver ever increasing value back to our customers. Our team gives Data Engineers the ability to own independent small-to-medium features all the way from technical design to launch. A successful Data Engineer will possess strong analytical as well as technical skills, and have the ability to communicate the logic behind technical decisions to non-technical stakeholders

Responsibilities:

Collaborate with Engineers and Product Managers to design and implement features
Ability to meet deadlines and satisfy requirements from other Engineers and Product Management
Peer review and code review participation to provide valuable feedback during every step of the development process
Quickly produce well-organized, optimized, and documented code
Communicate effectively and efficiently across all divisions including with the business, technical teams, and leaders
Take technical ownership of tasks and successfully work independently
Demonstrate the ability to become a domain expert in projects

Bachelor's in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or relevant equivalent experience
4+ years of relevant programming experience
Hands-on experience working data pipelines and data architecture
AWS experience preferred (S3, Glue, RDS, EMR, Athena/Presto DB, IAM)
History of designing and delivering software solutions to real world problems across a variety of technology stacks and programming languages with deep experience in several modern programming languages (e.g. JavaScript, Python, Go, JVM based languages)
Experienced in the development of highly maintainable and reliable code using practices such as unit testing, integration testing, proper code documentation, and appropriate logging
Strong communication, critical thinking, and problem solving skills
Demonstrated understanding of fundamentals engineering concepts
Knowledge of software and application design and architecture
Experience writing and reviewing detailed Technical Design Documents (TDDs) is a plus

PI123899379",4.0,"Olive
4.0","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
282,Technical Service Field Scientist – Biofuels North America,"$58k-$101k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Pioneer a brighter future
At Novozymes, we work in close partnership with our customers and the global community to make a sustainable impact. We use science to advance industries, and as part of Agriculture & Bioenergy, you will work across the agricultural value chain to provide biological solutions that help feed and fuel a growing world.

Technical Service Field Scientist – Biofuels North America
The US ethanol industry is an exciting and dynamic place to work and we are looking for motivated individuals to implement our market-leading products and services.

We are looking for an experienced and personable candidate to join our Biofuels Technical Service team. In this role, you will work with our customers at ethanol plants across the US to learn their processes, understand their challenges, and deliver products and services from Novozymes’ wide portfolio. This will require strong collaboration both with the ethanol producers and the Novozymes Biofuels team.

To be successful in this role, you should be a strong logical thinker with the ability to solve complex technical problems and communicate in an understandable and convincing manner. In addition, you should have a business understanding of how the science will impact economic factors for Novozymes and our customers. In this dynamic and evolving industry, you will need to be able to adapt to exciting and ever-changing information and technology.

Location
The position will ideally be based out of a home office in Kansas City, MO or the surrounding states including Missouri, Illinois, Iowa, and Nebraska.

In this position you need to have:
A minimum of 4 years of relevant experience in the Ethanol industry or Agricultural industry.
A minimum of a BS degree in a scientific field such as Engineering, Chemistry, Biology, Microbiology, Biochemistry.
A solid science background, including engineering, data analysis and fermentation.
Both process experience in the ethanol or corn milling industry and experience working in a technical service or technical sales role (would be ideal).
Ability to travel approximately 50%.

Note: The job level can potentially be adjusted to accommodate applicants with significantly more experience

Are you the next Zymer in our team? Consider a career with Novozymes and let’s realize your potential together.

Novozymes is the world leader in biological solutions. Together with customers, partners and the global community, we improve industrial performance while preserving the planet’s resources and helping build better lives. As the world’s largest provider of enzyme and microbial technologies, our bioinnovation enables higher agricultural yields, low-temperature washing, energy-efficient production, renewable fuel and many other benefits that we rely on today and in the future. We call it Rethink Tomorrow. www.novozymes.com

Novozymes is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All employment decisions are based on business needs without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, age, disability or veteran status.

Application deadline: October 30, 2020",3.8,"Novozymes
3.8","Ames, IA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
283,Automation Development Scientist,"$18k-$117k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Automation Development Scientist will be responsible for designing and executing laboratory experiments to support assay development on an automation platform and phase appropriate qualification of high throughput methods. The focus will be on the development and automation of methods to support process development, high-throughput screening and non-GMP release and stability. He/she must have experience with liquid handling technologies (Tecan Fluent, Hamilton Vantage), Excel spreadsheets and Macros to generate Worklists, familiarity with ELISAs, qPCR, enzyme activity and binding assays. Experience with programming languages, magnetic particle extraction, mobile robots are a plus. Willingness and enthusiasm to work in an exciting and challenging field is a must. The ability to work independently and/or within a team environment is essential. An innovative mindset is necessary to both solve problems and bring greater efficiency to the department. The candidate must be able to effectively communicate cross-functionally with internal and external partners (CRO/CMO’s).

Job duties to include but not limited to:

Automation of methods and evaluation of automatable platform methods and technologies to support process development, high-throughput screening and non-GMP release and stability
Design and participate in phase appropriate qualification and transfer of automated methods
Author and review technical documents such as protocols, SOPs, and reports. Training of personnel for purposes of broadening the Analytical Development Toolkit.
Manage outsourced activities pertaining to the evaluation of automation platforms
Present data/results in group and department meetings
Seek out and evaluate novel technologies

Education and Experience

Ph.D. in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with 0 – 3 year of relevant postdoctoral or industry experience.
MS in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with a minimum of 3 years relevant industry experience.
BS in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline with a minimum of 8 years relevant industry experience.
Computer science background highly desirable
Working knowledge of common analytical platforms not limited to: ELISA, qPCR, enzyme activity and binding assays

Knowledge, Skills, and Ability:

Under general direction develop complex strategic approaches and methodologies within expertise with an understanding of how to weigh and assess technical risks. Leverage understanding of project timelines and big picture (e.g., impact on resources across functions in Pharm Sci).
Develops technical skill(s) to act as a resource/expert for the department.
Responsible for authoring and/or reviewing technology transfer documentation
Identifies and plans broader technical objectives both project and scientific related and executes plans independently or with input from management. Initiates the development of operational processes to facilitate these objectives for future projects, either independently or in consultation with manager.
Proactively builds relationships with key partners/stake holders to gain access to technologies/understanding and deliver on pipeline goals.
Responsible for coordinating cross-functional team and providing resolutions to scientific/technical challenges. Expected to fully represent their functional area to a PS sub-team or other cross functional team.
Develops the ability to define more complex/novel approaches and methodologies to solve complex technical challenges.
Keeps abreast of literature and benchmark best practices outside the company
Expertise in multiple technologies to support automated assay development
May represent Takeda in relationships with universities and industrial consortia

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
284,Certifying Scientist - Toxicology,-1,"Ensures all laboratory procedures are conducted in compliance with prescribed regulations. Under the supervision of the Certifying Scientist Manager and Technical Supervisor, will serve as a toxicology expert to include performing UPLC-MS/MS testing, reporting and issuing accurate toxicological reports to clients, authoring and performing technical studies/validations, and maintaining knowledge of applicable regulatory/quality/safety requirements. Maintain knowledge of, and author/revise (as necessary), current Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) required to perform effectively. Maintain excellent communication with all personnel.

Major Duties and Responsibilities:
Operate and troubleshoot UPLC-MS/MS instrumentation and analyze data output in high-throughput toxicology laboratory
Maintain rigorous QA/QC records
Understand and interpret drug metabolism
Consolidate and interpret large amounts of analytical data
Accurately report toxicological findings to clients
Adhere to all safety, regulatory, and quality requirements
Necessary qualities in the strongest candidates will include:
Fierce attention to detail
Commitment to accuracy
Advanced problem solving skills
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Extensive analytical chemistry background
Ability to prioritize
Desire to work hard
Eagerness to improve performance
Positive work attitude
Respect for co-workers and management staff
Perform Pre-Analytical tasks [receipt, qualification, and preparation of samples for testing] and highly complex testing of patient specimens and/or biologic products

Evaluate test results in an accurate and timely manner.

Recognize and report unusual test results, and provide technical guidance to all departmental team members.

Operate equipment utilizing established protocols and within quality control limits.

Recognize equipment malfunctions and/or technical problems and take appropriate steps to resolve.

Maintain strict adherence to Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs).

Prepare and maintain reports/records and perform computer data entry.

Participate in continuing education and attend meetings as required.

Assist with training and/or mentoring of departmental staff.

Participate in team-oriented projects for the development and implementation of strategic initiatives, validations, process improvements, new testing methodologies and Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs).

Education
Requires a Master’s Degree from an accredited college or university with major coursework relative to analytical chemistry, biochemistry, or toxicology.
Licenses and/or Certifications
General Laboratory Supervisor License or Technologist License via the Nevada Division of Public and Behavioral Health (DPBH), or experience and education necessary to obtain one shortly after hire.
Experience
Previous experience as a Certifying Scientist in an accredited laboratory is required.
Requires one or more years of CLIA/CAP accredited, clinical laboratory experience.
Requires experience in clinical toxicology, including sample preparation, enzyme immunoassay screening, and LC/MS confirmation testing.
Knowledge
Must obtain a working knowledge of regulatory/quality requirements and perform within all Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) and policies.
Must have a working knowledge of high complexity laboratory methodologies and processes.
Skills
Must be capable of evaluating, interpreting and reporting accurate test results by current testing methodologies.
Must be capable of assisting with the design and implementation of new testing methodologies.
Must have strong computer skills.
Must have excellent written and oral communication skills.
Abilities
Must be able to work with interruptions, meet deadlines, and perform accurate laboratory testing.
Must be professional, detail-oriented, self-motivated, innovative, creative, assertive, organized, communicative, and have the ability to work both independently and as a team member.
Must perform well in repetitive work situations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://mdlabs.com/",4.7,"MD Labs
4.7","Reno, NV",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
285,Process Control Scientist,"$44k-$70k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Come Be Part of a Mission that Matters!*
WHO IS NEOGEN: *
From farm to fork, we offer solutions to enhance the quality, quantity and safety of the global food supply. Our food safety diagnostics are used within farming operations to the production facilities of most of the world’s best-known food companies. Neogen’s solutions are critical to the health and well-being of our customers’ operations – and in turn their consumers. *What we do matters!*
Neogen’s culture combines stability with a deep believe in providing professional and personal growth. Our *Pillars of Trust* – the principles which guide our everyday decision—making, include *Openness, Honesty, Credibility, Respect, and Service* . It’s the belief in these characteristics that provide a consistent, happy and healthy work environment for our employees.
Neogen is looking for a Process Control Scientist to design and conduct experimentations to determine root cause for product variability. The Process Control Scientist will analyze and communicate their information (ex. audit findings, status updates, process improvements) to the Process Control Manager. Demonstrates up-to-date expertise of products and documentation systems, and applies this expertise to the development, execution, and improvement of precision plans.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities* include the following. Other duties may be assigned.
Designs and conducts in-depth experiments to resolve instances of process failure.
Coordinates process audits of Lansing based operations including written audit findings, corrective actions; performs follow up and closure.
Assists with in-depth audits when questions regarding process control arise.
Analyzes experimental data and bases conclusions on said data.
Designs experiments to determine critical process points.
Be present for customer, government and 3rd party certification audits, assisting with corrective action follow up/closure.
Ensure documentation complies with cGMP and ISO requirements; gives feedback to improve the documentation.
Qualifications: *
Knowledge and experience in laboratory techniques and process development.
Strong communication skills.
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment, managing multiple projects with attention to meeting project milestones and timelines.
Ability to work effectively as a member of a project team, interacting with members of other departments including R&D groups, Sales & Marketing, Business Development, Manufacturing, Quality Control and Technical Service.
Education and/or Experience: *
BS in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field with 3+ years laboratory experience
or
MS in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field with 2+ years laboratory experience
or
PhD in Chemistry, Microbiology, or Biochemistry or related field.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $35,000.00 - $40,000.00 per year",2.7,"Neogen
2.7","Lansing, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
286,Azure Databricks Data Engineer,"$56k-$105k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Collaborate with business stakeholders to identify and meet data requirements
Management of data workflows and pipelines
Responsible for collecting, moving, storing, and preparation of data infrastructure
Manage and secure the flow of structured and unstructured data from multiple sources like ingest, egress , and transform data
Manage, monitor, and ensure the security and privacy of data to satisfy business needs
Other duties as assigned

5 +yrs of Azure experience
Experience with PySpark, Spark SQL, Databricks (notebooks), and Azure Synapse.
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,"BRMi
4.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
287,Senior Data Scientist,"$118k-$194k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Summary

Establish data science as a value-add capability for the firm. Explore and exploit data sources through the use and creation of statistical models and artificial intelligence / machine learning to uncover and communicate business insights. Work on unusually complex problems and provide highly innovative solutions. Translate business problems into scalable models. Mentor colleagues in both analytical and technical competencies. Be passionate about data and analytics, thrive in an evolving environment, and bring an enthusiastic and collaborative attitude.

Job Skills and Abilities
Thorough command of data science and data analytics, including structured, unstructured, or relational data, data mining, and machine learning techniques
Ability and drive to develop and train Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) algorithms as well as Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Experience using Python to perform rapid prototyping for data cleaning, EDA, and data visualization including numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, etc.
Experience with data manipulation, quality assurance, data curation, data cleaning, normalization, analysis, or modeling
Experience with data visualizations tools such as Tableau, MicroStrategy or Power BI
Must be able to interact with all areas of business
Communication skills that can influence across organizations and at all levels including non-technical colleagues
Highly motivated, with a strong interest in finance and solving complex problems
Experience using R or SQL is preferred
Financial background is preferred
Responsibilities

Analysis: 85%
Establish data science as a capability within the firm
Engage with internal business partners to understand their questions and needs
Develop and maintain a process for identifying and prioritizing the questions with the highest business value
Create advanced analytics/models to facilitate and encourage data-driven decision making
Present findings to senior leaders in a manner comprehensible to their background
Generate financial insights and long-term trends that can be shared with clients
Attend conferences and seminars to sharpen skills with latest technologies and maintain knowledge of best practices
Mentor: 15%
Cultivate data science skills in junior colleagues
Support and contribute to the Analytics Center of Excellence
Further the data-driven culture of the firm by demonstrating the art of the possible
Education

Master of Science (M.S)

Work Experience

5+ years of experience as a Data Scientist",3.9,"Harbourvest
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
288,Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist,"$60k-$105k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Junior Python Developer / Data Scientist
Aurora, CO · Computer/SoftwareApply Now
Are you interested in developing advanced software systems to support national security? At Stratagem, we work with the U.S. Government to solve some of the most challenging problems concerning critical national missions.

Who is Stratagem
Stratagem is a small high-end software technology company that delivers operational solutions and performs advanced R&D for the DoD and Intelligence Community. We are built around the idea that we can make a lasting impact for our customers and employees and believe in a culture of innovation, fun, empowerment, and family. We want you to learn new skills so you can become more fulfilled in both your personal and professional life.

At Stratagem, our goal is to make our company the last company you work for!

Stratagem is hiring passionate, creative, and uniquely talented individuals to join our growing team. We look for candidates with exceptional problem-solving skills, a high level of creativity, and the ability to quickly learn evaluate and deploy new technologies. We also seek out individuals that are clear communicators and support their teammates with a sense of positivity and open-mindedness.

** TS/SCI Clearance with SSBI REQUIRED**
* DOD TOP SECRET or SECRET will be CONSIDERED **
** US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED **

This position, in either Aurora, CO or Valley Forge, PA, is for an early-career Data Scientist or a Python developer interested in transitioning into data science. You will support the development of cutting-edge predictive analytics by creating software tools and curating datasets containing adversarial behaviors (such as vehicle track data).

Responsibilities & Skills

Our ideal candidate is a software engineer or data scientist with experience creating software tools in Python and familiar with Python data science / machine learning libraries (e.g. Pandas, and scikit-learn).

As a Python Developer / Data Scientist, your responsibilities include:
Working with a small team consisting of developers and researchers to implement algorithms for tracking and fusion, and pattern of life software
Identifying statistically relevant features within big datasets to provide analysts with actionable data
Writing, evaluating, and integrating software into the existing architecture
Reviewing relevant publications in order to gain enough of an understanding of the underlying concepts in order to break down key ideas to government customers, and implement in software
Your core skills/experience include:
Experience with Python and any of the following Python data science / machine learning libraries: Pandas, and scikit-learn
Experience applying and/or developing algorithms based in statistical analysis
Experience with big data sets, preferably comprising of sensor data (e.g. GEOINT, and SIGINT)
Effective communicator with the ability to write and present technical reports
Experience writing technical documentation supporting code, program capabilities and user-guides
Experience with Gitlab, Github, Bitbucket, and/or Jenkins
Experience with Linux
2-5 years of experience, preferably in software development or as a data scientist
You are the proud owner of at least a DoD SECRET clearance
Bonus points if you have experience in any of the following:
Experience with implementing tracking and fusion, and pattern-of-life algorithms
Experience in application deployment, virtualization, and containerization
Experience with kinematics
You are the proud owner of a TS/SCI SSBI clearance",4.3,"Stratagem Group
4.3","Aurora, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
289,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,"$74k-$123k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.9,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
3.9","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
290,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
291,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
292,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
293,"Senior Scientist, Molecular Biology",-1,"Directed Genomics is looking for an exceptional and experienced senior research scientist to join a rapidly growing, multidisciplinary team who is providing contract Research and Development services for the NGS biotech community. Directed Genomics operate in the space between a traditional CRO, and a consulting agency, providing custom wet-lab and bioinformatic solutions for startup and established biotech companies alike.

The successful candidate will be working in a collaborative, dynamic team role - at times leading a project team, and at other times as a member of a project team, comprised of other senior scientists, associate scientists, and bioinformaticians. Projects may have the candidate working as an independent researcher, or as a team member of another project group. The candidate will oversee and be a point of contact with customers and with their project teams. In addition, the candidate will participate in; proposal generation for new projects, project reporting, and delivery of final methods/reports/training as needed.

Key Responsibilities
Execute scientific collaborations/contracts with clients
Work closely with senior scientists, computational biologists, and associate scientists
Develop and optimize novel NGS library preparation methods
Conduct product development and application development experiments
Supervise and coordinate experiments and data generation
Work closely with team members to design, implement, and troubleshoot experiments critical to the group’s collective success
Troubleshoot to resolve problems and participate in new technology evaluation, development, and implementation
Document, compile, and analyze experimental data
Attend and present at team meetings to share results, plan projects and experiments, and ensure that projects support team goals
Contribute to grant and proposal writing
Contribute to the overall culture and operations of the DGx laboratory
May perform other duties as assigned, including related lab management duties
Qualifications
PhD and 4+ years of postdoctoral experience in a relevant discipline; molecular or cell biology, biochemistry or related disciplines
2+ years of laboratory experience with Next Generation Sequencing
Hands-on experience with molecular biology, specifically Next Generation Sequencing (NGS)
Hands-on experience assay design and analysis
Hands-on experience with primer design
Hands-on experience with bioinformatics tools, and unix/linux OS
Experience with applications and/or product development
Ability to solve complex problems independently and as part of a team
Candidate should be a self-motivated fast learner and an innovative and analytical thinker
Candidate should possess outstanding interpersonal and communication skills
Demonstrated track record of, and continued interest in, working as a team member in a fast-paced contract environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills, lab notebook practices and attention to detail
Must be willing and able to develop and shift plans in service of a rapidly changing environment and troubleshoot to solve problems
To apply, please submit a cover letter and CV.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.directedgenomics.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/directed-genomics
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Directed Genomics,"Watertown, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
294,Autonomous Driving Data Engineer,"$99k-$178k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an experienced Big Data Engineer to help building up our large-scale data management system for the ADAS / Autonomous Driving team. This field allows contributions on various levels around the data pipeline and data processing, data annotation, machine learning, data ingestion, data pre-processing, integration of Deep Neural Network frameworks, efficient data search and high performance data manipulation.
You Will:
Work with a state-of-the-art data pipeline on the development and test process of the ADAS/AD features
Enable efficient data (pre-)processing in our cloud infrastructure
Contribute to the architecture and implementation of an efficient data ingestion process to transfer and store large-scale vehicle sensor data from our Lucid Air test vehicles efficiently into our data storage
Help to optimize the data storage, search and data processing based on a diverse mix of storage solutions, caching techniques and big data frameworks.
Contribute to the implementation of a secure distributed data access solution for data on-premise and via cloud providers to connect Lucid data with service providers and partners
Work with machine learning experts, testing engineers and software developers to solve challenging development problems
You Bring:
Knowledge of database systems, big data concepts and cluster computing frameworks (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, or other tools)
Excellence in C++, Python, Java or other related programming languages
Previous experience with big data applications or back-end software development
Experience with machine learning, data engineering, deep learning frameworks and related open-loop testing techniques
Strong communication skills
Great to Have:
Previous experience building efficient large-scale data collection, storage and processing pipelines
Understanding of cyber-security issues and best practices
Advanced degrees preferred
Education:
BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science/Engineering, Data Engineering or other related fields
4+ years of work experience or a PhD in a related field
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
295,Data Engineer,"$48k-$95k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Data Engineer you will spend your days finding ways to unlock value from large sets of data in an Azure environment in support of executive decision making and daily operations. You'll do so as part of a complete product team including user experience designers, business analysts, and software engineers/developers. You'll do so in a modern data science tech stack of open source tools and cloud services.

Experience and Education

Skills/Experience:

Support and develop data flows by developing processes that verify, standardize, and scale data input, transformation, and storage.
Expert knowledge in Data Migration, Data transfer, and SQL query script writing.
Self-starter and quick learner that is capable of finishing Data interface projects with minimal supervision.
Collaborate with Data Analysts, Visualization Experts, and Customer-facing advisors to support and develop our data and analytics reporting offerings.
Research and implement cutting edge solutions to solve challenges related to ETL/ELT, data processing, and analytics.
Support efforts by the Data Science and Data Analytics teams.
Discover non-functional requirements, risks, and enterprise strategy deviations while working with project teams.
Identify appropriate data sources for application use.
Profile and analyze data.
Create or validate system context diagrams, logical data models, and integration designs.
Generate data flow diagrams (DFD).
Create or validate data mappings.
Ensure new data sources, mappings, and models are correctly captured in enterprise repositories.
Conduct technical reviews to ensure the application data models and flows have been correctly implemented.
Participate in Integration/System testing.
Discover non-functional requirements, risks, and enterprise strategy deviations while working with project teams.
Identify appropriate data sources for application use.
Profile and analyze data.
Create or validate system context diagrams, logical data models, and integration designs.
Generate data flow diagrams (DFD).
Create or validate data mappings.
Ensure new data sources, mappings, and models are correctly captured in enterprise repositories.
Automate the external data interfaces and the Power Automate flows to replace manual steps.

Desirable Skills/Experience:

Experience with modern data structure design and data engineering.
Experience with Azure Data Factory, COSMOS, Azure SQL, Azure Synapse Platform and Data Lakes and Data Warehouse tools and technology.
A drive to learn and share knowledge about emerging data science tools and practices.
3-7 years of relevant experience.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or similar.
Ability to obtain a USCIS Public Trust Clearance.

Benefits and unique perks offered, but not limited to:
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA)
401(k) Matching Program
10 Paid Holidays
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Short-Term and Long-Term Disability
Basic and Voluntary Life Insurance
Education Assistance Program
Award Incentive Programs: Leader of the Year, Employee of the Quarter, Energy Award
Scholarship Award Program
Referral Incentive Program
Employee Longevity Recognition

JANUS Research Group provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request in order to express interest in a position by e-mailing:

Judy Pagac
Director of Human Resources
judy.pagac@janusresearch.com
(706) 364-9100

Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within JANUS Research Group will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with JANUS Research Group.

Janus Research Group participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.",3.5,"JANUS Research Group
3.5","Evans, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
296,Data Engineer,"$93k-$165k
(Glassdoor Est.)","sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
297,Data Scientist - Member Experience,"$88k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","#TeamNextdoor


Nextdoor is the neighborhood hub for you, your neighbors, and the broader local community. Nextdoor's purpose is to cultivate a kinder world where everyone has a neighborhood they can rely on.

Real-world connections are a universal human need and neighborhoods are one of the most important contexts in which we form them. This is a guiding principle for Nextdoor. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in neighborhoods around the world in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, France, the Netherlands, Italy, Spain, Sweden, Denmark, Australia and Canada, with many more to come.

Meet your Future Neighbors


The Data Science team at Nextdoor is part of the Data org, which also includes Business Intelligence and Data Engineering. At a high level, the Data org is responsible for the building and maintenance of data infrastructure as well as the use of that infrastructure for internal reporting, analysis, and modeling. Data Science at Nextdoor is responsible for design and oversight of product experiments, analysis and modeling to drive company and product strategy, and, where applicable, the deployment of online and offline models to a production environment. We use a semi-embedded team structure, in which a group of data team members works on a specific product or pillar, interfacing directly with product and engineering stakeholders. The Data Science group is made up of people from a diverse set of backgrounds and perspectives, trained in fields as wide-ranging as psychology, geology, physics, and statistics. Data Scientists at Nextdoor serve as the mathematical decision scientists for their product group and play an active and collaborative role in improving the product.

The Impact You'll Make

On the Member Experience pillar, Data Scientists have the opportunity to work across a wide range of problem areas, including analysis of real-time feed ranking, design and oversight of experiments covering new product experiences, statistical modeling of network effects, the development and deployment of member segmentation models, and the study and modeling of the member journey. The work is essential to the growth and success of the company and involves frequent opportunities to deploy code as well as showcase progress to teammates, stakeholders, and company leadership.

Requirements
Advanced degree in a quantitative field and 2+ years work experience in data science or machine learning, or equivalent
Excellent knowledge of Python, including common scientific computing packages and data science tools such as numpy, pandas, and scikit-learn
Deep expertise with methods, tools, and packages for statistical modeling and machine learning
Advanced knowledge of SQL
Intermediate knowledge of at least one big data technology such as Hive, Presto, or Spark
Basic knowledge of web applications and service-oriented architecture
Excellent written and oral communication, including ability to effectively communicate complexity to a diverse group of stakeholders
Curiosity about how things work, from both a business and technical perspective
A collaborative spirit, a love for the work, and a commitment to community
Bonus Points
Work experience related to social or community-based products
Expertise deploying models to production
Expertise in testing and evaluating the impact of network effects
At Nextdoor, we empower our employees to build stronger local communities. To create a platform where all feel welcome, we want our workforce to reflect the diversity of the customers we seek to serve. We encourage everyone interested in our purpose to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or any other trait that unfairly targets a group of people. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we always consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.6,"Nextdoor
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
298,Production Senior Associate Scientist,"$61k-$137k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Overview: * At the heart of QIAGEN’s business is a vision to make improvements in life possible. We are on an exciting mission to make a real difference in science and healthcare. We are still the entrepreneurial company we started out as and have today achieved a size where we can bring our full power to many initiatives and to our presence across the globe. Our most valuable asset are our employees – more than 5000 in over 35 locations around the world. Our ambition is to ensure we have outstanding and passionate people working in the best teams and we are constantly looking for new talent to join us. There are few players who have shaped the world of modern science and healthcare as much as QIAGEN, and we have only just started. If you are looking to advance your career, are seeking new challenges and opportunities, enjoy working in dynamic and international, diverse teams and want to make a real impact on people’s lives, then QIAGEN is where you need to be. Join us. At QIAGEN, you make a difference every day *Position Description: * We are currently seeking a Bioinformatics Specialist to work with product development scientists to develop software for assay design and analysis of qPCR data. The assay design and analysis software supports both internal product development needs and customer-facing services. The position requires both strong coding ability and expertise in PCR assay design. *Primary responsibilities: * * Responsible for manual/automated production in compliance with relevant regulations and Standard Operating Procedures. * Independently conduct bench testing and research studies following guidance from senior level manager or clear instructions. * Able to understand and performs biochemical, cellular and molecular biology techniques, including but not limited to, formulation, cell culture, nucleic acid extraction, real-time PCR, ELISA and spectrophotometric. * Monitor and maintain the proper operation of general lab environment and instrumentation. * Maintain accurate, detailed, written records of laboratory procedures, results and conclusions. Adhere to and accurately complete all production-related documentation. Perform and report interim analysis of accumulated data to monitor work process. Concludes results from raw data to meaningful terms, e.g., numbers, graphs or simple forms. * Contribute to cross-functional process improvement initiatives. Conduct research studies following sufficient guidance from senior level manager. * Participate in the writing/change in documentation as well as the initiation in production-related deviations and nonconformities. * Supports projects within his/her expertise and experience. Develops and improves new skills and knowledge necessary to successfully support assigned projects. * Other duties as assigned. *Position Requirements: * Bachelor or Master of Science degree on biology or chemistry and with over 6 years of related working experiences. Strong molecular biology and Chemistry skills. Good communication skill and team player. Ability to understand working process of robotic system. * BS or MS in Molecular Biology, Biochemistry, Chemistry or related Life Sciences fields, with basic knowledge to understand the experiment design. * Have essential bench skills to perform lab tasks. Significant experiences in the biotech industry working in process development, process scale up, or manufacturing. * Ability to plan the use of equipment, materials and personal time, and to complete production-related documentation accurately. * Ability to read and follow professional journals or technical procedures. Ability to write reports and procedure manuals. Good communication skills in speaking, writing and presentation. * Ability to solve practical problems and deal with variables in situations where only limited standardization exists. Ability to interpret instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form. * To perform this job successfully, the candidate should have knowledge of Microsoft Excel and Spreadsheet formulation, Power Point and Word Processing software. * Able to adapt quickly to changes of working environment and management; value teamwork with a positive attitude of cooperation. Multi-task while maintaining a professional demeanor. The candidate should be a quick learner for new technology and skills. * Physically capable to perform the essential functions of this job. Specific vision abilities required by this job include ability to adjust focus. * No travel required. This job has no supervisory responsibilities. *What We Offer* At the heart of QIAGEN are our people who drive our success. We act with passion, always challenging the status quo to drive innovation and continuous improvement. We inspire with our leadership and make an impact with our actions. We create a collaborative, safe and engaging workplace which forms the basis for high performing individuals and teams. We drive accountability and entrepreneurial decision-making and want you to excel your growth and shape the future of QIAGEN. QIAGEN is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, or disability. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $75,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Disability insurance * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Supplemental Pay: * Bonus pay Experience: * PCR, ELISA, Spectrophotometric: 3 years (Required) * iochemical, cellular and molecular biology techniques: 3 years (Required) * biochemical, cellular and molecular biology techniques: 3 years (Required) * formulation, cell culture, nucleic acid extraction: 3 years (Required) * general lab environment and instrumentation: 3 years (Required) Education: * Master's (Preferred) Work Location: * One location Work Remotely: * No",3.5,"QIAGEN
3.5","Frederick, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
299,Senior Data Scientist,"$76k-$125k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Mars Agency is a global marketing practice, specializing in marketing to shoppers, consumers and retailers across the ever-expanding omni-commerce environment. Mars uniquely refers to this environment as the A-to-V Commerce SM space, which incorporates everything from Autonomous to Voice commerce.

Mars, proud of its independence and growth-for-clients focus, operates internationally across the Americas, Europe and Asia through its network of 13 offices.

We are currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist to work out of our Bentonville or Detroit office.

The Senior Data Scientist serves as a key member of the team building out the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling and advanced analytics offering, evolving statistical modeling and analytics with technology to develop a best-in-class platform for measurement, evaluation and marketing ROI.
What You’ll Do:
Assist in the development and implementation of the agency’s shopper marketing mix modeling platform.
Lead the continued development of the Analytics capability for the agency, helping to define the role of Analytics in all aspects of a program from planning to measurement.
Work to enhance the agency’s overall Business Intelligence offering and analytics strategy.
Define and develop compelling analytic opportunities that complement the agency’s business and result in incremental category growth opportunities for our clients.
Synthesize data from a variety of sources including IRI, Nielsen, media, customer specific POS, shopper loyalty databases, consumer research and category management tools to identify and prioritize business-building opportunities.
Consult on data strategy for the agency, in collaboration with data strategy lead. Identify potential data sources and key data points to be captured, outlining and thinking about potential future uses.
Interface with clients and internal team members to explain complex analytic concepts in an easy to understand way.
Promote advanced analytic and data science capabilities during new business pitches and within the agency’s existing clients.
Provide recommendations for cloud analytics technology and be part of the team implementing.
Work with Python and its libraries, SQL, Spark, and R, all via a Cloud-based platform.

What You Bring to Us:
Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a related field, such as statistics, mathematics, econometrics, data science, computer science, or marketing.
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience in consumer marketing or shopper marketing insights and analytics, particularly in the CPG and retail industries.
Dynamic personality able to effectively engage and influence a variety of audiences.
Proficient on querying and reducing data from large database repositories and/or flat files.
At lease 2 years of experience in/with: building efficient data processing pipelines for analytical systems using cloud based technology.
Knowledge of the digital marketing ecosystem and fluency with common web technologies, as well as knowledge of media platforms (Google DFP, Google DFA, Facebook) and 3rd Party Tools (Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google AdWords) as well as experience with CRM Data Analysis.
Hands-on experience with experimental design, offer testing methodology,
descriptive statistics, hypothesis testing, econometric modeling, and regression analysis.
Passion about business and dissatisfaction with the status quo – always thinking of ways to improve/grow the function.
Proficiency in IRI and Nielsen systems, data management and analytics tools, and data visualization software (Tableau preferred).
Leadership and organizational skills.
Capable of handling multiple projects simultaneously.
High level of energy and enthusiasm.
Comfortable with high pressure, fluid and ambiguous situations.
Ability to travel on an as-needed basis.

The Mars Agency is an Equal Opportunity Employer and will recruit, hire, train and promote persons in all job classifications without regard to race, ancestry, creed, color, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability or handicap, HIV, veteran, marital or family status, or any other status or condition protected by applicable state and/or federal laws, except where a bonafide occupational qualification applies.

The Mars Agency has developed a wide variety of inclusive benefit plans and policies that address and promote the needs of all employees and their family members, including comprehensive group health plans, a parental leave program that includes paid maternity and paternity benefits for pregnancy, adoption and surrogacy, flexible paid time off, a broad and confidential employee assistance program, ongoing wellness support initiatives, trusted financial health advice and guidance, promotion of education through tuition support and assistance, and a flexible and supportive work environment and culture.",3.3,"The Mars Agency
3.3","Rogers, AR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
300,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,"$43k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.6,"Summa Health System
3.6","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
301,"Specialist, Data Engineer","$84k-$157k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description:

Data Engineer Specialist

Collaborate with Innovative 3Mers Around the World

Choosing where to start and grow your career has a major impact on your professional and personal life, so it’s equally important you know that the company that you choose to work at, and its leaders, will support and guide you. With a diversity of people, global locations, technologies and products, 3M is a place where you can collaborate with 93,000 other curious, creative 3Mers.

“A long-lasting career at 3M comes from having vision, imagination and the ability to see what doesn’t exist. 3Mers are groundbreaking innovators and it’s important that we give every person the space for disruptive and creative thinking.” – John Banovetz, senior vice president and chief technology officer at 3M

This position provides an opportunity to transition from other private, public, government or military environments to a 3M career.

The Impact You’ll Make in this Role

As a Data Engineer Specialist, you will have the opportunity to tap into your curiosity and collaborate with some of the most innovative and diverse people around the world. Here, you will make an impact by:

Supporting manufacturing locations globally by creating and supporting data reporting and analytics so users in various manufacturing roles can make optimal decisions.
In this role, you will collect and document requirements for data access and KPI reporting, then lead the development for the report, either within a scrum framework or on a project team.
Joining a high-profile rapid-response team for key reporting projects and contribute expertise as needed
Maintain a high degree of integrity and an established reputation for completing difficult projects

Your Skills and Expertise

To set you up for success in this role from day one, 3M is looking for candidates who must have the following qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or higher (completed and verified prior to start) from an accredited institution
Ten (10) combined years experience in SAP data warehouse, HANA, and BI Reporting and Analytics

Additional qualifications that could help you succeed even further in this role include:

Strong knowledge of 3M legacy data systems (GEDW, MES, etc)
Experience with the agile process and scrum development teams
Experience with enterprise report development with minimally defined, complex requirements
Experience with Cloud access and development for manufacturing reporting
Possesses knowledge and understanding of Manufacturing and Supply Chain and business unit organizations
Strong proficiency with analytical tools – Business Objects, Power BI, Web Intelligence, SQL
Experience with SCPA and SAP Supply Chain Service Reports

Location: Maplewood, MN and may consider remote U.S. work location

Travel: May include up to 10% [domestic/international]

Relocation Assistance: May be authorized

Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B status).

Supporting Your Well-being

3M offers many programs to help you live your best life – both physically and financially. To ensure competitive pay and benefits, 3M regularly benchmarks with other companies that are comparable in size and scope.

Resources for You

For more details on what happens before, during and after the interview process, check out the Insights for Candidates page at 3M.com/careers.

Learn more about 3M’s creative solutions to the world’s problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M.

Responsibilities of this position include that corporate policies, procedures and security standards are complied with while performing assigned duties.

3M is an equal opportunity employer. 3M will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.

Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.

3M Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at 3M are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.",3.9,"3M
3.9","Maplewood, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
302,Data Scientist - Business Solutions,"$88k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","#TeamNextdoor


Nextdoor is the neighborhood hub for you, your neighbors, and the broader local community. Nextdoor's purpose is to cultivate a kinder world where everyone has a neighborhood they can rely on.

Real-world connections are a universal human need and neighborhoods are one of the most important contexts in which we form them. This is a guiding principle for Nextdoor. Today, neighbors rely on Nextdoor in neighborhoods around the world in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, France, the Netherlands, Italy, Spain, Sweden, Denmark, Australia and Canada, with many more to come.

Meet your Future Neighbors


The Data Science team at Nextdoor is part of the Data org, which also includes Business Intelligence and Data Engineering. At a high level, the Data org is responsible for the building and maintenance of data infrastructure as well as the use of that infrastructure for internal reporting, analysis, and modeling. Data Science at Nextdoor is responsible for design and oversight of product experiments, analysis and modeling to drive company and product strategy, and, where applicable, the deployment of online and offline models to a production environment. We use a semi-embedded team structure, in which a group of data team members works on a specific product or pillar, interfacing directly with product and engineering stakeholders. The Data Science group is made up of people from a diverse set of backgrounds and perspectives, trained in fields as wide-ranging as psychology, geology, physics, and statistics. Data Scientists at Nextdoor serve as the mathematical decision scientists for their product group and play an active and collaborative role in improving the product.

The Impact You'll Make


On the Business Solutions pillar, Data Scientists have the opportunity to work across a wide range of problem areas, including analysis of real-time auction dynamics, design and oversight of experiments covering the ad system and ad display products, the development and deployment of action-rate models and methods for audience targeting, and the study and modeling of the customer lifecycle. The work is essential to the growth and success of the company and involves frequent opportunities to deploy code as well as showcase progress to teammates, stakeholders, and company leadership.

Requirements
Advanced degree in a quantitative field and 2+ years work experience in data science or machine learning, or equivalent
Excellent knowledge of Python, including common scientific computing packages and data science tools such as numpy, pandas, and scikit-learn
Deep expertise with methods, tools, and packages for statistical modeling and machine learning
Advanced knowledge of SQL
Intermediate knowledge of at least one big data technology such as Hive, Presto, or Spark
Basic knowledge of web applications and service-oriented architecture
Excellent written and oral communication, including ability to effectively communicate complexity to a diverse group of stakeholders
Curiosity about how things work, from both a business and technical perspective
A collaborative spirit, a love for the work, and a commitment to community
Bonus Points
Work experience related to auctions or real-time markets
Expertise deploying models to production
Knowledge of action-rate models
At Nextdoor, we empower our employees to build stronger local communities. To create a platform where all feel welcome, we want our workforce to reflect the diversity of the customers we seek to serve. We encourage everyone interested in our purpose to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, religion, sexual orientation, age, or any other trait that unfairly targets a group of people. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we always consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.",4.6,"Nextdoor
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
303,Director of Data Science,"$113k-$186k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


Analysis Group is one of the largest international economics consulting firms, with more than 1,000 professionals across 14 offices in North America, Europe, and Asia. Since 1981, we have provided expertise in economics, finance, health care analytics, and strategy to top law firms, Fortune Global 500 companies, and government agencies worldwide. Our internal experts, together with our network of affiliated experts from academia, industry, and government, offer our clients exceptional breadth and depth of expertise.

Analysis Group provides economic, financial, and strategy consulting to law firms, corporations, and government agencies. At Analysis Group, Data Science is a center of excellence within a company that already has decades of experience focused on analysis involving data. Within Data Science, the Director of Data Science is charged with collaborating with leading internal and external academic experts to find creative solutions to some of the most challenging and high-value problems we face.

The Director of Data Science contributes to both client engagements and to the design and development of internal data science tools and infrastructure. The client work is diverse, utilizing a wide variety of complex and novel data sources, and supporting cases across industries including: finance, healthcare, antitrust, intellectual property, energy, and technology. The tool and infrastructure work assists the firm in developing cutting-edge data science and high-performance computing techniques for common business challenges.

The Director of Data Science helps Analysis Group in maintaining our leadership position in terms of advancing methodology and data computations, and works to increase Data Science knowledge within the firm, both through mentorship to more junior Data Science team members and via interactions with Consulting teams. The Director also is involved in recruiting, assisting in building out the team over time.

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities:
Work with project teams to creatively address data science/computing challenges
Take initiative to identify opportunities for technology to enhance service offerings
Act as a resource and participate in client engagements and research as part of the project team
Maintain up-to-date knowledge of data science and computing tools, providing technical training and helping to grow the in-house knowledge base
Present research at selected conferences; serving as an expert
Maintain individual contributions while providing mentorship to other data scientists and analysts conducting work such as:
Optimize procedures for managing and accessing large databases (e.g., insurance claims, electronic health records, financial transactions)
Create interactive analytics portals and data visualizations (e.g., using R/Shiny, Python/Flask, D3)
Build and maintaining high performance computing (HPC) tools on grid and cloud computing environments
Develop and reviewing open source macros and packages in R, Python and other Object Oriented Languages
Establish optimized procedures for repetitive or computationally intensive tasks (C, C++, Cuda-C)
Use natural language processing methodologies to work with EMR data, social media data and other unstructured data
Contribute to team growth/development via assistance with advisorship and recruiting
Contribute to firm’s strategy for data science tools and infrastructure
Qualifications
Track record of using data to solve real-world problems
Experience applying multiple software tools and languages to provide data-driven analytical solutions to decision makers or research teams
Strong credentials and experience in database management and data visualization
PhD or advanced degree in computer science or data science-related field, with relevant experience. Other candidates with at least three years of relevant experience in the field will also be considered
Background in Statistics/Econometrics or Biostatistics
Extensive experience in programming languages like Python, C++, Java
Knowledge of R, Shiny and SQL
Familiar with online/cloud computing/storage (e.g., AWS)
Linux and basic system administration experience
Demonstrated experience working on project teams and collaborating with others
Strong communication skills
­
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.8,"Analysis Group
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
304,Scientist,"$46k-$105k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why Join Revenue Analytics?
Because you have exceptional talents and you want to be part of a fun and highly collaborative team that creates analytical products and solutions to eliminate the unknowns in business problems for world-renowned companies.

What's In It For You?
· Competitive base salary
· 100% paid healthcare including medical, dental, and vision coverage for our employees and their families
· 100% paid life insurance, long and short-term disability coverage for team members
· 401k plan with a generous match and is vested immediately
· Company issued cell phone or phone allowance
· 18 days PTO, 9 paid holidays, and unlimited sick time
· Gym membership reimbursement
· Flexible work arrangements
· Once again voted a Top Workplace in Atlanta in 2020!

Come help us execute the vision and roadmap for our product analytics and hey, while you’re at it…why not give our customers the confidence and trust that they’re making the best pricing decisions possible (all provided by your whip-smart data and analytics chops)?
A Day In the Life
You will develop and implement the predictive analytics models that form the backbone of our products, leveraging Revenue Analytics precedent and Atlas toolkits
Translate business needs and processes into modeling requirements
Do parameter tuning of forecast and/or optimization models to best fit a customer’s data
Deliver analysis and models results that meet key Quality Assurance standards (i.e., reasonability checks, error checks, etc.)
Communicate your analysis, models, and insights effectively in business language to customers and internal Team Members
Effectively explain to customers and prospects how the analytics in our products work and address customer questions about model recommendations
Complete analysis in a repeatable way that can be leveraged across multiple customers and situations
Keep up to speed with data science trends and news so that you can incorporate new methodologies and approaches as appropriate.
Who You Are
Master’s degree or foreign equivalent in Operations Research, Economics, Engineering, or another applied mathematics discipline and at least one year of experience applying research to Revenue or Yield Management issues
In lieu of a master's or the foreign equivalent degree and one year of stated experience, we will accept a Ph.D. or foreign equivalent degree in one of the above specified fields
Must also have experience solving business problems using statistics, machine learning or optimization; and using Python, R, or SQL analytical tools
Who We Are
A pioneer of Revenue Management, Revenue Analytics is an enterprise SaaS company that partners with hospitality, media, and passenger rail companies to solve their most complex pricing challenges. By leveraging powerful analytics and deep strategic experience, Revenue Analytics’ next-generation software delivers intuitive answers to help companies perfect their pricing, reclaim missed revenue, and take back their time. To learn more about how Revenue Analytics is recreating Revenue Management, visit revenueanalytics.com or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn.

Revenue Analytics embraces diversity and is an equal opportunity. We are committed to building a Team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Revenue Analytics
4.1","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
305,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,"$70k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",3.9,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
3.9","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
306,"Quantitative Analyst, Investing Intelligence","$82k-$158k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Are you an Analytics Indiana Jones? Do you enjoy digging up unique insights in the strangest, most remote datasets, but you know how to properly handle artifacts? If you answered “yes” to any of those questions, then we would love to talk with you about joining our Investing Intelligence team as a Quantitative Analyst

Our purpose at The Motley Fool is to help people become Smarter, Happier, and Richer. We educate people on everything from how to choose the best credit card to how to make the most of their 401(k). The Economist has called The Motley Fool “an ethical oasis” within the financial industry, and we are looking to expand our unique brand of advice to even more kinds of financial conundrums.

If you think you have what it takes to join our band of merry Fools, please send us your resume and Foolishly written cover letter!

Required Qualifications:
• You have undergraduate training in either Statistics, Finance, Economics or a similar discipline and 4 years of applied experience. Or, you have a similar graduate degree with 2 years of experience.

• You’re fascinated by markets and investing. You’ve either applied your quantitative skills to markets as a professional or as a passionate hobbyist. (Self-taught hackers who can show their skills are always welcome!)

• You write terse, powerful code in R or Python, both for interactive analysis and building robust, analytics systems.

• SQL is your jam. You don't just query a database – you interrogate it. Bonus points for advanced experience building functions and stored procedures and comfort specifically with SQL Server and PostgreSQL.

• You find unconventional solutions to questions that aren't covered in textbooks. You're comfortable working with dirty data, nonparametric analysis and drawing conclusions from incomple inf...

Preferred Skills:
• You got the jokes in the last section.

• You have experience working with financial data, particularly index development, factor research, strategy backtesting and performance attribution.

• You can tell your histograms from your Lorenz curves and know your way around visualization tools, like ggplot2 and matplotlib, and reporting platforms, like Periscope Data and Tableau.

• You’re a full stack quant and know how to get your hands dirty with less glamorous tasks like data cleaning and ETL. You've developed robust ETL pipelines, using tools like Talend, Xplenty and Microsoft SSIS.

Key Projects and Responsibilities:

• Collaborate with the other analysts on original alpha research, searching the universe for factors that help our models beat the stock market

• Conduct Brinson and factor-based performance attribution to help the Fool’s fundamental research analysts and services understand their performance and make better decisions.

• Help design and implement a robust system meant to keep data from various sources clean and flowing to the team’s research

• Conduct ad-hoc research for stakeholders across the marketing, product and investing teams into what investment strategies and policies generate the best returns

• Pitch in on efforts to infuse data-driven investing insights throughout our business lines.",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
307,Data Scientist,-1,"Fidelity TalentSource is your destination for discovering your next temporary role at Fidelity Investments. We are currently sourcing for a Data Scientist to work at Fidelity in Boston, MA.

At Fidelity’s Artificial Intelligence Center of Excellence (COE), you won’t be just tinkering around the edges, you’ll be building critical solutions that will benefit our clients for years to come. We work closely with business partners, collect requirements and deliver high value AI/ML solutions that drive customer and business value. Those of us who love to work with data see this as the pinnacle of opportunities that you cannot find anywhere else in the industry.

These positions are all located in Boston, MA.

The Team

The AIML (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) team contributes to the vitality and growth of the organization through researching and building complex, cutting edge and scalable AI algorithms, models, platforms and technologies to significantly improve customer experience and drive business results. Our team of high caliber scientists, mathematicians and statisticians use rigorous quantitative approaches to ensure that we are efficiently building algorithms and technology relevant to the business or customer experience issue at hand.

The Expertise You Have
Minimum Master’s Degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Computational Statistics, Operations Research, Machine Learning or related technical fields.
Advanced knowledge in model evaluation, tuning and performance, operationalization and scalability of scientific techniques and establishing decision strategies.
Hands on experience developing supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms (regression, decision trees/random forest, neural networks, feature selection/reduction, clustering, parameter tuning, etc.),
Experience in evaluating and making decisions around the use of new or existing tools for a project.
Experience in projects involving large scale-multi dimensional databases, complex business infrastructure, and cross-functional teams. Three to five successfully launched ML projects would be ideal.
Programming skills in Python, Spark, Scala, R or MatLab
The Skills You Bring
Your solid skills in algorithm development and predictive modeling
You have deep knowledge of some combination of the following:
Natural Language Processing (NLP)
Deep Learning, Neural Networks
Real Time Event Detection and Scoring
Time series analysis, Econometrics
Robotic Process Automation
Cloud ML
The Value You Deliver

You will partner with business stakeholders to identify/prioritize top AI opportunities, create business/technical requirements, transform large volumes of data into AI-driven solutions using creative, cutting edge open source methods/technologies, lead ML strategy and road map planning, work across teams and influence the direction of external teams. The ideal candidate will combine experienced AI/ML/Open Source/Tech knowledge with hands on experience building algorithms/models/programming and outstanding business skills (revenue/cost drivers, customer experience, customer journey, communication, etc.) to manage and deliver complex/critical projects driving significant value to Fidelity.

Company Culture

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and furthering a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates.

Company Overview

We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skillset and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource.

For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Company Overview

Fidelity TalentSource, formerly Veritude, is the in-house temporary staffing provider for Fidelity Investments, one of the largest and most diversified global financial services firms in the industry. We recruit individuals from a variety of backgrounds, including technology and customer service, to fill assignments across Fidelity’s U.S.-based regional and investor center locations. If you would like to experience Fidelity’s diverse and inclusive workplace while expanding your skill set and developing your professional network, consider a role with Fidelity TalentSource. For information about working at Fidelity TalentSource, visit FTSJobs.com.

Information about Fidelity Investments

At Fidelity, we are focused on making our financial expertise broadly accessible and effective in helping people live the lives they want. We are a privately held company that places a high degree of value in creating and nurturing a work environment that attracts the best talent and reflects our commitment to our associates. We are proud of our diverse and inclusive workplace where we respect and value our associates for their unique perspectives and experiences. For information about working at Fidelity, visit FidelityCareers.com.

Fidelity Investments and Fidelity TalentSource are equal opportunity employers.",3.9,"Fidelity TalentSource
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
308,Lead Data Scientist,"$111k-$178k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
309,Healthcare Data Analyst - Orthopaedics Administration,"$36k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center

Location: US:PA:Hershey

Work Type: Full Time

FTE: 1.0

Shift: Days
Hours: Monday - Friday ; 8:00 AM - 4:30 PM

Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is searching for an outcome driven Healthcare Data Analyst to support our Orthopaedics Administration team!

The Healthcare Data Analyst, Orthopaedics Administration is responsible for customer-focused reporting, analysis, and data visualization, providing support to the leadership of the Academic Practice Division of the Penn State Health System. In addition, the analyst facilitates the development and maintenance of data collection, analysis, and reporting of internal and external information to assist leadership in making sound business decisions.

The Department of Orthopaedics and Rehabilitation at Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is committed to advancing our field through scientific discovery and education. Our faculty, clinicians, and researchers have been recognized by U.S. News & World Report, ranking as one of the best hospitals in the nation for 2020-21 in orthopedic care.

The Healthcare Data Analyst selected for this vital role will promote data integrity through using and developing standard based measures and will be tasked with data preparation for submission of data to national and specialty registries as well as creating functional department dashboards to present to department leadership.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare beginning day one, multiple time off programs to ensure that our employees can enjoy strong life/work balance, and tuition programs to ensure that our team members have the resources to grow professionally.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's Degree in Business, Mathematics, Statistics, Applied Science, Healthcare Management, or related field. Three (3) years of experience in data analysis, reporting, and documentation.

Ability to work collaboratively in a team structure.

Strong Excel skills (pivot tables, v-lookups, graphing, macros and VBA scripting). Understanding of relational databases and querying techniques (e.g. SQL).

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

MBA/MHA preferred. Experience with Cerner EMR preferred.

Experience with Qlik (BI Analytics tool) is advantageous.

Experience in and/or understanding of the academic healthcare environment is a plus.

Process improvement experience is desirable.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is fundamentally committed to the diversity of our faculty and staff. We believe diversity is unapologetically expressing itself through every person's perspectives and lived experiences. We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, national or ethnic origin, political affiliation, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, veteran status, and family medical or genetic information. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.7,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.7","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
310,Machine Learning Engineer,"$78k-$138k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Video & Image Understanding Group develops and applies cutting-edge computer vision and deep learning techniques to solve problems in object detection, recognition, localization & tracking; biometrics; 3D scene reconstruction; threat detection; vision-aided navigation; and situational awareness. Our projects integrate algorithmic research, software engineering, and application system development to produce innovative capabilities that address challenging national security problems. We actively collaborate with research engineers across STR, as well as with academic researchers and industry partners to develop practical and powerful computer vision solutions.

The Role:
Develop, implement and evaluate machine learning algorithms to detect, segment, classify and track objects in diverse imaging modalities.
Apply machine learning techniques to integrate information from multiple looks and multiple modalities to improve scene understanding capabilities.
Develop and apply transfer learning and domain adaptation techniques to solve scene understanding problems where limited measured training data is available.
Perform data analysis on experimental data and identify performance improvement strategies.
Transition machine learning algorithms to prototype and/or real-time systems demonstrations.
Who You Are:
BS, MS or PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Applied Mathematics or related technical discipline
Strong scientific software development skills
Independent analytical problem-solving skills
Experience in machine learning techniques, particularly deep learning
Motivated collaborator and excellent communicator to both technical and non-technical audiences
Some Other Relevant Skills You May Have:
Experience with Python and C/C++
Experience in developing and applying machine learning techniques to solving computer vision problems",4.2,"Systems & Technology Research
4.2","Beavercreek, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
311,Data Scientist,"$84k-$138k
(Glassdoor Est.)","PIC Groups client is currently seeking a Data Scientist for a Direct hire position in Atlanta, GA!

As part of its continued business development program PIC has established a Remote Operating Center (ROC) within its Atlanta, GA Corporate Office with the capability to monitor, operate and evaluate plant anywhere in the world. The current focus of the ROC is wind, solar, reciprocating engine and simple cycle gas turbine-based power plant but coverage is also provided for process plant and other industrial facilities.

In order to provide the maximum value to its Clients PIC has a requirement to analyze and interpret the large quantity of plant data being received and stored in the ROC. While day-to-day operational issues are handled by our team of experience control room operators we have now identified a requirement for a Data Scientist to join our team to develop and implement the data analysis techniques and systems by which we can provide additional insight to improve facility availability, efficiency and performance.

In this role, you should be highly analytical with a proven talent for data analysis, math and statistics. Critical thinking and problem-solving skills are considered essential for interpreting data, and a passion for machine-learning and research will be a key requirement of the job.

Responsible for analyzing large amounts of raw information to identify patterns and trends that will help improve our performance and that of our Clients. An additional responsibility will be the identification and selection of the necessary tools and support required to accomplish these goals. We will rely on you to build data products to extract valuable business insights and help our company to make better decisions.

Objectives of this Role
•Collaborate with PIC management and operations to develop an understanding of needs.
•Identifying the data-analytics problems that offer the greatest opportunities to the organization
•Determining the correct data sets and variables
•Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources
•Clean and validate the data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity
•Devise and apply models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data
•Analyze the data to identify patterns and trends
•Interpret the data to discover solutions and opportunities
•Propose solutions and strategies to business challenges
•Collaborate with engineering, sales and operations teams
•Communicate findings to stakeholders using visualization and other means
•Evaluate and select software tools and systems to support the data analysis process
•Keep current with technical and industry developments
•Write case studies and papers to promote PIC’s capabilities for presentation at industry shows and for industry publications.

Required Experience:

•Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
•Problem-solving aptitude
•5+ years demonstrable successful experience in data science
•Proficiency with data mining, mathematics, and statistical analysis
•Understanding of machine-learning and operations research
•Knowledge of R, SQL and Python; familiarity with Scala, Java or C++ is an asset
•Advanced pattern recognition and predictive modeling experience
•Analytical mind and business acumen
•Excellent communication and presentation skills
•Comfortable working in a dynamic, results-oriented group with multiple ongoing concurrent projects

Preferred Experience and Qualifications:
•Familiarity with, and understanding of, power generation technologies including wind, solar, reciprocating engine and gas turbines.
•Previous experience analyzing and interpreting power plant data
•Master’s or PhD degree in stats, applied math, or related discipline
•2+ years of project management experience.

We are proud to offer competitive wages and benefits. Prior to beginning work, all applicants must be willing to submit to a drug and alcohol screen as well as a background check, inclusive of criminal. We seek out and employ talented individuals who meet the qualifications for each position. PIC Group, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Due to the large number of responses we receive to our postings, only those applicants with the required experience and qualifications will be contacted.",2.9,"PIC Group Inc.
2.9","Atlanta, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
312,"Data Transformation Engineer, Medical Diagnostics",-1,"_*The Company*_
The world is facing a medical crisis, bacteria are increasingly evolving resistance to even our strongest antibiotics. The problem is already very real and immediate; for example, bloodstream infection leading to sepsis is now responsible for more than half of all deaths in hospitals and is the most expensive condition treated in hospitals. Sepsis mortality rate increases >6% every hour without effective antibiotic treatment. Yet, despite the life and death urgency, and healthcare cost impacts, current methodologies require 3 days to determine the correct antibiotic.

Specific Diagnostics has developed a breakthrough solution to rapidly determine the effective antibiotic treatment for bloodstream and other acute infections. Used for bloodstream infection Specific’s solution provides results 2 days sooner than existing methods, saving patients suffering from drug-resistant infection.

We have been funded by nearly $30 M in non-dilutive government sponsored research support and recently $17.5 M in venture capital. This is an opportunity to join us at an inflection point in our commercial growth as we bring our first key product to market and with recognition from major customers fueling an expansion of our staff.
_The Job_*
his is the job for you if want to be where your ideas to be central to a world-changing and lifesaving product. Data science and analytics are at the core of our company we are seeking an exceptional talent to join our team. You will be a key contributor and critical to the success of the company. The main tasks you are expected to contribute to are:
Applying data transformation methods for processing high-volume, temporal high-dimensional data streams generated in real-time from our proprietary sensor technology.
The development of data-driven visualization tools for the explorative analysis of high-dimensional data.
The application and development of suitable pre-processing techniques to account for data errors and artifacts.
The development and validation of applications for a medical instrument built under the guidance of a senior manager experienced in the application development discipline (so you’ll be learning the valuable skill of integrating your work into applications for medical diagnostic devices).
Data pipeline and warehouse development and maintenance
This is not the job for a numbers only person. We want someone with a passion for and experience in the sciences that will lead you to look deeply into the sources of the data along with the scientists so that the data analysis is influenced by the science of our diagnostic technology and the science is influenced by the analysis.
_You_*
You have a proven track record of successfully developing, validating and deploying data analysis methods to solve challenging real-world applications. You are deeply familiar with ETL tools, Python, and Pandas. You should have a track record of success in your education and projects and have these characteristics and skills:
Bachelor's degree in computer sciences, biomedical engineering, or related field and at least 2 years of interesting relevant experience.
Expert in Python & Pandas and proficient with Object Oriented Programming and test development.
Proficiency in SQL as well as NoSQL database technologies.
Comfortable with Linux and writing Bash scripts
Familiar with authoring on Tableau Desktop or Tableau Server
Full fluency (verbal and written) of the English language is a must.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
relavent: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Company's website:
https://www.specific-dx.com/
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Specific Diagnostics
2.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
313,Data Engineer,-1,"Chat with a recruiter today! Follow this link: https://flashrecruit.com/jobs/63476000

Job Overview:
Our client will be hiring a mid-sr level Data Engineer with strong Backend development and experience creating data ETL pipelines!
This position will be the first Data-focused position on the team, you’ll work with the CTO to drive data improvement projects, manage data pipelines, and find ways to best put the data to good use.

**We are not able to use 3rd parties or Corp to Corp candidates**

The team values patience and empathy in product planning, support, and day-to-day relations.
Work well both collaboratively and independently — come together to pair on tricky problems and architecture, then dive deep on individual tasks.

Be ready to learn and share knowledge — Everyone comes to the company with their own set of skills and experiences. Cross-training, code review, mentorship, and curiosity all help us build better products.

Responsibilities:
Evolve and maintain data processing pipelines, combining public, private, and user-contributed data
Use natural language processing to extract relevant highlights and amenity information from review text
Coordinate manual data review and improvement projects using internal staff, community crowdsourcing, or mechanical turk
Make use of photo geotags and computer vision (via Amazon Rekognition / GCP Vision AI) to infer information.
Improve techniques for matching and deduplication between multiple data sources

Qualifications:
4+ years of experience in data engineering
Strong backend programming skills (Python preferred)
Experience creating data ETL pipelines
Intermediate experience with SQL and relational schema design

Preferred
Advanced degree in math, statistics, computer science, information science
Experience working with geospatial datasets and GIS analysis
Experience applying machine learning techniques to real world problems
Familiarity with Elasticsearch

Chat with a recruiter today! Follow this link: https://flashrecruit.com/jobs/63476000",-1,Tech Talent Link,Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
314,Senior Quantitative Analyst/Quantitative Analyst III,"$90k-$177k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The
Senior Quantitative Analyst will be an integral part of RADAR’s Retail
Supervisory Modeling Team (SMT). The Retail SMT has responsibility for
projecting losses associated with U.S. retail credit exposure groups (including
auto loans, credit and charge cards, first lien mortgage loans, and home equity
mortgage loans) for bank holding companies subject to the supervisory stress
test (DFAST and CCAR). You will perform statistical and econometric analysis to
support research, development, and implementation of the retail models in
accordance with the development cycle set forth by the Model Oversight Group
(MOG). You will provide initial and
final stress test estimates for each applicable firm, including written
explanations of analysis and results, and presentations to the MOG. The Senior
Quantitative Analyst will assist with maintaining model soundness and control
documentation in accordance with MOG standards. You will assist the team with model reviews by
the Supervisory Modeling Validation (SMV) team, providing explanations and
responses to follow-up requests and addressing SMV findings, as appropriate. You also assist FR staff on longer-term
research projects involving retail lending.

This position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or
FOMC information, which is limited to “Protected Individuals” as defined in the
U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not
limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who
either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for
naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are permanent
residents must sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen when
eligible to do so and pursue a path to citizenship. Candidates who are not U.S.
citizens or U.S. permanent residents may be eligible for the information access
required for this position if they sign a declaration of intent to become
a permanent resident and a U.S. citizen and meet other eligibility
requirements. In addition, all candidates must undergo an applicable background
check and comply with all applicable information handling rules.

To
be considered for the position, please submit a resume and cover letter.

About
the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia:

The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia is one of the 12 regional Reserve Banks that,
together with the Board of Governors in Washington, D.C., make up the Federal
Reserve System. It helps formulate and implement monetary policy,
supervises banks and bank and savings and loan holding companies, and provides
financial services to depository institutions and the federal
government. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia serves eastern and
central Pennsylvania, southern New Jersey, and Delaware.

Background
investigations including drug testing are required for all new hires as a
condition of employment, after the job offer is made. Employment may not begin until the Bank
accepts the results of the background investigation.

To
see the full job description, click the link:

https://www.philadelphiafed.org/-/media/67799981834740d49d69b177998c3bc8.ashx

To
Apply:

Go
to https://www.philadelphiafed.org/careers/job-openings.cfm
and find the ""Senior Quantitative Analyst/Quantitative Analyst III""
position.

We offer a great
benefits package that features:
Medical (4 options), Prescription, Dental
(3 options), and Vision Insurance
401k/Thrift Plan with
generous employer match
Employer-funded Pension Plan
Paid Vacation/Sick Time&
Holidays
Monthly Commuter Allowance
Flexible Spending Accounts
and Healthcare Spending Accounts
Flexible Work Schedule
available in most departments
Tuition Reimbursement
Parental Leave
Onsite 24/7 Fitness Center
including training classes, Peloton bikes and locker room / shower
facilities
Onsite Cafeteria and Coffee
Shop
Additional convenience
benefits, discounts and more…
The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia believes that diversity and inclusion among our
employees is essential to our success as an organization, and we want to
recruit, develop and retain the most accomplished people from a diverse
candidate pool. To support a workplace culture of belonging, we offer seven
employee resource groups (ERGs) and a 100 percent rating on the Human Rights
Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equality Index. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
3.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1914,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
315,Population Health Outcomes- Data Scientist (Remote/ Virtual),"$66k-$117k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Looking for an opportunity to use your applied predictive analysisis, Python, SQL and AI expertise? Apply to this REMOTE opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

The Ascension Data Sciences Institute (ADSI) was created in July 2019 with the mission of supporting Ascension in achieving its Quadruple Aim with uniquely skilled, high-performing associates who develop analyses, models and applications to enable Ascension in providing higher value healthcare and making strategic decisions. ADSI is comprised of 6 domains addressing 1) Clinical quality and patient safety; 2) Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes; 3) Strategic Operations and Financial Analytics; 4) Actuarial and Managed Care Analytics; 5) Registry Abstraction Healthcare Solutions; and 6) Healthcare Data Intelligence. We recognize that the healthcare environment is a complex ecosystem of rapidly evolving clinical and economic practices that affect patient and provider experience and demands increasingly sophisticated and complex measurement. Our objective is for advanced analytics and data science to play a critical and foundational role in the transformation of care delivery, quality and financial outcomes to enable our organization’s competitive advantage.

We are hiring a Data Scientist on the Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes team to support Ascension’s Population Health Management and Value Based Care Strategy. In this position, you will be involved in predicting clinical and cost outcomes to identify cohorts of the population that represent opportunities for clinical intervention. You will be expected to develop a deep understanding of the business and design advanced analytics products that support the objectives of our stakeholders. In order for your work to drive action and directly impact population health outcomes, you will need to collaborate closely with IT, clinical and operational teams to implement patient identification tools.

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develops predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creating efficient algorithms, and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Validate the performance and generalizability of predictive models and risk scores available in vendor tools identifying gaps and prioritizing model development based on business needs.
Become the subject matter expert on available risk scores and consult with local analytic teams and business leaders on the tools appropriate for their use cases.
Leverage external research and internal clinical expertise to identify key predictors to capture and include in models.
Work with data management teams to develop standardized datasets used for predictive modelling.
Use EMR, adjudicated medical and pharmacy claims, health risk assessments and other data sources available to develop a suite of models that align with strategic initiatives.
Develop models that are applicable to our value based contracts including Medicaid, Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and commercial populations.
Clearly communicate the value to the organization of leveraging advanced analytics to drive health outcomes and success in value-based care.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Masters in Healthcare Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or other analytical related fields strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of related experience preferred.
At least 2 years of previous experience in applied predictive analytics preferably within healthcare preferred.
Experience applying leading machine learning methods (forecasting, neural networks, deep learning, optimization etc) to drive measurable improvements in health outcomes preferred.
Experience with Python and SQL required. Working knowledge of Google Cloud Platform (GCP) AI and ML tools a plus.
Experience working with EMR and adjudicated claims data a plus.
Business consultation experience required demonstrating communication and presentation skills.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Nashville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
316,Quantitative Researcher,-1,"What happens when accomplished scientists and engineers come together to tackle financial markets using complex models, custom technology, and huge amounts of computational horsepower? What if you mix these things together in an environment that values quality of life and rewards contribution? In our experience, you're able to build a team of talented professionals working together to solve interesting problems and produce real-world results.

If joining a collaborative and high-performance team sounds appealing and you have a history of exceptional performance in a quantitative discipline, we’d love for you to share your resume and give us the chance to explore a potential fit. Financial experience isn’t a prerequisite. Programming skills and an PhD in Statistics, Math, Physics, Engineering or comparable scientific discipline strongly preferred.

Position

We are looking for highly talented candidates to support development of quantitative trading systems. Our quantitative researchers engage in both the development of trading strategies and the implementation of software that tests and executes these strategies.

We seek quantitative researchers with strong analytical and mathematical skills as well as the ability to conduct creative research at the highest level. Strong software coding experience is highly desired, as the position involves the development, testing, and maintenance of software on a daily basis.

About Us

For over three decades, the TGS team has built quantitative trading systems that have produced exceptional results across a range of financial markets. We use scientific methods and engineering discipline to solve challenging problems and develop technology solutions. Our Irvine office is as unique as our Southern California location, combining elements of high tech, finance, and applied research in a collegial atmosphere and beautiful workspace.

As an employer, we are small, discreet, and highly selective. We look for exceptional people with proven track records of performance and achievement, and are far more interested in aptitude and potential than expertise in any particular technology, tool set, or professional domain. If you're inspired by the idea of working on interesting problems with talented colleagues, we invite you to share your resume and explore the possibility of joining our team.

Applicants residing in California may find our CCPA notice to California residents HERE.",5.0,"TGS Management Company
5.0","Irvine, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
317,Program Data Analyst,"$42k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Description:

XLA is looking for a Program Data Analyst to work onsite at the DHS ICE ODCR (Office of Diversity and Civil Rights) in Washington D.C. and be heavily responsible for both program data analytics and strong technical writing within designated program offices. The ideal candidate should be an independent individual while working alongside a team of other data specialists and technical writers to support ICE Senior Leadership. Primary duties may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Examine existing data sets and work to improve current governmental programs by performing research on specific topics or projects, extrapolating and manipulating data, and presenting findings in clear and concise technical writing documents to ultimately serve as consultant for the management of those projects.
Support ICE Senior Leadership to identify opportunities for continual improvement; creating reports for internal teams, collaborating with individuals to collect and analyze data; show graphs or other methods to present written findings and visualize data.
Structure large data sets to find usable information for process improvement; create presentations and reports based on best practices and recommendations.
Provide senior management with detailed reports, evaluated information, budgetary proposals and similar products for effective direction of program operations.
Independently researches programmatic activities; Reviews information, reconciles conflicting data, and devises new and modified methods to analyze findings.
Advises management of unique conditions and issues that affect program activities and recommends strategies to improve implementation and evaluation of programs.
Develops and maintains communications with team and stakeholders by providing verbal and written communication in support of programmatic activities
Support various ODCR programs and initiatives, including reasonable accommodation, equal employment opportunity, alternative dispute resolution, organizational climate assessments, special emphasis, model workplace, anti-harassment, and civil liberties.
Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree
Prior experience in a professional environment providing data analysis, reporting, and technical writing functions
Ability to independently conduct research to gather information in support of work-related projects
Excellent attention to detail and strong written communication skills
Skilled in proactively identifying problems and making recommendations to management
Researching and interpreting regulations; Identifying and relaying recommendations for project success
Prior records management experience, including organizing electronic files, maintaining file plans, and ensuring compliance with privacy regulations
Prior experience with Microsoft Office software, including Outlook, Microsoft Word and Excel, as well as, other analytics software including SharePoint a plus
The ability to obtain and maintain a DHS ICE Public Trust",3.4,"XLA Associates
3.4","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Private Practice / Firm,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
318,"Computational Scientist, Machine Learning","$86k-$154k
(Glassdoor Est.)","ROLE SUMMARY

The Pfizer Simulation and Modeling Sciences (SMS) group has an opening for a computational methods developer with strong expertise in computational biology, bioinformatics, Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML). Working with the biotherapeutics group, the successful candidate will leverage skills in sequence analysis, protein structure modeling, machine learning, and scientific programming to develop AI models and computational tools that enable design of antibody therapeutics and prediction of biophysical and therapeutic properties. To be successful in this role, the incumbent must be able to effectively collaborate with colleagues with diverse scientific background, identify problems and opportunities, and combine techniques from computational biology and AI, in particular recent advances in deep learning, to rapidly develop powerful computational solutions.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Identify novel and creative applications of deep learning approaches to advance discovery and development of antibody therapeutics.
Collaborate across biotherapeutics organization to implement powerful AI models and cutting-edge computational tools to enable rapid developability assessment of novel monoclonal antibodies.
Effectively utilize relevant public and proprietary databases and available computational resources (internal HPC and Cloud) to develop ML models to predict important biophysical and therapeutic properties of antibodies.
Occasionally contribute to the ongoing and new ML-related efforts within SMS in the area of small molecule discovery and development.
Leverage proprietary computational framework and applications to deploy AI/ML models for wide usage by Pfizer scientists.
Proactively identify, assess, and internalize promising methods and tools.
Communicate and explain computational models and ML techniques to broad scientific audience from diverse discipline.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
Ph.D. in computational biology, chemical engineering, computer science, physical or biological sciences, machine learning, or related discipline.
Experience with several machine learning algorithms (e.g. Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Deep Neural Networks) and packages (e.g. Sci-kit Learn, Keras, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Track record of applying machine learning, in particular modern deep learning approaches, to solve relevant biological problems.
Familiarity with concepts, techniques, and common tools used for sequence analysis and protein structure modeling.
Experience with Unix/Linux, HPC environments, and high-level programming language (e.g. Python).
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Demonstrated track record of applying AI/ML, in particular cutting-edge deep learning techniques such as ConvNet, RNN, generative modeling, and reinforcement learning to tackle complex drug discovery and development problems.
Experience in applying ML to immunology data, e.g. HLA peptide binding.
OTHER INFORMATION
Eligible for Employee Referral Bonus
#LI-PFE
Sunshine Act

Pfizer reports payments and other transfers of value to health care providers as required by federal and state transparency laws and implementing regulations. These laws and regulations require Pfizer to provide government agencies with information such as a health care provider’s name, address and the type of payments or other value received, generally for public disclosure. Subject to further legal review and statutory or regulatory clarification, which Pfizer intends to pursue, reimbursement of recruiting expenses for licensed physicians may constitute a reportable transfer of value under the federal transparency law commonly known as the Sunshine Act. Therefore, if you are a licensed physician who incurs recruiting expenses as a result of interviewing with Pfizer that we pay or reimburse, your name, address and the amount of payments made currently will be reported to the government. If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility

Pfizer is committed to equal opportunity in the terms and conditions of employment for all employees and job applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or gender expression, national origin, disability or veteran status. Pfizer also complies with all applicable national, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment as well as work authorization and employment eligibility verification requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act and IRCA. Pfizer is an E-Verify employer.
Information & Business Tech",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1849,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
319,Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations,"$120k-$193k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description

Job Title: Senior IT Data Scientist - Operations

City: Lake Forest / State: Illinois

Job Description

Join Reynolds Consumer Products… a world of opportunities! At Reynolds Consumer Products, we are passionate about achieving results and have fun winning as a team! We provide amazing job opportunities for growth with competitive salaries and benefits in an exciting, dynamic, fast-paced, and fun workplace environment. Are you looking to build a strong career and make a positive impact? Then we have an opportunity for you! We currently have an opportunity for an Operations Senior Data Scientist to join our team located at our Company Headquarters in Lake Forest, IL.

Your Role:

As an Operations Senior Data Scientist, you will primarily be responsible for solving operations problems by processing and analyzing data from multiple sources to identify meaningful relationships, patterns and trends. You will prepare data insights and proposals in narrative and visual forms and leverage advanced data science methods to discover opportunities to increase equipment effectiveness, reduce costs and provide insights to plants on process disruptions. You will have the opportunity to:
Improve the manufacturing process by formulating hypotheses, conducting experiments and delivering improvements to KPIs based on findings
Maintain and tune analytical models to predict and monitor the condition of plant equipment
Influence manufacturing decision makers by presenting statistical insights
Ensure our manufacturing operations operate at peak efficiency
Ultimately, you will be a vitally important team member in our Digital Manufacturing Group and help Reynolds Consumer Products succeed by leveraging data insights.

You will love it here if…
You are not only a team-player, but you foster a collaborative team environment
You are analytic, enjoy new challenges and thrive in a fast paced manufacturing operation
You are committed to operational excellence and to keeping others safe in the workplace
We need you to have:
A strong proficiency in statistical analysis methods and tools, e.g., Python, Machine Learning
3-5 years of experience in data model development, data visualization, and application of advanced analytics to drive business outcomes
3-5 years of experience in the design and implementation of data infrastructures and data hierarchies
Experience in AWS Analytics platform
SQL query skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
BA/BS in Data Analytics, Engineering, Business, or a related field
Icing on the cake:
Experience developing and implementing predictive maintenance and predictive quality models
Data visualization skills in Power BI
Prior experience working in operations research or related field, e.g., Industrial Engineering or Manufacturing
For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, protected veteran status or disability.

Reynolds Consumer Products is an Equal Opportunity Employer that complies with the laws and regulations set forth in the following EEO is The Law Poster: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

The Pay Transparency Policy Statement can be found on this link:

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/PayTransparencyNondiscrimination.html

The poster and the supplement can be found on this link.

http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm

For applicants or employees who are disabled, or require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, you may request assistance by calling us at (847)482-3550 or email Recruitment@ReynoldsBrands.com.

No recruiter calls or emails please.",3.6,"Reynolds Consumer Products
3.6","Lake Forest, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
320,Principal Data Scientist I,"$96k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOB SUMMARY
The Principal Data Scientist I will serve as a technical lead for the experimentation data science team. This role will support experiment planning and set-up across Charter product teams including video, buyflow, and support portals and own experimentation strategy including validation development of experimentation plans, frameworks, and experimentation metrics. The individual will additionally be responsible for executing advanced analytic projects with the objectives of creating causal inferences, correlations, predictions, and recommendations for improvements to business processes, and the metrics to monitor those improvements. Requires a strong command of statistical and data science oriented techniques and algorithms as well as a demonstrated practical ability to determine where to invest time, synthesize actionable findings across diverse assignments, and present these findings to an audience with varying levels of background in analytics.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Actively and consistently support all efforts to simplify and enhance the customer experience
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand product / feature plans for development and translate those plans into experimentation objectives and testable hypotheses
Assist product teams with experimental design and analyses, including development of analysis plans and ad hoc reports
Develop experimentation strategy and project plans for stakeholders and lead execution of plans involving members across multiple teams
Synthesize data from experimentation and other data sources to provide stakeholders with answers to research questions and help determine next steps for a product / feature using a data driven approach
Create and present materials communicating quantitative findings and relevant business impacts to internal and external teams as well as an executive audience
Supervise and integrate the work of junior data scientists on experimentation and data science team to produce high quality work products
Refine experimentation processes including leverage of existing data science tools and development of new tools where applicable
Identify new methodologies for advancing experimentation program, develop plans to evaluate these methodologies through simulation studies, and work with software and data engineering teams on implementation strategies
Leverage multiple data sources to produce intelligent data products that solve the needs of business and engineering for business intelligence, operational analytics, descriptive models, predictive models, diagnostic models, and prescriptive models.
Make technical decisions for the organization
Coordinate technical activities across projects and the organization
Interact with various stakeholders to understand their business needs, communicate project status and develop relationships to ensure satisfaction
Develop and deliver materials on experimentation techniques and tools to a broad set of business-intelligence, data, and analytics professionals with varied backgrounds
Exercise thought leadership and discretion in tailoring the tools, approaches, and data used to meet the needs of the particular problem
Deliver results using metrics-driven analysis, and communicating the costs and tradeoffs of ideas to stakeholders and top management

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Ability to read, write, speak and understand English
Able to communicate complex technical, statistical and quantitative concepts to individuals with a variety of backgrounds, explain the importance and relevance of data, and suggest solutions
Works with minimal guidance to set project plans and timelines and prioritize among multiple competing interests
Working knowledge of current industry best practices for online experimentation
Command of advanced statistical concepts including experimental design, hypothesis testing, common and more advance analytic methods
Fluency with regression modeling and the ability to develop and evaluate a model using simple and complex regression, working knowledge of correlated data analysis and ability to identify when more sophisticated ML modeling may be warranted over common approaches
Knowledge of tools to obtain, transform, and store data on Big Data and Streaming systems
Ability to design and implement ETL projects from scratch
Knowledge of tools to develop, test, and deploy production code, modify CICD pipelines and deployment scripts
Background with Cable systems and operations
Experience with Hadoop, HIVE, SPARK, and/or Snowflake
Knowledge of other relevant tools such as SAS, SPSS, Alteryx, Linux
Knowledge of other relevant techniques such as text analysis and text mining
Familiarity with the open-source ecosystems surrounding R (CRAN), Python (PyPi), and/or Hadoop
Broad experience and solid theoretical foundation on the modeling process using a variety of algorithms
Data profiling, distributions, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing
Data pre-processing, exploratory data analysis using a variety of techniques
Knowledge of classification using techniques such as linear models, GLMs, and tree-based methods
Interpretation of model results, consideration of causality, treatment of multicollinearity
Strong synthesis and presentation skills
Ability to communicate results and recommendations to a wide variety of audiences including executive leadership
Understanding of data architecture, data warehouse and data marts
Demonstrated ability and desire to continually expand skill set, and learn from and teach others
Experience with other database and data store technologies, such as NoSQL, key-value, columnar, graph, and document.
Experience in receiving, converting, and cleansing big data
Program, product, or project management experience delivering analytics results
Strong background in Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows installation and administration
Ability to identify and resolve end-to-end performance, network, server, cloud, and platform issues
Pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Keen attention to detail with the ability to effectively prioritize and execute multiple tasks

Education
Bachelor’s Degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

Related Work Experience
3 plus years user and system admin ownership with Linux/Unix/CentOS and Windows
10 plus years Statistical Analysis
8 plus years Business Analysis
8 plus years SQL/R/SAS Programming
2 plus years Database Design or Database Modeling

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Skills/Abilities and Knowledge
Operations-research background, in particular focused on large labor operations such as field ops, technical support, and sales
Background with cable and/ or telecommunications

Education
Master’s degree in a statistics, data science, applied math or related field.

WORKING CONDITIONS
Office environment
Charter Technical Engineering Center
Highly collaborative and innovative work space
Occasional Travel",3.0,"Spectrum
3.0","Greenwood Village, Arapahoe, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,2016,Subsidiary or Business Segment,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
321,Research Scientist,"$53k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are searching for a Research Scientist for our 3D print manufacturing facility in St Clairsville, Ohio

To learn more about our industry changing and dynamic culture, please view our website at: www.exone.com

Follow us on LinkedIn at: https://www.linkedin.com/company/the-ex-one-company/
About Us: *
Located in the greater Pittsburgh area, The ExOne Company is a global provider of binder jet 3D printers. Our business primarily consists of manufacturing and selling 3D printers and 3D printed parts for our customers.

With over 20 years’ experience in additive manufacturing, ExOne is poised to empower our partners to design and implement game-changing solutions leveraging 3D printing technology. As a publicly traded manufacturing company, our focus is to our customers first.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
The Research Scientist is responsible for leading product research and development projects in support of product line business and overall company objectives. Develop and characterize new powders and binders on a laboratory scale. Develop new process technology enabling new product development. Leads or assists in the scale-up of new materials from laboratory/pilot plant to commercial site. Provide technical support to customers and production service centers (PSC). Screens and characterizes new raw materials for suitability in commercial production. Assists in external programs with universities/institutions or other ExOne entities to evaluate emerging technologies. Facilitates the development and professional growth of assigned technician(s). Maintains a safe work environment for self and others. Performs other duties as required or assigned. Analyze existing materials, relevant properties of ExOne products, and material dynamics within applications. Identify and develop additional capabilities and properties for expanding existing product uses.

Collaborate with Applications, Engineering, and Production teams to develop new products/applications and improve customer satisfaction. Innovate and develop new opportunities for continuous process improvement. Initiate activities to increase quality and efficiency of department and company-wide.

Attend and participate in any training or additional education as required by company. Follow all company procedures and policies with particular emphasis in confidentiality and protecting the company’s interests and technical data.
Minimum Requirements: *
Ph. D in Materials Science and Engineering, Chemical Engineering or related field. Five to seven years R&D experience in carbon and ceramics. Meticulous attention to detail, excellent analytical skills, team working and interpersonal skills. Competence in computer skills and various software applications. Excellent written and oral communication skills for use at all levels of management and customers.
Physical Requirements: *
Ability to walk, sit and stand in office and manufacturing environments. Manual dexterity and hand manipulations to operate computer and perform various forms of chemical testing. Visual acuity sufficient to operate a computer and to provide close scrutiny of chemical processes and measurements. Must hold a valid driver’s license and travel as deemed necessary.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
R&D in carbon, ceramics: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
License:
driver's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.exone.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ExOneCo
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.4,"The ExOne Company
3.4","Saint Clairsville, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
322,"Data Strategy & Analytics Manager, WGU Academy SLC","$57k-$100k
(Glassdoor Est.)","If you’re passionate about building a better future for individuals, communities, and our country—and you’re committed to working hard to play your part in building that future—consider WGU as the next step in your career.

Driven by a mission to expand access to higher education through online, competency-based degree programs, WGU is also committed to being a great place to work for a diverse workforce of student-focused professionals. The university has pioneered a new way to learn in the 21st century, one that has received praise from academic, industry, government, and media leaders. Whatever your role, working for WGU gives you a part to play in helping students graduate, creating a better tomorrow for themselves and their families.

**THIS POSITION will be located in Salt Lake City, UT- Must be willing to relocate within 6 months.

About WGU Academy

WGU Academy is a recently established division of Western Governors University that exists outside the main operations of the university in order to dramatically impact college readiness efforts on a large scale. Its primary mission is to develop and deliver new solutions for college and career readiness to tens of thousands, even hundreds of thousands, of individuals who otherwise would not be prepared for regular enrollment at WGU or at other institutions. WGU Academy offers college-level courses that will support students by promoting a high level of confidence, study habits, and communications skills to be successful while at the Academy and throughout their future studies. In addition to supporting WGU, the Academy will also work with numerous external institutions, foundations, and states.

Position Summary



The Data Strategy & Analytics Manager is a subject-matter and/or industry-leading expert and professional individual contributor, requiring knowledge within their functional area along with appropriate education, experience, and skills. While under the guidance of leadership, this role inputs, processes, extracts, and analyzes a variety of data related to the business’ Key Performance Indicators. This individual interfaces with multiple teams across the organization and other stakeholders in matters related to enrollment and coaching reports, Tableau dashboards, Power BI, Databricks, and automation. This position will help drive and define strategy for data analysis, management, acquisition, and distribution. Working closely with WGU Academy leadership as well as technology partners, the position will participate on projects of various size and complexity, including product/platform development and improvement. The Data Strategy & Analytics Manager will play a meaningful role in data-related business planning and prioritization.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
Working with (and reporting to) the Director of Business Operations, supports the diverse data needs of Senior Management across a range of projects and initiatives
Identifies areas for process and quality improvement. Recommends efficient resources required for operational data needs based on complexity, cost and scalability
Participates in business planning and prioritization for data initiatives
Analyzes and interprets data from various functional areas using a variety of statistical methods and uses reports to demonstrate the results of statistical analyses in the form of graphs, charts, and tables
Demonstrates competencies to achieve specific individual and functional objectives that require the application of subject matter knowledge
Formats and deliver accurate data, using prescribed programs/reports or programs/reports they develop, which will enable leadership to make informed business decisions, as well as enable employees to better serve student needs and ensure student success.
Creates and distribute reports in Power Bi and/or Tableau that inform and educate Academy Leadership to support objectives
Demonstrates excellent attention to detail, data cleansing, and data accuracy, and support others on the team as a quality check to ensure all data is accurate
Demonstrates superior accuracy in reporting, planning, and communication; adaptability and flexibility as situations change frequently; and reliability in accomplishing tasks on time
Leverages collaborative skills with internal customers and subject-matter-experts to establish the technical vision and analyze trade-offs between usability and performance needs
Communicates and collaborates with internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements and deliver the appropriate artifacts as needed
Performs quality assurance on data warehouse objects and the creation of user-facing reports and dashboards and work to debug and resolve problems in reporting data
Partners with Institutional Research to manage Academy’s data warehouse, including tables, views, integrations, and schedules
Knowledge, Skill and Abilities
Strong written, oral, presentation, and interpersonal relation skills, including the ability to explain the significance of data and trends to stakeholders
Problem Solving Skills: Investigates appropriate resources and involves partners when appropriate; future-oriented; assesses what will help/hinder achieving goals; focuses on what is important
Interpersonal Skills: Deals with others in a considerate, respectful, and unbiased manner; approaches conflict proactively; solicits and shares feedback openly; listens with empathy and maintains composure
Accuracy: Draws on factual information garnered from careful cultivation of a broad knowledge of Academy’s goals and processes; investigates beyond assumptions
Adaptability: Course corrects behaviors and communication style to meet the needs of a wide range of situations; tackles obstacles appropriately; is comfortable with ambiguity
Reliability: Accountable to others; does what it takes to get the job done; actions are consistent with words; follows through on commitments; exhibits exceptional integrity
Attitude: Displays commitment to the organization and to personal growth; self-motivated and able to motivate and inspire others; asserts self appropriately to champion ideas; demonstrates a high level of integrity; effectively collaborates in a team environment
Initiative: Self-directs with a strong bias for action; leads the way in improvement of performance or processes; displays keen interest in students and organization
Demonstrates a high level of understanding regarding Academy’s business model and the student experience and lifecycle
Strong organization skills with a high attention to detail
Ability to manage and report data on several projects/initiatives at once
Ability to work with minimum supervision in a fast-paced environment
Ability to create and track data related to project impact
Proficient in Microsoft Excel, Tableau, and Power BI
Proficient in building relational database queries using programming languages like SQL, Spark SQL R, Python, or Scala
ETL experience is preferred
Databricks experience is preferred
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree required
3+ years professional data management experience
**THIS POSITION must be located in Salt Lake City, UT, or willing to relocate within 6 months.
Preferred Qualifications:

Master’s degree

Working Conditions
Travel possible but will be rare if needed.
Disclaimers:

WGU Academy, Inc is an affiliated non-profit entity of 501c(3) Corporation of Western Governors University

This Job Description has been designed to indicate the general nature, essential duties, and responsibilities of work performed by employees within this classification. It does not contain a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications that are required of the employee to do this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice. This Job Description does not constitute a contract of employment and the University may exercise its employment-at-will rights at any time.

As an equal opportunity employer, WGU recognizes that our strength lies in our people. We are committed to diversity.",3.8,"Western Governors University
3.8","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1997,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
323,"R&D Scientist, Sr.","$46k-$84k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Improve Lives—that’s what drives us. It’s what makes us better, more innovative, more compelled to work harder. What we do is develop superior point-of-care rapid testing solutions for healthcare providers around the world; what we help create is healthier lives and communities.
Position Summary*: This position is responsible for planning, organizing and performing experiments to develop and refine state-of-the-art assays for the detection of infectious diseases.
Duties & Responsibilities* include but are not limited to:
° Conduct assay system development, optimization and validation.

° Provide direction and guidance to lab scientists, technicians and other technical personnel solving unresolved technical difficulties in assay implementation and routine operation, when such problems arise

° Run experiments to evaluate new laboratory instrumentation and equipment for laboratory testing in cooperation with the equipment manufacturer.

° Prepare technical SOP's.

° Applies quantitative methods: analyzes data, evaluates results, forms conclusions, and provides/implements process or document improvements.

° Assist and/or coordinate technical transfer of new assays and procedures to appropriate departments.

° In cooperation with the R & D Director, assist in the training of laboratory personnel on new procedures and/or equipment.

° Strong expertise in troubleshooting

° Good reporting skills in technical reports as required for review and approval

° Able to communicate at various levels with professionals with different expertise.

° Keep Director and/or VP of Product Development informed about status of on-going projects.

° Help supervisor(s) implementing clinical diagnostic products or services in compliance with industry regulations.

° Maintain awareness of current and developing technologies.

° Interact with Academic Associates and other outside sources of emerging technologies, science and materials.

Qualifications Required*:

° Master’s with 3+ years’ experience or a PhD

° Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, requires excellent communication and writing skills

° Experience in infectious diseases is desirable

° Knowledge of regulations and standards affecting IVDs is desirable

° Previous laboratory experience in immuno assay-development and other valuable experience, such as: planning and working within a timeline, knowledge in protein/antibody function as well as bio-analytical background.
COMPANY PROFILE*
Chembio Diagnostic Systems, Inc. is a public company serving the increasing global demand for rapid tests needed for the effective prevention and treatment of infectious diseases and other conditions. Located minutes off the Long Island Expressway in Medford, NY, Chembio operates a research and manufacturing facility that is registered with the US FDA.

Equal Opportunity Employer – Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disability/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation

For more information about Chembio Diagnostic Systems Inc., please visit our website.

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Chembio Diagnostic Systems, Inc.
2.6","Medford, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
324,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"EpicGenetics is a fast-growing clinical lab located in West LA. We are looking for candidates to fill a full time CLS position. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package as well as work schedule flexibility and friendly work environment.

Duties and responsibilities:
Set-up, perform a high complexity test and report test results
Prepare reagents and maintain inventory of reagents and supplies
Perform instrument maintenance and maintain daily QA/QM charts
Perform other QA/QM tasks, e.g. proficiency testing, competency assessment, parallel testing of instruments and reagents and maintain records of QA/QM activities
Performs data entry into LIS and other databases
Supervise non-licensed personnel
Perform other tasks as assigned
Requirements:
Must have a CA CLS license.
General lab experience, including experience with general lab equipment and good laboratory practices are a must
Experience with cell culture is desirable
Able to multi-task and work at a fast pace level
For more information go to http://fmtest.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $41.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Immunology
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
general lab: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Los Angeles, CA 90064 (Required)
License:
CLS (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
fmtest.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Epicgenetics,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
325,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"EpicGenetics is a fast-growing clinical lab located in West LA. We are looking for candidates to fill a full time CLS position. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package as well as work schedule flexibility and friendly work environment.

Duties and responsibilities:
Set-up, perform a high complexity test and report test results
Prepare reagents and maintain inventory of reagents and supplies
Perform instrument maintenance and maintain daily QA/QM charts
Perform other QA/QM tasks, e.g. proficiency testing, competency assessment, parallel testing of instruments and reagents and maintain records of QA/QM activities
Performs data entry into LIS and other databases
Supervise non-licensed personnel
Perform other tasks as assigned
Requirements:
Must have a CA CLS license.
General lab experience, including experience with general lab equipment and good laboratory practices are a must
Experience with cell culture is desirable
Able to multi-task and work at a fast pace level
For more information go to http://fmtest.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $41.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Immunology
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
general lab: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Los Angeles, CA 90064 (Required)
License:
CLS (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
fmtest.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Epicgenetics,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
326,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"EpicGenetics is a fast-growing clinical lab located in West LA. We are looking for candidates to fill a full time CLS position. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package as well as work schedule flexibility and friendly work environment.

Duties and responsibilities:
Set-up, perform a high complexity test and report test results
Prepare reagents and maintain inventory of reagents and supplies
Perform instrument maintenance and maintain daily QA/QM charts
Perform other QA/QM tasks, e.g. proficiency testing, competency assessment, parallel testing of instruments and reagents and maintain records of QA/QM activities
Performs data entry into LIS and other databases
Supervise non-licensed personnel
Perform other tasks as assigned
Requirements:
Must have a CA CLS license.
General lab experience, including experience with general lab equipment and good laboratory practices are a must
Experience with cell culture is desirable
Able to multi-task and work at a fast pace level
For more information go to http://fmtest.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $41.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Immunology
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
general lab: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Los Angeles, CA 90064 (Required)
License:
CLS (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
fmtest.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Epicgenetics,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
327,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"EpicGenetics is a fast-growing clinical lab located in West LA. We are looking for candidates to fill a full time CLS position. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package as well as work schedule flexibility and friendly work environment.

Duties and responsibilities:
Set-up, perform a high complexity test and report test results
Prepare reagents and maintain inventory of reagents and supplies
Perform instrument maintenance and maintain daily QA/QM charts
Perform other QA/QM tasks, e.g. proficiency testing, competency assessment, parallel testing of instruments and reagents and maintain records of QA/QM activities
Performs data entry into LIS and other databases
Supervise non-licensed personnel
Perform other tasks as assigned
Requirements:
Must have a CA CLS license.
General lab experience, including experience with general lab equipment and good laboratory practices are a must
Experience with cell culture is desirable
Able to multi-task and work at a fast pace level
For more information go to http://fmtest.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $41.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Immunology
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
general lab: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Los Angeles, CA 90064 (Required)
License:
CLS (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
fmtest.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Epicgenetics,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
328,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"EpicGenetics is a fast-growing clinical lab located in West LA. We are looking for candidates to fill a full time CLS position. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package as well as work schedule flexibility and friendly work environment.

Duties and responsibilities:
Set-up, perform a high complexity test and report test results
Prepare reagents and maintain inventory of reagents and supplies
Perform instrument maintenance and maintain daily QA/QM charts
Perform other QA/QM tasks, e.g. proficiency testing, competency assessment, parallel testing of instruments and reagents and maintain records of QA/QM activities
Performs data entry into LIS and other databases
Supervise non-licensed personnel
Perform other tasks as assigned
Requirements:
Must have a CA CLS license.
General lab experience, including experience with general lab equipment and good laboratory practices are a must
Experience with cell culture is desirable
Able to multi-task and work at a fast pace level
For more information go to http://fmtest.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $41.00 - $48.00 per hour

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Immunology
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
general lab: 2 years (Required)
Location:
Los Angeles, CA 90064 (Required)
License:
CLS (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
fmtest.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Epicgenetics,"Los Angeles, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
329,"Scientist, Pharmacology",-1,"Sutro has a unique capability that enables new molecular entities to be designed using a hybrid of synthetic and recombinant technologies to create best in class therapeutics in the oncology and auto-immune disease space. Our portfolio includes antibody-drug conjugates, bispecific antibodies, cytokine derivatives and other novel immuno-stimulatory approaches.

Sutro Biopharma is looking for a talented and energetic team player to help drive preclinical/clinical advancement of our drug portfolios within the Translational Pharmacology and Preclinical Development (TP/PD), Pharmacology group.

Responsibilities


This pharmacology position requires a Scientist/Senior Scientist with at least 2 years industry experience in the preclinical development of cancer immunotherapies. The scientist will be responsible for validating therapeutics that have been engineered to engage a variety of immune effector pathways. Specifically, to develop novel animal models and conduct complex in vivo and ex vivo murine tumor studies with the goal of advancing leads to the clinic. The individual will be expected to have:
Strong background in one or more areas of tumor biology, immunology, oncology, and/or immuno-oncology
Experience with independent design, execution, analysis, and reporting of non-clinical animal pharmacology, pharmacokinetic (PK) and pharmacodynamic (PD) studies
Communicate key scientific data to project teams with clear interpretation of data and proposal of next steps
Qualifications
Ph.D. degree with a minimum of 2 years industry experience evaluating oncology or immuno-oncology drug products in preclinical efficacy models
Independently plan and execute complex anti-tumor efficacy, PK, and PD studies in mice including: cell culture, dosing (IV, SC, IP), tumor measurement, as well as the dissection of organs for subsequent ex vivo analysis
Design flow cytometry (FACS) panels and perform FACS analysis on human and murine cells, tumors, and tissues
Develop novel murine models to investigate combinatorial immuno-therapeutic strategies
Must be highly motivated and work successfully in cross-functional teams by contributing data and ideas
Demonstrated ability to multi-task, troubleshoot, think critically and interpret data
Clear and professional verbal and written communication skills, including maintaining detailed and accurate protocols and lab notebooks
Please submit resume for Req. #2039 to jobs@sutrobio.com. Please visit our website at www.sutrobio.comfor more information. Local candidates, SF Bay Area.

Sutro provides a competitive benefits package that includes a choice of health, dental, and vision insurance, life insurance, flexible spending accounts, 401K plan, PTO, and stock options.

Sutro Biopharma is committed to the diversity of our team and we are committed to Equal Employment Opportunity without regard for race, ethnicity, gender, protected veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or religion.

Salaries listed on jobsites may not be representative of salary ranges at Sutro Biopharma.

Please be advised, inquiries or resumes from recruiters will not be accepted.",4.3,"Sutro Biopharma
4.3",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
330,Sr. HR Data Analyst,"$59k-$100k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who is Cenlar? You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Sr. HR Data Analyst.

Job Summary:

The Sr. HR Data Analyst is responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies related to Human Resources. This role identifies and aggregates complex dataset using a combination of tools, such as, SQL, VBA, PowerShell, and MS Access. This role should have knowledge of statistical models/algorithms using Python as the primary programming language.

Responsibilities:
Identifies, analyzes, and interprets trends or patterns with HR data sets and makes recommendations for business and process improvement
Analyzes processes and data by extracting data from various data warehouse environments
Develops reports and dashboards using various reporting and visualization tools to meet business needs
Understands ongoing requests and translates them into reports for team members and other stakeholders
Ability to design, develop, and execute ETL pipelines to automate ingestion of structured and unstructured data sources using a combination of PowerShell, SQL, Python, VBA, and other programming languages
Solid understanding of REST API architecture to implement interfaces that allow for the seamless data integration between our vendor systems and our internal databases
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Handles complex requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing and trend analysis
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, statistical analysis, Human Resources, or related field, Master’s degree preferred with 5+ years of relevant and/or data engineering analytics experience
Working knowledge of SQL skills to perform complex data manipulation using multiple tables, queries, and subqueries in a database environment (i.e., SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, DB2, MS Access, et al).
Strong background with at least an object-oriented/functional/scripting language (Python, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with CLI (CMD, bash, PowerShell, etc.)
Expertise with various ETL technologies and tools
Strong understanding of business logic for aggregation and analysis services
Experience with HRMS, such as ADP, ETime, Taleo, and Cornerstone, preferred
Ability to develop capabilities and/ or experiences in partnership with more experienced staff
Exceptional organization and time management skills, with the initiative and the desire to own problems from start to finish
Ability to flex and adapt to changing business needs, and use discretion when dealing with confidential information
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with ability to work on several projects simultaneously
Passion to have an impact; Pro-active self-starter; Demonstrates a strong sense of urgency and responsiveness; Strong organizational and project management skills
Demonstrated track record of developing and successfully driving new initiatives through an organization to achieve business results
Total Rewards :

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online .",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Yardley, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
331,SQL Data Analyst,"Employer Provided Salary:
$45k-$53k","Job Description
Company: Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization
Job Title: SQL Data Analyst
Department: Information Technology
Reports To: CIO
FLSA Status: Exempt
Prepared Date: 1/2/2020
DISCLAIMER:
Job descriptions are not meant to be all-inclusive and/or the job itself is subject to change. Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Perform ETL duties to move data from raw format for use by multiple departments
Apply knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Respond to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Assist other analysts to perform financial analysis of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Work with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identify, develop and implement methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Perform checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintain and apply knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educate and assist in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Collects, compiles and analyzes data to measure and report on provider and program performance.
Must abide to all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD9/ICD10/ICD11 classifications, CPT codes)
of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Minimum level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment: Advanced.
Strong skills in SQL, Microsoft Excel, or other comparable software tools.
Programming languages preferred, notably C#
Experience with ETL process management and data engineering
Strong internet research capabilities.
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus.
High attention to detail
SQL Server / SSRS / Other Analytics Software
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions.
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly.
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time.
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience:
Required: Bachelor's degree in statistics, engineering, computer science and 1-3 years of experience in the field or in a related area.
Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area
Language Skills:
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills:
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint), Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools. Programming skills preferred in C# or other related languages.
Other Skills and Abilities:
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a MUST. Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands:
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.",3.8,"Palm Beach ACO, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
332,Data Scientist-Senior,"$107k-$171k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
333,Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track,-1,"Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Marketing Analytics Track

Job
ID

27345478

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

Our All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Marketing Analytics will:

* Work with client to translate Marketing strategy to specific analyses and resulting recommendations

* Work within a fast-paced, action-oriented environment

* Conduct analyses to support the business, across one or more areas of insight

* Present analysis findings and insights to the client Marketing organization

* Develop dashboard reports in Tableau to support the broader set of Marketing stakeholders

* Work with Decisioning platform and enterprise data in an EDW / Analytics Sandbox environment

* Collaborate with data team to configure fact tables that support the broader analytics team

* Collaborate and support other team members with data preparation, vestigation, methodology and development

* Work directly with the client to understand business goals, methodology considerations and timing for analysis and reporting work

Skills:
MS in Markeing Analytics, Business Analytics, or other quantitative field with some experience in Marketing

* Independent thinker, prepared to provide situational analysis and recommendations for moving things forward

* Ability to evaluate customer requirements and modify analyses and deliverables accordingly

* Ability to work closely with colleagues and client teams towards building a collective body of decisioning insights

* Strong knowledge of accessing and analyzing data in a data warehouse environment

* Ability to investigate data (vetting, anomaly detection and resolution, etc.)

* Experience in marketing analytics (CRM/Digital experience a plus)

* Ability to craft data stories through visualizations and derive insights from data

* Strong skills in Excel and data visualization e.g., Tableau, Power BI",4.5,"Blend360
4.5","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
334,Data Scientist,"$111k-$175k
(Glassdoor Est.)","C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
335,"Principal Scientist, Gene Therapy 2",-1,"We are seeking a motivated scientist who will be supporting research and development activities of Ocugen’ s gene therapy programs. This role involves leading the discovery and preclinical activities related our pipelines for ocular degenerative diseases. The Principal Scientist will be responsible for leading the laboratory research, making decisions within his area of expertise and proactively work with colleagues for timely execution of the team’s deliverables. The ideal candidate will have advanced expertise in at least 2 areas: adeno-associated virus biology, molecular biology, animal models in ocular degenerative diseases, or biochemistry.
What You Will Be Primarily Responsible For: *
Your responsibilities will include, but not be limited to:
Lead laboratory research related to vector design, development, and characterizations for gene therapy products
Support pre-clinical AAV studies related to ocular degenerative diseases
Work with external collaborators and Contract Research Organizations for timely execution of projects
Identifying and quickly resolving workflow issues
Maintaining familiarity with current scientific literature and techniques in the field of AAV based gene therapy
Write technical reports and present data/results to the project teams
Collaborating with colleagues within Research and Development group
What You Need to Apply: *
PhD in molecular biology, cell biology, biochemistry, genetics, or a related field
Minimum 3 years of industry experience or 5 years of postdoctoral experience in relevant field
Scientific training and hands-on experience with AAV, such as vector design, potency assay, and characterizations
Strong leadership and communication skills
Evidence of scientific accomplishments in the form of publications and presentations
Evidence of contribution to the field of gene therapy
Ability to work independently and effectively as a team member within multidisciplinary project teams
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $105,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
industry: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",1.7,"Ocugen, Inc.
1.7","Malvern, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
336,Medical Laboratory Scientist,"$17-$23 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Summary:

Performs and interprets tests at all complexity levels. Demonstrates an understanding of the theory and scientific principles of laboratory testing as well as the technical, procedural and problem solving aspects. Correlates abnormal laboratory data with pathological states, determines the validity of test results and the need for additional tests. Determines the validity of test results through the monitoring and/or verifying of quality controls, standards, etc. Communicates test results, reference ranges, specimen requirements, and other pertinent information to authorized sources.

Job Responsibilities:

Follows the laboratory's procedures for specimen handling and processing, test analyses, reporting and maintaining records of patient test results.
Performs laboratory testing in a compliant manner.
Maintains regulatory knowledge and awareness as it pertains to specific job duties.
Adheres to the laboratory's quality control policies, document all quality control activities, instrument and procedural calibrations and maintenance performed.
Assumes responsibility for and takes action regarding any quality control or quality assurance issues as it pertains to specific job duties.
Maintains instruments and equipment in accordance with manufacturer’s specifications.
Assumes responsibility for good documentation practices and maintains clear and legible records.
Performs proficiency testing in compliance with Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) regulations i.e. analyze proficiency survey sample in the same manner as a patient specimens, no communication with other CLIA laboratories, complete record retention and accurate documentation and result reporting.
Assumes responsibility for participation in continuing education, professional development and required annual competency assessment.
Follows the laboratory's established policies and procedures whenever test systems are not within the laboratory's established acceptable levels of performance.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or reporting of test results and either must correct the problems or immediately notify the General Supervisor, Technical Supervisor, Clinical Consultant, or Laboratory Director.
Exercises good judgment, analytical and problem solving/troubleshooting skills.
Recommends solutions and improvements.
Documents all corrective actions taken when test systems deviate from the laboratory's established performance specifications.
May function in an educator and provides instruction and training in theory, technical skills, safety protocols, and the application of laboratory test protocols to students, employees, residents, etc.
Other duties as assigned.
Follows Hospital and department policies and procedures with special attention to attendance and punctuality, confidentiality, dress code and display of ID badge, and safety.
Completes mandatory education and training in order to maintain organization and department-specific competencies and requirements.

Education:

Bachelor's degree in a chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science or medical technology from a four-year college or university.
One year training in approved program with registry/certification at Medical Technologist/ Clinical Laboratory Scientist level (MLS or MT) or registry eligible.
OR
Meets the CLIA qualifications for high complexity testing personnel grandfathering clauses.
See Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, §493.1489(b)(3), §493.1489(b)(4), §493.1489(b)(5), §493.1491 Standards; High Complexity Testing Personnel Qualifications.
Diploma and/or transcripts must be provided.
Education will be verified.
Education outside of the United States requires diploma/transcripts translated into English and proof of foreign equivalency from by an HHS approved agency or nationally recognized organization such as NACES (National Association Credential Evaluation Services, Inc.) or AICE (Association of International Credential Evaluators, Inc.).

Languages:

Certifications:

Certification as a Medical Technologist (MT) or certification eligible preferred upon hire, from the American Society of Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or American Medical Technologists (AMT).
Certification must be obtained within one year of hire.

Complexity of Work:

Requires critical thinking skills, decisive judgment and the ability to work unsupervised or with minimal supervision.
Must be able to work in a stressful environment and take appropriate action.

Work Experience:

None required.

Physical Requirements:

Physical demands include: Visual acuity to study specimens under a microscope.
The ability to distinguish colors.
Fine motor skills and manual dexterity to handle specimens and lab equipment required to process specimens and repair equipment.
May be required to stand for long periods of time.
Light lifting may be required.
May be exposed to hazardous chemicals, biohazards, radioactive materials, etc.

Personal Protective Equipment:

Follows Standard Precautions using personal protective equipment as required.

The policy of Cleveland Clinic and its system hospitals (Cleveland Clinic) is to provide equal opportunity to all of our employees and applicants for employment in our tobacco free and drug free environment. All offers of employment are followed by testing for controlled substance and nicotine. Job offers will be rescinded for candidates for employment who test positive for nicotine. Candidates for employment who are impacted by Cleveland Clinic’s Smoking Policy will be permitted to reapply for open positions after 90 days. Decisions concerning employment, transfers and promotions are made upon the basis of the best qualified candidate without regard to color, race, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, ancestry, status as a disabled or Vietnam era veteran or any other characteristic protected by law. Information provided on this application may be shared with any Cleveland Clinic facility.

Cleveland Clinic is pleased to be an equal employment employer: Women/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities",3.8,"Cleveland Clinic
3.8","Akron, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1921,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
337,Risk Decision Scientist,"$112k-$176k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: The PayPal Risk Platform is looking for a smart, self-motivated and strategic thinker to build out risk platform capabilities supporting emerging payment products and optimizations. This role will partner deeply with product managers, policy analysts and technology teams across risk, payments and core experiences to find synergies and build appropriate fraud controls optimized for the payments ecosystem. We are looking for product managers with Payments experience in the bank, card, tokenization or other related field with a passion for fighting fraud.

Job Description:

Understand and synthesize Risk business needs and platform strategy with various product groups with an emphasis on the payments ecosystem:

Developing expertise in specific areas by leading analytical projects independently, while setting goals, providing benefit estimations, defining workflows and coordinating timelines in advance.
Fight fraudulent activity in one’s domain of ownership by analyzing existing loss trends through review of specific cases, research on our payments database and incorporation of feedback from operations teams.
Produce accurate, automated risk solutions and manual handling policies to block fraudulent activities by declining payments, providing a step-up flow, adding accounts to the fraud review queue or restricting suspicious users.
Work closely with product teams on development of new products to identify potential gaps that might create loss and define requirements to mitigate those risks.
Have a good understanding of general business trends and directions to be able to put own work in the broad business context.
Work with various partners within PayPal to coordinate the execution of fraud mitigation solutions.
Develop controls and monitoring dashboards to ensure performance against business goal, regulatory requirements and business priorities.
Remain up-to-date on industry information, federal regulations and new products, while continuously learning from peers across the organization about fraud and fraud-prevention tools..
Be data-driven and outcome-focused

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",3.9,"PayPal
3.9","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
338,"Data Analyst, Governance and Quality","$43k-$77k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

Boston Private is a leading provider of fully integrated wealth management, trust and private banking services. For more than 25 years, Boston Private has taken a highly personalized approach to serving the complex financial needs of individuals, families, business owners, private partnerships, nonprofits and community partners. Boston Private is also an active provider of financing for affordable housing, first-time homebuyers, economic development, social services, community revitalization and small businesses.

Headquartered in Boston, Boston Private has offices across the U.S. including Boston, San Francisco, San Jose, Los Angeles and South Florida. Private banking and trust services are provided through Boston Private Bank & Trust Company. Wealth management services are provided through Boston Private Wealth LLC, an SEC registered investment adviser and a wholly owned subsidiary of Boston Private Bank & Trust Company.

Responsibilities:

As a member of the Data, Analytics and Reporting Team (DART) and reporting to the Head of Data Management, the Data Analyst – Governance and Quality will play a critical role to establish Enterprise Data Governance. Under the direction of the Head of Data Governance, this role will administer all aspects of the Data Governance (DG) process as well as serve as lead analyst for issues related to data standards and data policies. The role will also involve a component of change management for the definition, creation, and enforcement of DG processes.

This role will not only play an integral role in helping to stand up DG, but it will also play a role in shaping and evolving it. This is a great opportunity for an experienced and organized Business Analyst with data background to learn and grow along with Boston Private’s DG data function. Key stakeholders include the Data Governance Leadership Team, Data Analysts, BI Report Developers, Data Engineers, Data Stewards, and business data consumers.

Key responsibilities include:

Create and maintain BP’s Enterprise DG tools (e.g. Data Glossary, Master Report Inventory, Standards & Policies)
Collect and maintain a master list of DG required actions and their progress
Proactively gather, document data requirements and analysis including data integrity and data consistency related to DG standards
Establish DG monitoring processes and related reporting to track the organizations progress.
Work closely with DART Data and Reporting Analysts to inform data transformations, reporting and analysis.
Coordinate and prepare for Data Leadership Group, Data Steward Working Group, and Data Quality Working Group
Serve as curator for DG assets to help DART members and business stakeholders gain ready access to reference materials and tools.
Work closely with the Data Architecture team to enhance existing tools and data architecture to ensure a best in class control framework.
Leverage DART processes and tools to communicate, develop, and maintain DG assests such as documentation and analysis including Jira and steps required as part of DART’s development and launch control processes.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or a similar subject required.
Master’s degree in Technology preferred, or equivalent work experience using software tools for data interrogation is a plus.
Demonstrated attention to detail and teamwork.
Exceptional written and verbal Communication skills.
Financial Services industry experience desired.

Skills & Experience

3+ years’ hands-on experience as a Business Analyst or equivalent required.
Experience producing and/or maintaining business and/or data requirements required.
Experience with SQL and demonstrated understanding of relational databases required.
Experience working on or directly supporting a data management team is desired.
Prior experience serving as part of a Data Governance organization or supporting one is a plus.",3.6,"Boston Private Bank & Trust Company
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
339,Development Scientist,"$24k-$108k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Development Scientist
Location


SEATTLE - Bothell, WA

Company Order #

1775

Apply Now

AGC Biologics is a leading global Contract Development and Manufacturing Organization, with a deep commitment to improving life quality by bringing new biopharmaceuticals to market. Because of our dedication to building and empowering our internal teams, AGC Biologics is an innovative leader in the industry with an extensive network of cGMP facilities in the US, Europe and Asia. As such, we deliver a deep expertise, dynamic solutions and technologies, as well as customized services for the scale-up and cGMP manufacturing of protein-based therapeutics. We forge exceptionally strong partnerships with our clients, and we never lose sight of our pledge to deliver a reliable and compliant drug substance supply. Right. On time. For more information, visit www.agcbio.com.

SUMMARY:

The Development Scientist in the Upstream Process Development group will support the development, scale-up, and transfer of mammalian cell culture processes to GMP manufacturing for the production of recombinant therapeutic proteins

PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with clients and internal project teams in the successful completion of contract manufacturing projects.
Coordinate bench scale experiments leading up to clinical and commercial manufacturing.
Present data to project teams in verbal and written reports.
Take a leadership role within the department for developing and improving cell culture processes:
Develop, coordinate, and communicate experimental plans within the department
Execute and manage shake flask and bench scale bioreactor experiments
Manage large data sets and provide technical guidance to others in the analysis and interpretation of data
Write development protocols and characterization reports
Coordinate activities and experiments with project management, manufacturing, purification development, and analytical development
Provide technical support to manufacturing during large scale manufacturing campaigns
Contribute to the overall operation of the lab and infrastructure improvements
Provide technical support in the laboratory as necessary
Troubleshooting process control instrumentation
Implementation of new equipment and technology
Provide technical and strategic planning support to business development activities with respect to new client projects and new business initiatives.
Contribute to technology development—goal of increasing efficiency and productivity of manufacturing processes through cell culture media and process development
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
Demonstrated experience in a mammalian cell culture and bioreactor lab environment
Excellent technical writing and presentation skills
Previous supervisory, technical guidance and leadership experience
Entrepreneurial/business aptitude with interest in growing a contract manufacturing business
Good interpersonal relationship skills required for working with clients
Previous experience with process validation activities and knowledge of large scale manufacturing activities in a GMP environment
Experience with JMP or other statistical analysis tools would be beneficial
EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE:
PhD (or equivalent experience) in life science or engineering with a minimum of 3-8 years of industrial experience in cell culture process development related to manufacturing biotherapeutics
AGC Biologics offers a highly competitive compensation package and a friendly, collaborative culture that values personal initiative and professional achievement. AGC Biologics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances.",3.3,"AGC Biologics
3.3","Bothell, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
340,Data Analyst,"$34k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Onsite work only - Franklin, Tennessee

Are you looking for a career with a purpose? Do you want the opportunity to be part of a company that’s changing millions of lives for the better? Well, you’ve come to the right place. Ramsey Solutions exists to provide biblically based, commonsense education and empowerment that give HOPE to everyone in every walk of life. Our mission to change the world isn’t easy. We face resistance every day because what we believe is absolutely countercultural. We’re weird. We hate debt. And we actually cut up our credit cards . . . like, for real. We don’t use them in our entire business. Bottom line: We don’t use debt—period. Some of us are still fighting our way out of it, but we aren’t going back in.

Our Analytics and Insights Team has been one of the fastest-growing technology teams at Ramsey Solutions—they’re rocking it! They partner with our 15 digital product areas to help create data-driven solutions for our business problems so we can keep doing work that matters to change more lives. Performing mathematical analysis and using technology to put it into action, this team helps all of us at Ramsey perform at our highest level.

This is where you come in. We need your help to generate data-driven solutions to our business problems. We need a hardcore math nerd—someone who understands mathematical analysis and knows how to use technology to implement it. You’re someone who’s always itching to solve the problem, complete the puzzle, and answer the question. You’re never satisfied with a fluffy answer. You want the facts. You always back up your position with data.

Our data tells a story, and we need you to help us read it. You’ll help us pull back the curtain, notice trends, and apply data to drive change in our business models so we can help more people. If that sounds exciting to you, keep reading.

Skills Needed to Win:
3+ years of experience driving analytics initiatives to impact a business
Solid mathematical or statistics background
Experience with SQL (you’ll use it every day to get the data you need)
Experience with scripting languages like Python and R
Experience building and maintaining dashboards and reporting systems
Ability to translate data into actionable insights
Supporting business decisions through ad hoc analysis
Extraordinary passion to solve problems (you’re not satisfied until it’s solved and backed by data)
Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with data visualization tools like Tableau
Experience utilizing web analytics and Google Analytics tool set
Experience with optimization testing
About Ramsey Solutions:
We’re a debt-free company that was founded in 1992 by Dave Ramsey.
We have over 900 team members who are 100% dedicated to our mission.
We believe collaboration, innovation and a shared sense of mission come from being present with each other. That’s why all of our team members work together under one roof at our headquarters in Franklin, Tennessee.
Ramsey Solutions was recognized by Inc. Magazine as a Best Workplace in the nation for 2020.
And by the way, we're not stuffy or corporate around here. Here are some of the perks and benefits at Ramsey Solutions:
A 401(k) match of 4% after one year as a team member (you can still contribute in the first year)
Health insurance on day one with a $500 HSA match every year
One fully paid workweek of ministry time after one year to volunteer for your favorite charity or nonprofit
Generous PTO and paid sick time off
We prioritize work-life balance and rarely exceed a 40-hour work week
Weekly devotionals with world-renowned speakers, pastors and authors
$300/year to put toward achieving your fitness goals
Casual dress and work environment
It’s a calling, and we’re on a mission to change lives. Join the crusade! Apply now.

EEO/M/F/Veteran/Disabled",3.2,"Ramsey Solutions
3.2","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
341,"Associate Scientist, Virology (PhD Required)",-1,"The associate scientist in virology will be involved in conducting infectious diseases research programs directed at developing novel broad-based host-targeted anti-viral and immunomodulatory therapeutics against influenza and other viral infections. The candidate will write scientific publications, grant and patent applications, and investigational new drug (IND) applications. The responsibilities of this position include developing and executing cell-based assays, _in vitro,_ _ex vivo_ and _in vivo_ to characterize biological mechanisms of action of novel immunotherapeutic product candidates for the treatment of infectious diseases. The associate scientist will have ample and documented experience in cell culture, virus generation and propagation, as well as molecular biology, immunology and biochemical techniques. We are looking for a highly motivated and collaborative individual with a passion for research who enjoys working in a fast-paced and highly dynamic working environment. The candidate will be aligned with four fundamental pillars of BTI's entrepreneurial corporate culture: 1) Be bold and decisive, 2) Never give up, 3) Be solution-oriented, and 4) Do the impossible.
Key Responsibilities: *
· _Experimental Design: _ Generate and test novel experimental hypotheses to advance discovery-based R&D at BTI. Propose controlled designs capable of robustly testing respective hypotheses to draw conclusions relevant to drug development research.

· _Data analysis: _ Utilize established and novel methods to analyze data. Data types will include but are not limited to flow cytometry results, high-throughput sequencing, protein biochemistry assays, and histopathology.

· _Data communication and reporting: _ Provide detailed reports of experimental results. Generate figures, presentations and publications to communicate results with scientific community, investors, and collaborators. Support the development of peer reviewed scientific publications, patents and grants relevant to ongoing research. Demonstrate innovation and strong problem-solving skills.

· _General Laboratory Procedures_: Perform various standard experimental assays including quantitative real-time PCR, Western blot, flow cytometry, and ELISA. Work in sterile conditions to conduct cell culture experiments and maintain the growth of cell lines. Express and purify recombinant protein. Collect and analyze generated data.

· _Personnel Training_: Training of BTI personnel on laboratory upkeep, experimental assays and research projects. Guide the personnel resourcing of projects and tasks.

· _Animal Procedures_: Conduct various IACUC approved laboratory animal procedures and techniques for BTI’s projects including but not limited to basic rodent handling, oral gavage, intraperitoneal injection, blood collection, and euthanasia. Interact with animal facility personnel to maintain organization and compliance of animal facilities. Will design new animal studies for projects related to therapeutic efficacy or mechanisms of action of new drugs for infectious diseases.

· _Virology_: Perform mammalian cell culture and independently develop, run, analyze and troubleshoot in vitro assays, such as cell-based activity assays, virus generation and propagation, and high throughput screening assays. Use developed screening assays to validate the characterize novel therapeutic products.

· _Teamwork_: Work independently and collaboratively in a matrixed environment. Be able to successfully work with other BTI team members in experiments.

· _Regulatory Compliance_: Support regulatory compliance efforts as instructed by the senior leadership in accordance with IACUC, IBC, and IRB protocols. Implement, organize and maintain regulatory compliance records.

· _Record keeping_: Timely documentation of experiments and activities in electronic archive systems. Keep detailed records of all activities, record these activities in Google Drive, laboratory notebook, the BTI’s Colony Management System (CMS), and Labkey. Provide weekly updates of the BTI research progress to the CSO, and BTI team. Maintains confidentiality of all data, information and knowledge.

· Maintain the confidentiality of all company deliberations and plans.

· Any new responsibilities or changes in the reporting structure as directed by the executive leadership.

· Act in accordance with Company’s policies.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $48,590.00 - $69,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Company's website:
www.biotherapeuticsinc.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"BioTherapeutics, Inc.","Blacksburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
342,Computer Scientist – Machine Learning,"$97k-$169k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The Research & Development centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world.

MITRE is seeking an early career Computer Scientist to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision and cognitive science to solve some of the world’s most challenging problems. Our Data Engineering and Biometrics team provide MITRE-unique solutions across multiple sponsors. We are a driving force investigating, developing and defining multiple research initiatives in collaboration with academia, industry and our sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Work in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Advance the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and produce quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Cybersecurity, or related field
At least 1 year of professional experience
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a Secret DoD clearance and DHS fitness
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Demonstrated proficiency using tools such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government Secret clearance are preferred
2+ years’ work experience should include: machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science
Documented success working in the fields of: cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE’s workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us. For more information please visit https://www.mitre.org/careers/working-at-mitre. U.S Citizenship is required for most positions.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.3,"MITRE
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
343,Data Scientist,"$97k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a member of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

Data Scientist is supposed to handle complex problems independently and demonstrate analytical thinking. At this position, you should be able to make judgments and recommendations based on the analysis and interpretation of data.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Design, develop, train, evaluate, tune and support machine learning models for time series analysis, demand forecasting, customer intelligence, recommendation systems, optimization, NLP and image analytics.
Design, implement and support scalable jobs and services for data cleaning, preprocessing, aggregation for model training and model inference data pipelines.
Analyze existing and discover new data sources, perform feature engineering and feature selection
Contribute to the analysis of the business requirements, architecture development and implementation planning
Contribute to the presentation of teams results
Learn & stay current on developments in one or more analytics domains: Optimization, Machine Learning, Deep Learning / AI, Simulation, etc.
Build upon and utilize Amazon Cloud Services and Tools
Requirements:
Good communication and presentation skills
Solid mathematical & computer science background
Relevant software engineering background: VCS(git), CICD, containers (Docker), SQL, agile development practices
Proficiency and practical experience with Python and Python-based ML ecosystem, good coding skills
Proficiency and practical experience with cloud native software architectures, familiarity with AWS ecosystem: Sagemaker, Redshift, Aurora, Redis, EMR, SNS, SQS, DocDB, Cloudwatch, Step Functions, etc...
Strong practical knowledge of classic ML algorithms and experience with modeling tools like scikit-learn, statsmodels, lightgbm, hyperopt
Familiarity with and understanding of time series modeling, response modeling, lift modeling, survival analytics, look-alike modeling, statistical modeling. Ability to quickly ramp up to state-of-the-art in corresponding field.
Nice to Have (Plus):
Familiarity with data engineering and devOps is a plus
Experience with NLP and image analytics is a plus
Experience with recommendation systems (collaborative filtering, content filtering, session-based recommenders is a plus)
Deep learning knowledge and practical experience is a plus (TF, Pytorch, MLPs, RNNs, CNNs, Transformers, etc..)
Experience with retail, online commerce or similar B2C business domain is a plus
Experience in working across different global cultures is a plus

We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,"Grid Dynamics
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
344,Medical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"Performs routine and stat laboratory test procedures working as a generalist in Chemistry, Hematology, Blood Bank, Immunology and Microbiology. Ensures the validity of test results by performing quality control, instrument calibration and routine maintenance on all instruments and manual test. Provides excellent customer service to patients, physicians and other hospital staff. Must we able to work alone as well as part of a team. Ability to multitask, prioritize and perform under pressure is essential.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Collects and processes clinical specimens for routine and stat testing.
Performs reviews, accepts and reports laboratory tests as outlined in the laboratory procedure manual. Adheres to quality assurance and quality control procedures prior preforming all testing.
Maintains and operates laboratory equipment. Has the ability to detect and trouble shoot instrument malfunctions and or failures.
Helps to ensure that proper inventory is maintained for all instruments and other laboratory supplies.
Participates in established Quality Management activities. Collects, evaluates and reports quality management data in order to improve laboratory performance.
Attends and participates in continuing education programs. Monitors, participates and evaluates proficiency testing as well as taking an active role in corrective action.
Participates in job competency evaluation programs and takes an active role in accomplishing laboratory team goals.
Works closely with all laboratory staff to ensure timely client service and accurate test results.
Maintains strict confidentiality in all situations and with all relevant documentation.
Arrives on time, works scheduled hours and takes an equal amount of call.
Performs any and all additional duties assigned by the Laboratory Manager.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor of Science in Medical Laboratory Science or equivalent.
ASCP registration or registry eligibility required.
New graduates are encouraged to apply and must be board certified within six months of hire.
Candidate will be required to relocate.
Willingness to be on call is a must.
Competent phlebotomy skills are required.

Hours: 40/week

Shift: Days, some evenings, weekend, Holidays and call rotation",-1,Franklin County Medical Center,"Preston, ID",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
345,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vitro studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.

Responsibilities:

Assay development (Target engagement)

Cell line development and characterization

Characterization of hit/lead candidates in vitro (qPCR, western blot, ELISA, functional assays)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation

Requirements:

BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vitro assays (cell culture, transfection, qPCR, ELISA/Mesoscale, western, etc.)

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
346,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vitro studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.

Responsibilities:

Assay development (Target engagement)

Cell line development and characterization

Characterization of hit/lead candidates in vitro (qPCR, western blot, ELISA, functional assays)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation

Requirements:

BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vitro assays (cell culture, transfection, qPCR, ELISA/Mesoscale, western, etc.)

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
347,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vitro studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.

Responsibilities:

Assay development (Target engagement)

Cell line development and characterization

Characterization of hit/lead candidates in vitro (qPCR, western blot, ELISA, functional assays)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation

Requirements:

BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vitro assays (cell culture, transfection, qPCR, ELISA/Mesoscale, western, etc.)

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
348,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vitro studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.

Responsibilities:

Assay development (Target engagement)

Cell line development and characterization

Characterization of hit/lead candidates in vitro (qPCR, western blot, ELISA, functional assays)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation

Requirements:

BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vitro assays (cell culture, transfection, qPCR, ELISA/Mesoscale, western, etc.)

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
349,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vitro studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.

Responsibilities:

Assay development (Target engagement)

Cell line development and characterization

Characterization of hit/lead candidates in vitro (qPCR, western blot, ELISA, functional assays)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation

Requirements:

BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vitro assays (cell culture, transfection, qPCR, ELISA/Mesoscale, western, etc.)

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
350,"Associate Scientist, Analytical Development",-1,"Visterra is a clinical stage biotechnology company committed to developing innovative antibody-based therapies for the treatment of patients with kidney diseases and other hard-to-treat diseases. Our proprietary technology platform enables the design and engineering of precision antibody-based product candidates that specifically bind to, and modulate, key disease targets. Applying this technology to disease targets that are not adequately addressed by traditional therapeutic approaches, we are developing a robust pipeline of novel therapies for patients with unmet needs.

Visterra is a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka America, Inc., which is a U.S. holding company and a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. of Japan. Visterra has approximately 75 employees and is located in Waltham, Massachusetts.
Summary*
The Associate Scientist reports to the Associate Director of Pharmaceutical Sciences and Technology (PST) and supports analytical activities to progress molecules from early development through to clinical trials and product licensure. The Associate Scientist is accountable for analytical development and characterization of Visterra’s pipeline molecules. The Associate Scientist will work very closely with internal QA, QC, Manufacturing, and Clinical teams as well as with Contract Test and Manufacturing partners.

This is a full-time position based in Visterra’s facility in Waltham, MA.
Responsibilities*
Provide analytical support to research and development teams to support lead candidate identification and development.
Generate standard operating procedures for characterization of biologics for use at Visterra, train lab members and transfer analytical methods to CMOs.
Identify and stay current with new analytical technologies and methods for characterization of biologics.
Perform characterization and degradation studies on lead candidates and share results with cross-functional teams.
Develop protocols for assay qualification and validation, review and approve data.
Prepare presentations for external partners and internal meetings and represent analytical and CMC issues.
Provide analytical support for investigations at CTOs and CMOs, generate hypothesis, critically review results.
Maintain a contemporary knowledge of current industry trends, standards and methodologies.
Actively participate in program teams, as well as collaborate effectively across functions and external partners.
Other duties and responsibilities as required by departmental and business needs.
Requirements*
At least 5 years of industry or related professional analytical experience in an industrial setting.
A BS Degree in chemistry, biochemistry or a related analytical scientific discipline.
Hands-on experience with some of the following analytical methods; HPLC, UPLC, CE-SDS, SDS-Page, protein purification, CEX, icIEF, LC-MS, Glycan analysis, ELISAs, and cell-based potency assays.
Experience with analytical software Excel, Chemstation, SoftMax, PRISM, and Empower.
Strong interest in innovative strategies for analysis and control of new modalities of biologics.
Experience with trouble-shooting assays, creative problem-solving, and method transfer.
Ability to work in a fast-paced dynamic environment with changing priorities, forward thinking with flexibility to support multiple development programs simultaneously.
Skilled in managing cross functional relationships and collaboration as a team member.
Experience with writing reports, generating presentations, working with external teams and maintaining timelines.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
_Visterra provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws._

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We have created robust and comprehensive policies, process, materials and infrastructure to minimize the risk of COVID-19.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
http://www.visterrainc.com/
Work Remotely:
No",4.6,"Visterra, Inc.
4.6","Waltham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
351,Sr. Manager Advanced Analytics (Data Scientist),"$129k-$210k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.5,"Lidl US
3.5","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Private,Grocery Stores & Supermarkets,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
352,Senior Data Scientist - Defense & Intelligence,"$90k-$145k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Data Scientist - Defense & Intelligence

Home office: Arlington, VA

Elder Research Inc. is a recognized leader in predictive analytics and data mining. We pride ourselves in our ability to find creative, cutting edge solutions to real-world problems. We are looking for innovative and inquisitive self-starters who enjoy translating complex models into actionable solutions that deliver real value for our clients. We have multiple openings in the Northern Virginia-Washington Metropolitan area for analytics and data science professionals to support our Defense & Intelligence business.

Job Description

As a Senior Data Scientist, you will work directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems. You will primarily create and deploy predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods.

Essential Functions

Exploration, cleaning, and wrangling to understand available data.
Meetings and discussions with clients and co-workers, in person and virtually, to refine understanding of the business problem at hand
Trying different predictive modeling approaches to identify the best fit for a given set of business understanding, available data, and project timeline
Writing re-usable code in R, Python, Java, Scala, SQL, or other languages, and working to refine it through code review and discussion
Applying statistics to understand the significance of different attributes
Preparing presentations, writing reports, and working to communicate technical results to clients with varying levels of analytic sophistication
Ability to work independently in a collaborative, dynamic, cross-functional environment
Travel to and work on-site at clients both local and non-local. Number of days at client site vary depending on project requirements.
Clear written and verbal communication skills

Required Qualifications

We are looking to hire Senior Data Scientists with at least 4-8 years of technical experience working with data and deploying analytical solutions. Qualified candidates should have a Master’s degree or greater in a technical field. A PhD can substitute for 2 years of work experience. Applicants with a BA/BS with more data science experience will be considered.
Must be able and willing to obtain a successful CBP Background investigation. A secret or higher clearance may be required in the future

Ideal candidates have technical skills and analytic tool experience in several of the following areas:
Technical Areas: machine learning, statistical learning, statistics, natural language processing, text mining, anomaly detection, operations research, exploratory data analysis, ETL
Analytic Tools: R, SQL, Python

Desired Qualifications

Graduate degrees and additional years of experience are desired.
Current Secret or Top Secret clearance, or willingness to apply for one, is preferred for positions in Defense & Intelligence.
Experience working in any of the following domains is a plus:
Domain Expertise: personnel security, national security, insider threat and continuous evaluation, survey research focusing on behavioral health, behavioral science, I/O psychology, military analytics, epidemiology, public health

About Elder Research, Inc.

Elder Research is a fast growing consulting firm specializing in predictive analytics. Being in the data mining business over 20 years, we pride ourselves in our ability to find creative, cutting edge solutions to real-world problems. In keeping with our entrepreneurial spirit, we want candidates who are self-motivated with an innate curiosity and strong team work. We work hard to provide the best value to our clients and allow each person to contribute their ideas and put their skills to use immediately.

Elder Research believes in continuous learning; each week the entire company attends a “Tech Talk” followed by an office lunch. Elder Research provides a supportive work environment with established parental, bereavement, and PTO policies. By prioritizing a healthy work-life balance - with reasonable hours, solid pay, low travel, and extremely flexible time off - Elder Research enables and encourages its employees to serve others.

Elder Research, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

Elder Research is unable to consider candidates who will need H1B visa sponsorship.",3.8,"Elder Research Inc
3.8","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
353,Junior Data Scientist,"$50k-$87k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Junior Data Scientist
Location


Atlanta - Midtown

Department


Systems Architecture Enterprise

Employment duration


Full time

Apply Now

Work at Purchasing Power

Purchasing Power is a fantastic place to work because: Purchasing Power was founded on the belief that we could empower people and provide the means for them to obtain the small (and sometimes big!) things that improve the quality of their lives.

Junior Data Scientist

Purchasing Power, Midtown Atlanta, GA

Purchasing Power one of Atlanta’s fastest growing e-retailers is seeking a Junior Data Scientist to join our team in Atlanta, GA. In this role, the selected candidate will utilize their expertise to support various business unit and provide insights gained from analyzing our data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities in our data to help solve the “why” of various trends that we see in our KPI’s and help drive courses of action. This candidate must have some relative experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building, and implementing models, using/creating algorithms. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large datasets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

This individual may be required to provide input to or participate in various projects and will perform other duties as requested.

What you’ll do (Duties)
Work with a growing team of Data Scientists to bring decisioning models to various business units.
Demonstrate technical expertise in enterprise level cloud data architecture and advance analytic solutions
Analyze large amounts of data to discover trends and patterns. Be able to present findings to C-Level executives.
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for analysis
Selecting features, building and optimizing classifiers using machine learning techniques.
Present information using data visualization techniques.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Mine and analyze data from company databases to drive optimization and improvement of product development, marketing techniques and business strategies.
Use predictive modeling to increase and optimize customer experiences, revenue generation, delinquency models, and other business outcomes.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Requirements
Proven experience as a Data Scientist or a Data Analyst
Experience in data mining
Understanding of machine learning and operations
Understanding of statistics
Knowledge of R, SQL, and Python. Familiarity with Scala and/or Java is an asset
Familiarity of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Familiarity of statistical techniques and concepts (i.e. regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests, etc).
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
A strong background in data analytics
BSc in Computer Science, Engineering, or relevant field.
A minimum of 2-3 years’ experience and relevant coursework is required
Why Purchasing Power?

We are the leading specialty e-retailer offering consumer products, vacations and online education services through an easy and convenient payment plan. Our customers love us because we make paying for their purchases stress- and hassle-free. The automatic payments help them to avoid penalty fees and ballooning interest associated with other payment options. While the fixed payment duration options empower them to budget more efficiently. Ours is a revolutionary e-commerce experience that gives customers access to a better life combined with a responsible way to buy.

Purchasing Power is ‘Powering People to a Better Life™’ through its employee purchase program, financial literacy efforts and charitable contributions.

For more information, visit www.PurchasingPower.com
Our people! We are very proud of our people, we “Power People to a better life”
100% company paid benefits for employees
Kitchen stocked with gourmet coffee, teas and free snacks
Casual work environment
Summer Hours
Flexible PTO
Top of the line hardware
Purchasing Power is an equal opportunity employer. At Purchasing Power, we make all employment decisions, which include hiring, promoting, transferring, demoting, evaluating, compensating and separating, without regard to sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, race, color, religion, age, national origin, pregnancy, citizenship, disability, service in the uniform services, or any other classification protected by federal, state or local law.",2.5,"Purchasing Power
2.5","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
354,"Scientist, Research","$61k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Company Description

JDRF is the leading global organization focused on type 1 diabetes (T1D) research. Through research, advocacy, partnerships and outreach, JDRF is racing to find cures for tomorrow while striving to improve the lives of those with T1D today. JDRF positions its scientific resources, policy influence and strategic working plan to bring life-changing breakthroughs from therapeutic concepts to the community. As the largest charitable supporter of T1D research, JDRF has invested nearly $2B in research and is funding scientific research and clinical trials in 17 countries worldwide. For more information, please visit http://www.jdrf.org.

Job Description

JDRF will be hiring multiple scientists to manage diverse aspects of our research portfolio. You will be part of a highly interconnected and fast-moving team that is responsible for setting and driving the global research agenda for type 1 diabetes.

These research scientists will be responsible for building and actively managing a research portfolio of grants. The candidates will serve as internal experts in their specialty areas and function as a knowledge resource internally and externally. Due diligence and landscape analyses activities are a requisite part of this active portfolio management. Our mission is highly translationally focused on type 1 diabetes so the candidate should have a strong interest in public health and understand the basic concepts of product development and translational research.

The candidates will be expected to have excellent interpersonal and communication skills to interact effectively with all stakeholders – internal and external scientists, board members, senior management, JDRF supporters, etc. The qualified individual will directly contribute to the implementation, oversight, and advancement of research projects and activities in several programs.

These scientist positions will report to Associate Directors and above, and will participate in all aspects of the JDRF research program including providing scientific input to accelerate the progress of therapeutic areas, contributing to future research strategies aligned with JDRF’s mission, and leveraging opportunities and optimizing relationships within the US and international diabetes research communities.

SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES:

· Strategy and Planning

o Contribute to the regular assessment, review, and presentation of the status of the research portfolio to the Board of Directors and external scientific advisors.

o Work closely with the program administrators to plan, track, and execute on the research budget.

o Contribute expertise to strategic planning efforts across multiple project areas.

o Perform ongoing landscape analyses in areas of relevance to the research department’s therapeutic goals both inside and outside of your area of expertise.

· Review and Oversight

o Development of new research opportunities with internal and external stakeholders (academic scientists, industry partners, etc.)

o Management of external peer review of funding opportunities.

o Active management of ongoing funding opportunities towards early go/no go decisions.

o Opportunity to participate in scouting, securing, and managing research partnerships with companies, other non-profits, governmental agencies, etc.

· Communication

o Generation and presentation of summary documents to lay and/or expert stakeholders.

o Generation of content for public media outlets in collaboration with internal Marketing and Communications team.

o Presentation of JDRF Research and priorities and special topics to both lay and expert audiences.

Qualifications
Ph.D. in biomedical sciences - pharmacology, physiology, cell biology, nutrition/metabolism, public health, biochemistry - or similar field required.
Post-doctoral experience (1-2 years) in disease focused or product development areas desired but not required
Working expertise in one of the following areas is highly desirable:
Experience in the mechanisms of human disease, especially autoimmune disease
Medicinal chemistry, pharmacology, early stage product development
Knowledge of T1D clinical trials and T1D outcomes
Data science/analytics, big data warehousing
Public Health, epidemiology
Psychosocial and quality-of-life aspects of disease, including behavioral health interventions, mental health, patient reported outcomes
· Ability to create, operate and innovate within highly connected team environments with high level of independence

· Ability to handle multiple tasks and meet deadlines demonstrated by strong organizational skills and a detail-oriented nature. Establish priorities in fast-paced environment. Must be a fast learner.

· Exceptional collaboration and relationship-building skills. Ability to interface with stakeholders of highly diverse backgrounds such as all staff and volunteers. Must develop, maintain, and cultivate relationships.
Demonstrate creativity and ability to think strategically regarding scientific and technical opportunities or roadblocks and to conceive and execute on projects
Ability for and interest in developing expertise in new scientific areas
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

#LI remote",3.0,"JDRF International
3.0","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
355,Senior Data Analytics/Scientist,"$73k-$123k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Senior Data Analytics/Scientist to support the Chief Human Capital Office (CHCO) for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

Primary Responsibilities

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insights and trends in human capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance HCA across the IC. Centralize IC CHCO data collection and synthesis, including survey data, enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data-driven problem-solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operation questions; and incorporate insights and findings into a range of products.

Create detailed write-ups of processes used, logic applied, and methodologies used for creation, validation, analysis, and visualizations. Write- ups shall occur initially, within a week of when process is created, and updated in writing when changes occur.

Adapt freeware solutions such as R, and modular solutions for maximum flexibility. Provide an advanced capability for data analysis of human capital information from disparate data types, promoting visualization and storytelling to discover insights that help guide business decisions. Be forward leaning, exploring HCA solutions that benefit IC elements individually and collectively. Let the data tell the story including what is inconsistent or contradictory, and automate data cleansing as much as possible. Integrate data solutions and collection with IC Information Technology Enterprise to enhance connectivity with IC Elements.

Identify and customize, if necessary, Commercial Off The Shelf (COTS) Information Technology (IT) tools for administration and data collection, or to leverage, support, and integrate the process with tools built for the IC and/or its component elements. Any tools developed shall be web-based and web-enabled, designed to maximize feedback effectiveness while protecting employee assessment information, and include both structured interview and web-based tools for gathering feedback.

Assist in the development and maintenance of financial procedural guidance, templates and data formats, for identifying IC-wide workforce numbers, to include government, military, and contractor support. Review, assess data, identify data deficiencies and recommend solutions for remediation. Support quantitative and analytic efforts for workforce planning, development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to the Congressional Budget Justification Book (CBJB) planning displays, and analytic support for budget management and planning. Assist with ad hoc data requests from Congress, IC elements or as required by IC CHCO.

Coordinate and facilitate community of practice and working group meetings, to include meeting logistics, agenda development and presenter coordination, day-of execution and facilitation, documentation and distribution of meeting minutes and presentations. Present or coordinate presentations on relevant topics as directed by IC CHCO.

Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.

Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).

Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.

Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative- tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.

Preferred Experience:

C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.

Demonstrated expertise in supporting quantitative and analytical efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.

Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.

Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.

Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on-line and automated survey instruments.

Years of Experience: 7 years of relevant experience in a related field (computer science, mathematics, statistics, etc.).

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance/ SCI Eligibility with a CI Polygraph. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc.
4.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
356,Data Engineer,"$60k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


The Data Engineer participates in the design and build of modern data products that comprise of raw data stores (data lakes) and cleansed data repositories, populated by batch or streaming data pipelines. The Data Engineer works with a team to create a robust, sustainable and flexible design and leads the technical delivery using Agile delivery frameworks like Scrum or Kanban.

Responsibilities
Developing and managing data processes to ensure that data is available and usable
Creation and automation of data pipelines and platforms
Managing and monitoring data quality via automated testing frameworks (Data Driven Testing, TDD, etc.)
Working closely with Architects, Data Scientists, and DevOps to design, build, test, deliver, and maintain sustainable and highly scalable data solutions
Researching data acquisition and evaluating suitability
Integration of data management solutions into client environment
Actively managing risks to data and ensuring there is a data recovery plan
Building data repositories such as: data warehouses, data lakes, and operational data stores, etc.
Qualifications
3+ years relevant professional work experience.
Experience and expertise in the following:
Creating robust and extensible data pipelines for production systems
Use of cloud platforms, preferably AWS
Creating secure, performant, and well-modeled data stores
Common analytical platform architectural patterns (Star Schema, data integration patterns, ABAC, data quality frameworks etc.)
Data lake design patterns and technology options (schema on read, metadata capture, search framework)
Use of scripting languages, preferably Python
Familiarity with NoSQL databases
Source code version control management using git
Project experience using the Scrum or Kanban framework.
Professionalism; to include written and oral communication – the ability to communicate collaboratively in front of a whiteboard. An ability to understand your audience and adjust your communication style to fit
Aptitude and desire for learning new technologies.
Technically savvy, entrepreneurial spirit who thrives in environments that reward self-initiative and resourcefulness.
About Excella


Excella is a leading provider of Agile software development and data and analytics solutions to clients in the federal, commercial and non-profit sectors. We believe that great work leads to great things –- our experts measure success by the positive impact we make on our clients, community, and colleagues. We are growing fast and need passionate, innovative people who love working with technology and are ready to make an impact.

Here's what you can expect from us:
You'll work with great people who love what they do: our team includes published authors, certified trainers, and internationally renowned speakers.
We have a ""bring your own device"" workplace and will share the cost of a new computer of your choice -- Mac or PC. It's up to you.
We'll invest in your career by providing 3 days of paid professional development every year, including travel and registration fees to attend classes and conferences, in addition to tuition assistance for degrees and certifications.
Starting day one, every employee is bonus eligible and receives 15 days of paid vacation, 6 federal holidays, and 4 floating holidays.
You can bike, drive, or metro to work -- our commute reimbursement plan has you covered.
You'll have fun! We hold monthly social events all year long, including a summer event for you and your family.
Excella is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,"Excella Consulting
4.2","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
357,Research Molecular Scientist,"$28k-$51k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Travel Required: None
Public Trust: NACLC (T3)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT 's military health team is HIRING a Research Molecular Scientist to support the 59th Medical Wing (MDW), located Keesler Air Force Base in Biloxi, Mississippi.

The 59th Medical Wing Science and Technology (ST) office advises and conducts clinical and translational research on matters pertaining to the medical aspects of the Air Expeditionary Force and the health of Air Force (AF) personnel and beneficiaries. In order to support the required research, ST offices conduct translational research in the areas of emergency medical care, combat casualty care, force health protection, restorative medicine, clinical and rehabilitative medicine and specialty centers.

Learn more about the 59th MDW HERE

What You'll Be Doing:

Be experienced and qualified to do research testing in the field of Molecular Laboratory Science to include but not limited to nucleic acid extraction and quantification, electrophoresis, PCR, rtPCR, Microarray, and Sequencing. Familiarity with various Sequencing techniques to include Pyro-Sequencing, Sanger Sequencing and Next Generation Sequencing (NGS). Experience with multiple library preparation techniques for transcriptome, exome and whole genome NGS.
Develop methods related to their particular field of expertise to support research protocols approved by regulatory oversight committees. Methods must be developed to meet researchers need and be in compliance with Good Laboratory Practice Guidelines. Be able to develop test methods and implement testing independently.
Perform manual and automated testing on multiple body fluids from human research subjects and various species of animal subjects as described in approved research protocols.
Perform all required setup and quality control and quality assurance processes required for equipment used in analyzing specimens for research purposes. Meet all accreditation requirements for Good Laboratory Practices in using manual and automated testing equipment.
Analyze the results of tests and experiments to ensure conformity to specifications, using special mechanical and electrical devices.
Review results of tests and quality control materials to ensure that testing processes were in control and all data produced is accurate and precise.
Analyze and record test data to issue reports that use charts, graphs and narratives.
Enter data into various computer systems to meet research protocol requirements. Follow established procedures in validating and verifying data entered in to computer systems.
Use standard laboratory techniques and follow operating instructions in preparing materials for test procedures (i.e., standards, calibrators, solutions, and reagents). Use standard laboratory procedures to prepare specimens for molecular, chemical or toxicological analysis.
Process and ship all samples according to regulations and protocol requirements.
Document all correspondence and communication pertinent to the research.
Assist in the preparation and analysis of laboratory experiments, as requested.
Maintain and update files of all applicable regulatory documentation for IACUC or IRB (including protocols, approvals, amendments, modifications, etc.) as well as any communications with the sponsor or any other Federal or regulatory office (including prior approvals, change in scope, etc.).
Manage study documentation to include accurate and timely filing.
Adheres to Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA), International Air Transport Association (IATA), Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) and infection control procedures.
Assist in writing method validations, operating procedures, presentations, and publications using provided methodologies and formats.
Collect and process specimens from research subjects for testing purposes. All specimens must be collected, processed and handled as described in approved research protocols.
Assists the PI to refine the specific laboratory requirements to meet the aims, research questions, hypotheses, and/or objectives of the studies.
Conducts laboratory procedures and testing in accordance with the approved protocol. Performs appropriate study specific procedures as outlined in the protocol. Orders study materials, equipment, and/or supplies as specified in the research protocol and in accordance with Clinical Research Division (CRD) policies.
Maintains all protocol binder to include all approved protocols and amendments and all data obtained from laboratory procedures.
Abstracts required research data elements from paper or electronic systems or other existing documents, clinical computer databases such as the AHLTA, CHCS or JPTA, and/or other electronic diagnostic reports in accordance with the research protocol and enter these data into spreadsheets, databases, and/or statistic software as required.
Delivers and receives specimens to internal laboratory and/or ship specimens to a referral laboratory as specified by the protocol.
Works with the statistician to clean and prepare data sets for analyses.
Collects, sorts, files, and maintains all paper and electronic documents related to the protocol. Evaluates proposed amendments of the study to identify any changes in laboratory testing requirements as approved by the IRB, Institutional IACUC.
Maintains complete and accurate drug and equipment accountability at all times for the study.
Identifies delays and other shortcomings in meeting objective and develops a contingency plan as required.
Communicates and provides information during any sponsored Contracting Officer Representative (COR) site visit related to the study.
Assists the PIs to write the final report and submit it to the IRB, IACUC, and study sponsor. Manages all aspects of laboratory experiments while in constant communication with the PIs and CRD leadership.
Actively seeks to learn new laboratory techniques to support new protocol requirements. Manages all laboratory testing requirements to support translational and clinical research projects in concert with the PI.
Arranges learning schedules for Graduate Medical Education (GME) personnel working in the clinical and translational research programs.

What You'll Need (required):

Master’s Degree in Molecular Biology or science-related degree with 2+ years’ experience or minimum of Bachelor’s Degree in Molecular Biology with 5 years of recent experience in a molecular biology laboratory.
Shall have at least 5 years of experience in advanced Molecular Laboratory procedures and experience research laboratory procedures including but not limited to research specimens from various species, experience using basic and advance laboratory instrumentation, using various testing techniques to determine biological activity, metabolic changes, or biology products, experience in the collection and processing of various biological samples for frozen long term storage and the procedures to recover samples from long term storage for analysis.
Experience or knowledge in performing translational biomedical research, and working in a laboratory performing various techniques to include but not limited to: flow Cytometry, research involving the use of specimens, PCR/rtPCR testing, expertise in the use and enzyme immunoassay testing assays, use of laboratory equipment including imaging systems, chemistry equipment (i.e., HPLC, GS-MS, etc.), hematology and clinical chemistry analyzers, coagulation testing, experience in cell culture techniques, and extensive experience in collecting processing and archiving specimens for use in translational biomedical research.
Shall have and maintain a current Basic Life Support (BLS) certification.

#MilitaryHealthGDITJobs

#gditpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Keesler AFB, MS",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
358,Data Scientist,"$93k-$149k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The emerging next-generation pharmaceutical supply chain is characterized by the orchestration of collaborating, networked stakeholders working to the common goal of delivering pharmaceutical products to patients on-time and in-full. TraceLink is leading that transformation by leveraging the benefits of big data and cloud technologies realized through advanced algorithms, data science, and analytics. We are extending our core data science team that is responsible for delivering innovative data science solutions to our customers. The ideal candidate is an experienced data science innovator capable of methodically producing performant solutions subject to business constraints. Experience that extends back into data engineering and data collection and forward into product realization within a cloud environment is highly desirable.

Collaboratively identify data science opportunities that support business and product goals
Propose, develop, evaluate, and perfect specific data science solutions
Modify solutions to address application constraints
Integrate modified solutions into cloud-based product offerings
Communicate results and ideas to business leaders

Skills and Qualifications Wish List
Analytical, data-driven, inquisitive mindset with a bias toward precision
Superb written and oral technical communication skills
Learn quickly especially within computer technologies and mathematical concepts
Proficiency in mathematics, statistical analysis, and software development
Proficiency in data science environments, tools, and technologies
Broad knowledge of data science techniques
Ability to distinguish applicability of alternatives
Understanding of the relative performance of competing techniques
Develop, evaluate, perfect, and implement data science solutions
Clean, enhance, profile, and mine structured and unstructured data
Identify and integrate data repositories from internal and external sources
Optimize and test estimators
Perform experimental analysis and validate results
Communicate trustworthy and objective results
Implement analytical models into production by collaborating with software developers and machine learning engineers.
Valuable Additional Skills and Experience
Formal training in data science or related disciplines such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
Experience with big data cloud technologies especially Amazon offerings
Experience with software engineering tools and processes (agile software development)
Proficiency with MSOffice and Google G Suite tools
Experience with Java, Scala, javascript, SQL, Python, R, XML, yaml, JSON, shell scripting
Proficiency with applied mathematics such as probability and statistics, stochastic systems, queueing theory, optimization, control theory, and adaptive systems.",3.9,"TraceLink, Inc.
3.9","North Reading, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
359,Clinical Lab Scientist l,"$19-$30 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","JOB DESCRIPTION & *
COMPETENCY EVALUATION *
POSITION TITLE: *Clinical Laboratory Scientist *JOB CODE: *121
DEPARTMENT: *Clinical Laboratory (7060) *SALARY GRADE: *
REPORTS TO: *Department Manager, Clinical Laboratory *EXEMPT/NON: *Non-exempt
Position Summary: *
Under general supervision and medical direction, performs laboratory test procedures in a manner that provides accurate, timely, and meaningful results.

This position requires the full understanding and active participation in fulfilling the Mission of the Organization. It is expected that the employee will demonstrate behavior consistent with the Core Values. The employee shall support the
Organization’s strategic plan and the goals and direction of the Performance Improvement Plan (PIP).
General Accountabilities: *
_The following are essential job functions and accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Demonstrates an understanding of the District’s guest relations’ policies and programs by initiating and maintaining positive relations with patients, patient families, visitor, medical staff members and other employees of Oak Valley
Hospital District (OVHD), regardless of age, cultural or ethnic backgrounds.
Understands and adheres to hospital requirements for the assessment and provision of care which considers the personal, cultural, spiritual and/or ethnic beliefs of patients.
Assures that the rights of all patients are respected and maintained by allowing for privacy, confidentiality, and dignity in the provision of service.
Demonstrates the ability to follow the Standards of Behavior.
Maintains current professional licenses and/or certifications as and when required by state, regulatory agency, or hospital mandate.
Demonstrates knowledge of, and adheres to, all applicable professional regulatory practice acts, state/federal regulations and policies and procedures of OVHD, including JCAHO, Title XXII and requirements of other regulatory agencies, as applicable.
Identifies patients at risk for abuse and/or neglect, as well as associated signs and symptoms. Adheres to mandatory reporting requirements for healthcare professionals per Administrative Policy & Procedure.
Practices Universal Precautions while providing care and performing other hospital services.
Demonstrates the knowledge and skills to safely and appropriately fulfill job specific responsibilities related to safety, security, emergency preparedness, control of hazardous materials/waste, life safety, medical equipment and utility systems as outlined in the hospitals environment of care plan. Observes safety precautions to ensure a safe environment for patients, patient families and guests of all ages. Adheres to National Patient Safety Goals (NPSG).
Actively supports the organizations mission, vision, values and goals. Participates in activities within the organization that support performance improvement.
Meets current hospital standards as defined by the Oak Valley Hospital District Employee Handbook and the hospital’s
Administrative Policy and Procedure Manual.

Job Description
Laboratory Scientist
Meets the age specific clinical, interpersonal and interactive responsibilities, as outlined in the Human Resources
Policy and Procedure _“Age-Specific Interpersonal and Interactive Relationships”._
Meets the clinical competency requirements as outlined in the Department Specific Skills Checklist.
Meets State of California standards by completing an annual TB test during the established time frame, in accordance with OVHD established TB testing schedule.
Reviews the job description with the designated supervisor during the annual performance appraisal and recommends changes, as necessary.
Position Accountabilities: *
_The following are general job accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Demonstrates the skill to appropriately utilized multiple computer systems and L.I.S.
Demonstrates good communication skills to ensure continuity of care as it pertains to laboratory testing, including relaying information to supervisor, relaying information between shifts, relaying information to the Supervisor and relaying of information between shifts.
Acts as a resource for orientation and training of new employees. Disseminates accurate and complete information.
Judiciously uses supplies and suggests cost saving measures. Ensures appropriate use of inventory and its management.
Is courteous and professional with patients, coworkers and visitors.
_*_
_ *The following are unit-specific accountabilities *_
_ *_*
Read and follow all policies and procedures
Perform quality control on all test systems as required and document corrective action
Operate analyzer according to manufactures specifications and perform maintenance as required
Evaluate sample integrity and reject compromised specimen
Accurately enter test results and document read back
Assist in the work up of new test systems as directed by Medical Director
Communicate problems to supervisor or Medical Director as necessary
Oversee the duties of Lab Assistant I/II. Direct as necessary
Correlate Clinical Data
Phone all alert value results and document read back.
Position Qualifications: *
Minimum Education: *
BS/BA in chemical, physical, biological or laboratory science
Minimum Experience/Skills: *
One (1) year experience as a technologist in a laboratory is preferred

2
_The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. *_
_ *_*

Job Description
Laboratory Scientist

Able to perform basic mathematical calculations
Licenses/Certificates/Credentials: *
Current CA license as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist
Physical Demands: *
Prolonged, extensive or considerable standing/walking
Lifts, positions, pushes up to 50 pounds
Considerable reaching, stooping, bending, kneeling, crouching
Manual dexterity and mobility
Ability to move quickly
Vision Requirements: *
Ability to adjust vision sufficiently to perform duties
Working Conditions: *
Regularly exposed to the risk of contagious and blood borne diseases
Subject to varying and unpredictable situations
Exposure to unpleasant elements (accidents, injuries, illness)
Emergency and crisis situations
Subject to irregular hours
Increased stress due to multiple calls and inquiries
Occasional exposure to radiation hazards, radioactive substances and biohazard material

3
_The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. *_
_ *_*

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $15.24 - $17.31 per hour

Work Remotely:
No",3.3,"OAK VALLEY HOSPITAL DISTRICT
3.3","Oakdale, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
360,Real World Evidence (RWE) Scientist,"$100k-$135k
(Employer Est.)","Genesis Research is an international healthcare consultancy providing end-to-end evidence development, optimization and communication services for Life Sciences groups. _Our RWE-S team has seen exceptional growth and success in providing holistic and comprehensive support to Life Science organizations._ We are looking for an experienced *Real World Evidence (RWE) Scientist* to join our research team.

_Location: Hoboken, New Jersey._
_Responsibilities: _*
Conceptualize the scope of projects and work with the team from project initiation through completion of client deliverables
Work with project teams to identify data needs, sources, and structure to support client issues problem solving
Understand the strengths and limitations of Real-World Data (RWD) sources
Generate Evidence and Analyze large and complex healthcare data (Claims, EMR, and Registry Data) using R, SQL, Python
Participate in the production and presentation of deliverables
Develop creative solutions for complex problems
_Key Requirements_**: *
Bachelor’s degree in a technical or quantitative field from an accredited college or university (e.g., statistics/ biostatistics, epidemiology, bioinformatics, health economics, mathematics, outcomes research, public health, biology, medicine); Masters, MPH or PhD degree preferred
3+ years relevant work experience (less with PhD)
Demonstrated knowledge of R/SQL and statistical methods
Experience developing and implementing statistical analysis plans utilizing RWD or clinical trials
Demonstrated thorough aptitude for conducting quantitative and qualitative analyses
Willingness to provide superior customer service through first-rate work product
Ability to work independently and collaboratively
Strong communication skills with the ability to explain technical data analysis results to business people, as well as communicate quantitative challenges and issues to technical people
_Knowledge Preferred: _*
Significant experience working with analytical models and visualization techniques and tools
Advanced analytics techniques (regression, simulation, etc.)
Identifying and addressing client needs, building relationships with clients, developing requests for proposals
Creative and innovative problem solving skills
Ability to work under tight deadlines in a highly dynamic environment.
Experience developing scientific communications (Abstracts, Posters, Reports)
Compensation: *
Competitive salary, 401K, performance-related bonus and health insurance benefits.

Genesis Research is an equal opportunities employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $86,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
industry: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.genesisrg.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.6,"Genesis Research
4.6","Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
361,Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition,"$86k-$154k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition
Location


Simi Valley, CA

Employment type


Regular - Full Time

ID

1727

Apply Now

This is a pipeline requisition posted in advance of approved headcount for future hiring needs of Machine Learning Engineers.

AeroVironment Machine Learning Engineers have the opportunity to lead engineering development and work with our R&D Group to develop a variety of innovative capabilities - computer vision detection, classification, localization, and tracking solutions for defense and commercial applications. These development efforts will generally be small focused design teams, which will require a Machine Learning Engineer to use a range of skills and tools across traditional engineering, computer science, and mathematical disciplines including computer vision, machine learning, optimization, deep convolutional neural networks, and visual tracking. This position will work on, and lead, a variety of stages of development including requirements definition, concept design, prototyping, detailed design, test and evaluation, and validation and verification testing.

Position Responsibilities
Leads development of computer vision & machine learning algorithms capable of detection, classifying, localizing & tracking objects-of-interest from a group 1 UAV, using the existing gimballed camera payload
Writes Hand test software to Lead integration of autonomy algorithms into aircraft (such as autopilots, payloads, or other functional components) or other robotic systems
Explores and visualizes data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect
Implements Machine Learning systems and validate designs through a series of purpose-designed experiments
Creates objectives & develop models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress
Performs design and analysis tasks using AeroVironment and industry developed tools
Leads Analysis of ML algorithms to solve a given problem and ranking them by success probability
Performance when deploying the model in the real world; Verifying data quality, and/or ensure it via data cleaning
Supervises the data acquisition process if more data is needed; Finds available datasets online that could be used for training
Understands the preprocessing feature based engineering to be done on a given dataset; Training models and tuning their hyper-parameters
Analyzes the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them. Deploy models to production; Study and transform data science prototypes
Researches and implemenst appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Determines methods and procedures on new assignments and may coordinate activities of other personnel
Special Requirements
U.S. Citizenship required. Must be willing to work on government contracts and the ability to obtain a security clearance

We are pipelining for Engineers with various level of experience:
Machine Learning Engineer III with a minimum of 5+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 8+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Staff Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 12+ years of relevant experience
Basic Qualifications
BS Degree in Computer Vision and Machine Learning is required or equivalent combination of education, training, and experience - with qualifications in any of the following fields: Mathematics, Optimization, Computer Science/Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering
Familiarity with C/C++ and Matlab required
Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot complex systems
Familiarity with office software and computer-based productivity tools
Advanced degree is preferred
Other matrixed skills include:
Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow or Keras
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning such as scikit-learn and pandas
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with OpenCV
Familiarity with Linux
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency
Computational statistics
Mathematical optimization
Data mining
Exploratory data analysis
Predictive analytics
Note: Our team is always interested in speaking with exceptional Machine Learning Engineers though please note this is a Pipeline posting with more of an eye towards our future needs rather than necessarily being an immediate hire. Only qualified candidates will be contacted.
ITAR Requirement:

This position requires the use of information which is subject to compliance with International Traffic Arms Regulations (ITAR). To conform to U.S. Government export regulations/ITAR, applicants must be a U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S. (or, green card holder), protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3). Applicants cannot be hired until they are qualified to have such access. Some positions due to U.S. Government contract requirements will require current U.S. Citizenship.

Benefits: AV offers an excellent benefits package including medical, dental vision, 401K with company matching, a 9/80 work schedule and a paid holiday shutdown. For more information about our company benefit offerings please visit: http://www.avinc.com/myavbenefits.

We also encourage you to review our company website at http://www.avinc.com to learn more about us.

Principals only need apply. NO agencies please.

Who We Are

Based in California, AeroVironment (AVAV) is a global leader in unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Founded in 1971 by celebrated physicist and engineer, Dr. Paul MacCready, we’ve been at the leading edge of technical innovation for more than 45 years. Be a part of the team that developed the world’s most widely used military drones and created the first submarine-launched reconnaissance drone, and has seven innovative vehicles that are part of the Smithsonian Institution’s permanent collection in Washington, DC.

Join us today in developing the next generation of small UAS and tactical missile systems that will deliver more actionable intelligence to our customers so they can proceed with certainty – and succeed.

What We Do

Building on a history of technological innovation, AeroVironment designs, develops, produces, and supports an advanced portfolio of unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Agencies of the U.S. Department of Defense and allied military services use the company’s hand-launched UAS to provide situational awareness to tactical operating units through real-time, airborne reconnaissance, surveillance, and target acquisition.

AeroVironment Incorporated is an equal opportunity employer, M/F/D/V and works in compliance with both federal and state laws. We are committed to the concept regarding Equal Employment opportunity. Qualified candidates will be considered for employment regardless of race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, marital status, medical condition nor disability, genetics, veteran and all others that may appy.

To view our CCPA Privacy Policy click here: https://www.avinc.com/legal/ccpa-privacy-policy",4.1,"AeroVironment
4.1","Simi Valley, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
362,Data Analyst,"$53k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

Job Description

The Data Analyst is responsible for providing in-depth data mining and data analyses to multiple departments, with a focus on understanding our customers and identifying ways to improve the user experience within our games.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Identify, design, prioritize and develop data analyses to create unique business insights; perform detailed data exploration and validation to understand customers
Identify key analytic metrics; build reports and present key insights to ensure that data drives actions to improve the business; examine and analyze available information to determine patterns and gaps at a strategic level and recommend a course of action to support internal and external users
Research and analyze web and game usage data and recommend solutions; analyze user experience and business processes in order to identify opportunities for improvement
Document business needs, prioritize requested functionality, and validate requirements against strategic goals and project objectives
Provide reporting and performance monitoring by using data drawn from diverse sources
Other duties as assigned
Type of Decisions made by this position?
Analyze game data and make recommendations for improvement
Prioritize data requests
Documentation of the department's business needs
Work Experience
3+ years of experience in data analytics or a related field
2+ years of experience with analytics software such as Google Analytics
2+ years' experience with Marketing Intelligence Platforms such as Singular
Experience with data extraction and manipulation tools and Data Mining tools
Online gaming experience preferred
Education, Professional Training, Technical Training or Certification
Master's Degree preferred or Bachelor's degree with equivalent experience
Knowledge/Skills
Excellent knowledge of statistical analysis
Ability to extract data by writing your own SQL queries
Experience using Tableau or similar BI tools
Programming for data analysis (R or Python) preferred
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Able to manage shifting priorities in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional Excel and PowerPoint skills
Excellent time and project management skills
Management has the right to add or change duties and job requirements at any time.

Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner, and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company-paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work-life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,"Nexon America Inc
2.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
363,Data Engineer,"$50k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

We are expanding our efforts into complementary data technologies for decision support in areas of ingesting and processing large data sets including data commonly referred to as semi-structured or unstructured data. Our interests are in enabling data science and search based applications on large and low latent data sets in both a batch and streaming context for processing. To that end, this role will engage with team counterparts in exploring and deploying technologies for creating data sets using a combination of batch and streaming transformation processes. These data sets support both off-line and in-line machine learning training and model execution. Other data sets support search engine based analytics. Exploration and deployment of technologies activities include identifying opportunities that impact business strategy, collaborating on the selection of data solutions software, and contributing to the identification of hardware requirements based on business requirements. Responsibility also includes coding, testing, and documentation of new or modified scalable analytic data systems including automation for deployment and monitoring. This role participates along with team counterparts to develop solutions in an end-to-end framework on a group of core data technologies.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Contribute to the evaluation, research, experimentation efforts with batch and streaming data engineering technologies in a lab to keep pace with industry innovation
Work with data engineering related groups to inform on and showcase capabilities of emerging technologies and to enable the adoption of these new technologies and associated techniques
Contribute to the definition and refinement of processes and procedures for the data engineering practice
Work closely with data scientists, data architects, ETL developers, other IT counterparts, and business partners to identify, capture, collect, and format data from the external sources, internal systems and the data warehouse to extract features of interest
Code, test, deploy, monitor, document and troubleshoot data engineering processing and associated automation
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures

REPORTING RELATIONSHIP

Data Integration Manager US

Qualifications:

Knowledge

Experience with processing large data sets with Kafka, RabbitMQ, Flume, Hadoop, HBase, Cassandra and/or Spark or similar distributed system
Experience with NoSQL data stores such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Redis, Riak or other technologies that embed NoSQL with search such as MarkLogic or Lily Enterprise
Experience or familiarity with ETL and Business Intelligence technologies such as Informatica, DataStage, Ab Initio, Cognos, BusinessObjects or Oracle Business Intelligence

Skills

Ability to quickly prototype and perform critical analysis and use creative approaches for solving complex problems
Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Education

High School Diploma or equivalent required
Bachelor’s Degree in related field or equivalent work experience preferred

Experience

2-4 years of hands-on experience with SQL, data modeling, and relational databases such as Oracle, DB2 and Postgres required
Minimum of 1 year of experience with software engineering to include Java, Scala and Python required #LI-TS1",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Arlington, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
364,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,"$46k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
365,Head of Real-World Data Science,-1,"Genesis Research is an international healthcare consultancy providing end-to-end value evidence strategy, development, and communication services to Life Sciences companies. We are looking for an individual with demonstrated leadership, biopharma industry experience, and strong methodological skills to lead a growing team epidemiologists and RWE scientists. Our RWE-S team has seen exceptional growth and success in providing holistic and comprehensive support to Life Science organizations. The professional leading this team must possess and demonstrate a passion for innovative research, maintain accountability for all RWE deliverables, develop RWE scientists and research teams. This person must understand the needs of clients’ internal and external stakeholders and leverage this understanding to suggest and design value-added, fit-for-purpose research approaches. This role reports to the Chief Scientific Officer. Location: Hoboken, NJ, USA, although remote locations may be considered. Local and international travel of up to 20% is required.


Accountabilities within this role:
• Be the Genesis Research Authority on study design, methodology, and result interpretation for all RWE Deliverables
• Lead, manage, and ensure maximum utilization of a team of epidemiologists and health services researchers charged with designing, implementing, and managing a wide range of studies assess the distribution, patterns and determinants of health and disease conditions and examine access to and the use, costs, quality, delivery, organization, and outcomes of health care.
• Create, update, and maintain Methodological and Scientific Standard Operating Procedures (SOP) that RWE teams will follow
• Support Client Managers with execution and delivery of high-priority and highvisibility studies as a Client-facing subject matter expert
• Provide training, oversight, and guidance for new and current members of the Epidemiology team
• Ensure that the Epidemiology team members are aware of and understand RWD data sources, their strengths and limitations, and statistical software when designing studies
• Manage team capacity in concert with Client Management needs
• Motivate teams during periods of high demand

Qualifications:
▪ Master’s degree, MD or PhD within a relevant discipline (Epidemiology, Public Health, Statistics)
▪ 10+ years of consulting, industry, or academic experience
▪ Experience generating and interpreting real-world and observational research required
▪ Excellent verbal and written communication skills
▪ Proficiency in relevant software such as MS office (Word, Excel and PowerPoint) and statistical packages
▪ Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail
▪ Enthusiasm to learn and motivation to develop oneself and others within Genesis Research
▪ Flexibility to adapt to client project needs in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial workplace

Compensation:
Competitive salary
Performance-related bonus C
ompany-matched 401k plan
Medical/dental benefits

Genesis Research is an equal opportunity employer.",4.6,"Genesis Research
4.6","Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
366,Data Analyst I - Data Science Team,"$78k-$129k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Wednesday, October 14, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

JOB DECRIPTION/ DUTIES

Data Analysts I in the Data Science Program work on projects to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. Data Analyst I learn CNA's unique approach to analytics that combines an understanding of the technical capabilities with insights acquired from up close and current experience with real-world military operations.
1. Leverage R and/or Python to develop machine learning models for, e.g., regression, classification, natural language processing, and/or image recognition.

2. Develop an understanding of Navy and Marine Corps operations, maintenance, supply, training, and personnel datasets.

3. Extract, transform, load (ETL) data from various data sources in order to initiate analysis.

4. Conduct data preparation including cleaning, wrangling, joining, and converting data in order to provide a useable analytic dataset.

5. Conduct Exploratory Data Analysis (EDA) to include the use of data visualizations (e.g. Dash, MATPLOTLIB, R Shiny, ggplot2, Power BI, etc.), correlations, empirical/theoretical distributions of data, and summary statistics.

6. Apply statistical methods including descriptive and inferential techniques using parametric and nonparametric statistics.

7. Communicate analysis and results clearly, concisely and precisely.

8. Support projects by analyzing complex datasets and using effective visualizations of data in their results.

9. Serve as an effective team member by fulfilling assignments in a timely and efficient manner. Works cooperatively and accepts guidance and direction from others. Exhibits a positive attitude, and takes responsibility for own actions and outcomes.

10. Interact with functional peers within the organization, as well as sponsors / clients/ vendors; sometimes with guidance from others. Interaction normally involves exchange or presentation of factual, but somewhat varied and complex information.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

1. Education: Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Programming, Statistic or related field or equivalent experience required.

2. Experience: Relevant experience demonstrated from course work and/or relevant work history including internships.

3. Skills: Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to apply machine learning techniques, building models (statistical, mathematical, simulation, etc.) in programming languages such as R or Python. Ability to analyze complex datasets using effective visualizations of data in achieved results; skilled in programming, statistics, machine learning, and data visualization. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices.

4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Technical
Job Function
Career Path I - Research
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
367,Senior Scientist of Protein/Antibody Engineering,-1,"Synbio Technologies is committed to discovering and developing cutting edge DNA technologies for the advancement of life science, synthetic biology, drug discovery and development, diagnostics and precision medicine and digital information DNA storages etc. Synbio Technologies has built a comprehensive DNA “reading” (sequencing); DNA “writing” and DNA “editing” platforms enabling us to aid customers in one-stop DNA solutions. We are a teamwork orientated company and are looking for dedicated, self-motivated and talented individuals to join the team.

We are looking for a qualified individual to lead antibody engineering and functional applications. The individual will be responsible for the design of intracellular antibody discovery and optimization, developing biochemical and cell-based screening/reporter assays for antibody therapeutic lead selection, screening of antibodies from hybridoma and display libraries, antibody V gene sequencing, recombinant antibody expression, purification, and characterization.The candidate will be responsible for defining, developing and implementing technology and commercial strategies, initiating and establishing team and execution of working plans from antibody early discovering to functional characterization and leads validation. Supporting business development transactions such as research collaboration, OEM negotiation, and business development partnership. The candidate will be the key in driving those activities to achieve strategic goals and financial objectives for sustainable long-term growth of the company.
Specific Responsibilities*
Express and purify proteins in mammalian cells, E. Coli cells, Yeast cells and insect cells
Design, test and optimize the discovery & development of antibodies
Create infrastructure/library for any one of the display platforms (phage/Yeast/mRNA)
Design, generate and optimize synthetic antibody libraries (i.e. ScFv library, VHH library, full length library etc.)
Create infrastructure the display platforms (phage/Yeast/mRNA)
Development of biochemical and cell-based reporter assays for antibody lead generation
Express, purify and bio-physical characterize of antibodies
Initiate and coordinate projects with different department (i.e. PM and BD)
Teach and mentor junior research associates and interns
Independently analyze and present data to scientific teams
Strong commitment and accountability for completion of projects in accordance with team plans
Excellent organizational skills, attention to detail and goal orientation
Minimum Requirements*
PhD in molecular biology, biochemistry, protein/antibody engineering, immunology, or related field with 0-3 years postdoctoral biologics experience preferred
Proven record in protein expression and purification
Experience in antibody engineering and affinity maturation
Hands-on experience in antibody engineering in areas of hybridoma sequencing, synthetic antibody library construct designs and antibody expression is required
Experience with antibody sequence isolation, repertoire analysis, and V region classification
Direct experience in antibody library designs and testing using one of the display platforms (Phage, Yeast, mRNA) is preferred
Designed and developed intracellular protein-protein interactions via a reporter system
Ability to collaborate with Synthetic gene and Vector Engineering colleagues to generate appropriate in vitro, cellular, and in vivo data packages
Hands-on experience with transient and stable expression of proteins in CHO or HEK293 cells and antibody production and purification methods
Outstanding problem-solving skills, ability to multi-task and learn new techniques
Excellent communication skills, written and verbal Strongly Preferred
Significant experience in a cell-based reporter system to test protein-protein interactions
Open to learn new techniques and implement them in the group and experience working within a cross-functional therapeutic program team or academic group
Job Type: * Full Time
Base salary*: /year
Bonus: *
Stock option: *
Experience: *
Molecular Biology 5 years
biotech/pharmaceutical working: >1 years (Preferred)
Education: *
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization: *
United States (Required)
Required travel: *
Required
Contract Length: *
N/A
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,"Synbio Technologies LLC
1.0","Princeton, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
368,"Patient Insights & Healthcare Data Science Lead, US Oncology BU","$94k-$155k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Discover more at takedajobs.com.

As a member of Takeda Oncology, your work will contribute to our bold, inspiring vision: We aspire to cure cancer. Here, you’ll build a career grounded in purpose and be empowered to deliver your best.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Takeda Oncology is seeking a highly data-driven, passionate and self-motivated individual to join our US Insights & Analytics (I&A) team and provide meaningful patient insights that enable effective, data-driven decision making. This Senior Manager level role is a critical position demanding experience in consultative influence utilizing varied approaches to advanced analytics and data science methods, engaging stakeholders at all levels. This senior manager-level role will report to the Head of Patient Insights & Healthcare Data Science and will partner closely with the US Oncology Business Unit (US OBU) functional leads and business stakeholders.

This role will be responsible for bringing an innovative perspective to advise strategic decision around patient analytics and healthcare data science capabilities, supporting commercial, medical and health economics & outcomes research (HEOR) functions. She/he will facilitate and develop actionable recommendations based on patient insights that address key business needs and objectives. This role will be highly involved in all facets of our analytics strategy, ensuring rigorous approach of measuring business value. This role will guide and execute advanced and predictive analytics to support the US OBU’s goal of delivering differentiating patient engagement through value-added services to support patients in the journey of fighting cancer and position Takeda with an ongoing competitive advantage.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Provide strategic input to identify and develop key patient insights and analytics capability by analyzing longitudinal health data to characterize patient journey and outcomes.

Identify and implement viable data science and epidemiology use cases to solve problems impacting patient outcomes across multiple franchises leveraging diverse data, ranging from specialty pharmacy to claims to real world evidence.

Develop comprehensive data science strategy and framework that builds out core US OBU data science capability and knowledge management platform.

Act as a thought leader in defining data science and machine learning models ensuring the team continues to apply cutting-edge models across patient adherence, segmentation, etc.

Process analytical models and create or modify patient journeys while activating a brand plan and measurable insights, as well as provide recommendations into strategies and tactics for key products in the market.

Translate insights generated from various models and algorithms into actionable insights via story-telling to brand leadership teams along with corresponding data to substantiate the recommendations.

Drive data science initiatives end-to-end by defining, designing and implementing in close collaboration with IT and external vendor partners.

Support data analysts in identifying the key data requirements and build data cohorts for ad hoc and recurring patient analysis across commercial, medical and HEOR functions.

Apply appropriate methodology based on the use cases – including, but not limited to regression, forecasting, clustering, decision trees, simulation, optimization, and machine learning.

Publish the models and perform reviews on an ongoing basis to ensure that the efficacy of results generated is not diminished over time.

Champion in educating stakeholders on the usage of data science across US OBU by demonstrating value to enable data-driven culture.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Bachelor’s degree with minimum 5 years of experience in an analytical field such as statistics, management science, engineering, economics, math, etc.

Experience in pharmaceutical, healthcare and/or pharma healthcare consulting industry with focus on patient analytics and data science in healthcare.

Experience in the pharmaceutical industry with expert knowledge of secondary data sources and suppliers in the US market, such as IQVIA, Prognos, MMIT, Flatiron, etc.

Deep expertise in external data assets (including specialty pharmacy, claims and real world evidence) to enable brand strategy and insights

Excellent influencing skills, with demonstrated ability to work collaboratively and effectively with key business partners, IT leadership teams, and external service providers

Solid business acumen, understanding of what are the key business drivers that will generate desired results.

Having a “growth mindset” and open to new challenges and constructive feedback. Always learning and turning problems into opportunities.

Familiarity with business intelligence and data warehousing principles and techniques

Strong interpersonal skills as well as excellent verbal, written communication & presentation skills

Learn more at takedajobs.com.

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-KB1

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Synbio Technologies LLC
1.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
369,Machine Learning Engineer,"$65k-$102k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description
This role will be part of our Applied Data Team and will be responsible for providing Machine Learning Engineering support.
Tasks & responsibilities required of this role include but are not limited to:
Construct machine learning models including data collection, normalization, and standardization, data pipeline construction, model selection and hyperparameter tuning, working ml systems that can add new data into ml model.
Create apps to present ml models and host them in the cloud or locally.
Create pipelines to query and retrieve and update data for existing applications to keep them updated
Supervise the scaling and management of the machine learning modeling ecosystem
Find orthogonal data sets to supplement models and increase alpha
Stay abreast of new technology and machine learning methodologies and implement them into the model building architecture
Work alongside (re)insurance domain experts to improve predictive aspects of their lines of business
Requirements:
3+ years of demonstrative excellence in building, scaling, and productizing machine learning models
Experience working with sparse, high dimensional, and time series data
Python ml stack
Experience dealing with imbalanced classes
Deep Learning Architectures
ML Optimization Techniques
Cloud Services: Azure, AWS, Google Cloud
Distributed systems: Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark
Databricks
Ensemble Stacking and Meta Learners
Classification and Regression Metrics
Regularization Methods
Version Control
Quant trading experience welcome but not required
Kaggle ranking of expert or higher a plus",3.5,"TransRe
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
370,Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II),"$34k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Looking to join a growing organization? Ocean State Job Lot is currently seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II)! To apply, visit our website at oceanstatejoblot.com/careers
POSITION SUMMARY:
The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II) is responsible for developing and managing Business Intelligence solutions for the organization. This role is a contributing member of the Business Intelligence & Analytics team and works closely with, and has full exposure to, all areas and levels of the business. The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer performs a variety of duties, without limitation, to identify the most impactful way for data and analytics to drive decision making and accelerate profitable growth.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop and manage Business Intelligence solutions utilized throughout all corporate offices, the distribution center, and retail stores
Collaborate and effectively communicate directly with internal stakeholders on a daily basis
Solve problems and independently develop high quality solutions by combining knowledge of programming, data modeling and statistics with skillful communication, analytical thinking, presentation and relationship building
Actively participate in the Business Intelligence workstream planning process including inception, technical design, development, testing, and delivery of solutions
Perform analysis for a wide range of requests using data in different formats and from various platforms
Create and maintain documentation including requirements, design, and user manuals
Develop policies and procedures for data collection and analysis
Participate in the deployment of data to the data warehouse
Follow IT processes and best practices for successful implementation and maintenance of Business Intelligence solutions
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related field required
3-5 years of Business Intelligence or related technical experience required
1-3 years of professional experience in retail or related industry preferred
Experience with Business Intelligence solutions (Qlik, MicroStrategy, PowerBI, Tableau, etc.) required
Experience with Data Warehouse and ETL solutions (Cloud-Based a plus) required
Experience with programming / scripting (SQL, Python, R, etc.) required
Experience with full Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC) methodologies preferred
Experience with Google Cloud Platform (BigQuery, Storage, Dataprep, Dataflow, etc.) preferred
Proficient in Google platform (i.e. sites, slides, drive, docs, sheets)",3.7,"Ocean State Job Lot
3.7","North Kingstown, RI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,General Merchandise & Superstores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
371,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,"$69k-$116k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
372,"Staff Research Scientist, Geomorphology/Soil Science","$35k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Thank you for your interest in employment with the Desert Research Institute. We want your application process to go smoothly and quickly. We ask that you keep in mind the following when completing your application:
Once you start the application process you cannot save your work. Please ensure you have all required attachment(s) available to complete your application before you begin the process.
Required attachments are listed below on the posting. Your application will not be considered without the required attachments.
Please see the application instructions under each posting for information on submittal deadlines.
If you need assistance or have questions regarding the application process, contact Human Resources Hotline at (775) 673-7431 or recruit@dri.edu.

Job Description

The Desert Research Institute (DRI) seeks a Staff Geomorphologist or Soil Scientist at the Staff Research Scientist level (Rank 1) to assist in the characterization of soils, geomorphology, and dust emission in support of current DoD funded projects at DRI.

This position involves research support in four overlapping areas:
Assist in the analysis of soil surface conditions as related to dust emission potential, including field operation of the PI-SWERL (Portable in situ Wind Erosion Laboratory).
Assist in the entry of field and laboratory data into spreadsheets and databases as required and ability to assist in the analysis of collected soil, dust, geomorphic, and Quaternary geologic data.
Assist on field-oriented studies where soil and geomorphic data is collected in support of project objectives.
Perform laboratory duties in the Quaternary Pedology and Soil Characterization Laboratory as directed.
In addition, the candidate should be familiar and comfortable with basic report writing and technical editing and be willing to learn how to collect instrument data, often in extreme environments.

Other responsibilities may include assistance in a wide variety of Quaternary geologic and geomorphic projects as opportunities and needs arise. These efforts include mapping of Quaternary geology and soils, identification of landforms, description and sampling of soils and sediments, working with Quaternary stratigraphy, sampling of materials for geochronology, geoarcheology and cultural resources identification, and general support of field research activities.

Required Qualifications
US Citizenship (Must have the ability to work on DoD instillations);
Bachelor of Science Degree in Geology, Earth Science, or related field from an accredited institution;
Basic knowledge in geomorphology, Quaternary geology, or soil science;
Excellent oral and written communication skills;
Team player with diverse research interests and excellent interpersonal skills;
Demonstrated experience to independently conduct field-based geomorphic or soil science research.
Preferred Qualifications
Master of Science Degree in Earth Sciences, Soil Science, or related fields from an accredited institution;
Experience using standard GIS software (e.g. ArcGIS Desktop) and generating map products;
Demonstrated experience with soil mapping and performing field descriptions of geomorphic, stratigraphic, and/or soil morphologic properties;
Working knowledge of soil classification systems;
Demonstrated experience or interest in performing laboratory analyses;
Demonstrated experience editing, compiling, and writing scientific reports and publications.
Conditions of Employment
Due to security requirements associated with accessing essential project sites and information, ALL applicants MUST be citizens of the United States.
Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background check.
Must be able to travel and to work in harsh field conditions for extended periods of time (i.e. southwest deserts in the summer, cold regions, tropical regions), walk/hike across uneven terrain, and ability to lift heavy equipment (40+ lbs.)
Organizational Summary

Since 1959, DRI has stood at the forefront of understanding Earth's complex environmental systems, promoting preservation of diverse ecosystems, advancing responsible natural resource management, and improving human health and welfare throughout Nevada and around the world. More than 500 highly skilled scientists, engineers, technicians and students are collaboratively focused on understanding and answering critical questions about global climate change, water quality and availability, air quality, sustainability of desert lands, life in extreme environments, and more.

Salary/Benefits

DRI’s starting salary is competitive and commensurate with education, experience, and aligns with similar public academic research institutions. DRI provides excellent benefits that include:
Health insurance options that include dental, vision, life, and long-term disability;
15.25% tax-deferred retirement contribution with matching by DRI;
Thirty (30) days of sick leave provided upon start date and two (2) days of sick leave accrued per full month after the first year of service, two (2) days of annual leave accrued each full month, 11 paid holidays;
Tuition reduction at NSHE institutions for employee and dependents;
No state income tax and no Social Security deduction;
Relocation assistance.
Exempt

Yes

Full-Time Equivalent

100.0%

Required Attachment(s)

Qualified individuals interested in this position must apply online at https://nshe.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/DRI-External.

Please upload the following documents in the specified section of your application in Workday:
A cover letter detailing your research experience, career goals, and project interests;
A current curriculum vitae;
Contact information for three professional/work-related references, to be contacted at the appropriate phase of the recruitment process based on applicant permission.
Individuals who meet all required qualifications are encouraged to apply immediately and provide all required attachments to receive full consideration. Recruitment will close without notice when a sufficient number of applications are received, or a hiring decision has been made.

For more detailed information about DRI, please visit us at www.dri.edu. For questions regarding this position or assistance with your application, please call the recruiting office at 775-673-7319.

Posting Close Date

Note to Applicant

Applicants should fully describe their qualifications and experience with specific reference to each of the minimum and preferred qualifications. The search committee will use this information during the initial review of application materials.

References will be contacted at the appropriate phase of the recruitment process based on applicant notification and permission.

Newly hired faculty and postdoctoral fellows must assure that their official transcript is submitted to the Human Resources Office within 30 calendar days from the effective date of employment. Academic degrees must have been awarded by regionally accredited institutions.

This position may require a criminal background check to be conducted on the candidate(s) selected for hire.

As part of the hiring process, applicants for positions in the Nevada System of Higher Education may be required to demonstrate the ability to perform job-related tasks.

DRI employs only U.S. citizens and aliens authorized to work in the U.S. DRI only sponsors aliens applying for research faculty or postdoctoral fellow positions (J-1 or H-1B Visas).

All applicants hired by the Desert Research Institute are subject to E-Verify.",3.7,"Desert Research Institute
3.7","Reno, NV",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1959,Nonprofit Organization,Colleges & Universities,Education,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
373,"Staff Research Scientist, Geomorphology/Soil Science",-1,"Responsibilities of the Associate Scientist, IHC/IF Analysis:

Perform histological staining analysis (IHC/IF) on animal model and human samples.
Conduct slide imaging and fluorescence microscopy studies.
Perform histological quantification and analysis for assay optimization.
Perform image analysis pipeline generation and data quality control.
Work closely with clients to discuss results and needs of data.
Validate software in support of product management.

Requirements of the Associate Scientist, IHC/IF Analysis:

BS/MS with 2+ years laboratory experience.
Must have displayed background in IHC, IF, histology, or immunostaining.
Oncology experience is helpful.
Must be ok interacting with clients and utilizing interpersonal skills.
Experience with R and data analysis is a strong plus.",4.8,"Desert Research Institute
3.7","Reno, NV",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
374,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,"$42k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Data Analyst in the Population Health Strategy practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
375,Safety Data Analyst,"$41k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

Support the collection, analysis and audit of safety data and supporting documentation for the department. Ensure safety, reliability, and performance goals for the customers and stations are observed.

Responsibilities

Track and trend SRC (Security, regulatory, and compliance) damage investigations as directed
Track and trend quality control audits at warehouses, ramps, and operations areas.
Produce quality reporting documentation for management review and action as required through:
PowerPoint Presentations
Charts
Graphs
WBAT
Acquire an understanding of ground operations including Loadmaster, Hazardous Materials, deicing, fueling, special loads, catering, security, etc. to obtain and coordinate the collection and analysis of data in each area.
Audit various operational departments in areas such as Training Records, Manual Content/Revision
Comply with all Company procedures as outlined in manuals, bulletins, and memos.
Perform all job duties in a timely and efficient manner.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree Required
Excel and/or Tableau experience required
Microsoft Suite experience; including PowerPoint required
Must possess a valid passport.
Must be willing to travel (25%)
Strong oral and written communication required
Self-Starter
Auditing experience a plus
Aviation experience a plus

The Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer. It is our policy to afford equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, place of birth, age, disability, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other characteristic or status protected by applicable in accordance with federal, state and local laws.

If you'd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please download the available EEO is the Law document at http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm.

To view our Pay Transparency Statement, please click here: Pay Transparency Statement

#GH19

PI123925562",2.8,"Atlas Air, Inc
2.8","Miami, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Charter Air Travel,Travel & Tourism,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
376,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Content function

We are One. That’s the foundation of our company culture at TVH. We’re the worldwide leading supplier of quality replacement parts, safety equipment, and accessories for the material handling and industrial equipment industry. We’re seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst that Partners with the business to gather business requirements for reporting and design and implement various analytical reports based on requirements defined by business users. Translate requirements and ideas into creative and statistically driven solutions.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities

Work closely with business partners to analyse and understand business processes to create and design insightful and intuitive reports
Leverage understanding of business intelligence software to advise the business on best practices in order to deliver the most valuable insights, including:
Advising stakeholders on your views and ideas in order to optimize the reports to be efficient and effective
Understands the impact of one's actions on others and demonstrates respect for others
Effectively communicate findings and solutions to a variety of audiences.
Provide advice and support to executives, managers, clients, and other stakeholders in using business intelligence dashboards
Propose changes that make the BI solutions more efficient and/or reduce operation or maintenance cost
Lead reporting projects from business requirements gathering to delivery
Facilitate communication and understanding between business users and data team
Take ownership of all assigned tasks and project related assignments
Organize and lead meetings with the business and project teams
Profile
Support prioritization of scope based on end user needs and business value
Report project progress at all levels, including management and/or the stakeholders

Ensure the quality, validity and accuracy of reporting provided to the business including detecting and adjusting abnormalities or errors within the reports

Share and define best practice for business intelligence reporting, including:

Develop and implement organizational reporting standards
Collaborate with business users regarding standardization and delivery
Share best practices with other Business Intelligence Analysts and Developers and the IT team in general
Analyze and recommend new ideas and opportunities to streamline processes, address inefficiencies and increase business satisfaction

Deliver business intelligence reporting training to business users as required and address functionality questions to promote the usage of Business Intelligence tools within the organization

Update and maintain professional knowledge and gain insights in business intelligence solutions, tools, and practices including participation in training, staying current with business processes and practices, and enhancing expertise in this area

Travel internationally up to 10% to collaborate with Belgian colleagues

Offer

Education & Skills

Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university in Business, Information Technology, Management, Business Administration, or another applicable field

Must possess a minimum of two years work experience performing a substantially similar role working in functional or business analysis for an ERP system in the specified business area
Demonstrated interest and/or experience working with business intelligence tools and/or reporting
Demonstrates proficient knowledge of business ERP systems with a focus on financial modules including data analysis, typical business processes, reporting, and interdependencies on other ERP modules
Proven track record in project management, planning, implementing, and communicating technical information
Demonstrated ability to work independently, take initiative and effectively manage multiple projects and changes quickly and effectively
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel

Desirable qualifications:

Experience, knowledge, and/or training with visualization tools (Tableau, Qlikview, BigQuery)
Experience, knowledge, and/or training with the Agile/Scrum methodology
Project management and Stakeholder management experience

TVH offers a competitive benefits package including medical, dental, and vision insurance, access to an onsite health clinic for you and your family, vacation and sick time, a retirement plan. And, if you need to take a quick break, take a lap around the TVH campus and earn points through our Wellness program or grab your laptop for a quick walk on one of the treadmills located on our Olathe campus. That’s just the start. Want to learn more and see our dynamic work environment? Apply today to join the TVH team.

EEO/AA/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",4.0,"TVH Group / mateco GmbH
4.0","Olathe, KS",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
377,Data Engineer,"$59k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary of Responsibilities

Codes and develops software applications. Works as part of a development team on the design and implementation of analytical applications, including current Business Intelligence technologies, modern programming languages (Python, Scala, R) and current SQL database skills. Conducts requirement analysis, produces design documents on proposed solutions, and delivers consistent, test-covered, high quality code in a timely fashion. Recommends and completes product revisions or enhancements based on feedback. Develops and maintains documentation as required.

Performs work under minimal supervision. Handles moderate to complex issues and problems, and engages higher-level staff on only the most complex issues as necessary. Possesses comprehensive knowledge of subject matter. Provides coaching, and/or mentoring to a subordinate group.

Preferred Experience and Skills
Four to Eight year of related experience
Technical expertise and detail orientated
Complex problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Analytical thinking skills
Ability to build collaborative skills
Agile/SCRUM methodology experience
Azure DevOps experience
Property and Casualty insurance experience
4+ years of Hands-on experience with SQL databases, SSIS/Informatica ETL, Power BI, Cloud based integration tools.
Knowledge of Data warehousing concepts, and data modeling using Kimball methodology.
Preferred Education and Training
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field
INDSP",3.6,"West Bend Mutual Insurance Co.
3.6","West Bend, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1894,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
378,Project Coordinator - Data Analyst,"$35k-$69k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Project Coordinator - Data Analyst
Location


Hauppauge, NY

Company Order Number

2123

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Custom Computer Specialists, Inc. is one of the largest Technical Consultants on Long Island, celebrating over 40 years in business! We continue to successfully provide network integration, support services, products solutions, and applications services to our valued clients in the northeast. Our focus is simple...our goal is to make technology easy and to help our clients use it as effectively as possible.

Position Title: Project Coordinator

Division: MSP

Reports to: James Szwed, Manager

OVERVIEW

This individual will provide project support and coordination for our healthcare sector. We are looking for a person who wants to challenge him/herself that will take ownership and assist with daily project production. Requirements include having technical and analytical capabilities, knowledge of office suite, an understanding of technical concepts, ability to plan and manage multiple tasks, outstanding written and verbal communication skills.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Responsibilities of this position include:
Creating and closing request tickets for each device
Communicating with teams to ensure timely completion of tasks
Responsible for managing inbound support tickets
Updating assets in the database with corresponding tickets
Assisting other coordinators with scheduling work to technicians
Updating assignment of new assets with client’s ITAM system
Providing operational support of physical inventory in Custom’s warehouse for old and new assets
Covering for other team members when on leave
QUALIFICATIONS

The right candidate will have:
Minimum of 6 months’ experience working as an administrative assistant or project coordinator
Capable of working with Microsoft word, excel, and power point
Professional verbal communication, customer service, organizational skills and professional manner required
Candidates must be customer oriented, self-motivated, ambitious and dedicated team players
Custom Computer Specialists Offers:


Competitive salaries
Comprehensive benefits including:
Medical and dental plans
Company Paid Vision and Short and long term disability plans
Flexible spending programs including Healthcare, Dependent Care, Transit and Parking
401K with employer match
Tuition reimbursement
Onsite Fitness Center (or gym membership reimbursement for client or satellite based employees)
Company paid life Insurance
Paid holidays and vacation
Technical certification gift card rewards program
Come experience our unique culture and see how our “right people, right results” philosophy has led to our outstanding success! We are great place to start your IT career!

EEO Statement:


Custom Computer Specialists is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other protected characteristic.",2.4,"Custom Computer Specialists
2.4","Hauppauge, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
379,Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist),"$62k-$119k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Battelles founding mission to translate scientific discovery and technology advances into societal benefit is as relevant today as when we opened our doors over 90 years ago. Our science and technology enhance society's well-being and create critical innovations that drive scientific advances for the future. We conduct groundbreaking research and development, design and manufacture leading-edge products, and deliver critical services for commercial and government customers. Our work meets the needs of the nation when it matters most, and Battelle is committed to driving innovation today and for generations to come.
JOB SUMMARY
Battelle’s National Security Business Unit is currently seeking candidates for a full time, permanent position as an Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist) to provide support to government and commercial programs focused on the development, testing, evaluation, and implementation of materials, devices, and techniques designed to detect, provide protection against, and mitigate the effects of explosives.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Execution, data analysis, documentation, and client communication assistance on various projects involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assistance in the resolution/troubleshooting of technical difficulties and safety hazards involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assist in the design and planning of projects, potentially including technical leadership of small teams of multidisciplinary scientists and technical support staff in the performance of selected tasks/projects within time and budget constraints.
Drafting of documentation of laboratory findings and results, including progress reports, final reports, and presentations.
Assistance with posters, articles, and presentations for technical conferences.
Assist with business development efforts, including cost estimation and preparation of white papers and proposals.
Oversee, mentor and train lower-level staff.
Domestic travel of approximately 10% of the time, with some travel events lasting 1-2 weeks.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s degree in chemistry, chemical engineering, mechanical engineering, or a related discipline.
Approximately 5 years of experience with munitions/explosives research, development, and/or test and evaluation
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Sole US citizenship, with the ability to obtain and maintain required government security clearances as a condition of employment.
Sufficient medical fitness to work in the laboratory and in the field to perform assigned duties, including working in test chambers, test ranges, munitions bunkers, and field environments.
The ability to work in a team environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience with modeling and simulation of explosive/energetic events
Safe handling practices for munitions and ordnance
Small arms handling, modification, armoring, gunsmithing
Experience with instrumentation for characterizing properties of energetic materials (e.g., DSC/TGA, bomb calorimetry, etc.)
Experience with flash X-ray and high-rate data capture (video, audio, pressure, electrical)
Experience with leading DOD contracted efforts including DFARS, IDIQ, and OTA contracted research
Explosives formulation, synthesis, handling, and passivation, including military, commercial, and improvised explosives
Experience with aerosol generation/measurement, sampling, characterization, air pollution analysis, and/or spray systems.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members. No statement herein is intended to imply any authorities to commit Battelle unless special written permission is granted by Battelle’s Legal Department.

BENEFITS

Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.

Battelle provides employment and opportunities for advancement, compensation, training, and growth according to individual merit, without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, age, genetic information, disability, veteran-status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable Federal, state, or local law. Our goal is for each staff member to have the opportunity to grow to the limits of their abilities and to achieve personal and organizational objectives. We will support positive programs for equal treatment of all staff and full utilization of all qualified employees at all levels within Battelle.

For more information about our other openings, please visit www.battelle.org/careers",3.3,"Battelle
3.3","West Jefferson, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1929,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
380,SAP Maintenance Master Data Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Job Title: SAP Maintenance Master Data Technician

Seeking a skilled technical resource with 5 years experience in the maintenance reliability or design fields. The ideal candidate will have experience in:
Hands on equipment maintenance and management
Management of timelines and work outline
Able to read schematics and technical drawings
Working Knowledge of MircoSoft® suite
Working in a team environment, multiple customers
Consideration given to those with robotics and automation experience
Job Duties:
Perform asset walk down for equipment
Creation of Functional Locations in SAP up to 6th level (this will be trained)
Critical Assessment of equipment
Creation of Maintenance task list based on OEM recommendations
Creation of Maintenance Actives
Maintenance Planning & Scheduling
Creation of Bill of materials
Successful candidate will possess and demonstrate these attributes:
Dedication to collaborative work environment and committed to team success.2. Works for win-win scenarios, whenever possible
Internally motivated, goal driven, biased toward action
History of success and overcoming adversity
Experienced with multilayered matrix organizations
Have a Technology Degree or Military Equivalent
Communicates in timely, honest, candid, direct, and concise manager in all environments
Willing to work out of Anderson, Indiana location",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Anderson, IN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
381,Supply Chain Data Analytics Manager,"$28k-$61k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Your Opportunity:

Smithfield Foods is a $15 billion global food company and the world's largest pork processor and hog producer. In the United States, the company is also the leader in numerous packaged meats categories with popular brands including Smithfield, Eckrich ®, Nathan's Famous ®, Farmland ®, Armour ®, Farmer John ®, Kretschmar ®, John Morrell ®, Cook's ®, Gwaltney ®, Carando ®, Margherita ®, Curly's ®, Healthy Ones ®, Morliny ®, Krakus ® and Berlinki ®. Smithfield Foods is committed to providing good food in a responsible way and maintains robust animal care, community involvement, employee safety, environmental and food safety and quality programs.

As a Manager in the Supply Chain Data Analytics department at Smithfield Foods you will be responsible for maintaining, improving, and building new reporting capabilities for the business. You will provide support for a business tower by streamlining reporting and building new capabilities. You will develop a deep understanding of operational processes and needs, then use technology to deliver impactful reporting solutions. You will work with teams in various functional areas of the business and will implement process improvements to streamline the efficiency and accuracy of the reporting process. You will be responsible to deliver daily/weekly/monthly reports accurately and on time. You will also be involved in Ad-hoc analysis of large datasets to quickly provide insight into the business.

Core Responsibilities:
Conduct meetings with leadership to standardize and improve reporting capabilities
Lead team of analysts to deliver results
Oversee the delivery of reports Daily/Weekly/Monthly accurately and on time
Build Reports and Dashboards in Microsoft Power BI, Analysis for Office, Bex, and other reporting tools
Build automated Processes using scripting tools
Hold training sessions on how to use the various tools and reports created by the department
Generate load files for various systems, maintaining system accuracy
Communicate effectively with report stake holders to ensure strong understanding of the methodology behind all calculations
Perform adhoc analysis using data from various systems and explain results of analysis to all levels of management
Create SOPs and documentation for processes

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. May perform other duties as assigned.

Qualifications:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals to perform the essential functions.

Bachelor’s Degree from a regionally accredited four-year college or university and 5+ years of relevant experience, required.
Minimum of 2+ years’ experience in a position of leadership to include team development and management, required.
Experience in a manufacturing and/or logistics business environment, required.
Proficient with Power BI, Power Pivot, SAP, SAP Analysis for Office, BPC, Bex Query Designer.
Proficient in Data analysis in Python using Pandas/Numpy/Jupyter Notebooks or equivalent technologies.
Proficient in analyzing data within relational database systems such as MS Access, MS SQL Server, and MySQL.
Experience with ETL Tools such as Alteryx, Paxata, DataGuru or equivalent technologies.
Ability to quickly learn new technology and business logic.
Superior analytical and problem-solving skills with superb attention to detail.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work independently in a fast-paced and rapidly changing and ambiguous environment.
Understanding of Windows environment command line tools, .BAT files, and Task Scheduler.
Strong leadership and management skills, including driving operational excellence, and striving for continuous improvement.
Ability to provide clear direction to employees.
Ability to translate business requirements into an action plan to deliver reporting solutions.
Has the creativity to go beyond current tools to investigate and deliver best solution to the problem.
Has a passion for working with data and finding solutions to problems using technology.
Ability to work well with others in fast paced, dynamic environment.
Ability to be respectful, approachable and team oriented while building strong working relationships and a positive work environment.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
Responsible for the overall direction, coordination, and evaluation for the Supply Chain Data Analytics team.
Carries out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws.
Responsibilities include interviewing, hiring, and training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.
EEO/AA Information:

Smithfield, is an equal opportunity employer committed to workplace diversity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, gender identity, protected veterans status or status as a disabled individual or any other protected group status or non-job related characteristic as directed by law.

Careers and Benefits:

To learn more about Smithfield’s benefits, visit smithfieldfoods.com/careerbenefits",3.2,"Smithfield Foods
3.2","Smithfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
382,Senior Data Engineer,"$95k-$174k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
383,Data Analyst,-1,"Celebrating over 30 years in Florida, Maschmeyer Concrete has become one of the leading privately held, family-oriented ready- mix concrete and building materials suppliers in the state of Florida. Maschmeyer takes pride in its people by building strong Customer and Team relationships through the relentless pursuit of our Mission and Core Values. If you are looking for a “Family” environment where our superior work atmosphere is a way of life, then you have found the right Team.

Maschmeyer Concrete Company in our Southeast Region is seeking an experienced, highly-motivated, honest and dedicated Data Analyst for our Lake Park Corporate Office.
Job Specifications include: *
· Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports

· Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality

· Acquire data from primary and secondary data sources, and maintain databases/data systems

· Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets

· Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct problems

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Compensation: *
· Competitive rate of pay based on ability & experience

· Generous Benefits Package: Medical, Dental & Vision options

· Paid Life Insurance, Long-Term Disability, Holidays & Paid Time Off (PTO)

· 401K with company match

· Free Financial Planning

· Free EAP Programs

· Professional Training & Certifications

Please apply online or in person at www.maschmeyer.com/careers . We are an EOE and DFWP company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $45,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business data mining: 1 year (Preferred)
database maintenance: 1 year (Preferred)
productivity, sales & cost analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Location:
Lake Park, FL 33403 (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.maschmeyer.com/careers
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Maschmeyer Concrete Company of Florida
4.0","Lake Park, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Mining,Mining & Metals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
384,Sr Research Scientist - Gene Program - Helen F Graham Cancer Center,"$67k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Gene Editing Institute is the only research institute of its kind in the nation based within a community health care system. Led by gene editing pioneer, Eric Kmiec, Ph.D., and based in ChristianaCare's Helen F. Graham Cancer Center & Research Institute, the Gene Editing Institute is a worldwide leader in gene editing biomedical research in cancer and other inherited diseases, and the only one working in the same space with oncologists, genetic counselors and patients, bringing translational research from basic science to patient treatment to an entirely new level.

ChristianaCare is currently seeking a Sr. Research Scientist I for the Gene Program at our Helen F Graham Cancer Center. The Sr. Research Scientist I will lead preclinical non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) research projects in the Oncology group and in collaboration with other teams within the Gene Editing Institute. The Oncology group in the Gene Editing Institute focuses on the development of new, targeted delivery system utilizing AAV-CRISPR/Cas to treat NSCLC in combination with chemotherapy. As a group leader, the Senior Research scientist will expand current preclinical research built on the proof-of-concept studies to successfully file INDs with FDA. The ideal candidate will have advanced and hands on expertise in CRISPR gene therapy and extensive industrial experience in leading a team of scientists to bring about tangible outcomes in timely delivery of therapeutic products.

Other responsibilities include:
Lead preclinical research in NSCLC gene therapeutic drug development
Develop and implement proof-of-concept and preclinical research in other solid tumor gene therapy
Hands on laboratory research in cancer biology, CRISPR technology, AAV biology and other delivery system
Manage the overall progress of the preclinical programs to be aligned with set timelines
Identify and manage Contract Research Organizations for timely execution of projects.
Work with cross-functional team to support the IND submissions
Take Lead role in writing or contracting out nonclinical reports to include in Module 4 of the IND
Support pIND and other meetings with the FDA
Requirements: PhD in oncology, molecular biology, cell biology, biochemistry, or a closely related field. Six to ten years of pharmaceutical industry experience in gene therapeutic development, preclinical and clinical researches. Must be proficient in CRISPR gene therapeutic development, AAV delivery (and/or nonviral vector delivery systems), CRISPR technology and its clinical application, cell-based models and in utilization of murine models, and performing cell biology, biochemistry, and molecular biology techniques.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Experience:
gene therapeutic development: 6 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"ChristianaCare
3.6","Newark, DE",-1,10000+ Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
385,"Director, Data Services Analytics","$97k-$189k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Director, Data Services Analytics in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The director of data services analytics will be responsible for the adoption and utilization of technologies, models and methods for science driven analytics of data services and architectures across R&D. Responsibilities will include:

Shape and assess data architectures and services through data analytics for cell therapies and other current and emerging therapeutic areas across Takeda R&D from multiple dimensions including pre-clinical and discovery data, operational and clinical trial data, clinical production data, real world data, scientific data, and related.
Lead the implementation and operational analytics of data services including performance, usage, governance, and management processes that reveal opportunities, insights, and approaches for data usage.
Drive the definition, design, implementation and validation of cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve actionable design, planning, and improvement of data services by leveraging new data architectures, complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques.
Prioritize and oversee a portfolio of projects ensuring alignment of activities and standards.
Measure, monitor, and collaborate with users, partners, and stakeholders on the use and socialization of techniques and new technologies throughout organization.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Oversee the ingestion and classification of diverse data sources, such as performance data, usage, adoption, health and status, and scientific data more broadly for cell therapies and other R&D areas.
Deliver on data-driven projects through organization of team efforts and hands-on approach.
Actively listen, integrate input from diverse sources, and collaboratively translate engineering, scientific, or business questions into data and analysis requirements
Partner with experts to verify and drive model capabilities and translate modeling outputs into functional descriptions and business language.
Partners with IT resources to enable and measure data flow, performance, reliability, development using appropriate tools/technology and rapid prototyping that informs the design of analytical products.
Coach, develop and mentor others on data services analytics, tools and methodologies.
Build external alliances to gain and share new insights from architecture analysis, technical information, and trends both internal and external.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Advanced degree or equivalent experience in computer science, mathematics, or a data-related field with a substantial software architecture, design, and scientific rigor emphasis.
Experience working in industrial-scale projects with experience in pharmaceutical / biotechnology / healthcare / health IT industry a desirable.
Demonstrated experience in exploring alternate approaches and novel solutions
Strong management and organizational skills.
Ability to effectively interact with and influence all levels of management.
Seasoned computer scientist or data scientist with experience in large-scale healthcare data analysis and industry models/standards.
Expertise in advanced data architectures and deep knowledge of a wide range of analytic approaches, computing models, and data structures.
Advanced hands-on knowledge of advanced database technologies, graph structures, modern software languages, full stack development, analytic environments, and devops tools.
Experience analyzing data from traditional healthcare databases or similar structured and unstructured datasets.
Experience with big data methodologies and cloud environments.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Willingness to travel to various meetings, corporate partners, additional Takeda sites.
Requires approximately 10% travel.

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-SGM

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
386,Data Scientist,"$80k-$132k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,"American Bureau of Shipping
3.5","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1862,Other Organization,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
387,DATA ENGINEER,"$59k-$112k
(Glassdoor Est.)","DATA ENGINEER

Job Details
Job Location
Keet Health - Austin, TX
Description
Are you looking for a fast-paced company where our people are our competitive advantage? A company that fosters your entrepreneurial spirit by encouraging you to act like an owner? Do you have the passion and drive to push beyond the adequate to exceptional? Are you passionate about fixing the healthcare system? If so, you may be perfect for our open position.

Keet is a team of passionate, fun-having, taco-loving people on a mission to make healthcare experiences feel better.

At Keet, we help put humanity back into healthcare. It feels good to know that what we do ultimately contributes to a patient’s well-being. We know our clients, and our client’s patient’s want to get back to doing more of what they love, so that is the core of our culture—merging talented people doing what they love, to create products that help others do the same.

DATA ENGINEER

ROLE SUMMARY

The position of Data Engineer will help to create new reporting solutions for Keet Health’s platform, and improve current solutions. The Data Engineer position will be working with a variety of databases (MySQL, Postgres, MongoDB, etc) to be deployed in a cloud infrastructure (AWS) and made available in AWS Quicksight.
Qualifications
ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop and maintain reporting processes and ETL solutions for moving data
Develop reporting solutions for internal and external customers
Develop and maintain ETL solutions for moving data into reporting schemas
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelors degree or computer science, engineering, data analytics or equivalent experience in related fields.
Experience with SQL (MySQL, Postgres, etc) and NoSQL (Mongo, etc) databases.
Experience with scripting languages (python, scala, ruby)
Comfortable working using the command line (Bash, etc)
Experience with cloud server architectures (AWS, Azure)
Experience with Linux.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Must have 5+ years using SQL, and NoSQL database
Must have 3+ years experience working as a data engineer
Must have skills in linux, Bash, cloud infrastructure, docker, mobile development, analytics,
Must have experience using git, and worked in an agile development environment
Must have familiarity with AWS data technologies such as Glue, Redshift, S3, and other big da-ta technologies
Nice to have medical industry experience.
Nice to have Java experience.
Nice to have experience with AWS Glue, Athena, and QuickSight.
OUR CORE VALUES
• Collaboration: We're continuously learning how to work together, better.
• Heart: We've got it, and we're not afraid to show it.
• Innovation: We are lifelong learners.
• Service: We’re here to serve.
• Humility: We're humans, and we come from dirt.

PERKS

(We’ve got them).

Keet offers a competitive benefits package with fully-paid medical benefits, unlimited PTO, company hosted lunches, happy hours, and special events.

We have a flexible work from home policy dependent upon productivity and ability to communicate effectively. Oh, and we have snacks. Our office is located in the hip south river district of Austin, TX in the heart of Austin weirdness.

Keet is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national or ethnic origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, protected veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.0,"Clinicient
3.0","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
388,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
389,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
390,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
391,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
392,Sr Data Engineer,"$71k-$92k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Group O is seeking a strong candidate in the job of Senior Data Engineer for a Group O partner in San Antonio, TX. In this role, you will be a valuable expert in data coding and ETL and will lead the development of data models, structures, and data wrangling.

Responsibilities
Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, pre-processing using Hive and Pig
Scope and deliver various Big Data solutions
Design solutions based on high-level architecture
Manage technical communications between clients (technical and non-technical) and internal teams
Building a cloud-based platform that allows easy development of new applications
Collaborate with developers, subject matter experts, and business users in gathering and documenting requirements for data extraction and transformation
Perform code reviews, analyze execution plans, improve ETL jobs efficiencies, correct ETL defects and respond quickly to fixes and enhancement requests
Follow design standards for ETL and ELT processes
Analyze, assess and implement changes to existing solutions in response to business changes
Perform data research and analysis to find insights
Analyze data models to identify variances and discrepancies
Design, update, and maintain data sets
Work with geographically distributed team structure in a fast paced and challenging environment; multi-task and work under pressure
Communicate results with internal and external stakeholders

Qualifications:
An ideal candidate will have experience leading data quality assessment, will be a strong problem-solver and will have excellent interpersonal and communications skills.
Over 5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc.
Strong background with ETL Design and coding for Data loading, Data cleansing, Data Validation
Proficiency in SQL, SAS, R and Python – with preference to SQL
Previous experience designing custom deliverables based on user requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills – must be able to communicate fluently in English both verbally and in writing
Strong analytical and statistical analysis skills to extract insights and recommendations
Strong problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners
Insurance domain experience is preferred",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
393,Lead Global Data Science Oncology & External Supply (Onc ES),"$94k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Lead Regional Data Science US & Japan in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

Global Data Science Lead for the GMS Onc ES Operational Units (OPU):
Drives design, execution und implementation of the overall GMS Data Science strategy for the GMS Onc ES OPU
Develops and owns detailed GMS Onc ES OPU scale-up and delivery execution roadmap for data science and manages respective functional and cross-functional interdependencies
Manages, gathers and executes GMS Onc ES OPU data science needs and execution of initiatives in collaboration with respective stakeholders and advises on the respective short and medium focus
Ensures and establishes Data Science capabilities GMS Onc ES OPU by establishing expert Data Science capability on all levels of data analytics
Provides the Data Science link across local, functional and global GMS OPU Data Science, IT, Engineering and GMS Onc ES OPU.

Accountabilities:

GMS Onc ES OPU Data Science strategy implementation
GMS Onc ES OPU detailed scale-up and delivery execution roadmap for data science:
Reviews data science possibilities/initiatives/requests in collaboration with IT and GMSGQ business stakeholders. Advises on the respective prioritization for short and medium focus.
GMS Onc ES OPU data science capabilities:
Review and establishes internal and external data science ecapabilities within GMS Onc ES OPU. Ensures GMS Onc ES OPU data science capabilities are sufficient to defined data scientist profile. Conducts and participates in technical interviews for data science capabilities. Executes and drives the data science training for GMS Onc ES OPU in collaboration with GMSCI Data Science Training excellence.
GMS Onc ES OPU data science initiatives portfolio
GMS Onc ES OPU functional and cross-functional interdependencies for data science
Ensures GMS Onc ES OPU representation in GMSGQ data science community.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education / Experience:

University degree of science/business:
Advanced degree is required (Master/MBA and/or PhD), e.g. in Engineering , Mathematics, IT or Physics with focus on either Control Theory/Statistics/Mechatronics, Information/Operation, Management/Strategy, Technology and Innovation Management
Experience in applying and executing Digital/Big Data Analytics/ Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning, Machine Learning algorithms, Respective programming knowledge
Fluent in English

Digital & Data Science Skills:

Strong expertise and experience in Digital/Big Data Analytics/ Artificial Intelligence/Machine
Learning
Experience in Machine Learning algorithms (CNN, SVM, LSTM, etc.),
Respective programming knowledge of either MATLAB/Python/R required, further skills such as C++, SQL etc. are advantageous
Experience in quality mapping of parameters is a plus
Prior experience of Biostatistics, stochastic modelling and decision trees is a strong asset
Strong knowledge of Statistical Process Control Expertise in Bayesian statistics:
Experience in Density estimation
Solid knowledge in Bayesian Hypothesis Testing,
Solid knowledge in ANOVA and forecasting techniques (ARIMA, RMA, NARX)
Expertise in Signal Processing, Control Systems, Mechatronics

Behaviors:

Willingness to travel to various internal/external Takeda meetings and events:
International travel will be required (estimated 1 travel per 4-6 weeks for 1 week each)
Strategic enterprise thinking, finding innovative ways to serve patients build reputation and trust
Creating the environment that inspires and enables people
Focuing on the few priorities and provide superior results
Elevating capabilities for now and the future

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
394,Scientist III or higher,"$37k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","SEKISUI XenoTech, LLC is currently looking to add a Scientist III or higher (based on experience and/or education) to the Analytical Services department. The Analytical Services department is a contract service and support department focused on providing analytical support for SEKISUI XenoTech’s products and services. This department also provides services in method validation, metabolite identification and Bioanalysis.

Essential duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following:
Operates the LCMS systems with no supervision. Processes and reviews analytical data.
Ensures maintenance of laboratories and equipment. Troubleshoot problems with laboratory instruments and software.
Maintains appropriate logs, records and studies notebooks.
Participates in administrative and scientific meetings as requested.
Keeps accurate administrative records (e.g., purchase requisitions, timesheets, expense reports)
Trains employees at or below the specified level.
Serves as Lead Scientist or Study Director, as needed. Prepares, or assists in the preparation of reports requiring specialized scientific knowledge
Adheres to Good Laboratory Practice regulations and SEKISEI XenoTech safety policies and procedures
Serves as a reviewer or owner of Standard Operating Procedures. Writes and/or reviews Standard Operating Procedures.
Conducts routine laboratory functions including diluting, labeling and dispensing of biological samples, reagent solution preparation, equipment repair, laboratory upkeep, maintains inventory of supplies, and various other responsibilities.
Conducts research and development for new method development with minimal supervision. Independently develops and validate new methods and procedures
Participates in company’s research and development effort by staying abreast of developments in specific research fields, suggesting areas of new R&D and conducting experiments as directed

QUALIFICATIONS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Doctoral degree (Ph.D.); Masters (M.S./M.A.) degree and three years related laboratory experience; or Bachelor’s degree (B.S./B.A.) from five-year college or university plus four or more years related laboratory experience preferred
Must have an understanding of basic techniques and equipment of a biochemistry laboratory. Must have relevant experience in the use of centrifuges, spectrophotometer, incubators, balances, pH meters, HPLC/UPLC systems, mass spectrometer systems (HRMS and Triple quads) and other routine equipment. Good understanding of elementary chemical principles. Knowledge or familiarity with scientific terminology.
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.
Ability to write routine reports, notes-to-file, and correspondence.
Literate and proficient in the use of personal computers and peripheral equipment (e.g., printers, etc.).Proficient in software programs such as word processing, spreadsheet, graphics, statistical analysis, imaging and slide maker, and enzyme kinetics. Ability to learn new software programs, as needed.
High attention to detail and detail-oriented record keeping.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to stand; display finger dexterity, handle, or feel; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to walk, sit, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, talk, hear; taste and/or smell. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts, risk of electrical shock, biohazards, flammable liquids, risk of radiation, and vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. At times, the noise level can be louder and hearing protection may be required.

Those interested may apply via the online link. No phone calls please.

SEKISUI XenoTech is an EEO employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",3.2,"Sekisui XenoTech, LLC
3.2","Kansas City, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
395,"Associate Director, Oncology R&D – Clinical Scientist","$51-$89 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","Join a Legacy of Innovation 110 Years and Counting!

Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical therapies to improve standards of care and address diversified, unmet medical needs of people globally by leveraging our world-class science and technology. With more than 100 years of scientific expertise and a presence in more than 20 countries, Daiichi Sankyo and its 15,000 employees around the world draw upon a rich legacy of innovation and a robust pipeline of promising new medicines to help people. In addition to a strong portfolio of medicines for cardiovascular diseases, under the Group’s 2025 Vision to become a “Global Pharma Innovator with Competitive Advantage in Oncology,” Daiichi Sankyo is primarily focused on providing novel therapies in oncology, as well as other research areas centered around rare diseases and immune disorders.

Job Summary:

Oversees typically a single non-pivotal trial (small size, standard complexity in design and geographic scope). Prepares clinical section of regulatory document. Collaborates as team member with AROs/CROs. Drafts development plans, protocol profiles, and sections of submission documents under guidance of higher level. Reviews and oversee completion of clinical trial protocols. Provides medical and/or scientific direction to Clinical Operations. Represents Clinical Development on Project Teams.

Responsibilities:

Study Strategy: Provides the strategic direction to Biostats Data Mgmt & Data Ops for EDC, edit checks, data quality listings, SAP, Data Mgmt plan; Reviews patient population and protocol compliance for consistency with study strategy; Develops biomarker strategy in collaboration with Translational Medicine/Clin Pharm; May act as Clinical study leader (CSL).

Study Planning and Execution: Provides input on major milestones of trial, clinical trial plan and contingency planning; Analyzes and updates management on potential risks to study deliverables; Provides input on ICF creation; Oversees recruitment and retention; establishes and implements contingency plans for shortfalls; Consults & recruits members for DSMB and/or adjudication committee setup.

Study outputs: Draft responses to IRBs and Health Authorities; Collaborates with Translational Medicine and Clinical Pharmacology to ensure appropriate biomarker, PK / PD measurements; Reviews emerging clinical data regularly; Leads dose-escalation meetings; Performs quality assessment with Delivery Lead e.g. review Tables/Listings/Graphs before database lock and quality check of data; Works with BD&O to ensure SAP update.

External collaboration: Consults with internal experts and external KOLs, Ad Boards for protocol development; Provides input on CRO / ARO Statement of Work and Budget; Establishes effective communication between CRO / vendors / ARO.

Additional non-study related activities: Occasional senior management interactions at FIHC, WDC; Initiates contact w/KOL and prepares material for KOL interactions on a program based need; Involvement with in-licensing and acquisitions on individual due diligence activities

Qualifications: Successful candidates will be able to meet the qualifications below with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Education/Experience:

Master’s degree; PharmD, PhD, or equivalent; Postgraduate training in TA or related specialty, or equivalent, desirable

4+ years with PharmD, PhD and relevant clinical experience
7+ years with Master’s degree and relevant clinical experience

Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.2,"Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
396,Business Intelligence Analyst I,"$38k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","GreenState Credit Union

Business Intelligence Analyst I

US-IA-North Liberty

Job ID: 2020-2559
Type: Regular Full-Time
# of Openings: 1
Category: Information Technology
GreenState Credit Union

Overview

The Business Intelligence Analyst I is responsible for development, summarizing and presenting financial and business information to the credit union team from various reporting environments such as our database and data warehouse, financial ledger systems and 3rd party environments. With general and specific guidance, the BIA will conduct and present financial analysis and utilize data to identify process gaps and help implement master data management processes.

Salary range for this position is $71,379 - $107,068.50 with a progressive benefits package.

Responsibilities

Performs essential duties and responsibilities in the following areas which may include, but are not limited to those listed and are subject to change:

Adheres to the Credit Union's core values and Service Standards in carrying out GreenState's mission and vision.
Demonstrates teamwork in all interactions with coworkers and in the completion of all duties and responsibilities.
Ensures confidentiality of member information.
Presents a professional image from a personal and professional level that will be beneficial to both the Credit Union and GreenState Wealth Management.
Works with stakeholders to develop and/or modify reporting or processes to resolve simple business problems by using IT solutions, includes analysis of business and user needs, documenting business requirements and translating business requirements into functional solutions.
Develops reports, visualizations, and custom extracts using business intelligence tools including, but not limited to SQL Server Management Studio, Episys PowerOn, SQL Server Reporting Services, R, Python, Excel Power Query and Power BI.
Develops stored procedures, views, custom tables, and defined business rules for reporting and analytic solutions. Develop a combination of simple to complex SQL queries to fulfill stakeholder’s requests.
Evaluates and works to improve the capabilities of Business Intelligence tools through new methodologies, technology, and data management. Review reports to improve accuracy, functionality, and consistency.
Integrates data sources from multiple systems to provide seamless reporting. Understand database relationships and interconnections among data sources. Maintain and enhance data integrity of all information connection through the Data Warehouse.
Analyzes data extracted from the database and validate accuracy of data and collaborates with other Power BI Pros within the organization to resolve data integrity issues.
Assists in the coaching and development of Power BI Pros throughout the organization.

Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, Management Information Systems or related field, or equivalent combination of training and experience of at least six years, with three years of experience in report creation.
Proficiency in business intelligence tools such as SQL, Qlik, SSRS, R, Python, Excel Power Query and Power BI.
Ability to work with multiple data sources and validate accuracy of information.
Basic understanding of data modeling to assist DBA in development of new source data models to align with existing DW.
Inquisitive nature for data discovery and aligning solutions to business needs.
Ability to prioritize and organize a wide variety of assignments and duties and large volumes of details.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Experience in the financial industry a plus but not required.
Interpersonal skills to promote and represent the credit union and its products.
Must be able and willing to work a flexible schedule as needed to accomplish all duties.

Reporting Relationship
Reports to the Business Intelligence Director.

Supervisory Responsibilities
This position is not responsible for supervision of other employees.

Equal Opportunity Employment Statement
GreenState Credit Union is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

PI124654057",3.6,"GreenState Credit Union
3.6","North Liberty, IA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1938,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
397,Data Science Manager,"$101k-$167k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Data Science Manager will manage a team of statisticians in research and development of new predictive models and new analytical techniques related to insurance pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors and related topics using internal and external data. You will start your Data Science Manager role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Provide analytics for setting price, underwriting and products strategies.Implement analysis and modeling tests.
Develop and enhance models used in a variety of contexts within the product management structure.
Advance modeling capabilities.
Work with colleagues in various departments to facilitate the application of models developed considering the regulatory and competitive contexts.
Ensure models are understood, implications are appropriately assessed, implementation plans are defined,validation of results are undertaken and adjustments are made.
Qualifications and Education
Master's degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering or related field (willing to accept foreign education equivalent) and a minimum of seven (7) years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Alternatively, will accept Ph.D. and five years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Demonstrated expertise in SAS.
Demonstrated expertise in Bayesian statistics.
Demonstrated experience in developing multivariate predictive models in an insurance environment.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
398,Data Scientist,"$111k-$143k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Duties & Responsibilities
Bring Creativity to Data products.
Analyze transaction data.
Build models to predict possible finance operation inconsistencies.
Use machine learning methods to perform transaction matching (matching algorithms).
Cleanse raw data for use in models.
Perform data munging, data mining, clustering & classification methods, pattern recognition.
Comfortable with Statistics, Calculus & Multivariate analysis.
You will work closely with a small R&D team with Product Managers, Data Engineers & Analysts. The R&D team will experiment with the data and come up with POC's.
Familiar with SQL, Python, R, Spark MLib, AWS, SQL Server, Redshift.
Most of the data currently lives in SQL Server. We are experimenting with AWS Redshift as well. Python for coding and someone with experience with Spark MLib & Machine learning is a big plus.
Qualifications
Extensive experience solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches.
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources.
A strong passion for empirical research and for answering hard questions with data.
A flexible analytic approach that allows for results at varying levels of precision.
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL
Expert knowledge of an analysis tool such as R, Matlab, or SAS
Strong working knowledge of financials
Acquired skills would include Data Warehousing, ETL, BI, Data Mining, and Machine Learning.
Strong written and verbal skills – able to explain the work in plain language
MS in Computer Science or other quantitative disciplines or BA with 2+ years applicable experience",3.9,"BlackLine
3.9","Woodland Hills, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
399,"Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing",-1,"Job Purpose*
Canventa has a new role for a Senior Scientist, Cell Manufacturing to provide scientific expertise for the development of multiple product lines for iPSC and iPSC derived differentiated cell types at Canventa Life Sciences. This role guides development strategies for diverse product portfolios and advances Canventa’s long-term success in current and emerging markets through product and technological innovation. This scientist drives collaborations both internally and externally to facilitate development of cutting edge products and scalable manufacturing processes.

Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for providing advanced scientific expertise for multiple product lines with particular emphasis on iPSCs, iPSC-derived cell types, organoids, and other culture-derived cell products.
Responsible for submitting new product proposals, setting performance criteria, experimental design, project planning, product optimization, and product launch .
Resolve complex scientific and technical investigations for cross-team and cross-functional operational activities.
Execute on department and corporate goals, projects and/or initiatives with the required stakeholders and subject matter experts. Contributes to the 5 - 10 year strategic plan.
Working closely with the Strategic Marketing and Marketing teams, participate in all aspects of the product lifecycle management and identify future trends to meet customer needs.
Evaluate new technologies, literature and patents independently, generate intellectual property, and respond to patent office actions with the Business Development Team; draft patent applications.
Identify and execute multiple product and process improvement projects including cost reduction and risk mitigation initiatives; responsible for initiating cost reduction projects.
Manage the assigned project research budget and report on monthly status updates.
Generate, review and approve technical documentation and provide pre- and post-product launch support.
Proactively research and analyze competitor activities, threats, and trends, and recommend new product development ideas to counter potential competitor threats.
Serve as a scientific ambassador of the company: i) deliver superior quality presentations to internal and external audiences; ii) promote the Canventa brand and mission; iii) facilitate and strengthen successful relationships with external experts at all levels.
Adhere to the Quality Management System (QMS) initiatives and requirements.
Proactively report and present on the product lifecycle activities to senior leaders across the company. Responsible for Executive reporting on corporate initiatives as needed.
Lead, manage, coach and mentor a cross-functional team to meet the deliverables and increase team productivity.
Qualifications
PhD with 4-8 years of relevant experience in iPSC generation, maintenance, differentiation and cell characterization.
Experience in creating master cell banks and cryopreservation is an asset.
Additional expertise in primary cell/ organoid/ organ tissue culture is an asset.
Additional experience in high-throughput screening, drug screening, disease modeling, or experience with bioreactor cultures is an asset.
Accomplished independent researcher with product, methodology, and/or technology development experience.
Proven record of complex experimental design and execution, including expertise in applying appropriate statistical analyses in complex data sets.
Broad technical expertise and knowledge of diverse laboratory techniques. Proven experience training staff on laboratory techniques and protocols.
Expert presenter with the ability to deliver technical summaries of data with critical thinking skills to provide in-depth analytical explanations and interpretations.
Managed successful collaborations with key opinion leaders.
Demonstrated expertise drafting business plans, patent applications, and related articles in the field of expertise.
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written and presentation) both in one-on-one and in group settings.
Personal Attributes
Ability to question and not always be satisfied with the status quo.
Willingness to learn and assume new responsibilities.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Self-motivated and independent work ethic.
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a fast paced environment.
Strives in a growing and changing environment.
Team orientated – ‘one-team’ behavior with demonstrated team leadership capabilities is a must.
Canventa Life Sciences is a company focused on the collection and processing of donated blood and bone marrow specimens into samples that are immediately used by researchers worldwide, increasing access to biologically relevant samples and accelerating the pace of research.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
All office and lab staff have access to plastic barriers, gloves, eye protection, masks, hand sanitizers, soap & water, and lab coats.

Experience:
Staff Training: 1 year (Preferred)
Cryopreservation: 1 year (Preferred)
laboratory: 4 years (Required)
Presentation Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Cell culture: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.Canventa.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/canventa/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Canventa Life Sciences,"Emeryville, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Unknown,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
400,Research Scientist,"$45k-$99k
(Glassdoor Est.)","CTK Biotech is a San Diego (Poway) based company that develops, manufactures, and markets innovative diagnostic test kits for the IVD community worldwide. Our mission is to simplify diagnostics and improve global health. We are looking for a Scientist to join our team.
Responsibilities/Job description*
The candidate will function as an integral member of the research team to support product development activities. Primary responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Involvement in the development of the following IVD product lines: ELISA, Chemiluminescence assays, POC assays.
Fulfill design control requirements such as feasibility studies, optimization studies and verification and validation studies. This includes but is not limited to: new products, technology transfers, validation, product improvements, and IP development.
Planning and execution of experiments for IVD product development under minimal supervision.
Effective troubleshooting and data interpretation.
Assists in transfer of developed products to manufacturing process.
Generate detailed study reports, SOPs, and technical documents to support product registration.
Effective communication with colleagues and present the results in weekly/month R&D meetings.
Must thrive in fast-paced environment and be willing to learn new technologies.
Maintain compliance to company quality policy.
Education/Experience: *
PhD with 3+ years’ experience, or MS with 6+ years’ experience, or BS with 8-10 years’ experience, in Biology, Immunology, Molecular Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry or related discipline
Preferred Knowledge, Skills, and Experience: *
Hands-on experience in development of immunoassays (ELISA, CLIA, POCT) and biomolecule conjugation.
Experience in molecular biology techniques (PCR, cloning, expression).
Previous experience in the IVD industry is a plus.
Worked in a regulated environment following ISO 13485:2016.
Draft work instructions and SOPs for production.
Self-motivated, flexible, and positive attitude.
Strong communication skills – oral and written.
Excellent organizational, time management, and multi-tasking skills.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team, in a fast-paced environment.
Collaborative personality.
Work Environment*
Equal Opportunity Employer

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Poway, CA 92064 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"CTK Biotech
3.7","Poway, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
401,"Research Scientist (Computer Vision, Machine Learning)","$60k-$126k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Robotics and Electromechanical Systems (REMS) Group at Intelligent Automation, Inc. (IAI) has an open full-time position for a Research Scientist in computer vision and machine learning. We are looking for an outstanding self-motivated researcher with a Masters or Doctorate degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science with a background in computer vision and machine learning.

You will be working with the multi-disciplinary team of scientists and engineers to conduct R&D in the fields of video analytics, machine learning, robotics perception and AI. We have numerous active research and development projects where we design, integrate, test, and deploy systems for a range of applications, including image and video analytics, artificial intelligence, scene understanding, perception for autonomous systems, healthcare, training, and simulation.

The desired candidate should have a strong publication record in computer vision particularly in the areas of deep learning, object detection, tracking and classification, segmentation, cross-modality inference, self-supervised learning, activity recognition, and robotic vision. A solid background in programming is important.

CITIZENSHIP / VISA STATUS: Applicant must be a US Citizen or US Permanent Resident (Green Card)

JOB DUTIES

Conduct research and development in the area of computer vision and image processing
Design, implement, and integrate computer vision and machine learning algorithms and prototypes
Interact with and support multiple research teams
Support program management and business development efforts by writing reports and presenting to customers

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE & EDUCATION

Masters or Doctorate degree in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, mathematics or other related field
Minimum 3 years of hands-on experience in research, engineering, or research & development

DESIRED SKILLS

Proficiency in Python, C++, and MATLAB
Minimum 3 years of experience with computer vision techniques such as object recognition, segmentation, and classification
Experience with machine learning or deep learning models
Proficient technical writing and strong communication skills
Familiarity with computer vision libraries and machine learning framework, such as OpenCV, PyTorch, and TensorFlow
Experience with embedded vision development

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 20-1247",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
402,Data Analyst - Predictive Modeler,"$41k-$80k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Zeta Global is looking for a talented Predictive Modeler to join our Analytics team. Armed with the Advanced Analytics & Data Science skills, this position will be responsible for supporting and improving the quality of our customer acquisition efforts using machine learning, statistics and data wrangling skills.

Key Responsibilities:
Predictive/Prescriptive Modeling & Optimization: Develop state-of-the-art predictive and recommender systems that support business objectives.
Data Visualization: Support and maintain KPI dashboards using Tableau. Collaborate with internal teams to gather requirements and provide reporting solutions.
Support Data Infrastructure: Use scripting languages like Python (Pandas, PySpark and Sci-kit) and MySQL to extract, transform and load data. In addition, support the management of internal data marts.
Ad-hoc reporting: Collaborate with cross-departmental teams to drive analyses and insights that lead to insightful decisions and improved financial performance/ROI for the business.
Requirements:
You love being a change agent! You tangibly add value for decision makers with actionable insights from data.
Proven ability to implement statistical/machine learning techniques in R / SQL and Python. In addition, ability to disseminate insights using data visualization tools like Tableau.
Exceptional attention-to-detail with the ability to meet aggressive deadlines. We move at a fast pace and generally have 3-5 projects going at any one time.
Excellent story-telling skills. The insights gleaned are no good if you can't present it in an effective and organized fashion.
MS degree in Business Analytics, Data Science or similar quantitative disciplines. Bachelor’s degree with minimum 1 years of experience will also be considered.
Strong knowledge of modeling algorithms like randomForest, nnet, svm, and glmnet packages in R and Python.
Desired Skills:
Ability to write complex R, Python and PySpark scripts.
Working knowledge with Python NLP packages like Spacy, NLTK and pycorenlp.
#LI-MC1

About Zeta Global
Zeta Global is a data-powered marketing technology company with a heritage of innovation and industry leadership. Founded in 2007 by entrepreneur David A. Steinberg and John Sculley, former CEO of Apple Inc and Pepsi-Cola, the Company combines the industry’s 3rd largest proprietary data set (2.4B+ identities) with Artificial Intelligence to unlock consumer intent, personalize experiences and help our clients drive business growth.

Our technology runs on the Zeta Marketing Platform, which powers ‘end to end’ marketing programs for some of the world’s leading brands. With expertise encompassing all digital marketing channels – Email, Display, Social, Search and Mobile – Zeta orchestrates acquisition and engagement programs that deliver results that are scalable, repeatable and sustainable.

Zeta Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ancestry, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, medical condition, disability, veterans status, or any other basis protected by law.

Zeta Global Recognized in Enterprise Marketing Software and Cross-Channel Campaign Management Reports by Independent Research Firm

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-opens-ai--data-labs-in-san-francisco-and-nyc-300945353.html

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-recognized-in-enterprise-marketing-software-and-cross-channel-campaign-management-reports-by-independent-research-firm-300938241.html",3.3,"Zeta Global
3.3","Burlington, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
403,sf9 Scientist,-1,"Scientist sf9 Job Description*
Position: Full-Time

Type: Salary, Exempt

The successful candidate will support Manufacturing and Process Development activities. The Scientist will work in the laboratory and be responsible for execution of experiments supporting insect cell AAV production platform development.
Responsibilities*
Employ proprietary technologies to generate and maintain stable sf9 cell lines and facilitating scale-up to support bioreactor activities.
Express and purify proteins in bacteria and sf9 cells.
Measure cell viability and growth. Perform cell culture metabolites and other assays from bioreactors and shake flasks.
Conduct molecular cloning work including PCR, cell-based assays, microscopy and plasmid construction via site specific transposition, homologous recombination and Gateway recombination methods.
Drive AAV vector production and associated cell and molecular biology assays.
Other duties as assigned by the supervisor
Required Qualifications*
Master’s in Biology, Cell Biology or related field with 6+ years of experience working with baculovirus-insect cell expression systems, PhD preferred.
Experience in DNA, RNA and protein expression, purification and analysis (e.g. PCR, cloning, qPCR, RNAseq, Immuno-precipitations, Western blotting, ELISA).
Ability to balance priorities of multiple projects in a fast-paced dynamic team environment.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Proven experience in troubleshooting technical issues.
Ability to compile, analyze and interpret data.
Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills, verbal and written.
Preferred Qualifications*
PhD in Biology, Cell Biology or related field with 6+ years of experience working with baculovirus-insect cell expression systems.
Technical expertise in AAV purification highly desired.
Experience in DNA, RNA and protein expression, purification and analysis (e.g. PCR, cloning, qPCR, RNAseq, Immuno-precipitations, Western blotting, ELISA).
Extensive expertise in a variety of cell culture methods, experience with bioreactor technologies.
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
baculovirus: 6 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.lacertatx.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.5,"Lacerta Therapeutics
4.5","Gainesville, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
404,Data Scientist / Quantitative Research,-1,"Overview

PicnicHealth is all about making medical records easy to access and using data to power the next frontier of medical research. We work directly with patients to give them the only tool anywhere that truly provides all of their medical records from any doctor or healthcare system in the USin an easy-to-use, secure online dashboard. Not only that, but patients can choose to contribute their incredibly important data to scientific research, which helps researchers accelerate breakthroughs in care. To date we've helped tens of thousands of patients, partnered with some of the world's largest biopharma companies, and raised more than $35M from Felicis Ventures, Amplify Partners, Foresite Capital, Refactor Capital, and Y Combinator.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, Data Scientists on the Quantitative Research team are responsible for translating, assessing, and augmenting our Real World Data (RWD) to develop actionable insights and evidence for our life science partners. We're seeking an experienced data scientist to join the team to deliver bespoke analytics, create internal and customer tools, and develop predictive models to improve our research data product.

As a Data Scientist on the Quantitative Science team you will:
Use PicnicHealth's large, multi-disease multi-modal real-world dataset to answer critical clinical questions;
Become a subject matter expert on our data and its capabilities. Lead technical initiatives that further our understanding of RWD and methods to generate real-world evidence;
Transform real-world clinical data into actionable insights using data analytics, robust statistical methods, and compelling data visualizations accessible to a wide range of end-users;
Work with a cross-functional team to define and clarify analytic requirements, develop analysis plans, ensure data quality standards, and create publication-ready methods and results;
Conduct research to assess our data quality, identifying gaps and proposing solutions.
Develop and manage relationships with external partners (including life science companies, regulatory agencies, academic institutions, and health technology assessment bodies) to advance the integration of our analytic products, including through peer reviewed scientific publications.
Must haves:
At least 4 years of industry experience in a quantitative/statistical position in the life sciences industry
You hold a degree in a quantitative discipline, such as biostatistics, epidemiology, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
Advanced experience with R (tidyverse) and preferably have built an R package before
You have some training in statistics
You are familiar with command line tools
You have experience working with medical data, longitudinal EMR data, and/or data ontologies (OMOP, etc.)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
Ability to work independently, and experience leading the development of analytical features
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical and thoughtful eye
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and professional
You enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines. You are passionate about our patient-centric mission to improve healthcare for all
You'd be an amazing candidate if you had some/any of the following:
You've built an interactive data visualization app using the shiny package
You have advanced experience with with SQL
You have strong experience in statistics or biostatistical methods
You have a track record of producing scientific publications
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.8,"PicnicHealth
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
405,"Scientist 2, Data Analytics","$65k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Areté Associates seeks highly motivated, technically talented and intellectually agile individuals to perform challenging and important work in the areas of signature discovery and exploitation algorithms; detection, classification and tracking algorithms; and design, analysis and performance optimization of robust, real-world advanced analytics software solutions.

The Data Analytics group at Areté has position openings for entry- to mid-level research scientists at our headquarters in Northridge, California.

Roles and Responsibilities:

Conceive, design, prototype and implement advanced algorithms aimed at generating solutions to critical problems

Assess algorithm performance on real-world data

Support multiple projects throughout the company

Engage customers and collaborators to provide technical results and recommendations

Document results via written reports, briefings and well-commented code

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor’s, Master’s or PhD degree in physical sciences, engineering, or mathematics with 0-8 years’ experience

Ability to quickly pick up “on the fly” new skills and develop expertise necessary to provide the best possible solution

Experience in scientific programming using Python, C++, Matlab, or similar high-level languages

Excellent interpersonal communications, technical writing, and briefing skills

Ability to work with minimal supervision and collaborate on small teams

Agility to work multiple potentially disparate projects simultaneously

Proven capability to develop creative solutions to complex technical problems

Intellectual curiosity and high motivation to solve challenging problems

U.S. citizenship and ability to acquire a security clearance

Desired Qualifications:

Experience in any of the following areas: machine learning, including artificial intelligence and deep learning; data analysis, statistical signal processing, spectroscopy, bioinformatics, data fusion, natural language processing, algorithm development

Experience with the Department of Defense (DoD) or the Intelligence Community (IC)

Current security clearance

Areté Associates offers an excellent compensation and a full benefits package. U.S. citizenship, background screen and drug test are required to meet position eligibility. Please submit your resume on-line at: http://www.arete.com

Areté Associates is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access our career center as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation, contact a Arete Associates Human Resources Representative.

Areté will consider for employment-qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring.

#IND123

Back Share
Apply Now",3.7,"PicnicHealth
4.8","Northridge, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
406,"Scientific Data Steward, Oncology","$53k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","1 purpose...to reimagine medicine!

Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research, Inc. (NIBR) is seeking a Scientific Data Steward to join the Novartis Oncology Data Science Team. Oncology Data Science provides computational biology expertise to NIBR Oncology, from target ID through clinical development, for both targeted and immune therapies. We apply cutting edge technologies and analytical approaches to elucidate the molecular basis for therapeutic response in individual cancer patients.

The Scientific Data Steward reports into the software engineering team within Oncology Data Science, and is a highly collaborative role interacting with data scientists, bioinformaticians, laboratory teams and software engineers. The successful candidate will become the department subject matter expert on internal and external genomics data sets, understanding how to harmonize, process and load these into data stores. The successful candidate will influence department strategies for data curation, metadata capture and data storage best practices. The candidate will also develop novel protoype visualizations using these data sets, to accelerate the work of the department in identifying novel biological insights to advance the development of new medicines to fight cancer.

Specific job responsibilities include:
•Become subject matter expert on internal genomic and biomarker data sets, genomic references and other resources used and maintained by department
•Survey literature to identify impactful external data resources for internal use
•Influence strategies for data curation, including promoting and defining metadata standards, access control, reproducibility, and recommended storage solutions for different levels of data
•Build prototype visualizations on top of internal data systems, in collaboration with data scientists and end-users. Visualizations may become part of existing or entirely new software tools within the larger group.
•Re-processes and aggregate external and internal datasets using consistent data pipelines, and publish to data registration and management systems
•Facilitate loading of novel data types into existing data stores. May require data munging, re-formatting and harmonization, in collaboration with data analysts, engineers and end-users

Desirable requirements:
•BsC or MS in computational biology, bioinformatics, biology, computer science, or a related field and practical experience working with bioinformatics data sets particularly NGS data types
•Experience working in bioinformatics, ideally in scientific data curation
•Expertise in Python and R, understanding of databases and use of REStful APIs, facility on the Linux command line
•Data visualization experience, ideally in RShiny or Spotfire
•Experience with data munging, cleaning and harmonization
•Highly collaborative, self-starter, with strong communication skills
•Experience influencing without direct authority
•Practical experience with Bitbucket and JIRA

Why consider Novartis?
799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:
Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
407,"Scientist/Senior Scientist, Chemical Development",-1,"Concert Pharmaceuticals is the industry leader in the use of deuterium incorporation to create and develop
innovative drug products that address important patient needs. We are now seeking an exceptional synthetic
organic chemist to join our Process Chemistry team. You will join a team of talented scientists who are
responsible for developing the ideal manufacturing route for late-stage programs. This requires a blend of
inventiveness coupled with attention to detail and good organizational skills. We expect the successful candidate
to have an outstanding record of solving complex synthetic challenges combined with a scientific curiosity and
enthusiasm to embrace future challenges. As a member of our team you will have an opportunity to build a career
in the pharmaceutical industry while helping develop innovative new medicines that address important unmet
medical needs.

Responsibilities:
• Design and execute synthetic routes to APIs
• Understand processes in detail as we complete late-stage process characterization work in our well-

equipped laboratory
• Work collaboratively with outsourcing partners to enable successful GMP manufacture of APIs
• Solve problems on diverse topics from impurity identification to API polymorph control and

engineering of physical properties
• Produce high-quality data and reports for inclusion in regulatory filings

Qualifications:
• This position requires a PhD in synthetic organic chemistry, with at least 1–3 years of post-doctoral

or industrial experience. The candidate needs to demonstrate a high level of technical ability,
scientific creativity, teamwork and independence. Good communication skills are essential.

If you would like to be considered for a job on the Concert team, send your resume in an email to:
careers@concertpharma.com.

Concert provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits
discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability
status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic
protected by federal, state or local laws.

Concert Pharmaceuticals, Inc. | 99 Hayden Avenue, Suite 500 | Lexington, MA 02421 | (781) 860-0045 | www.concertpharma.com",3.0,"Concert Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
3.0","Lexington, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
408,"Medical Lab Technologist- MLT, Clinical Lab Scientist- Microbiology",-1,"*Position Type: * Can be full-time or part-time (looking for full-time tech and PRN tech)
*Scheduled Hours per 2 week Pay Period: * 16-20 hrs
*Primary Location: * Eustis, Florida REFERENCE LAB

*Shift: * Flexible-8 hr shift weekend

*Job Summary*
Performs laboratory analysis on received specimens, providing clinical information for diagnosis, treatment and prevention of diseases. Responsible for overall quality, efficiency, and safety in the performance of assigned technical duties in the Microbiology and Molecular departments.

*Essential Function*

· Demonstrates proficiency and follows testing procedures and policies by adherence to quality assurance guidelines for equipment and work area, documenting corrective action to any non-conforming event.

· Prepares reagents, maintains an adequate supply of materials for test procedures and manages inventory to effectively reduce departmental waste/expense.

· Exercises clinical judgment in assessing priorities while identifying, problem solving and offering solutions to test systems through the appropriate department channels, i.e. contacts hotline to troubleshoot with a specialist when necessary to resolve the issue or set-up service when appropriate.

· Maintains clear, real time communications shift-to-shift and with leadership regarding issues, concerns and problems which may affect patient care or the operation of the department.

· Participates in competency assessment program, where qualified.

· Enter data from analysis of medical tests or clinical results into LIS system.

*EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE REQUIRED**: *

· Associates Degree minimum, Bachelor’s degree preferred

· Science degree meeting state licensure requirements (64B3-5.003).

· *Plate Reading and Molecular testing experience preferred**.*

*LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION OR REGISTRATION REQUIRED**: *
State of Florida- Medical Technologist License in at least one specialty: (Microbiology specialty required) Clinical Chemistry, Hematology, Molecular and/or Serology

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
Schedule:
* Day shift

Experience:
* Microbiology: 2 years (Preferred)

Work Location:
* One location

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
* Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous

This Company Describes Its Culture as:
* Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused

Company's website:
* Mid-florida Pathology

Company's Facebook page:
* Mid-florida Pathology

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Mid-Florida Pathology,"Eustis, FL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
409,Clinical Laboratory Scientist AM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission Pay
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
410,Clinical Laboratory Scientist AM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission Pay
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
411,Clinical Laboratory Scientist AM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission Pay
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
412,Clinical Laboratory Scientist AM Shift,-1,"Testing is the most significant bottleneck in the response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Broad testing is the fastest way to safely return to work, to school, and to normal life. SummerBio is a mission-driven company made up of life science automation engineers, molecular biologists, laboratory scientists, public health professionals, supply chain experts, software engineers and designers that was founded to scale up rapid, low-cost, mass-scale testing.

We have created an end-to-end COVID-19 test system designed from the ground up to massively automate the existing gold-standard RT-qPCR regimen based on commercially-available and scalable consumables.

Join SummerBio and help us solve COVID-19 testing for all.

This position is responsible for performing high complexity laboratory testing on patient specimens, performing quality control and quality assurance procedures, reporting patient results. This position will comply with all applicable local, state and federal laboratory requirements and operate under the direction of the Laboratory Director and Laboratory Supervisor(s). This role requires meticulous and organized records, excellent attention to detail, and the ability to multi-task and be flexible with tasks and schedules.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Accurately perform molecular testing, using a variety of molecular biological techniques
Conduct daily quantitation and qualification assessment of molecular data generated during testing.
Carry out QC/QA activities as part of the Quality program and commitment to patient safety
Operates automated liquid handling instrumentation to execute complex high-throughput procedures and troubleshoot as necessary.
Participate in a variety of other essential laboratory activities, including reagent qualification, inventory management, procedure writing, inspection preparation, assay validation and investigation.
Perform and document routine preventive maintenance and independently identify and troubleshoot highly complex problems that adversely affect test performance.
Diligently maintains a molecular biology laboratory environment to minimize and contain amplicon contamination.
Identify root cause and document all corrective actions taken when test systems.
Provides research and resolution on complex issues, including all necessary documentation.
Solves routine problems independently.
Familiar with unusual technical problems and results, and resolves any issues related to these problems or results.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or test results and notify Laboratory Director or Laboratory Manager immediately.
Executes & documents lab corrective action whenever test systems are not acceptable or when test systems deviate from established performance specifications.
Assist with training of new laboratory personnel.
Participate in introduction of assay improvements, new assay configurations and validation
At times, this position may fill the role of the general supervisor if the general supervisor is off-site.
Qualification Requirements*
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Must have a solid understanding of general laboratory techniques.
Experience with a wide range of laboratory equipment.
Ability to work independently as well as in a team-oriented environment.
Demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. Ability to critical analyze complex data.
Ability to learn new principles quickly, possess strong analytical skills, must possess strong interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of good laboratory and documentation practices.
Education and Experience Requirements: *
California Clinical Laboratory Scientist license.
Bachelor of Arts or Science in Biomedical Laboratory Science, Clinical Science or related field.
2+ years’ experience as a CLS in a clinical laboratory.
Working knowledge of local, state, and federal laboratory regulations.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Supplemental Pay:
Commission Pay
Company's website:
https://www.summer.bio/
Work Remotely:
No",-1,SummerBio,"Menlo Park, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
413,"Data Scientist / Program Scheduler, Junior - FAA","$48k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position: Data Scientist / Program Scheduler, Junior - FAA

Function: Data Science /Program Scheduling

Location: Cobec Site- Washington, D.C. * During Covid-19 all Cobec employees are working remotely until futher notice.

Job Summary

Cobec is looking for candidates with a positive and curious attitude and willingness to learn and grow with an innovative team. Are you ready to roll up your sleeves and drive execution and results?

This position will apply advanced analytical and mathematical techniques to solve complex decision problems. Candidates will use high performance computing, big data analytics and data visualization tools and techniques to assist in making acquisition decisions and maximizing operational effectiveness and efficiency.

This position will also provide program scheduling support to the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA).

Years of Relevant Experience

The position requires 0-3 equivalent years of experience in data mining, trend analysis, statistical research, and modeling and simulation.

The position requires 0-3 years of relevant experience in a planning, Program Management Organization (PMO), process improvement and general program support.

Essential Job Functions

The following duties are normal for this position. The omission of specific statements of duties does not exclude them from this position if the work is similar, related, and/or a logical assignment for this position. Other duties may be required and assigned.
Become a user of Primavera 6 (P6) and Atlassian tools (e.g. Jira and Confluence) to extract data for analysis.
Create resources loaded schedules based on input from team members, subject matter experts, other FAA groups, and various data systems and report findings to management and other decision makers.
Lead design and implement quality planning, scheduling, and resource management processes to meet varying project factors such as size and scope.
Prepare, maintain, and refine project schedule and/or roadmap using the critical path method (CPM) and report in P6 and Jira.
Develop what-if scenarios and identify risks and potential impacts to team objectives.
Ability to analyze data in various formats and interpret its meaning on project schedule, product delivery and operational research.
Able to work in a collaborative team environment with varying perspectives and roles including analysts, engineers, managers, and other schedulers.
Prepare management presentations driven by data and participate in project reviews.
Capacity to conduct data analyses, develop problem solutions, and work with limited oversight
Individual will have experience in data collection, data normalization techniques, statistical analysis, and performance metrics development
Individuals will have experience with compiling and integration map data for automation
Individuals will be required to contribute effectively to working groups through oral and written communication and cooperative working relationships
Individuals will support the develop of custom visualizations
Occasional travel required as needed by client/s and/or company
Education Requirements

Bachelor’s degree required.

Master’s degree is a plus and may count as additional years of experience

Skills Requirements
Demonstrate ability to learn new software stacks and tools is required.
Experience working in a team environment, empowering team members, and working collaboratively to collect schedule data for project updates.
Experience in IT or software project scheduling a plus, but not required.
Strong analytical knowledge and creativity to model various project components to measure project progression against and predict resource needs.
Preferred to have proficiency in various software languages such as Python, Bash, pl/SQL.
Preferred to have knowledge of software development concepts and processes such as configuration management, Agile, and others.
Good interpersonal and communication skills.
Must be willing to work in a fast-paced work environment and be flexible to work on more than one program.
Familiarization with Scaled Agile a plus, but not required.
Security Requirements

Must be a US citizen or a legal resident for three of the past five years. Must meet eligibility requirements for a US Public Trust security clearance.

Travel

Occasional travel required as needed by client/s and/or company",4.8,"Cobec Consulting
4.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
414,Sr or Principal Data Scientist,"$104k-$167k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We are hiring Data Scientists at these levels:
Senior
Lead (Staff or Sr. Staff)
Principal

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart/$ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2000 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart/$ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

The Sr. or Principal Data Scientist will be heavily involved in executing data analysis and modeling tasks for Freedom Financial Asset Management, the lending division of the Freedom Financial Network. The overarching mandate for the Sr. or Principal Data Scientist is to execute on analytic delivery and to develop new analytic capabilities for the company’s mortgage initiative. The position will essentially be to partner with the mortgage division to execute a new analytic vision. Additionally, he/she may collaborate with other team members to assess and develop new analytic opportunities. This role will provide the candidate exposure and visibility into a strategic initiative for the company, and as such, will be a high impact role within the organization.

THE ROLE:

Some of the key responsibilities for the Analytic Scientist will include:

Drive better understanding of FFN customers and prospects. Optimize customer experience and FFN value proposition by leveraging of GLM, supervised and unsupervised ML modeling solutions.
Utilize your technical and analytical skills, while also gaining in-depth exposure to business strategy.
Act as consultant to cross functional teams, advise how to best leverage predictive modeling and data in general.
Responsibility:
Design, build, optimize and maintain customer LTV / lifecycle modeling platforms.
Identify opportunities to apply data science solutions to improve customer experience and FFN value proposition.
Consult with business partners to develop data science strategy to address and influence customer LTV.
Analyze data, build models and assess their quality
Design experiments and evaluate the results
Monitor model performance and make recommendations
Ad-hoc Statistical requests
Communicating results and recommendations to senior management
Identify and apply best practices and innovative solutions for optimization of customer life cycle.
Skillset and Requirements:
Expert knowledge of logistic regression, decision trees, survival analysis, design of experiment and other statistical techniques
Expert knowledge of supervised and unsupervised ML modeling techniques
Communicating clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Influencing others in both verbal and written mediums
Leverage data and advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to develop comprehensive customer experience strategy
Qualifications and Experience
Masters or PhD in Statistics or similar quantitative field of study (Math, Economics, Financial Engineering, Physics, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Operations Research, etc.)
Hands on expertise in statistical modeling and analysis
Experience with use of credit bureau data for statistical modeling
Experience working with relational databases
Expert SAS/R/Python knowledge
Experience with cloud-based modeling (AI) platforms
0 - 7+ years of total experience. Financial services or mortgage experience, is not required, but is preferred.
Demonstrated experience in statistical modeling and analysis. Expert level skills in Python or R.
Proficiency in qualitative and quantitative data analysis and reporting.
Aptitude working with relational databases and manipulating data from databases for statistical modeling.
Familiarity with UNIX/LINUX environments and BASH/shell scripting is desired.
Very strong analytical skills, combined with an ability to tie analytic results to business implications.
A can do attitude for problem solving.
A keen eye to spot opportunities to automate and streamline analytic processes.
High level of comfort working within the financial services industry, as well as working within a rapidly growing environment in which change is a constant.
An ability to work independently with limited direction but with the judgment to do so within appropriate limits of authority.
Initiative to constructively, but passionately, challenge existing analytic processes.

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting to you, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader. Thank you for your consideration.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
415,Senior Data Scientist,"$91k-$145k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Senior Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
3+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
416,Data Scientist/Future Pricing Strategy,"$88k-$140k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Who we are

Our vision is to create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere every person, every organization, and every community around the globe. This motivates us inspires us to do what we do. To make what we make. To invent, and to reinvent. To engineer experiences that amaze. We wont stop pushing ahead, because you wont stop pushing ahead. Youre reinventing how you work. How you play. How you live. With our technology, youll reinvent your world

What we offer
Exciting experience with data sciences and analytics hottest topics: HPs Analytics team is covering a wide range of exciting, fast-growing and business critical areas such as: Big data SKU level pricing (in a space of millions of transactions), SEM/Display optimization in the worlds leading channels platforms (e.g. Google, Amazon, JD) and predictive analytics in the area of sales management (which accounts to target, with what offer )
Career building platform- HPs analytics team has a large and global footprint across the world offering many possibilities to advance ones career
International, collaborative and dynamic team - We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of economists, consultants, marketers, statisticians, engineers, scientists or even musicians united by the passion to create impact using technology
Position overview

In this position you would get the chance to
Shape HPs future of how we price and introduce new products
Develop and apply statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Collaborate and work closely with our internal business teams to drive action
Present results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
About you:
You have deep interests in pricing, business strategy, and consumer behaviour
You are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and models
You feel accomplished seeing your recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourself
You cant stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people
Requirements:

Must-haves:
At least 2 years working experience in data science in a business setting
Experience interacting with stakeholders and translating business questions to models
Ability to deploy, interpret, and troubleshoot linear regression models
Working understanding of causal inference methods
Proficiency with R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication for technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challenges
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Bonus points for:
Understanding of finance and product economics
Experience in deploying data science in a retail environment
Experience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB tests
Master's or PhD degree in Quantitative Marketing, Business, Statistics, Economics, Psychology, or other relevant quantitative discipline",4.1,"HP Inc.
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
417,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,"$80k-$136k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
418,R&D Scientist,"$69k-$115k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Agilent inspires and supports discoveries that advance the quality of life. We provide life science, diagnostic and applied market laboratories worldwide with instruments, services, consumables, applications and expertise. Agilent enables customers to gain the answers and insights they seek - so they can do what they do best: improve the world around us. Information about Agilent is available at www.agilent.com.

You have honed your knowledge and technical skills and are looking to join a fast-paced, high-performance team developing products to improve the human condition.

We are seeking a highly motivated R&D Scientist to join our Genomics R&D organization at our Cedar Creek, TX location. This is a hands-on position supporting the microarray product line. In this position, you will generate data to support and improve existing products as well as help to bring new assays to market.

Primary Responsibilities:

Perform wet lab bench experiments as the primary responsibility, to maintain existing microarray products and develop new technologies for initial market launch
Analyze data from experiments, troubleshoot technical issues, and design new experiments to meet required technical specifications
Effectively communicate scientific results in both written format and orally at group and cross-functional team meetings.
Collaborate with product development teams across the Genomics organization, including colleagues at remote sites
Assist senior scientists with lab maintenance, supply, and organizational tasks to ensure compliance with regulatory and quality standards
Ability to drive main projects forward with limited, but appropriate, supervision, while also taking direction from senior scientists when needed to perform experiments and tasks needed to support the wider team
Assist in writing product specifications, test plans/reports, and life cycle documentation
Meticulously document experiments and verification/validation (V&V) studies in the Electronic Laboratory Notebook
Ensure all aspects of studies are conducted according to internal and external quality and regulatory requirements",4.1,"Agilent
4.1","Cedar Creek, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
419,Manufacturing Scientist,"$19k-$112k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Summary:

Support daily operations in the Purification Department, executing process improvement projects for Flexbumin including validation support and submission writing.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Work with appropriate support groups to assess product impact of manufacturing deviations and write product impact statements

Solve technical manufacturing issues, either lead teams or be an integral member of the team

Work with manufacturing to identify improvement opportunities

Work with appropriate teams to execute improvement projects, including validation support and submission writing

Design appropriate experiments to achieve process improvements with minimal supervision

Work independently or with other Manufacturing Science personnel to execute experiments

May work on small scale experiments

Assessment of new technology and application to our existing processes

Utilize robust statistical analysis to draw appropriate conclusions from the data

Develop new or improved techniques and procedures around specific tasks with minimal supervision

Present information to auditors

Work with manufacturing, quality, engineering, and other support groups to drive the goals of the Flexbumin projects

Qualifications:

Knowledge of protein purification techniques and biochemistry

Experience in protein process development

Knowledge of analytical tools for analysis of proteins

Experience with DOE (Design of Experiments), six sigma, and lean manufacturing a plus

Knowledge of GMPs

Good interpersonal skills, good verbal, and written communication skills

Able to work in a cold environment

Ability to handle multiple tasks concurrently while paying attention to detail

Strong computer skills (MS Word, MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, Minitab)

Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills.Strong presentation skills

Education and/or experience:

Typically requires a Bachelor’s degree in science, engineering, or other related technical fields. 3+ years of related experience

Physical Demands:

Must be able to lift, push, pull 50 lbs, and carry up to 25 lbs

In general, the position requires a combination of sedentary work and walking around observing conditions in the facility

Working Environment:

Must be able to work in controlled environments requiring special gowning. Will be required to follow gowning requirements and wear protective clothing over the head, face, hands, feet, and body

No make-up, jewelry, contact lenses, nail polish, or artificial fingernails may be worn in the manufacturing environment

Will work in a cold, wet environment

Must be able to work multiple shifts, including weekends

Must be able to work overtime as required (only for non-exempt positions)

May be required to work in a confined area

Some Clean Room and cool/hot storage conditions

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
420,Plant Disease & Pest Control Biology Scientist,"$11-$30 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","About the position: GreenLight Biosciences is seeking an exceptional, highly motivated Plant Disease& Pest Control Biology Scientist to join our growing company and impact our greenhouse and field trial programs. The successful candidate will utilize his/her education and experience mainly in plant pathology or a related science field to lead the design, set up, management and analysis of greenhouse and lab studies with a primary emphasis on disease control in agricultural crop plants. The successful candidate will also support, in collaboration with the Field Development Team, the design, planning, execution and management of field research trials to define the activity of experimental GreenLight biopesticides, alone or in combination with other existing commercial solutions, to enable the successful development of new and innovative biological crop protection products. Strong technical, organizational, and communication skills are essential.

About the company:GreenLight Biosciences solves big problems facing society in agriculture, human health, and animal health through scientific innovation. Our pipeline of biopesticides have similar efficacy to traditional chemical pesticides while being safe to both non-target organisms like pollinators and the environment. The company is currently building on expertise in the cost-effective production of RNA to rapidly accelerate efforts in life sciences. Using our proprietary mRNA platform and collaboration with leading industry partners, GreenLight is developing a pipeline of RNA based vaccines and therapies to address critical public health challenges. The GreenLight team is over 100 people across our headquarters in Medford, MA and an R&D facility in Research Triangle Park, NC. Construction is underway on a pilot scale biomanufacturing plant in Rochester, NY.

Responsibilities:
•In conjunction with other teams at GreenLight, lead the design, set up, management and analysis of greenhouse trials as well as lab studies, when needed, with a primary emphasis on disease control in agricultural crop plants.
•Provide biology expertise (plant pathology preferred) to help guide program and protocol development for agricultural greenhouse and field trials, and to support research project teams to improve delivery of new leads.
•Analyze results of greenhouse (and field) efficacy trials using appropriate statistical tools, generate trial summaries and provide recommendations to project teams and management based on results to help steer the development of new products.
•Work closely with the project teams in developing strategies and methodologies for testing new biopesticides in lab and greenhouse settings.
•Drive process simplification in greenhouse trial data generation and summarization.
•Provide guidance on statistical design and analysis of greenhouse and field research trials.
•Support data quality and consistency across the greenhouse and field trial program.
•Support logistics for greenhouse and field trials implementation in partnership with other teams at GreenLight such as Formulation, Production, Regulatory, etc.

Required Qualifications:
•Masters or Ph.D. in applied agriculture pest control discipline - plant pathology preferred, but entomology or agronomy will be considered.
•0- 3 years experience with Ph.D. or 5+ years experience with M.S. conducting and summarizing agricultural greenhouse and/or field trials
•Demonstrated experience in growing agricultural crops in greenhouses and conducting research trials in a greenhouse
•Demonstrated solid level of expertise and experience with use of statistics in agricultural research
•At least 3 years of experience developing and analyzing complex datasets
•Excellent communication skills and the ability to work in a collaborative, team-oriented environment
•Must maintain a high level of ownership and see assignments through to completion based on agreed upon deadlines
•Must be independently driven, results-oriented and a quick learner
•Organizes own workload and works closely with leadership to ensure own workload is clearly defined and coordinated to meet deliverable timelines
•Demonstrated ability to spray pesticides in the greenhouse and work with chemicals and biological compounds including reading and understanding labels and SDS’s, following SOP’s, wearing proper PPE (including occasional use of a respirator)
Preferred Qualifications:
•Experience with Gylling Data Management’s ARM software program or similar
•Computer proficiency (Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint) coupled with the ability& motivation to learn new techniques will be important in protocol and method development.
•Demonstrated experience in the generation of reports and Power Point presentations.
•Expertise in applying statistical concepts, approaches, packages and libraries, programming and conducting analyses in R or JMP",4.0,"Greenlight Biosciences
4.0","Research Triangle Park, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
421,Data Engineer,"$90k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Us


Interested in working for a human-centered technology company that prides itself on using modern tools and technologies? Want to be surrounded by intensely curious and innovative thinkers who push one another to come up with the best solutions possible?

Seeking to solve complex technical challenges by building products that work for people, meet and exceed the needs of businesses, and work elegantly and efficiently?

Modeling ourselves after the 1904 World's Fair, which brought innovation to the region, 1904labs is seeking top technical talent in St. Louis to bring innovation and creativity to our clients.

Our clients consist of Fortune 500 and Global 2000 companies. We partner with them on complex projects that range from reimagining and refactoring their existing applications, to helping to envision and build new applications or data streams to operationalize their existing data. Working in a team-based labs model, using our own flavor of #HCDAgile, we strive to work at the cutting edge of technology's capabilities while solving problems for our clients and their users.

The Role


As a Data Engineer you would be responsible for developing and deploying cutting edge distributed data solutions. Our engineers have a passion for open source technologies, strive to build cloud first applications, and are motivated by our desire to transform businesses into data driven enterprises. This team will focus on working with platforms such as Hadoop, Spark, Hive, Kafka, Elasticsearch, SQL and NoSQL/Graph databases as well as cloud-based data services.

Our teams at 1904labs are Agile, and we work in a highly collaborative environment. You would be a productive member of a fast paced group and have an opportunity to solve some very complex data problems.

Requirements for Data Engineer


3+ years of progressive experience as a Data Engineer, BI Developer, Application Developer or related occupation.
Agile: Experience working in an agile team oriented environment
Attitude / Aptitude: A passion for everything data with a desire to be at the cutting edge of technology and consistently deliver working software while always keeping an eye on opportunities for innovation.
Technical Skills (You have experience with 2 or more of these bulletpoints):
Programming in Java (Or similar JVM language such as Scala, Groovy, etc) and/or Python
Architecting and integrating big data pipelines
Working with large data volumes; this includes processing, transforming and transporting large scale data using technologies such as: MR/TEZ, Hive SQL, Spark, etc.
Have a strong background in SQL / Data Warehousing (dimensional modeling)
Have a strong background working with and/or implementing architecture for RDBMS such as: Oracle, MySQL, Postgres and/or SQLServer.
Experience with traditional ETL tools such as SSIS, Informatica, Pentaho, Talend, etc.
Experience with NoSQL/Graph Data Modeling and are actively using Cassandra, HBase, DynamoDB, Neo4J, Titan, or DataStax Graph
Installing/configuring a distributed computing/storage platform, such as Apache Hadoop, Amazon EMR, Apache Spark, Apache Hive, and/or Presto
Working with one or more streaming platforms, such as Apache Kafka, Spark Streaming, Storm, or AWS Kinesis
Working knowledge of the Linux command line and shell scripting
Desired Skills for Data Engineer
Analytics: Have working knowledge of analytics/reporting tools such as Tableau, Spotfire, Qlikview, etc.
Open Source: Are working with open source tools now and have a background in contributing to open source projects.
Perks
Standard Benefits Program (medical, dental, life insurance, 401(k), professional development and education assistance, PTO).
Innovation Hours - Ten percent (10%) of our work week is set aside to work on our own product ideas in a highly collaborative and supportive environment. The best part: The IP remains your own. We are a high-growth culture and we know that when we help people focus on personal and professional growth, collectively, we can achieve great things.
Dress Code - we don't have one
While we are in the midst of the Covid pandemic our primary work location is our home offices. Once this is behind us, we will return to our normal hybrid model of working from the office and from home. For this reason we still prefer local candidates. While we would prefer local candidates your current location is not the most important factor; please help us understand why you would like to call St. Louis home if you would be relocating.

]]>",4.7,"1904labs
4.7","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
422,Senior Health Data Analyst I,"$74k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
423,"Director, Data Science","$122k-$194k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Position Summary:

Data is CAQH’s most critical asset. You will change how we understand and work with it. CAQH is seeking a hands-on leader for our Health Data Science team. The Data Science Lead will take the prime role in analyzing and delivering results based on large health care databases– from CAQH, from health plans and third parties. They will preferably have experience in health plan performance and quality measurement and comparative effectiveness analysis. As a senior member of the Product and Technology team, the selected individual will contribute to business development activities and will mentor the research staff. The successful candidate can understand content area, determine what the data means, define analysis plans, select appropriate statistical methods and tools, conduct quantitative analysis, program solutions in statistical or other programming languages, ensure an effective quality analysis plan, and communicate with clients. This is a highly technical and applied leadership position requiring experience with data science, algorithms, software development and large-scale databases.

This role is full-time exempt position and reports to the Senior Vice President, Product, Technology and Operations.

Specific Responsibilities:
Set the direction and development of CAQH’s data science and machine learning algorithms, structure, tools, and processes to obtain significant improvements in data accuracy levels based on the goals of the executive management team and CAQH Board of Directors.
Direct a Data Science team to support the breadth of CAQH data needs. Work within the team and across our products on the science, design, execution, and reporting of projects associated with data and data science. Engage the data team to enhance their intellectual curiosity and technical skills.
Serve as a member of the CAQH Leadership Council providing thought leadership and direction towards CAQH’s mission, strategy, objectives, and tactical projects.
Study our data from multiple angles, determine what the data means and recommends the best possible way to analyze it. Identify trends and patterns determining what is noise and what is good data and convey that understanding to others.
Develop analytical plans for research and analytics including: algorithm selection (data mining, machine learning etc.), advanced probability& statistics, predictive modeling, machine learning, relational database design, program design, selection of statistical methods and development of formats.
Conduct programming tasks and statistical analyses including preparation and cleaning of data, implementation and refinement of statistical methods, preparation of results, creation of databases and other outputs, and verification of the accuracy of results. Participate in quality assurance processes.
Lead, design, plan, and execute programming approaches to support various development projects. Code at an expert level in applications such as SAS, R, Python. Drive relational database design as well as the use of MongoDB and Hadoop/HDF.
Present analytic results to customers, CAQH staff and other researchers incorporating descriptions of methods, relevant literature, and other background material to provide context for the results.
Represent CAQH to technical and business audiences. Advance the company’s reputation as a leading provider of quality assured provider data. Enhance CAQH reputation for scientific leadership in performance measurement through publications, conference talks, etc.
Lead technical (econometric modeling/statistics) reviews of health-related proposals and deliverables
Supervisory Responsibility:

Manage a small but growing data science team, ensuring they deliver against current commitments and can grow into our future needs.

Skills:
Strong quantitative skills, including random assignment evaluation, quasi-experimental design, and mixed method evaluation strategies. Skilled at developing and applying univariate and multivariate modeling techniques, hypothesis testing.
Proficiency in statistical software packages strong programming skills in other languages such as Python, C# or Java required. Certifications a plus.
Excellent ability to communicate complex technical material, both orally and in writing with the ability to explain complex models and analysis in layman terms.
Preferably an extensive knowledge of one or more of the following areas: Medicare, Medicaid, comparative effectiveness, provider data.
A track record of publications is a plus.
Experience:
Ten or more years of experience delivering algorithm innovation into commercial software-based products.
Five or more years in health care in a data science or data related role.
Five or more years of experience analyzing large datasets.
Five or more years as a lead with experience in managing a team.
Education:

Master’s degree (PhD preferred) in Mathematics or Computer Science with experience in health services research, applied statistics or a combination of education and experience which demonstrates the necessary skills and abilities.

WHO WE ARE

Named one of Modern Healthcare’s Best Places to Work for five years (2016-2020), CAQH, a non-profit alliance, is the leader in creating shared initiatives to streamline the business of healthcare. Through collaboration and innovation, CAQH accelerates the transformation of business processes, delivering value to providers, patients and health plans.
COB Smart® quickly and accurately directs coordination of benefits processes.
EnrollHub® reduces costly paper checks with enrollment for electronic payments and electronic remittance advice.
CAQH ProView® eases the burden of provider data collection, maintenance and distribution.
DirectAssure® increases the accuracy of health plan provider directories.
VeriFideTMTM streamlines credentialing by consolidating and standardizing primary source verification.
SanctionsTrack® delivers comprehensive, multi-state information on healthcare provider licensure disciplinary actions.
CAQH CORE® maximizes business efficiency and savings by developing and implementing national operating rules.
CAQH Index® benchmarks progress and helps optimize operations by tracking industry adoption of electronic administrative transactions.
WHAT YOU GET

CAQH recognizes that its most important asset is its growing team of smart, creative, collaborative, forward-thinking and passionate professionals– and that a comprehensive employee benefits package is an important factor for them in choosing where to work. CAQH offers competitive compensation along with an extensive benefits package for all full-time employees, including medical, dental and vision coverage, tuition assistance and a 401k. Our location in downtown Washington, DC is metro-accessible, has an onsite fitness center and is centrally located to allow our team to take advantage of professional networking opportunities, cultural offerings and a thriving social scene.

CAQH is an equal opportunity employer (Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans). We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote without regard to race, national origin or ancestry, color, religion, creed, sex, age, marital status, presence of children, pregnancy, sexual orientation, genetic status, gender identity, mental or physical handicap, status as a covered veteran, status as a qualified disabled individual, except where sex is a bona fide occupational requirement, or where disability status is a bona fide occupational disqualification or any other legally protected status.

Applicants have rights under Federal Laws undertheFamily Medical Leave Act (FMLA),Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO),Equal Employment Opportunity Supplement, and theEmployee Polygraph Protection Act (EPPA).

If you are interested in applying for employment with CAQH and need special assistance or an accommodation to apply for a posted position, contact our Human Resources department at 202-517-0400.",4.3,"CAQH
4.3","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
424,Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers,-1,"Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers
Company Name *NovoDynamics, Inc. *

Company Location: Ann Arbor, Michigan

Fast-growing AI company is seeking highly-qualified scientists and engineers with experience in ML
(Machine Learning), DL (Deep Learning) and Computer Vision to address real-world challenges in the
Health Care industry. If you have a successful track record in software development, knowledge of current software technologies and methodologies, and excellent communication and interpersonal skills, we want to talk with you. Experience with image processing technologies is a plus.

Desired skills:

• Experience with data noise removal, data augmentation, dataset truthing and construction
• Expertise in visualizing and manipulating large datasets
• Familiarity with Java and Python a plus
• Proficiency with a deep learning library such as Keras or deeplearning4j a plus

Responsibilities may include:

• Understanding business objectives and developing models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress

• Analyzing DL algorithms that could be used to solve a given problem and ranking them by their success probability

• Exploring and visualizing data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the model in the real world

• Verifying data quality and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
• Defining validation strategies
• Training models and tuning hyperparameters
• Analyzing errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them

Why work for NovoDynamics?

• Be part of a dynamic team that designs disruptive technologies for the Health Care industry
• Receive great compensation and benefits
• Work in downtown Ann Arbor near the University of Michigan campus
• Enjoy free parking, popcorn, coffee, tea and soft drinks
• Delight in an amazing work environment with interesting and engaged teammates
• Relax with generous and flexible time off
Seniority Level *
Mid-Senior level
Employment Type *
Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $170,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Ann Arbor, MI 48104 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
https://www.novodynamics.com and https://www.novohealthdental.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/70143/admin/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"NovoDynamics, Inc.
4.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
425,"Sr Scientist, Clinical Research","$41-$71 Per Hour
(Glassdoor Est.)","Those who join Emergent BioSolutions feel a sense of ownership about their future. You will excel in an environment characterized by respect, innovation and growth opportunities. Here, you will join passionate professionals who advance their scientific, technical and professional skills to develop products designed-to protect life.
Job Summary
The Senior Scientist, Clinical Research is responsible for
i) providing scientific expertise and clinical strategy to assigned clinical development programs to other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) or to internal company departments (eg, pre-clinical, bioanalytical, medical writing, regulatory affairs);
ii) authoring relevant clinical trial documents; and
iii) playing a key role in the clinical development of the assigned product and the associated regulatory submission process. Additionally, the Senior Scientist provides leadership by acting as a mentor to clinical research scientists and/or colleagues in Clinical Research department.
This position is located in Gaithersburg, MD.

Essential Functions
Leads clinical research studies from trial design to final study report for assigned projects.
Develops, prioritizes and meets measurable short- and long-term objectives for assigned clinical studies.
Provides guidance to relevant Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) involved in design and conduct of clinical studies.
Authors/reviews clinical trial protocols, investigator’s brochure, clinical study reports, clinical sections of regulatory submission documents including IND and BLA/NDS, developmental safety update reports, clinical overviews/summaries, clinical assessments.
Appropriately designs studies to meet desired clinical endpoints and with appropriate methods and measurements.
Reviews and applies current company SOPs. Revises relevant SOPs, when required.
Tracks progress of assigned clinical development programs and addresses problems as necessary
Collaborates with other internal departments including Pre-clinical, Bioanalytical, Medical Writing, Regulatory Affairs, Pharmacovigilance and corporate project management groups to ensure common goals are met.
Provides leadership/mentorship to clinical research scientists or to colleagues in other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management).
Presents internally for clinical trial/program training; externally (when required) to investigators/clinical trial site personnel (eg, site initiation visit, investigator meeting), data safety monitoring boards (DSMBs), at regulatory agency meetings, conferences and/or advisory boards.
Attends and contributes at regulatory meetings with FDA, Health Canada, EMA.
Manages relationships with clinical consultants and/or relevant clinical research organization (CRO) personnel.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature of work performed by those in this job. It is not an exhaustive list of all duties, and other duties may be assigned.

Education, Experience & Skills
EDUCATION:
Qualified candidates will have one of the following:
An advanced degree in Life Sciences or Medicine (PhD, PharmD or MD preferred) with at least 4 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Master’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 5 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Bachelor’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 6 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions.
EXPERIENCE:
Must have knowledge and understanding of Health Canada, FDA and ICH regulatory requirements and procedures applicable to Clinical Research and Product Development.
At least 4 years of experience in the pharmaceutical industry with direct experience in designing and managing clinical studies.
Previous experience working in a matrix environment is highly desirable. Experience in clinical operations, biostatistics or data management is an asset.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
Ability to drive efforts, overcome obstacles and achieves results within budget and timeline specifications.
Experience in presentations in public or regulatory settings. Excellent organizational, analytical, leadership, problem solving and interaction skills.
Ability to work in a highly diverse and fast paced, team environment.
Excellent written/verbal communication and interpersonal skills, as well as excellent computer skills required.
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Successful Completion of a Criminal Record Check.

PHYSICAL/MENTAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT CHARACTERISTICS
There are physical/mental demands and work environment characteristics that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of the job.
This information is available upon request from the candidate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform all essential functions.
Emergent BioSolutions is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, disability, Protected Veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
Information submitted will be used by Emergent BioSolutions for activities related to your prospective employment. Emergent BioSolutions respects your privacy and any use of the information submitted will be subject to the terms of our Privacy Policy .
Emergent BioSolutions does not accept non-solicited resumes or candidate submittals from search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list. Unsolicited resumes or candidate information submitted to Emergent BioSolutions by search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list shall become the property of Emergent BioSolutions and if the candidate is subsequently hired by Emergent BioSolutions, Emergent BioSolutions shall not owe any fee to the submitting agency.",3.3,"Emergent Biosolutions
3.3","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
426,Research Scientist,-1,"Enabling Immunotherapy*
Key responsibilities – Research Scientist*
immunoSCAPE is looking for a highly motivated individual with outstanding immunology background to coordinate the scientific activities of its US laboratory based in San Diego, CA. The candidate will work closely with immunoSCAPE Operation team headquartered in Singapore and immunoSCAPE US BD team to:
Establish new US partners and collaborators
Manage projects with collaborators, including project set-up, experimental design, data acquisition and analysis, communication of results - ensuring delivery against milestones
Support project data acquisition and analysis
Supervise the US Operation team in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Implement immunoSCAPE’s proactive publication policy by drafting of manuscripts, abstracts and presentations in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Required qualifications and skills*
A doctoral degree in Immunology or related fields
At least 5 years of lab experience, preferably in T cell immunology and/or immunotherapy
In-depth experience with multi-parameter single cell technologies including flow cytometry and/or mass cytometry
Experience in designing, planning and delivering on project milestones
Experience in mentoring and supervising other scientists
Excellent writing and communication skills
Rigorous, organized and accountable
Excellent team player, independent, self-driven with good interpersonal skills
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Interested applicants please submit their CV and a letter of motivation

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Laboratory: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)",-1,"immunoSCAPE, Inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
427,Research Scientist,-1,"Enabling Immunotherapy*
Key responsibilities – Research Scientist*
immunoSCAPE is looking for a highly motivated individual with outstanding immunology background to coordinate the scientific activities of its US laboratory based in San Diego, CA. The candidate will work closely with immunoSCAPE Operation team headquartered in Singapore and immunoSCAPE US BD team to:
Establish new US partners and collaborators
Manage projects with collaborators, including project set-up, experimental design, data acquisition and analysis, communication of results - ensuring delivery against milestones
Support project data acquisition and analysis
Supervise the US Operation team in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Implement immunoSCAPE’s proactive publication policy by drafting of manuscripts, abstracts and presentations in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Required qualifications and skills*
A doctoral degree in Immunology or related fields
At least 5 years of lab experience, preferably in T cell immunology and/or immunotherapy
In-depth experience with multi-parameter single cell technologies including flow cytometry and/or mass cytometry
Experience in designing, planning and delivering on project milestones
Experience in mentoring and supervising other scientists
Excellent writing and communication skills
Rigorous, organized and accountable
Excellent team player, independent, self-driven with good interpersonal skills
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Interested applicants please submit their CV and a letter of motivation

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Laboratory: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)",-1,"immunoSCAPE, Inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
428,Research Scientist,-1,"Enabling Immunotherapy*
Key responsibilities – Research Scientist*
immunoSCAPE is looking for a highly motivated individual with outstanding immunology background to coordinate the scientific activities of its US laboratory based in San Diego, CA. The candidate will work closely with immunoSCAPE Operation team headquartered in Singapore and immunoSCAPE US BD team to:
Establish new US partners and collaborators
Manage projects with collaborators, including project set-up, experimental design, data acquisition and analysis, communication of results - ensuring delivery against milestones
Support project data acquisition and analysis
Supervise the US Operation team in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Implement immunoSCAPE’s proactive publication policy by drafting of manuscripts, abstracts and presentations in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Required qualifications and skills*
A doctoral degree in Immunology or related fields
At least 5 years of lab experience, preferably in T cell immunology and/or immunotherapy
In-depth experience with multi-parameter single cell technologies including flow cytometry and/or mass cytometry
Experience in designing, planning and delivering on project milestones
Experience in mentoring and supervising other scientists
Excellent writing and communication skills
Rigorous, organized and accountable
Excellent team player, independent, self-driven with good interpersonal skills
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Interested applicants please submit their CV and a letter of motivation

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Laboratory: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)",-1,"immunoSCAPE, Inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
429,Research Scientist,-1,"Enabling Immunotherapy*
Key responsibilities – Research Scientist*
immunoSCAPE is looking for a highly motivated individual with outstanding immunology background to coordinate the scientific activities of its US laboratory based in San Diego, CA. The candidate will work closely with immunoSCAPE Operation team headquartered in Singapore and immunoSCAPE US BD team to:
Establish new US partners and collaborators
Manage projects with collaborators, including project set-up, experimental design, data acquisition and analysis, communication of results - ensuring delivery against milestones
Support project data acquisition and analysis
Supervise the US Operation team in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Implement immunoSCAPE’s proactive publication policy by drafting of manuscripts, abstracts and presentations in coordination with the Director, Scientific Affairs
Required qualifications and skills*
A doctoral degree in Immunology or related fields
At least 5 years of lab experience, preferably in T cell immunology and/or immunotherapy
In-depth experience with multi-parameter single cell technologies including flow cytometry and/or mass cytometry
Experience in designing, planning and delivering on project milestones
Experience in mentoring and supervising other scientists
Excellent writing and communication skills
Rigorous, organized and accountable
Excellent team player, independent, self-driven with good interpersonal skills
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Interested applicants please submit their CV and a letter of motivation

We regret that only shortlisted candidates will be notified.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Laboratory: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)",-1,"immunoSCAPE, Inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
430,"Lead Data Engineer, Big Data","$120k-$217k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are looking for a Staff Data Engineer, Big Data who is looking for a challenge, enjoys thinking big and looking to make their mark on an extremely fast growing company. If building large and building fast, working with a young and very talented team of engineers and collaborating with the brightest mind in the Automotive industry is what you like, Lucid is the best to experience it.
The Role
Lead Data Engineer and architect, to design, implement a highly scalable system to ingest and process Petabytes of data per day.
Design and develop applications for data pipeline and data management.
Set processes and policies for data governance and data pipeline
Architect and implement best practices of big data tools such as Spark, Airflow, Kafka, Presto and Timeseries Databases
Lead and mentor junior Data and BI engineers.
Set and define the standards and best practices in data team
Be the point of reference for solving a challenging technical problem.
Architect and implement Machine Learning Pipelines for Data Science team.
Qualifications
Bachelor or Masters in Software Engineering and Computer Science
8+ years of experience in design and development of large-scale data platforms
4+ years of software development experience in Scala or Java.
Experience in hands-on implementing new application with production quality.
Expert in containerization, including Docker and Kubernetes
Expert in tools such as Apache Spark, Apache Airflow, Presto
Proficient in Spark application development with Scala Spark.
Expert in design and implement reliable, scalable, and performant distributed systems and data pipelines
Extensive programming and software engineering experience, especially in Java, Scala or Python.
Experience with running large-scale distributed computing infrastructure such as load balancing, Zookeeper, Micro service architecture
Experienced in security and access management
Experience with managing distributed databases like Elasticsearch, Cassandra and Timeseries Databases.
Experience with Columnar database such as Redshift, Vertica or Parquet
Great verbal and written communication skills.
LMMP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
431,Sr. Scientist,"$52k-$119k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description:

JOB SUMMARY

Contribute to the overall success of GRAM’s analytical operations on behalf of our customers through contributing to an efficient Analytical Chemistry group in order to develop and transfer drugs into the GRAM facility. This role is responsible to create and oversee various studies including troubleshooting and problem solving for customer products. The individual will develop, transfer and validate analytical methods to support clinical and commercial manufacturing of sterile drug products.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Provide expertise in chromatography and spectrometry.
Solve complex analytical problems as well as recommend/implement continuous laboratory improvements.
Provide expertise in ICH Stability and test method development and validation.
Provide expertise in USP analytical method requirements.
Participate in discussions and recommend capital equipment investments for the department.
Deliver on departmental strategy through innovation, use of automation, and efficiency.
Work effectively in a team to achieve goals.
Communicate effectively in written and oral form. Write detailed scientific reports with full experimental details and give proper presentations.
Maintain clear, detailed, and up-to-date laboratory notebooks according to internal policies.
Follow safe laboratory practices and comply with EHS, safety officers, and delegates to ensure that the laboratory is a safe environment. Recognizes potential safety issues, discusses them with EHS and management, and takes action to rectify them.
Assume responsibility for laboratory equipment, ensure equipment is properly maintained and serviced.
Work closely with Manufacturing, Quality Assurance, Quality Control, Project Management, and Business Development.
Open to a flexible and fluid work environment.
Support Agency, customer and vendor audits as needed.
Responsible for exhibiting professional behavior with both internal/external business associates that reflects positively on the company and is consistent with the company's policies and practices.
Perform all other tasks, projects, and duties as assigned.
. Requirements:

DESIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES

Advanced analytical chemistry skills (understanding, use, interpretation, and troubleshooting of HPLC, GC, FTIR, and UV).
Extensive knowledge and hands-on experience of drug formulation, and analytical validation for parenteral dosages.
Strong science and reasoning skills. The ability to plan, execute, critically interpret, and track the results from a logical progression of experiments in order to efficiently obtain definitive results.
Demonstrated ability to design and execute experiments using different laboratory instruments independently and author summary reports.
Understanding of pharmaceutical manufacturing and analytical labs in regulated environments under FDA, ICH, and EMA guidelines.
Ability to work with a diverse customer base.
Strong attention to detail; Ability to complete tasks with accuracy and efficiency.
Portrays appropriate levels of integrity and professionalism.
Capable of being the project lead for the Analytical Technical Services team
Excellent written and verbal skills; Ability to communicate effectively with clients, management and staff by exhibiting excellent interpersonal skills.
Energetic, self-motivated, organized individual who is accustomed to working in a deadline-focused, high-pressure entrepreneurial environment.
Results oriented and efficient; Acts with a sense of urgency.
Creative and open-minded individual who fosters an environment in which sharing of ideas is encouraged.
A Leader who is capable of training and overseeing other team members as necessary.
Demonstrates confidence in decision making ability and makes decisions while assessing risks.
Takes accountability and ownership.
Ability to work well independently and in a cross-functional team environment. Efficient team management skills.
Must have proficient computer skills in Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook, Chromatographic Data Systems, and Document Management Systems.
Must be able to communicate in a professional manner with clients and regulatory agencies.

Qualified candidates possess a Ph.D. in Analytical Chemistry or closely related field with 5-10 years’ experience, or M.S. in Analytical Chemistry or closely related field with 7-12 years’ experience, knowledge of GLP and cGMP, and direct work experience in a laboratory environment. Equipment qualification/validation experience not required, but preferred",3.5,"Grand River Aseptic Manufacturing
3.5","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
432,Data Engineer - Solovis,"$59k-$114k
(Glassdoor Est.)","About Solovis

Solovis is a revolutionary new SaaS platform offering a multi-asset class portfolio management and reporting solution for foundations, endowments, pensions, OCIOs, and family offices. Our firm is on a mission to set a new industry standard for performance, exposure, and portfolio analysis. The key to that success is to continue disrupting the industry with transformational technology designed specifically for limited partners. At Solovis, we recognize our employees by personally investing in them and providing a rewarding corporate culture centered around growth, training, and an opportunity to shape the future of our product.

Data Engineer

We are looking for a savvy Data Engineer who will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for use across existing products. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing and designing data systems. The Data Engineer will work alongside our software engineers, architects, and data analysts on data and integration initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting multiple systems, products and data flows. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support uses cases in the FinTech arena.

What you’ll do
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Work with large, complex financial data sets that require sophisticated processing and transformation.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build resilient and maintainable infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Work as part of an Agile development team with stakeholders to develop new features to support their data infrastructure needs.
Manage data cross multiple platforms, including Azure SQL and Snowflake.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Requirements

What you bring
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases. Must have the ability to write complex analytical queries.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured and semi-structured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disparate datasets.
Experience supporting and working with several products in a dynamic environment.
We are looking for a candidate with 3+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a degree in Computer Science, and/or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools. Experience with Airflow and/or dbt is strongly preferred.
Cloud experience strongly preferred. Experience with Azure and Snowflake is a major plus.
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: C# and/or Python
Ability to understand, and contribute to technical discussions
Effective communicator with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be comfortable communicating with development teams, Product Owners, Product Management, and company leadership
High level of accountability for program execution, deliverables, and reporting to technical management
High motivation and drive to help product teams excel and deliver based on roadmap and associated timelines
Excellent interpersonal skills – ability to work well in a team with diverse personality types
Benefits

What we bring

Purpose – we are about providing our customers investment knowledge when they need it so that they can positively impact the world around them
Top notch team members and collaborative environment.
Endless opportunity with the ability to progress into various disciplines and expertise or into a leadership role as company growth continues
Solovis is an Equal Opportunity Employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind: Solovis is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Solovis are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, marital, status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.",4.7,"eVestment
4.7","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
433,Data Scientist,"$79k-$127k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Title: Data Scientists

Job Description
Join an elite group dedicated to continuous personal improvement as GCT is currently seeking Data Scientists of all levels to support an intelligence agency with insights gained from analyzing voluminous sensor data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Candidates must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Clearance: TS/SCI w/Full scope polygraph (or used within the past 24 months)

Education/Experience Requirements

Senior Positions:
Masters degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field, or extensive comparable experience
10+ years of relevant experience
Junior/Intermediate Positions
Completed B.S. in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a closely related technical field
3-9 years of relevant experience
Qualifications
Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights fromlarge data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Strong problem solving skills
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Desired Skills
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, Bayes, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, AWS, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc.
The success of Great-Circle Technologies depends on the success and well-being of its employees. GCT promotes work/life balance and encourages the overall well-being of each of its contributors. A comprehensive benefits package is provided, which currently includes company paid single medical, dental, life, disability, and long-term care insurances (with contributions to family premiums,) matching 401k plan, 34 days off per year including 10 Federal holidays plus the day after Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s eves!

Join us at Great-Circle Technologies, where innovation is the shortest distance between two points.

Great-Circle Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Great-Circle Technologies ensures all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, race, ethnic background, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status.",2.2,"Great-Circle Technologies
2.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
434,"Team Leader Pharmaceutical Chemistry Research Scientist, PhD",-1,"Avisyn is a pharmaceutical research group with labs in the US and Canada. Focusing on medicinal chemistry design, computational chemistry and excellence in synthesis, we specialize early phase discovery programs in psychiatry, neurodegeneration, and oncology. Although we are an independent group, we do collaborate with major pharma on some in-sourced and out-sourced projects. For the present opening, we seek a team-leader level scientist who will oversee a team of synthetic chemists while also contributing directly to the team’s synthesis efforts. This position is within the labs of one of our major pharma collaborators, they are a top-5 global pharma company with research headquarters in Groton and San Diego.

Please note that we are NOT a recruiting nor a temp agency.

Required qualifications

· PhD with >3 industrial experience in synthetic chemistry with previous supervisory experience managing 3 or more synthetic chemists within major pharma or biotech environment.

· Experience in traditional and contemporary organic synthesis techniques.

· Familiarity with a wide range of techniques and reaction types such as low temperature reactions, inert atmosphere, metal-catalyzed cross coupling, hydrogenation, etc.

· Capable of independently evaluating synthetic routes and proactive troubleshooting.

· Experience in reaction monitoring (TLC, LCMS, GCMS, etc.).

· Ability to work safely with potentially hazardous chemicals. Ability to lead teams of synthetic chemists that maintain high awareness and compliance with safety protocols.

· Be highly skilled in practical and theoretical aspects of synthetic organic chemistry. Have strong understanding of reaction mechanisms and reactivity.

· Have strong expertise in multi-step synthetic chemistry over a broad range of reaction types, conditions and scale. Have strong experience in the synthesis, purification, and characterization of chiral compounds. Be highly skilled in chromatography, crystallization, and other purification techniques. Be highly skilled in the characterization of organic compounds, especially NMR and mass spectrometry.

· Be an avid reader of chemical literature with up-to-date knowledge of contemporary and emerging developments in synthesis.

· Have excellent oral communication skills with a strong ability to communicate scientific results at team discussions. Have excellent written communication skills through clear, concise reporting and by maintaining high quality, accurate electronic scientific notebook records.

· Employees must successfully pass a background check and drug test as a condition of employment.

Responsibilities

· Effectively manage laboratory work of a team of colleagues by fostering a culture of scientific rigor, high productivity, safety, and open communications. Provide guidance and feedback on reaction set-up, safety protocols, analytical interpretation, and troubleshooting/problem solving while balancing his/her own laboratory deliverables.

· Work effectively with Project Leaders to assure high productivity and high-quality delivery of synthetic targets and project goals.

· Build and sustain high performing teams by assuring that the team communicates well, helping to make sure that there are no misunderstandings or unexpressed difficulties between team members. Give and receive effective feedback.

· Consistently demonstrate effective multi-step synthetic planning, reaction optimization, and delivery through deep synthetic and mechanistic knowledge, awareness of classical, contemporary, and emerging synthetic methods, expertise using literature and scientific databases (SciFinder and Reaxys) and through highly effective reaction troubleshooting.

Our team members innovate beyond known chemistry while focusing on delivery. We have a passion for staying at the forefront of chemistry. To drive innovation, we recognize the importance of intelligent risk-taking and open-mindedness. We encourage creativity and recognize everyone’s contribution. We accomplish the most by working as a team.

We regret that we cannot respond to candidates that do not meet the stated requirements.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
How many year's experience do you have in heterocycle chemistry synthesis in your post-PhD work?",-1,"Great-Circle Technologies
2.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
435,"Team Leader Pharmaceutical Chemistry Research Scientist, PhD",-1,"Avisyn is a pharmaceutical research group with labs in the US and Canada. Focusing on medicinal chemistry design, computational chemistry and excellence in synthesis, we specialize early phase discovery programs in psychiatry, neurodegeneration, and oncology. Although we are an independent group, we do collaborate with major pharma on some in-sourced and out-sourced projects. For the present opening, we seek a team-leader level scientist who will oversee a team of synthetic chemists while also contributing directly to the team’s synthesis efforts. This position is within the labs of one of our major pharma collaborators, they are a top-5 global pharma company with research headquarters in Groton and San Diego.

Please note that we are NOT a recruiting nor a temp agency.

Required qualifications

· PhD with >3 industrial experience in synthetic chemistry with previous supervisory experience managing 3 or more synthetic chemists within major pharma or biotech environment.

· Experience in traditional and contemporary organic synthesis techniques.

· Familiarity with a wide range of techniques and reaction types such as low temperature reactions, inert atmosphere, metal-catalyzed cross coupling, hydrogenation, etc.

· Capable of independently evaluating synthetic routes and proactive troubleshooting.

· Experience in reaction monitoring (TLC, LCMS, GCMS, etc.).

· Ability to work safely with potentially hazardous chemicals. Ability to lead teams of synthetic chemists that maintain high awareness and compliance with safety protocols.

· Be highly skilled in practical and theoretical aspects of synthetic organic chemistry. Have strong understanding of reaction mechanisms and reactivity.

· Have strong expertise in multi-step synthetic chemistry over a broad range of reaction types, conditions and scale. Have strong experience in the synthesis, purification, and characterization of chiral compounds. Be highly skilled in chromatography, crystallization, and other purification techniques. Be highly skilled in the characterization of organic compounds, especially NMR and mass spectrometry.

· Be an avid reader of chemical literature with up-to-date knowledge of contemporary and emerging developments in synthesis.

· Have excellent oral communication skills with a strong ability to communicate scientific results at team discussions. Have excellent written communication skills through clear, concise reporting and by maintaining high quality, accurate electronic scientific notebook records.

· Employees must successfully pass a background check and drug test as a condition of employment.

Responsibilities

· Effectively manage laboratory work of a team of colleagues by fostering a culture of scientific rigor, high productivity, safety, and open communications. Provide guidance and feedback on reaction set-up, safety protocols, analytical interpretation, and troubleshooting/problem solving while balancing his/her own laboratory deliverables.

· Work effectively with Project Leaders to assure high productivity and high-quality delivery of synthetic targets and project goals.

· Build and sustain high performing teams by assuring that the team communicates well, helping to make sure that there are no misunderstandings or unexpressed difficulties between team members. Give and receive effective feedback.

· Consistently demonstrate effective multi-step synthetic planning, reaction optimization, and delivery through deep synthetic and mechanistic knowledge, awareness of classical, contemporary, and emerging synthetic methods, expertise using literature and scientific databases (SciFinder and Reaxys) and through highly effective reaction troubleshooting.

Our team members innovate beyond known chemistry while focusing on delivery. We have a passion for staying at the forefront of chemistry. To drive innovation, we recognize the importance of intelligent risk-taking and open-mindedness. We encourage creativity and recognize everyone’s contribution. We accomplish the most by working as a team.

We regret that we cannot respond to candidates that do not meet the stated requirements.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
How many year's experience do you have in heterocycle chemistry synthesis in your post-PhD work?",-1,Avisyn Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
436,"Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology","$38k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology
Location


Agios Pharmaceuticals HQ

Job Code

1271

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology

Agios (agios.com) is a biopharmaceutical company committed to applying our scientific leadership in cellular metabolism to transform the lives of patients with cancer and rare genetic diseases. We have an active research and discovery pipeline across both therapeutic areas. Agios has multiple first-in-class investigational therapies in clinical and/or preclinical development and has successfully launched two oncology precision medicines.

Agios Pharmaceuticals is searching for a dynamic Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist to join our growing Immuno-Oncology team. The Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist will collaborate cross-functionally with scientists at Agios to generate data to support the novel target discovery screens, validation of targets using both in vitro cell assays and in vivo mouse models of cancer and inflammation. The ideal candidate will integrate with project teams and contribute to study design, execution, data analysis and interpretation, and communication of results. A considerable level of independence is expected after the initial training period. This role requires a high degree of technical expertise as well as strong collaborative and written/verbal communication skills and a positive attitude to interact with multiple stakeholders.

Key Responsibilities
Develop and characterize immune-cancer cells co-culture assays to be used for genetic screens of novel therapeutic targets
Design and execute studies to support target validation using cell based models and assays
Identify methods, models, and technologies required to facilitate research and overcome scientific challenges and lead their development/optimization
Document, analyze, and interpret experimental data; present results and conclusions in a variety of team settings
Minimum Requirements
BS with 5+/MS with 2+ years of industry/academic experience working in a cancer biology or immunology team
Experience in isolation of primary immune cells and ex vivo assays of immune cell function (e.g. proliferation, differentiation, cytokine production)
Experienced with multi-color flow cytometry
Strong oral and written communication skills
Demonstrated ability to work independently in a cross-functional team environment
Ability to rapidly learn new techniques and technologies and perform them independently
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with mouse tumor models and/or models of acute immune activation
Experience with both shRNA and/or CRISPR techniques
Experience in molecular biology (nucleic acid purification, DNA cloning, PCR, gel electrophoresis, Western blotting, and qPCR)",4.2,"Agios Pharmaceuticals
4.2","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
437,Business Intelligence Analyst & Developer,"$36k-$74k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview


Everyone wants to work with people they respect. Even better if you can work with a company you respect. We have both at The David J. Joseph Company, and a 135+ year track record on operating an ethical business with a positive work culture. It may sound cliché, but it’s true. We’re a big, global company that still feels small.

Working at the David J. Joseph Company is unique. We offer employment in diverse settings such as traditional corporate headquarters, dynamic sales locations, and scrap recycling facilities. This workplace diversity gives our employees the variety they crave and the exposure to a global business. A career at The David J. Joseph Company is ideal for self-starters seeking to make an impact on our company and their careers.

The David J. Joseph Company (DJJ), founded in 1885, is a world leader in scrap metal recycling & trading. With over 80+ locations, the Joseph Company is headquartered in Cincinnati, Ohio and is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Nucor Corporation (NUE) a Fortune 200 Company.

Responsibilities
Performs solution design, development, testing, debugging and maintenance for one or more of the following enterprise data team areas of responsibility:
Enterprise data modeling
ETL systems
BI semantic layers
Dashboards and reports
Ad-hoc data analysis
Participates in requirements gathering, design sessions, fact-finding and prototyping activities to drive business adoption of data products.
Documents detailed solution specifications, data mappings, test cases and maintenance routines.
Works collaboratively with other team members to evolve best practices and team standards for data visualization, data modeling, or data integration.
Develops and maintains knowledge of customer’s business by learning through a mix of project work, partnering with business users, and seeking out learning opportunities.
Participates, along with other team members, in a support rotation, handling system triage and resolving user-facing tickets.
Delivers solutions that are optimized for performance and proactively tunes and refactors existing solutions.
Develops and refines new and existing data products to ensure data quality and single source of truth.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science or Business-related discipline is preferred. Equivalent combination of experience and education will be considered.
Minimum 2 – 5 years related experience including working knowledge of relational databases, data warehouse environments, and SQL.
Minimum 2 – 5 years related experience with business intelligence, data integration or data analytics tools and languages (for example: MicroStrategy, PowerBI, Tableau, MDX, multidimensional or tabular cubes; ETL development; R, Python).
Preferred experience utilizing source control systems to perform development tasks (git or TFS).
Preferred experience developing cloud-based data solutions (Azure, SnowFlake, RedShift, etc.)
Demonstrates working knowledge, practical skills and the ability to perform work under moderate supervision.
Must be detail-oriented with the ability to manage multiple assignments effectively.
Requires effective communication skills to convey status, ideas and concepts in a team environment.
Requires professional demeanor with a high degree of flexibility, responsiveness and self-direction.
Benefits


We offer a competitive compensation and benefit package including paid training, bonus program, medical, dental, vision, life and disability coverage, vacation, paid holidays, a 401(k) plan with match, tuition reimbursement and other great benefits.

EEO Statement


The David J Joseph Company (DJJ) is a drug-free workplace and conducts pre-employment testing as a condition of employment.DJJ is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, creed, sex, pregnancy, lactation/breastfeeding, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, age, marital status, familial status, disability, genetic information, protected veteran status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal laws, rules, or regulations. DJJ hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled. If you’d like more information on your EEO rights under the law, please click here.

DJJ reasonably accommodates qualified individuals with disabilities to enable them to receive equal employment opportunity and/or perform the essential functions of the job, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship to the Company. This applies to all applicants and teammates.DJJ also provides a work environment in which each teammate is able to be productive and work to the best of his or her ability. We do not condone or tolerate an atmosphere of intimidation or harassment. We expect and require the cooperation of all teammates in maintaining an atmosphere free from discrimination and harassment with mutual respect by and for all teammates and applicants.

E-Verify Information | E-Verify Notice

EJN


EJN",4.5,"The David J. Joseph Company
4.5","Cincinnati, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1885,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Metals Brokers,Mining & Metals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
438,Scientist - In vivo Translational Immunology,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

We are seeking a highly motivated Scientist I/II to support our translational science and in vivo pharmacology at ArsenalBio. Substantial expertise with tumor xenograft and syngeneic mouse models, oncology, immunology, as well as in vivo adoptive cell therapy with engineered T cells is highly desirable. The successful individual will design and perform studies for in vivo efficacy, candidate selection and ex vivo MOA pharmacodynamic and biomarker discovery. The successful candidate will work closely with discovery researchers to enable target discovery and next generation adoptive cell therapies. In addition, the successful candidate will support in vivo assays necessary to support product development and regulatory filings for pivotal clinical studies. This role requires an individual with outstanding self-initiative, communication and leadership qualities.
What You Will Do
Support the pre-clinical in vivo translational immunology group effort that utilizes tumor xenograft models for discovery and IND-enabling studies for CAR-T adoptive cell therapy. Model development to support MOA and TME discovery science as well as pharmacology efforts to advance projects as required
Responsible for collection, analysis and interpretation of experimental data
Design and perform rodent dosing studies, in vivo candidate selection, blood and tissue sampling, surgeries and isolation of tumor infiltrating CAR-T cells for MOA as required
Develop novel pre-clinical efficacy studies to discovery biology
Support product development and regulatory filings for pivotal clinical studies
Manage internal resource allocation and external collaborations
Responsible for working with team members to draft animal protocols and then coordinate studies with cross-functional teams
Participate and present data during internal research meetings and interface with cross-functional groups
Participate in the training of in vivo translational immunology personnel for proficiency in tumor model studies
Follow laboratory safety guidelines and practices
What You Will Bring
PhD in tumor immunology or related field with 1-2+ years of relevant industry experience
Strong background in tumor biology, immunology and tumor models including human xenograft models and development of novel models to solve MOA
Extensive hands-on experience with all aspects of running tumor models
Experience with various tumor models to demonstrate mechanisms of action
Experience working with antibody therapeutics is highly desired
Demonstrated ability to work in collaboratively in a cross functional environment
Must have excellent troubleshooting, organization, and planning skills, and the ability to work under timeline in a fast-paced environment
Excellent written and oral communication skills
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
439,Data Scientist III,"$78k-$128k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Intelligence

The Intelligence group provides high-end systems engineering and integration products and services, data analytics and software development to national and military intelligence customers. Serving federal agencies and the Intelligence Community for more than 50 years, the Intelligence group helps our clients meet their mission needs by providing trusted advisors, leading-edge technologies, and innovative solutions.

Responsibilities

Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data, including latent semantic indexing (LSI), entity identification and tagging, complex event processing (CEP), and the application of analysis algorithms on distributed, clustered, and cloud-based high-performance infrastructures. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces. Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills - engineering, physics, mathematics, coupled with the ability to code design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques and utilizing high-performance computing environments. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations for business and analytic decisions. Experience with Cloud-based data analysis tools. Experience with machine learning, algorithm analysis, and data clustering.

Qualifications

Requires 3 to 8 years with BS/BA or 3 to 5 years with MS/MA or 0 to 2 years with PhD.

TS/SCI with Poly Required
Focus on design, implementation and operation of data management systems. Design how data is stored, consumed, integrated and managed by different entities and systems.
Experience with SQL, Python, Spark
Machine Learning technologies/packages (Sagemaker, DataBricks, PyTorch and the similar)
Statistical techniques for analyzing data and visualization techniques for summarizing complex data analyses.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
440,Data Analyst,"$45k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We have an opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Duties & Responsibilities
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Candidate will be reviewing and analyzing non-standard format data and transforming it to a standardized format for ingestion into a Big Data and a Structured data environment.
Conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design.
Monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements.
Requirements
Knowledge and experience in programming languages (Python)
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc.)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
Active Secret clearance required
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
441,Data Analyst Quality - Quality Outcomes Managment,"$36k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Our quality data analyst will be responsible to perform high level analyses in support of institution-wide clinical quality improvement activities. The analyst will facilitate the development and maintenance of data collection, leveraging existing data to identify gaps in care and recommend areas of focus for quality improvement activities.

An integral role to ensure that the organization exceeds its goals, the quality analyst will work collaboratively with Decision Support & Quality Services to determine resources needed to improve identified gaps in care and to develop recommendations for quality improvement based on findings.

The individual selected for this role will be engaging with a strong ability to present complex information to stakeholders in a compelling and accessible manner. This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced analyst who understands common quality benchmarks and thrives in a high-autonomy environment.

A creative role with strong flexibility, the analyst will be exposed to, and lead high-impact projects as a partner to executive and clinical leaders.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare starting day one. Our employees enjoy a robust paid time off program that enables them to realize strong life/work balance.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Computer Science or a related field required.

3 years data analysis experience in either finance, clinical, or research required.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Project management skills preferred.

Experience with statistics preferred.

Experience with Vizient, Cerner or Midas would be helpful.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.7,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.7","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
442,Sr. Manager Advanced Analytics (Data Scientist),"$129k-$210k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.5,"Lidl US
3.5","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Private,Grocery Stores & Supermarkets,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
443,Data Analyst,"$45k-$82k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We have an opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Duties & Responsibilities
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Candidate will be reviewing and analyzing non-standard format data and transforming it to a standardized format for ingestion into a Big Data and a Structured data environment.
Conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design.
Monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements.
Requirements
Knowledge and experience in programming languages (Python)
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc.)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
Active Secret clearance required
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
444,Lead Data Scientist,"$93k-$153k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Lead Data Scientist

El Segundo, CA

About Nexon:

Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees, and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

About the role:

The Lead Data Scientist is responsible for developing advanced machine learning algorithms and statistical models to solve critical problems and help deliver the best customer experiences. The Data Scientist partners with Business teams, Platform team, Security team, and other stakeholders to implement data science models into live production systems. The Data Scientist brings fresh perspectives to inform decision-making toward better player experience by translating player voice into insights.

What you'll be doing:
Lead efforts to develop data science capabilities and partner with other data scientists across the Nexon organization
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data visualization and data-mining to tell the story behind numbers and find relevant insights for partners and leadership
Manage a portfolio of data science products and work closely with data engineers to help improve the platform in relation to data science work
Perform new research into machine learning applications that drive business value
Architect platform-level solutions for machine learning systems
Research and develop state-of-the-art machine learning, data mining, and statistical modeling solutions to understand game design, system performance and key business behaviors, such as player acquisition and retention
Establish scalable, automated processes for large scale data extraction, model development, model validation and model implementation
Effectively translate statistical findings into actionable recommendations for senior leaders on game design and business teams
Analyze player big data, developing and testing data-fueled hypotheses, extracting useful information and turning it into helpful insight that can help us improve players' experiences
Bring a fresh perspective and a new dimension of analysis to bear on the challenge of identifying


What skills you'll need:
7+ years of experience translating data to insight to recommendations
BS (MS/PhD Preferred) in quantitative discipline (e.g. Math, Physics, Statistics, Operations Research, Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Economics)
Expertise in machine learning and statistical analysis approaches such as classification, clustering, regression, statistical inference, collaborative filtering, natural language processing, experimental design, social networking analysis, etc.
Experience managing advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using data mining technologies
Expertise in automating and deploying models in production systems
Experience with Big Data technologies (AWS EMR, Spark, Presto, Hadoop, etc.)
A true passion for understanding customer behavior on-platform and in-game
Expert analytical and problem solving skills, plus the ability to innovate and work independently
Strong skills in statistical methods (e.g. hypothesis testing, time series modeling)
Strong SQL skills and strong Python or R skills; familiarity with Jupyter or RStudio
Familiar with Hadoop, Apache Spark framework, SQL/NoSQL, Snowflake
Strong skills in building dashboards and visualizations (e.g Tableau, PowerBI, Quicksight)
Bonus Points:
Online gaming experience a BIG PLUS!
Experience in marketing machine leaning project a big plus



Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,"Nexon America Inc
2.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
445,Sr. Manager Advanced Analytics (Data Scientist),"$129k-$210k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Role Information

Job Title: Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics)
Department: Management Accounting
Business Unit: Administration
Reports To: Director - Business Intelligence & Advanced Analytics
Supervisory Role: Yes
FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Summary

The Sr. Manager - Management Accounting (Data Scientist) (Advanced Analytics) provides support to executive management and operational departments by developing complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value. The role will include partnering with internal stakeholders across the business locally and internationally. The individual optimizes business processes through modern machine learning techniques and supervises integrating the developed models into productive software.

Essential Functions
Develop and supervise complex data products that are integrated into business processes and generate added business value.
Ownership of full lifecycle development from analyzing current processes, providing functional specification, designing and developing solution, testing and providing on-going support once live
Through modern machine learning techniques, optimization of business processes using predictive and prescriptive methods.
Lead the transfer from current Excel-based analysis tools to advanced analytics products
Cross-analyze data from different sources in order to create new insights to the business to solve real-world business problem
Support the departments concerning questions of advanced analytics and development of own proposals to move the company forward
Responsible to research other potential software solutions
Integrate the developed models into productive software.
Upskill colleagues by creating a culture of experience exchange with the aim of improving understanding and efficiency of the department’s processes and products
Train and guide the work of other team members, quality checks on work and ensuring deadlines are met
Cultivate a culture of learning and knowledge extension in the department to better understand the “why” behind tasks and therefore increase efficiency
Perform all other duties as assigned
Required

Required Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

Strong knowledge in big-data technologies
Strong knowledge of machine learning, optimization, and data mining methods (e.g. with Python, R)
Statistical knowledge, predictive modelling
Knowledge of applying time-series / regression analysis, clustering-methods, effectiveness testing (A-/B-hypotheses testing) to solve diverse business problems
Strong Ability to understand complex problems and scenarios, and analyzing them in detail
Ability to work to tight deadlines and to deliver accurate results
Excellent communication skills and ability to work well in a team
Self-motivated and proactive individual with a can-do attitude and the ability to work on projects and solve problems independently

Preferred Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

German language skills

Required Education, Certifications/ Licenses, Related Experience

Bachelor’s Degree in data science, mathematics/statistics, computer science, physics, or a related subject
5+ years of experience in related field in corresponding subjects or related fields

Physical Job Requirements

Ability to work a variety of shifts including nights, weekends, and holidays as needed
Ability to work in a fast-paced working environment, including the store(s), distribution center(s), warehouse(s), and/or corporate office(s) with the capability to switch job functions/roles quickly
Ability to remain in a stationary position (standing and/or seated) more than half the time
Ability to maneuver cases of product (lift, move, carry, slide, etc.) up to 30 lbs.
Ability to operate machinery and/or equipment that requires the constant use of hands/fingers/wrists
Ability to spend more than half the time viewing computer monitors
Ability to identify and distinguish between colors more than half the time

Travel Requirements

This position commutes between stores, regional offices and/or distribution centers less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight domestic travel less than 25% of the time
This position requires overnight international travel less than 25% of the time
Anticipated travel will be by car, air, and/or train
Preferred

Lidl US, LLC & Affiliates provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants without regard to, including but not limited to, race, sex, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity or expression, national origin or ethnicity, age, marital status, pregnancy, genetic information, disability, or veteran status, in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.",3.5,"Lidl US
3.5","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Private,Grocery Stores & Supermarkets,Retail,$10+ billion (USD),-1
446,Computational Scientist I,"$90k-$152k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused company that will inspire you and support your career? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as a Computational Scientist in our Cambridge, Massachusetts office.

Here, everyone matters and you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission. You will be empowered to provide leadership and global functional expertise for projects across the Takeda portfolio.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Analyzing and interpreting high dimensional molecular data for the development of GI Therapeutics
Identifying and developing advanced computational biology approaches to identify targets and provide translational medicine hypotheses.
Generate data insights to drive GI projects, Interface with research teams and support the data analysis and interpretation needs of GI projects
Drive collaborations with internal groups, external partners, including CROs and academia for data analysis and machine learning.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Support GI discovery teams to identify novel drug targets and achieve translational medicine objectives using advanced computational biology techniques.
Interact closely with biologists in the GI DDU to design experimental studies, plan analyses, data integration and data interpretation.
Process, QC and analyze microbiome datasets (16S and shotgun metagenomics)
Identify, build, and use bioinformatic pipelines to process and QC other omics data types including genomics, transcriptomics, single cell sequencing, proteomics and metabolomics.
Interpret preclinical and clinical datasets using appropriate statistical methods.
Create visualizations, interpret high dimensional data and explain results to cross-functional teams.
Perform integrative analyses with multi-omics datasets, identifying novel targets and achieving translational medicine goals.
Develop machine learning algorithms, including deep neural network algorithms.
Independently conduct data analysis tasks within a project scope, exercising judgement to evaluate a variety of statistical factors.
Independently keep abreast of current literature in computational biology for drug development.
Schedule and execute on tasks to meet deadlines.
Maintain and share code.
Plan and coordinate computational biology activities internally and in partnership with external CROs and academic partners, including complex projects requiring multiple members of the team and organization.
Prepare and present comprehensive scientific reports to a full range of internal and external audiences.
Work collaboratively with data scientists and data engineering groups to enhance our computational infrastructure, user interface, query and visualization capabilities.
Writes study reports and presents data effectively in all settings and with participants of all levels of the organization.

DIMENSIONS AND ASPECTS

Technical/Functional (Line) Expertise

Knowledge of and experience with machine learning and bioinformatic techniques.
Experience with high dimensional data analysis derived from Next Generation Sequencing, including some of the following: microbiome data, RNASeq, DNASeq, miRNA, copy number, epigenetics, and single cell sequencing
Hands-on experience developing and implementing bioinformatic pipelines for microbiome data analysis, RNASeq, DNASeq, single cell datasets, and metabolomics.
Solid knowledge of Unix/Linux, command line interfaces, and fluency in some common scripting and/or programming language (e.g., R, Python, Perl, Java, C / C++).
Familiarity with parallel computing, relational databases (e.g., SQL) and cloud computing or distributed computing (i.e. AWS)
Familiarity with Tensorflow/Keras or equivalent deep learning language
Theoretical knowledge of bioinformatics, computational biology; Keeps current with emerging trends in bioinformatics and computational biology
Familiarity with popular public domain data sources and programmatic interfaces
Experience in designing and conducting computational biology activities to meet program objectives; able to provide input on timelines and resource needs as indicated
Able to evaluate/develop computational methods based on project needs
Basic knowledge of biomedical science and technologies outside specific discipline
Strong scientific understanding of molecular biology and genomics
Excellent problem solving, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Independent, self-starting and supportive of team-based research and able to work effectively in a matrix organization

Leadership

Ability to work in a team and influence team to make data driven decisions

Decision-making and Autonomy

Independently manages own workload
Scientifically independent
Ability to search literature and come up with innovative solution to difficult problems

Interaction

Conducts scientific presentations to internal audiences

Innovation

Receives high level instructions on all work, determines methods on new assignments, works closely with manager, may manage junior staff
Determines methods on new assignments; perform literature search as needed to propose innovation solutions

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

PhD degree in a scientific discipline, or
MS with 6+ years experience, or
BS with 8+ years experience

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement
Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Learn more at takedajobs.com.

Takeda is an EEO employer of minorities, women, disabled, protected veterans, and considers qualified applicants with criminal histories in accordance with applicable laws. For more information, visit http://www.takeda.us/careers/EEO_Policy_Statement.aspx

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please

#LI-KL1

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Lidl US
3.5","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
447,Clinical Data Analyst (RN) - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS,"$35k-$60k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Analyst - MCS Research & Development - INTEGRIS

Don't miss out on this fantastic opportunity to take yournursing career in a new, exciting direction. INTEGRIS is look for a RN thatwould love to explore the Data field with in our Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute.Learn how to use your clinical experience to better understand data that isused to make business decisions, while working a M – F business schedule.

Job Code: 1729

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for the design, implementation, maintenance, integrity and data quality of the Nazih Zuhdi Transplant Institute (NZTI) in support of strict reporting requirements. This includes ongoing analysis of health care information, obtained from a variety of sources, including patient care, financial, and demographic data. It involves development and preparation of information products for transplant leadership, physicians and staff, including the assembly of documentation required for submission to regulatory agencies. It requires the ability to analyze health care data from conceptualization through presentation of the data. It requires proficiency with analytical tools (SAS, Excel), knowledge of data analysis methodology, use of presentation software, strong communication skills and a strong commitment to and affinity for delivering the highest level of customer service.

INTEGRIS Health is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.

Essential Functions:

The Data Analyst responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data.
Works with customers to develop and understand product specifications.
Develops methodologies for collecting, analyzing, and presenting data products.
Delivers data products in report/presentation format, or verbally, to customer specifications and timelines.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing customer requests.
Develop information from a variety of data sources evaluates data.
Accountability:

Reports to the Director of Research Administration and NZTI Quality.

Required Physical Demands (Subject to Reasonable Accommodation):

Keyboarding/Dexterity: Frequently; activity exists from 1/3 to 2/3 of the time
Standing/Walking: Occasionally; activity exists up to 1/3 of the time
Strength (Lift/Carry/Push/Pull): Sedentary (exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally)
Talking (Must be able to effectively communicate verbally): Yes
Seeing: Yes
Hearing: Yes
Color Acuity (Must be able to distinguish and identify colors): No

This position may have additional or varied physical demand and/or respiratory fit test requirements. Please consult the Physical Demands Project SharePoint site or contact Risk Management/Employee Health for additional information.

Environmental Conditions:

Normal office environment.

All applicants will receive consideration regardless of membership in any protected status as defined by applicable state or federal law, including protected veteran or disability status.

Qualifications:
Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience or an Associate degree with 4 years of experience specifically involving data analysis, quality assurance, and support.
Masters degree in relevant discipline may substitute for experience.
Healthcare experience preferred.
Training and experience with Microsoft Excel, Access, Word and PowerPoint, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services, and SAS preferred.
Must be able to communicate effectively in English (Verbal/Written).",2.8,"Integris Health
2.8","Bethany, OK",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
448,Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track,"$64k-$81k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job Title

Data Science All Star Program - Data Engineer Track

Job
ID

27260177

Duration

Location

Columbia,

MD

Other Location

Description

Dynamic, Fast-growing, Entrepreneurial Data Science Solutions Company seeking data Engineers! If you’ve got entrepreneurial spirit and passion, are driven by results, and want to be a part of significant growth, we’re looking for you!

BLEND360 is a multi-award winning Marketing Company who is privileged to provide our services to some of the most respected and recognized brands in the world. At BLEND360 it is all about advancing our clients marketing capabilities and performance.

If you are ready to ignite the fire for digital marketing and join our team, please keep reading!

*************************************************************************************

Our Data Science All Stars Program is a 6-month consultant training program for master’s graduates in Analytics, Statistics, Computer Science and other quantitative programs. Participants will have the opportunity to learn from top Data Scientists, work on real-world analytics projects, and gain experience with Fortune 500 clients across a variety of verticals. They will work alongside our Data Scientists to get data into proper shape, perform statistical analyses and develop predictive models to solve our clients’ business problems.

The primary objective of this program is to develop participants into productive, client engaged BLEND360 employees and set the foundation to build a fast track career in one of 4 areas:

Data Science

Data Engineering

Marketing- Adobe Cloud

Marketing Analytics .

The All-Star focused on Data Engineering will:
Work with business leaders to solve clients’ business challenges and improve clients’ business results using advanced analytics techniques. We contribute our Advanced Data Science subject matter expertise to the recommendations and solutions delivered to our clients.
Spend most of their time on getting data into proper shape, performing statistical analyses, developing predictive models and machine learning algorithms to solve clients’ business problems. We evaluate different sources of data, discover patterns hidden within raw data, create insightful variables, and develop competing models with different machine learning algorithms. We validate and cross validate our recommendations to make sure our recommendations will perform well over time.
Partner with client technical resources as well as BLEND360 team members, providing guidance and solutions for data architectures, data conversions, ETL and implementation of models in a production environment. The ideal candidate has retail experience and can provide technical expertise working with cloud based platforms as well as traditional data warehouse environments.
Main Responsibilities
Work with practice leaders and clients to understand how to make data accessible and usable throughout the organization.
Defines data environment design for the reporting and modeling/machine learning use cases that is consistent, maintainable and flexible.
Works with client and BLEND360 teams to identify use cases and functional requirements that drive the reporting and modeling data solutions.
Designs the database structure including tables, views, synonyms, sequences, triggers, procedures, functions, indexes and materialized views as relevant.
Provides the framework for integrating source systems with the reporting and modeling data environments – develops the ERD and data dictionaries
Implements business rules via stored procedures, middleware, or other technologies.
Develops strategies for flexibility and scalability, and defines the future technical architecture direction for the business intelligence reporting and analytical environments.
Problem solve with practice leaders to understand how to build the data pipelines that can support the business, formulate different approaches, outline pros and cons for each approach.
Work with practice leaders to get client feedback, get alignment on approaches, deliverables, and overall timeline
Document data flow, infrastructure and processes.
Turn models and machine learning algorithms into implementable production code
The Details:
Location: Columbia, MD
Duration:Full-time
Travel Requirements:Up to 25% (could be as much as (30% - 40% depending on projects)
Benefits:Health, Vision, Dental, 401K plan, Life Insurance, Pretax Commuter Benefits, and an incredibly supportive team cheering you on!
Qualifications:

o MS or PhD degree in Operation Research, Advanced Analytics, Computer Sciences, Engineering

o 1+ years’ professional experience in Data Engineering practices, such as:
data warehousing, optimization, and productionalization with examples of increased responsibility and evolving technologies.
developing code and/or applications using software such as Pyspark, Python, SQL, Scala, Java, etc.
deploying machine learning and data science pipelines into production using model management solutions and leveraging CICD solutions (e.g., Jenkins) for automation
configuring cloud platforms and configuring elastic compute environments in a cloud platform
Familiarity with and understanding of modern machine learning approaches, algorithms, libraries, and processes for feature selection / engineering
Experience building containerized applications and deploying those applications using solutions like Kubernetes
Experience with structured or un-structured data processing tools (SQL, Hadoop, Spark, NoSQL, MySQL, MariaDB, Hive, Pig, etc)
Comfortable with cloud-based platforms (AWS, Azure, Databricks, Google)",4.5,"Blend360
4.5","Columbia, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
449,Data Scientist,-1,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you'll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You'll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
450,Business Intelligence Analyst,"$45k-$90k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Musco Lighting is looking for a Business Intelligence Analyst to support the development of tools and reports that successfully allow our Team to make timely decisions based on the business data presented. This role will liaison between various business units and the Information Technology team to continually meet business objectives. This opportunity could be located at our Oskaloosa or Muscatine, Iowa locations.

Responsibilities:

Determine key user groups that would benefit from better analytics
Determine key metrics / reports that provide value to the team
Provide project management and prioritization of key initiatives
Become an expert user in assigned tools / reports and their supported business functions and processes
Implement training programs for end users
Provide timely end user support as needed
Other related duties as assigned

Education & Experience:

Four-year degree in Computer Science-related field, Business Analysis, and/or commensurate experience
Demonstrated experience with system implementations, project management and system design
Effective experience with computer programming languages and development of software a plus
Experience with Microsoft Power BI is a plus
Strong communications and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team environment
Self-Directed
Ability to work in a confidential manner with data

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.8,"Musco Sports Lighting, LLC
3.8","Oskaloosa, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1976,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
451,GMP QC Scientists,-1,"ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS*
· GMP QC: Follows Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs), protocols and other instructions from management to perform release testing for raw materials and finished products, validate analytical methods, and qualify analytical instruments (OQ/PQ/PM).

· Clean room Environment Monitor: follows SOPs to collect and manage environment monitor samples from clean room for incubation.

· Perform GMP analytical testings for drug products.

· Perform GMP stability studies for drug products.

· Under supervision, the scientist will write/revise SOPs, test methods, protocols, and specification documents.

· Under supervision, the scientist will write and conduct out-of-specification (OOS) investigations and deviations.

· Conducts peer review of data generated in QC lab.

· Maintains the inventory of laboratory consumables and clean glassware.

· Performs routine maintenance of laboratory instrumentation including maintaining instrument qualification, coordinating and scheduling for maintenance / requalification services. Maintains complete and accurate records of instrument service and repairs in conformance with company SOPs and policies.

· Maintains general cleanliness of the lab, including personal bench space and common use areas.

· All other tasks and duties assigned as perceived and agreed upon by management.
KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS*
· Software proficiencies include, but not limited to Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, as well as data acquisition software.

· Analytical skills with hands-on instrumentation knowledge and experiences in HPLC, FT-IR, UV-Vis, Karl Fisher, pH, viscosity, particulate matter, dissolution analysis, etc.

· Clean room Experience with environmental monitor, and aseptic process.

· Has ability to work in a fast pace laboratory

· Good attitude, good work ethic, and great attention to details.

· Excellent written and verbal communication.

· experiences with GLP, GMP, and GDP
Requirements: *
· BS and above degree in Chemistry or Microbiology with 2 years of work-related experience in cGMP setting.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
GMP QC: 1 year (Required)
Clean room: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Contract Renewal:
Likely
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,"LATITUDE Pharmaceuticals
1.0","San Diego, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
452,Data Engineer,"$86k-$99k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
453,Data Engineer,"$64k-$120k
(Glassdoor Est.)","As a Data Engineer, you will have the unique opportunity to curate and organize data for a program advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This aim of this program is to discover and curate data as well as develop and curate synthetic data. Then, we will develop machine learning (ML) models and training pipelines to detect and discern features in scenes. Finally, we will inject obfuscations into the data to fool the models.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos (DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you, and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Engineer will be responsible for the following:
Assess, transform, organize, and optimize data for use by machine learning algorithms
Generating representative data sets for systems development and data science initiatives
Build data pipelines that enables data scientists and engineers and other stakeholders

Requirements
TS/SCI clearance required
4+ years of experience designing data models and data warehouses supporting analytics, using both relational and non-relational distributed data storage systems
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining ETL pipelines. Bonus points for experience with Apache Beam
Demonstrated experience working with Synthetic Aperture Radar (SAR) data
Demonstrated experience with large-scale distributed processing
Experience building data pipelines in ML frameworks. Kubeflow experience is desired
Experience working in a fast-paced agile environment is a plus
Familiarity with machine and deep learning libraries such as Scikit-learn and PyTorch.
Experience in a high-level programing language, such as Java, Python or GoLang
Demonstrated proficiency with Git version control systems
Experience working in Linux environments
We're looking for a motivated Data Engineer eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes person growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment

#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
454,Data Engineer Senior,"$68k-$126k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Associated Bank is an equal opportunity employer committed to creating a diverse workforce. We support a work environment where colleagues are respected and given the opportunity to perform to their fullest potential. We consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, religion, color, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or veteran status, among other factors. Applicants with a disability who need assistance applying for a position with Associated Bank are asked to email: careers@associatedbank.com

Job Summary
The Data Engineer Senior is responsible for ingesting, transforming, and preparing data for consumption by our various lines of business. This will include designing complex data solutions, working with business lines to understand needs, documenting, building, and testing the solutions. This will require ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) development and data analysis skills using SQL and/or scripting tools. Incumbent will collaborate with other teams in Operations & Technology, including Software Engineering, Enterprise Architecture, and Infrastructure teams as well as our support teams. The Data Engineer Senior will assist the Data Architects in developing standards and best practices across the team. The role will ensure proper handoffs to the DataOps team to ensure proper support and maintainability, as well as be available for support remediation and troubleshooting. Position will be responsible for building and maintaining our advanced analytics capabilities (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning) as well as mentor other Data Engineers on our team.

Job Accountabilities

Develop and maintain advanced analytics capabilities (Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning).
Ingest, transform, and prepare data for consumption by our various lines of business.
Work with the lines of business on reporting, data visualizations and overall data consumption.
Mentor Data Engineers and team members.
Collaborate with other teams in Operations & Technology, including Software Engineering, Enterprise Architecture, and Infrastructure teams as well as our support teams.
Manage the handoffs to DataOps team to ensure proper support and maintainability, as well as be available for support remediation and troubleshooting.
Create standards and best practices.

Education

Bachelor's Degree or equivalent combination of education and experience Mathematics, Computer Science, MIS, Data Science, Analytics, or related. Required
Experience
5-7 years ETL/ELT experience (SSIS, Informatica, DataStage, etc). Experience working with complex structured, semi-structured, and unstructured data. Expert SQL knowledge and analytical skills. Exposure to modern data/analytics architecture (Big Data, Cloud, etc.). AI/Machine Learning advanced analytics tools (Python, R, etc). Required

Compliance Statement
Fully complies with all applicable enterprise policies and procedures. Acts in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations as outlined in training materials, including but not limited to Bank Secrecy Act. Responsible for reporting suspicious activity to Financial Intelligence. Responsible to report all customer complaints as prescribed and procedure violations to management or HR. Responsible to report ethical concerns as needed to Associated’s anonymous Ethics Hotline.

Associated Bank is committed to working diligently with any colleague who needs an accommodation perform the essential functions of the job. Please contact the Leaves & Accommodations office to request an accommodation.",3.8,"Associated Bank
3.8","Milwaukee, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
455,Senior Data Analyst,"$40k-$71k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Data Analyst*
Responsibilities will focus on providing detailed financial and operational reporting as well as enhancing, creating and analysis of key performance indications via push reporting form a data warehouse.

DUTIES
Maintain the data warehouse, the data warehouse infrastructure, ETL pipelines from enterprise systems to the data warehouse, and the integrity of the data therein.
Hands-on experience working with MS SQL Server (MySQL, Hive and SSIS are a plus)
Building SQL reports and dashboards that interpret data to expose patterns and trends.
Automating the collection of data from available sources while identifying new opportunities for automation.
Assist in developing and tracking relevant business metrics that help drive business success, as well as the periodic communications of those metrics to key stakeholders.
Help with in-depth periodic analysis of business metrics and variance analysis.
Ensure all data warehouse reporting reconciles to existing management systems.
Aid in the preparation and development of detailed budgets and forecasts, including P&L, cash flow, and balance sheet projections on a monthly, quarterly and annual basis.
Complete ad hoc analysis as needed.
Provide input to the management team as needed.
QUALIFICATIONS
Degree in accounting, finance or quantitative discipline preferred.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in FP&A, Business Analytics or Corporate Strategy
STARTING SALARY RANGE: $75,000

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analytics, Strategy or FP&A: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.hmespecialists.com
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"HME SPECIALISTS, LLC
3.2","Albuquerque, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
456,Data Scientist Senior Technical Specialist,"$97k-$156k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Intelligence

The Intelligence group provides high-end systems engineering and integration products and services, data analytics and software development to national and military intelligence customers. Serving federal agencies and the Intelligence Community for more than 50 years, the Intelligence group helps our clients meet their mission needs by providing trusted advisors, leading-edge technologies, and innovative solutions.

Responsibilities

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of AWS/cloud technologies.
Proficient in coding, particularly Python.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.
Bachelors degree required.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
457,"Sr Director, Data Science - Data Privacy","$187k-$292k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sr. Director, Data Science (Data Privacy)

Location - Blue Bell, PA

Symphony Health Solutions, a wholly-owned subsidiary of PRA Health Sciences, is a leading provider of high-value data, analytics, technology solutions and actionable insights for healthcare and life sciences manufacturers, payers and providers. The company helps clients drive revenue growth and commercial effectiveness, while adapting to the transformation of the healthcare ecosystem, by integrating a broad set of patient, prescriber, payer and clinical data together with primary and secondary health research, analytics and consulting. Symphony delivers a comprehensive perspective on the real dynamics that drive business in the healthcare and life sciences markets.

Responsibilities

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.

Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.

Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.

Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.

Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Specific Responsibilites:

Translates company business objectives and knowledge of data science to create long-term vision for department.

Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.

Represents the department on company or division-level process improvement initiatives and may act as sponsor for department-specific initiatives.

Establishes and assures adherence to budgets, schedules, work plans and KPI’s.

Maintains strategies for improving department systems/ processes.

Represents company at relevant industry forums and/or technology groups.

Expertise in machine learning and predictive modeling.

Expertise in relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages.

Excellent understanding of applied statistics, including regression models.

In-depth knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration.

Advanced leadership skills including change management, people development, strategic thinking and influencing.

Ability to strategize, communicate internally and with multiple clients.

Ability to resolve complex issues across departments and clients.

Ability to structure a scalable team to promote quality deliverables.

Ability to translate high- level corporate strategy into long-range project plans to gain competitive advantage.

Qualifications
Master’s degree or international equivalent
16 years’ relevant experience including 10 years formal people management experience
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Blue Bell, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
458,"Scientist III, Pharma R & D","$27k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Scientist III develops and executes formulation strategies related to product development, such as project planning, experimental design and data evaluations. The Scientist III applies technical expertise and has knowledge of various formulation development approaches. Demonstrates leadership and experience in the area of pre-formulation, formulation and process development of immediate and modified solid dosage, Topicals (cream,gel), Oral liquid and /or Transdermal. The position reports to a Manager/ Principal Scientist as described in the current organization chart of the department.

Essential Functions:
Develops formulation strategy and designs experimental plan, formulation and process development work for oral controlled release and immediate release dosage forms, Topicals, (cream, gel), Oral Liquid, and Transdermal products.
Responsible for selection of raw materials, packaging components and process requirements based on sound scientific principles.
Reviews analytical and clinical data and makes scientific conclusions.
Writes and reviews protocols and batch records for process development and evaluation work, scale up and pivotal batch manufacturing.
Creates and reviews technical documents, reports and presentations for cross functional teams. Writes Modules of ANDA's for submission.
Maintain Design history files for combination products. Develop design and development plan.
Keeps updated on cGMP and current technologies.
Additional Responsibilities:
Provides scientific and technical direction to junior staff members (scientists I, II, technicians & operators) to ensure project deadlines and performance standards are met.
Identifies, analyzes and suggests corrective actions to optimize R&D processes, technologies and regulatory compliance issues.
Equipment: Becomix, Tube filler, Transdermal and liquid manufacturing equipment.
Reviews Junior Scientist work.

Qualifications

Education:
A Master Degree (MS/MA) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is preferred
A Bachelors Degree (BA/BS) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is required.
Experience:
3 years or more experience with a Master Degree in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
5 years or more experience with a Bachelors of Science in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
Skills:
Must have knowledge of Pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing process. - Intermediate
Must be precise and consistent in day to day developmental work, easily trainable and ready to learn. - Intermediate
Must be able to effectively communicate reports, problems or issues, verbally as well as in writing. - Intermediate
Must have good oral and written communication skills. - Intermediate
Must be able to work in a team environment and be flexible to easily adapt to changes in assignments. - Intermediate
Must follow safe practices as defined by the SOP's and MSDS. - Intermediate
Must be willing to work extended hours as and when required. - Intermediate
Strong interpersonal skills and maintaining cooperative working relationships with others. - Intermediate
Managing multiple projects, duties and assignments. - Intermediate
Specialized Knowledge:
Must possess in depth knowledge and trouble shooting skills with Wurster Bottom Spray Fluid Bed Processors from lab scale to Commercial scale.
Must possess expertise with the use and optimization of extrusion and spheronization manufacturing techniques.
Must have a good understanding of complex modified release dosage forms.
Must Possess in-depth knowledge of the operation and troubleshooting skills for various lab scale equipment to production scale equipment: including Blenders, granulators, planetary mixers, fluid bed dryers, fluid bed coaters, incubators, mills, vibrorotatory sifters, encapsulation equipment (Manual to fully automatic), tablet presses and tablet coaters, roller compaction, packaging.
Works independently once assignments and responsibilities are outlined and delegated. Effective in oral and written communication skills at all levels and cross functionally.

Primary Location: US-NJ-Piscataway
Work Locations: Piscataway 49 49 Colonial Drive Piscataway 08854
Job: Research & Analytics
Organization: Scientific Affairs
Schedule: Regular
Shift: Standard
Employee Status: Individual Contributor
Job Type: Full-time
Job Level: 1st Shift
Travel: No
Job Posting: Dec 4, 2019, 10:41:34 AM",3.2,"Amneal Pharmaceuticals
3.2","Piscataway, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
459,Data Scientist-Journeyman,"$83k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 to 10 years of experience and a BA/BS or MA/MS degree

Typically performs all functional duties independently.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
460,100 - Data Modeler,"$44k-$76k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Key skillset: * *Data Modeler*/*Data Architect* for Relational and *Dimensional Modeling*, *Oracle*, *Erwin,* etc., Experience working in *Data Warehousing*, ETL and BI projects
Must have skills : *
Technical : *
• 5-8 years of IT experience as in *data modeling preferably in Dimensional modeling* in finance/Insurance sector.

• Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques

• Identifying the current- and future-state business processes and helping the business stakeholders envision the future.

• Working experience with ETL, Reporting developers, Business Analysts and architects to establish necessary data model to support the requirements

• Analyzing business requirements, designing/modifying system processes to meet the analytical capability needs and communicating them to the rest of the application development & data warehouse team..

• Well versed with Data warehousing Concepts and its design by using Star and Snowflake Schema methodologies.

• Experience in Data modelling and application design and development offering a rich mixture of business and technical expertise in data warehousing and reporting.

• Responsible for preparation of source to target mappings

• In depth working experience of *Star and Snowflake schema* designs and relational database ( e.g. Oracle and Sql server)

• In depth working experience on *Erwin Data Modeling* and depth experience in writing SQL queries
Interpersonal : *
• Excellent problem solving and strong communication skills required to interact with Client stakeholders

• Possess strong analytical skills
Nice to Have skills : *
• Familiarity working with ETL (e.g. Informatica )

• Experience in Microsoft Azure platform, Synapse, ADF, SQL, Python and Salesforce (specifically finance force) is a plus

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.6,"L&T Infotech
3.6","Hoboken, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1997,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
461,Scientist,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

We are seeking an outstanding Scientist to lead research efforts in areas of immunology that are key to understanding cancer immunity, including T cell and NK cell biology, as well as components of the tumor microenvironment. Strongest consideration will be given to candidates with demonstrated expertise in molecular or synthetic immunology and whose research interests are relevant to the problem of T cell development, mechanisms of immunosuppression, and next generation adoptive cell therapies. The successful candidate is expected to effectively lead cross-functional teams
What You Will Do:
Lead and drive studies applying cellular immunology, gene editing, single-cell sequencing and mouse modeling to address T cell dysfunction
Discovery and evaluation of novel mechanisms of tumor resistance to innate and adaptive immunity
Design and execution of cell-based functional assays to select candidate molecules for clinical development
Design and execution of drug mechanism of action studies using in vivo models and ex vivo methods, such as cell sorting, multi-color flow cytometry, immunohistochemistry/immunofluorescence, primary immune cell assays and 3D/organoid/explant assays.
Drive scientific and technical innovation collaboratively with other members of the company
Identify new ways to make better CAR T cells and collaborate with other ArsenalBio teams to move novel product concept designs to the clinic.
Provide exceptional scientific leadership and mentor and cross-train other scientists and research associates

What You Will Bring:
PhD, MD, DVM, or MD/DVM-PhD with at least 3 years of relevant post-doctoral research experience in Immunology, Biochemistry or Molecular Biology.
A strong work ethic, a steadfast commitment to discovery research and a documented ability to initiate, drive and complete research projects, as evidenced by a strong publication record.
Ability to manage an independent research program and to lead a cross-functional research team
Outstanding written and oral communication skills and the ability to organize and communicate complex data sets in a clear and concise manner to key stakeholders from diverse backgrounds are essential
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
462,R&D Scientist,"$45k-$79k
(Glassdoor Est.)","For nearly 70 years, Charles River employees have worked together to assist in the discovery, development and safe manufacture of new drug therapies. When you join our family, you will have a significant impact on the health and well-being of people across the globe. Whether your background is in life sciences, finance, IT, sales or another area, your skills will play an important role in the work we perform. In return, we’ll help you build a career that you can feel passionate about.isabled/Vet

Job Summary

Participate in evaluating technology platforms related to microbial identification and detection. Partner with cross-functional teams to develop new products and services to expand the Microbial Solutions product portfolio. Manage projects, perform experiments, analyze data, and present results to stakeholders.

We are seeking a R&D Scientist for our Microbial Solutions site located Newark, DE.

The following are responsibilities related to the R&D Scientist:

• Collaborate with R & D team members and external partners on technology evaluation and product development projects related to microbial identification and detection.
• Design and perform experiments to evaluate, develop, and optimize assays; ensure attention to detail in record keeping and result verification.
• Analyze data, summarize trends, and present results from R & D experiments.
• As required, manage technology evaluation and/or product development projects.
• Apply advanced data analysis approaches to find solutions and develop products.
• Use scientific literature, conferences, market research and patent databases to plan and guide projects.
• Assist R & D with presenting potential new technologies and scientific results both internally and externally.
• Support R & D efforts in responding to customer, QA, Operations and field-support questions.
• As required, participate in training CRL staff about new products and services.
• Maintain productive relationships with internal and external collaborators.
• Maintain freezer stocks of microbial isolates of all assigned projects.
• Provide routine maintenance, repair and cleaning of relevant laboratory equipment.
• Comply with all aspects of laboratory safety, safety stations, safety manuals, safety SOP and MSDS sheets.
• Ensure that all regulatory and GMP compliance requirements are met and adhered to in the development process.
• Perform all other related duties as assigned.

The following are the minimum qualifications related to the R&D Scientist:

• Education: Master’s Degree (M.A. / M.S.) or PhD Degree in Biological or Chemical Science, or Bioengineering, or related discipline required.
• Experience: Three to six years laboratory experience in Molecular or Microbiology, and/or Biochemistry field. Technical understanding of microbiology and molecular biology methods including DNA extraction procedures, Sanger and/or Next Generation Sequencing, primer design, quantitative PCR. Experience with Microbial Identification by Sequencing or MALDI-TOF mass spectrometry or other methods preferred. Knowledge of Spectroscopy, Experimental design, Bioinformatics, Multivariate statistics or Chemometrics, Machine Learning a plus.
• An equivalent combination of education and experience may be accepted as a satisfactory substitute for the specific education and experience listed above.
• Certification/Licensure: None.
• Other: Working knowledge of Quality Systems. Formal presentation skills and attention to detail needed.

About Microbial Solutions
Our Microbial Solutions business group has a comprehensive portfolio of endotoxin testing, microbial detection and microbial identification products and services is unlike any other, and has been purposefully designed to meet the complex and ever-changing needs of the industry. We help clients to ensure product safety and quality with easy-to-use yet robust testing solutions that satisfy regulatory requirements, support critical decision making and improve operational efficiencies.",3.3,"Charles River Laboratories
3.3","Newark, DE",-1,10000+ Employees,1947,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
463,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science","$83k-$139k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
464,"Environmental Geologist, Scientist or Engineer (Entry-Level)","$39k-$66k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Antea USA, Inc. (Antea®Group) is seeking a motivated, detail-oriented, Staff Professional for our Park City, UT office location.

Qualified individuals must have strong organizational and communication skills (both verbal and written), and a desire to work in a fast-paced environment with a strong technical support team.

This safety-sensitive position reports to a project manager and will support project teams on a variety of project assignments including site remediation activities, technical and safety oversight of subcontractors, permitting, Phase I and Phase II Environmental Site Assessments, and sample collection. Tasks could include preparing work and health and safety plans; conducting soil and groundwater investigations and sampling; remediation system operation and maintenance; data entry, management and analyses; and the preparation of reports in a variety of formats. Routine monthly field work includes visiting remediation sites located across the mountain west with regular travel required.

This is a full-time position with 60%-70% of travel anticipated. This may require working alone in remote locations and/or out of state work supporting other company offices. Typical travel includes staying over at site locations for several nights per week, a couple weeks per month. The locations may change based on client contracts and remediation site needs.

Antea®Group focuses strongly upon safety in all aspects of our operations, in the field, the office, and while traveling. The successful candidate must likewise consider safety as paramount and demonstrate an awareness of safe operations and be willing to accommodate long or non-standard work hours on a project by project basis.

QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and Training
BS in Environmental Sciences / Soil Science / Geology / Environmental Engineering or related science major
Proficiency in Microsoft Word and Excel
Entry Level 0– 2 years of applicable environmental experience
This position will require a 40-hour HAZWOPER OSHA certification. While current certification is desirable, it is not required to apply. HAZWOPER training will be provided upon employment if the successful candidate(s) is/are not already certified
Experience& Fundamental Skill Set
Strong organizational and communication skills with an innate attention to detail
Mechanical aptitude that is suitable for working on remediation systems including troubleshooting pumps, blowers, and motors. Advanced engineering is not mandatory but finding enjoyment fixing mechanical problems and tinkering with equipment is a must. Senior engineering support will help train and mentor the right candidate to learn our remediation systems.
Strong time management and decision-making skills
Able to work independently at remote locations to troubleshoot issues with sampling equipment and produce results
Ability to multi-task with multiple projects or assignments
Interest and motivation to diversify skill set with additional training
Familiarity with state and federal environmental regulatory framework
Potential employees must pass a company-paid physical examination, background check, drug-screen, and have a valid driver's license
Physical Requirements / Work Environment - Maintain physical condition appropriate to the performance of assigned duties and responsibilities, which may include the following:
Sedentary to light work (typical office or administrative work)
Frequently required to stand, sit and walk for extended periods of time
Occasional lifting and carrying of low (under 25lbs) to moderate (25-49lbs) weight objects
Repetitive motions: substantial movements (motions) of the wrists, hands, and/or fingers (including reaching)
Subject to inside environmental conditions (protection from weather conditions but not necessarily from temperature change)
Operation of a motor vehicle
Additionally, if you are assigned work in the field at client project sites you will need to complete a medical surveillance/fitness-for-duty examination and maintain physical condition appropriate to the performance of assigned duties and responsibilities which may include the following:
Medium to heavy work
Subject to outside environmental conditions: heat/cold, wind, wet and/or humid, etc.
Occasional stooping (bending body downward and forward), kneeling (bending legs at knee), crouching (bending body downward and forward) and climbing
Frequent lifting (including push/pull, hold/carry) of light, moderate and possibly heavy weight objects
Subject to hazards, including a variety of physical conditions, including but not limited to: proximity to moving vehicles, parts or equipment; exposure to chemicals; pressure (including noise); electrical hazards; biological hazards; excavation/trenching; confined spaces; elevated work; materials handling
May be required to wear an air purifying respirator
Antea®Group offers competitive benefits including paid vacation, paid holidays and paid sick leave.

Antea USA, Inc. (Antea®Group) is an EEO/AA Employer

Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity and other protected categories

NO RECRUITERS PLEASE

NO VISA SPONSORSHIP AT THIS TIME",4.0,"Antea Group
4.0","Park City, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
465,Research Scientist,-1,"Founded in Tokyo in 2012, SmartNews has quickly become the go-to source of news for millions of users around the world, and a leading news aggregation mobile app. Our mission is bigger than simply aggregating news, we are working to break through the filter bubble and deliver the world’s quality information to the people who need it.

We have various challenges to solve in order to achieve our mission. We are looking for someone with an insatiable curiosity to deeply understand user experiences and content consumption, and a passion to build a world-class, data-driven product. As a Research Scientist, you will be the key person to solve the most challenging problem together with Product Managers, Engineers and Data Scientists. We are looking for someone who is passionate about providing and discovering the highest quality news and delivering to our users. You will formulate the problems into various research questions, and perform independent research to find the best solution. You will also propose hypotheses, perform testings or simulations, to validate. You will also work together with Engineers to deploy your research solution into production to serve millions of SmartNews users.

Responsibilities
Partner with Product Managers, Engineers, Data Scientists to frame the appropriate research questions, and independently execute research to solve some of the challenging and novel problems at SmartNews
Independently dive into SmartNews’ data, and execute on appropriate projects that leverage mathematical, statistical and machine learning methods
Independently design and execute simulations or various live testings to collect data and prove research project concept
Be able to communicate solutions with Product Managers on realization, and transfer the solutions to production together with engineers
Be able to communicate ideas, methods, opportunities, and results well to all cross functional partners and all levels of management
Requirements
Ph.D. degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Information Technology, or other quantitative fields
3+ years of professional experience
End-to-end experience in research projects, including study design, simulation/testing, data cleaning and wrangling, data analysis, and reporting
Broad experience and deep knowledge with various modern technologies, including at least 2 areas of the followings, experimental design, causal inference, Machine Learning, Reinforcement Learning, Deep Learning, etc
Proficient with Python or R
Exceptional written, verbal, and visual communications
Benefits
Equity included
100% medical, dental and vision insurance coverage (60% coverage for dependents)
Monthly housing, commute, mobile phone and gym allowances
401k matching program
Free lunch, snacks, drinks, etc.
Pet friendly office",4.7,"SmartNews, Inc.
4.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
466,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
We are looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to help us create artificial intelligence products for Research and Development in the Medical Field. ML Engineer responsibilities include creating machine learning models and retraining systems. Transform Data Science prototypes to production-grade solutions. Responsible for implementing various algorithms for automated feature extraction, dataset augmentation, optimizing runtimes of neural network algorithms, and building higher level abstractions for various common AI/ML techniques.
Responsibilities: *
Study and transform data science prototypes
· Design, code and deploy machine learning systems capable of processing large volumes of data
Design and develop machine learning systems to create, train and deploy ML models
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Establish reusable data processing pipelines to enable rapid re-training and iteration through different ML methodologies
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Design experiments and analysis methodologies that are statistically rigorous
Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
· Tailor and deploy software tools, processes and metrics

· Serve as a subject matter expert
Requirements: *
· Proven experience as a ML Engineer or similar role

· Experience with supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement learning algorithms

· Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture

· Knowledge of ML frameworks such as Keras/Tensorflow/Theano/PyTorch and libraries (like scikit-learn)
Keep abreast of developments in the field
· Ability but to write robust code in Python, Java or equivalent modern programming language

· Proficiency in SQL, big data technologies and working with large data sets

· Works independently, able to manage multiple projects simultaneously

· Deep curiosity and a demonstrated ability to craft original solutions

· Highly communicative with collaborators and managers

· Proactive in seeking opportunities for innovation

· Ability to deal with ambiguity and deliver results in a fast-paced environment

· Dedicated and Self-Motivated

· Team collaboration and strong written and verbal communication skills

· Ownership and urgency across all responsible projects

· Proficient in Calculus, Statistics, and Linear Algebra

· Ability to work with cross-functional team to turn ideas into working solutions
Education & Experience: *
Requires Master’s Degree in Computer Science or Equivalent
2-5 years verifiable employment using requirements above. May substitute internships and projects for years of experience.
3-5 years Software Development Experience is preferred
1-2 years Networking Experience is preferred
Benefits*
· Competitive Pay

· Health, Dental & Retirement

· Continuing Education available
Salary*
· DOE

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,Ophthalmology Specialists of Texas,"Abilene, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
467,Data Architect/Scientist,"$86k-$142k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Member of Technical Staff – DATA ARCHITECT / SCIENTIST
US, Home Office

US Citizen or Permanent Resident

Wind River

In a world increasingly driven by software innovation, Wind River is pioneering the technologies to accelerate the digital transformation of our customers with a new generation of Mission Critical AI Systems in an AI-first world with the most exacting standards for safety, security, performance, and reliability. Success will be determined by our ability to innovate with velocity and sell at the solutions level.


ABOUT THE OPPORTUNITY

Wind River Systems is seeking an experienced high-performing senior software engineer for a position developing a hybrid cloud-based data analytics, machine learning and artificial intelligence platform.

The successful candidate will join a highly skilled development team delivering internal and external tools and technologies across a complete analytics driven DevSecOps platform, pioneering many new industry leading capabilities.

This is a data science all-rounder role. The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.


Interface & Collaboration

The successful candidate will collaborate with development and customer facing teams to ensure high levels of intuitive usability and product quality.

Responsibilities
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of development and systems problems
Help devise and layout a high-quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
Deliver cloud analytics solutions across a wide portfolio of class-leading products, in many industry verticals.
Extract data from development tools like Gitlab, Jenkins, JIRA, and many more.
Extracting data from real devices in the labs and the real world – planes, trains and automobiles
Develop new user interfaces and reporting options for these tools
Ensure security of all data
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!


ABOUT YOU

Core Competencies, Demonstrated Success & Qualifications
BSc / MSc degree (Computer Science, Computer/Electrical Engineering) or equivalent work experience
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Real-time analytics experience—receiving and analyzing streaming data from applications and distributed devices (not just processing data)
Experience working for companies engaged with autonomous devices in any vertical market (unmanned vehicles and defense systems, robotics for manufacturing and warehousing, autonomous transportation systems, etc.)
Blend of technical expertise and soft skills including business acumen, decision making, well developed oral and written communication skills
Demonstrable skills in SQL and Python
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets, etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and mathematics
Experience converting data models into products for real customers
Experience with Nifi / Kafka / Postgres / Hadoop / Linux
Familiarity with Real Time Operating Systems (RTOS)
Experience in autonomous systems development is a plus
3+ years of experience of big data analytics
6+ years working in a software development arena",4.1,"Wind River
4.1","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
468,Advanced Analytics Manager,-1,"Job Title: Advanced Analytics Manager or Director

Location: Philadelphia, PA

Overview:

The Advanced Analytics Manager will serve as an expert in understanding Health Union’s advertising campaign performance and delivery needs within the Health/Pharmaceutical space. She/he will support media delivery and sales teams by understanding measurement, integrating, interpreting, and leveraging statistical models/forecasted data, and applying best practices to Health Union’s campaigns in order to improve media performance and ultimately drive increased revenue. His/her analyses will serve as the foundation for Health Union’s campaign strategies and will allow the larger media team to anticipate campaign needs in real time, offset the impact of measurement and privacy limitations, and understand the anticipated impact of optimization efforts. She/he will also supervise a small group of analytics professionals and will provide statistical and analytical guidance to the team.

What You Do:
Develop Campaign Measurement Expertise. Develop expertise in all Health Union partnerships and third-party measurement studies (Comscore, Crossix, IQVIA and others) and associated measurement limitations. Provide recommendations to minimize/mitigate impact of data & measurement limitation on HU campaigns.
Lead Audience Quality Modeling:
Oversee forecasting process and statistical modeling of campaign results
Leverage learnings to drive campaign performance in real-time
Enhance and better understand internal measurement of audience quality through additional internal studies, delivery tests, third party data/models etc.
Determine content/engagement models that link audience quality to contextually relevant content to provide feedback on community content creation
Determine Optimal Campaign Blends: Through advanced analytics and forecasted data, provide recommendations for optimal campaign delivery breakouts, including: desktop vs. mobile, on-site vs. off-site, HU audience vs. lookalike, social vs. nonsocial, etc. against key KPIs of AQ, Rx Lift, ROI, etc.
Investigate alternative campaign or site traffic drivers: Measure and test DMP and other traffic drivers (Insta, Snap, Twitter, Taboola, etc.) against traditional FB investment drivers to enhance or deliver alternative traffic drivers.
ROI Improvement & Budget Forecasting: Through modelling and an understanding of historical spend (socially and programmatically), provide budget goal recommendations and analyze ROI, profit across platforms, and efficiency, while incorporating the impact of SEO.
Forecast Inventory: Develop models to forecast site & extension inventory incorporating factors such as incidence rate, community growth, DMP match rates, and other external factors (FB/Insta Reach/targeting, awareness, competition etc...).
Qualifications
What You Bring:
Experience working in the digital advertising ecosystem for a marketer/advertiser, publisher, agency, and/or ad technology company is a must
Strong preference for candidates with experience with the pharmaceutical/health space
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, mathematics, computer science or a related discipline is required. Advanced degree is a plus
A passion for digital advertising and emerging trends in the digital ecosystem
Experience sourcing, cleaning, analyzing and interpreting data from 1st, 2nd and 3rd party sources.
Knowledge of digital media reporting platforms such as DoubleClick, Facebook, DSP’s and others
The ability to clearly and efficiently present information and insights to internal and client teams in order to move beyond ‘what happened’ to deeper discussions of ‘what is important’, ‘why it happened’ and ‘what should be done’
Experience with business intelligence/ data visualization tools such as Looker, Mode, Metabase, Tableau or similar tools. Hands on experience with Looker a strong plus
Previous experience managing a team
The ability to partner effectively across internal and external teams, embrace accountability and deadlines, and to thrive in a fast-paced environment
HEALTH UNION REALLY IS THE BEST PLACE TO WORK

Health Union is a dynamic company that’s growing at a fast pace. To us, the most important part of managing fast growth is maintaining our culture. But don’t just take our word for it: Philly.com, Philadelphia Business Journal, and MM&M have all named Health Union a “best place to work”--and we take pride in living up to that hype every day. At Health Union:
We cultivate a fun, family-friendly work environment that values inclusion, community, excellence, and transparency.
We work hard, play hard and in the process, form close-knit relationships that breed an authentic, respectful culture of teaching and learning.
All team members - from executives to managers to people in entry-level positions - sit together in an open office and enjoy a fully integrated, collaborative and supportive work environment.
Full-time team members are immediately eligible for comprehensive health benefits, FSA for transit, parking, and dependent care, as well as PTO, paid parental leave, Summer Fridays, and paid holidays.
Health Union is the only digital health company that continuously works to bring people together by evolving social interactions into meaningful health conversations through a growing portfolio of online health communities. Every day, Health Union encourages engagement that helps millions of people with chronic conditions find the information, connection and validation they seek. Learn more at www.health-union.com.

EEO Statement: We are an equal employment opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, age, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

To comply with federal law, Health Union participates in E-Verify. Successful candidates must pass the E-Verify process after hire.

Applicants must be legally eligible to work in the U.S for any employer.

This is a full-time position, located at Health Union offices in Philadelphia (Center City). Relocation assistance is not available for this position.

*Candidates only. No direct calls or emails. No recruiters/agencies, please.",4.6,"Health Union
4.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
469,Data Scientist II,"$56k-$98k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
470,Senior Analyst/Data Scientist,"$141k-$225k
(Glassdoor Est.)","At Edmunds were driven to make car buying easier. Ever since we began publishing printed car guides in the 60s, the company has been in the business of trust, innovating ways to empower and support car shoppers. When Edmunds launched the car industrys first Internet site in 1994, we established a leadership position online and have never looked back. Now, as one of the most trusted review sites on the Internet, millions of visitors use our research, shopping and buying tools every month to make an easy and informed decision on their next car. For consumers, we bring peace of mind. For dealers, we make tools to help them solve their problems and sell more cars. How do we do it, you ask? The key ingredients are our enthusiastic employees, progressive company culture and cutting-edge technology. Want to join the team? Read on to find out how!

What Youre Applying For:

Edmunds is seeking a skilled, creative and enthusiastic Senior Analyst/Data Scientist experienced in generating actionable insights from large sets of data, measuring business performance, and identifying areas of growth and optimization using advanced analytical (modeling, machine learning) and experimental approaches.

The ideal candidate is also a natural problem-solver that enjoys working with large data sets and is proactive in exploring database tables and using data to make clear and convincing business cases.

The analyst will play a crucial role in supporting our Tier 1 team by developing, improving, and maintaining digital advertising revenue forecasts & models, monitoring major KPIs, and understanding impact to other areas of the business. This person will be expected to understand the details and complexity of the companys digital advertising revenue to ensure that the executive team has a clear and accurate pulse of the business, and recommend action plans to optimize against the companys revenue goals, and identifying areas of optimization and growth by extracting insights through modeling, testing and experimentation.

In addition, this person will be expected to take ownership of projects to continually improve reporting quality through automation. This person will also be expected to promote the use of self-service analytic tools across internal clients, and provide training for these tools.

This individual will be tasked to work cross-functionally with Product, Sales, Ad Operations, and Paid Media teams to optimize digital advertising products and revenue through A/B testing and experimentation, measuring and uncovering results based on changes to website traffic & consumer site behaviors, and recommending areas of paid marketing spend.

The right candidate will have experience working across business and functional boundaries, partnering with internal clients to provide decision-making support through analytic insights.

This is a great opportunity for an individual with significant business acumen that is interested in playing with the wealth of structured and unstructured data that is available within the car buying ecosystem. Curiosity and business intellect a must.

What Youll Do:
Develop, evaluate, refine, and automate analytic models using data to address business needs, and identify areas of optimization and growth
Prepare visualizations of data in order to explain and persuade
Design, conduct and lead complex analyses that mine, extract, track, report and analyze performance metrics
Provide recommendations to key stakeholders and support the business need
Create and produce forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc. utilizing our data warehouse and other data source systems and summarize your findings
Interact with multiple teams in different departments and define requirements for reporting
Challenges:
Edmunds is a fast growing and innovative company. Qualified candidate should possess strong project management skills, and an ability to multitask and balance competing priorities
What You Need:
Strong analytical and data mining skills
Excellent data extraction and manipulation skills - SQL experience required
Strong data modeling / statistical analysis / predictive modeling experience required (R and/or Python)
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Exposure to BI tools such as Tableau is a plus
Bachelors degree in a quantitative field, such as mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, business analytics, etc. with at least 5 years of relevant and progressively complex work experience
Working @ Edmunds.com:

Employees think its a pretty great place to work and some pretty impressive publications think it is too: we have been recognized as one of the best places to work by the Fortune Magazine and Great Places to Work, LA Business Journal (for the last 6 years!), Computerworld, and Built in LA. We've also been identified as one of the best workplaces specifically in Technology and also for Diversity and Asian Americans. In fact, our CEO, Avi Steinlauf, was rated as one of Glassdoor's Highest Rated CEOs! If youre interested in learning more and joining our mission, wed love to hear from you!

Edmunds will consider for employment qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of all applicable laws.

*LI-POST",3.6,"Edmunds.com
3.6","Santa Monica, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
471,Data Platform Architect (EDB) - DAB,"$128k-$206k
(Glassdoor Est.)","By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Enterprise Data Backbone

Enterprise Data Backbone - The Enterprise Data Backbone provides the most user-friendly real-time data for all our internal and external stakeholders, accessible through self-service tools.

We will transform the way we gather and use insights by integrating completely new types of data to better support our patient and others in the healthcare system. We will build capabilities to gather real world data outside of clinical trials in ways we have not been able to do so far.

We will make data more easily accessible across Takeda and find a way to share it so that we don’t keep re-inventing the wheel. We will push ourselves to think beyond our normal constructs of clinical trials or today's supply chains.

We will explore a future where we get data from all corners of the world – digital communities, wearable devices, social media, surveys, for a, consumer data combined with hospital, pharmacy and EMR data.

DATA PLATFORM ARCHITECT

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE:

The Data Platform Architect is an IT partner for the build and delivering of data platforms.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Strategic Business Impact – The role is a key enabler for Takeda strategy to become a Data Driven Enterprise. By connecting with TET-1 and their data teams the data platform lead will strategically align data, processes and technology to achieve faster time to market for life saving products
Operational responsibility – the Data platform & Ops delivery lead takes the responsibility of the quality and timeliness of customer project deliveries and internal research and development. Ultimately, help Takeda to make better decisions that improve the quality and efficiency of care for patients.
Delivery Scalability –Oversee and influence the other product leads, demand leads and solution architects to build and deliver data platforms and projects aligned with the new DAB program/initiative.
Develop data driven solutions utilizing current and next generation technologies to meet evolving business needs.
Ability to quickly identify an opportunity and recommend possible technical solutions.
Develop application systems that comply with the standard system development methodology and concepts for design, programming, backup, and recovery to deliver solutions that have superior performance and integrity.
Contribute to determining programming approach, tools, and techniques that best meet the business requirements.
Understand and follow the PDP process to develop, deploy and deliver the solutions.
Be pro-active and diligent in identifying and communicating design and development issues.
Utilize multiple development languages/tools such as Python, SPARK, Hive to build prototypes and evaluate results for effectiveness and feasibility.
Operationalize open source data-analytic tools for enterprise use.
Develop real-time data ingestion and stream-analytic solutions leveraging technologies such as Kafka, Apache Spark, Python and AWS based solutions.
Custom Data pipeline development (Cloud and locally hosted)
Work heavily within the Cloud ecosystem and migrate data
Provide support for deployed data applications and analytical models by being a trusted advisor to Data Scientists and other data consumers by identifying data problems and guiding issue resolution with partner Data Engineers and source data providers.
Provide subject matter expertise in the analysis, preparation of specifications and plans for the development of data processes.
Ensure proper data governance policies are followed by implementing or validating Data Lineage, Quality checks, classification, etc.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Bachelor’s degree in engineering or equivalent
8+ years of experience in IT field, with a focus in BI (Business Intelligence and Data Analytics)
Experience as a Sr. Developer in the Healthcare/Life Sciences field a must
Extensive experience with the AWS cloud platform along with technologies including Python, PySpark, KAFKA, SCALA and Databricks
Clinical Trial experience working with patients using IoT devices a must
Significant experience in an analytical role in the healthcare industry
Successfully leading and delivering Big Data programs for a Fortune 500 organization
Experience in a leadership position, including project management and team management
Strong time management and organizational skills
Strong communication and presentation skills
Experience working in a collaborative environment, including supporting and teaching other team members
Very strong customer-facing experience

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
472,Sr Data Scientist,"$66k-$110k
(Glassdoor Est.)","A world leader in the field of in vitro diagnostics for over 55 years, bioMérieux provides diagnostic solutions that detect disease and contamination to improve patient health and ensure consumer safety. bioMérieux’s global headquarters is located in Marcy L’Étoile, France, and we have more than 11,200 team members in 43 countries. With our distributor network, we serve more than 160 countries. bioMérieux, Inc., our Americas division, has more than 4,000 team members across 12 sites or subsidiaries. Our Americas headquarters is in Durham, NC, with nearly 1,200 team members. bioMérieux, Inc. sponsors public health initiatives and partnerships to address antimicrobial resistance, sepsis awareness, food safety, and consumer health. Our passionate team members recognize the power of diagnostics and rally behind our mission to help save lives.

Position Summary:

bioMerieux’s Data Science group is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to help develop solutions for the next generation product concepts that will have a direct impact on the future of medical diagnostics. The position involves all aspects of feasibility and design work focused on the application of mathematical techniques, data analytics, experiment design, algorithm design and statistical analysis to drive concepts from ideation through feasibility and into development. Algorithm design will involve statistical and machine learning methodologies from design to optimization. Additionally the Data Scientist will be required to support currently launched products, including manufacturing process development, quality analytics, product evolution and change requests. The position will include collaboration and interaction with other scientists and engineers while prototyping, integrating and testing the technology for the next generation of diagnostic products for hospitals and laboratories. Coordination as a project team member with marketing, project management, quality analytics, manufacturing, regulatory and other functional areas will be required. The Data Scientist is expected to prototype and design to the goals of functionality and operational utility while considering long term architecture, solution universality, practicality, connectivity, and schedule commitments. The position requires the ability to perform critical analysis, work well in teams, and self-manage.

Main Accountabilities:

Candidate must be well grounded in fundamentals of applied mathematics, data analytics, statistics.
Performance of statistical analysis to interpret experimental results.
Design experimental methods and plans to generate results that drive critical product design selections.
Experience with machine learning.
Implementation of algorithms using global software development tools, methodologies and processes.
Understanding and willingness to self-learn the technologies used in this domain to be up-to-date with the latest developments in data analytics, imaging and machine learning both in academia and in industry.
Aware and experience with the challenges associated with the transition of a prototype into a final product.
Experience with MATLAB, SAS, Python, etc.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and the ability to interact well within a team.
Proficient analytical, problem-solving and debugging skills.
Must be able to perform in a small team environment with minimal supervision.
Enjoy working in areas outside of usual comfort zone and love to learn new technologies.
Ability to perform in a ISO/ FDA regulated environment.
Familiarity with or interest in biology, microbiology and biochemistry.

Studies/Experience, Skills and Qualifications:

M.S. or Ph.D. in Mathematics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, Data Science, Biomedical, Electrical or Computer Engineering or Computer Science Desired: 3+ years of experience in the development of medical devices, medical diagnostics or other sensor based systems.
Proficient use of Development environments, MS Office Project, Excel, Word; Required.
Proficiency in Matlab, Python or equivalent programming experience. Code samples to be provided upon request; Required.

Joining bioMérieux, is choosing to join an innovative company with a long term vision, committed to the service of public health and carried out with a humanistic corporate culture. Our Group offers numerous possibilities: so come and join the 11,200 bioMérieux team members who already identify with these values!

bioMérieux is an Equal Opportunity, Affirmative Action Employer. M/F/Vet/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/GINA

BMXID",4.2,"Biomerieux
4.2","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
473,DOD Data Scientist/Engineer - Senior,"$113k-$183k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Overview

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.

Responsibilities

In the position of Data Scientist, the incumbent will support the Naval Air Systems Command (NAVAIR) in a once-in-a-generation digital transformation, driving change and devising how data can be integrated, controlled, distributed, and accessed by programs, business units and operators across the enterprise. Guidehouse is seeking an enthusiastic data scientist with the desire to harness data through the application of data science principles, tools, and methods and to share this knowledge as a mentor and coach for others. The individual will support the NAVAIR Digital Group in establishing practical and applied data science practices at NAVAIR, and in solving complex problems that have data driven solutions. This individual will additionally mentor and instruct employees during this process with the goal or sharing their knowledge and growing the data science skill base in Southern Maryland at Patuxent River.

Qualifications

Security Clearance:

Must have an Active Secret Clearance or above.

Responsibilities:

Work with large, complex data sets.
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.
Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale.
Develop comprehensive understanding of data structures and metrics advocating for changes where needed for both products development and sales activity.
Interact cross-functionally with a wide variety of people and teams.
Work closely with engineers to identify opportunities for, design, and assess product improvement.
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.

:Required Skills

5 years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / computational biologist / bioinformatician).
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL).
Deep expertise and experience with statistical data analysis such as linear models, multivariate analysis, stochastic models, sampling methods.
Applied experience with machine learning on large datasets.
Experience articulating business questions and using mathematical techniques to arrive at an answer using available data. Experience translating analysis results into business recommendations
Able to clearly communicate (speaking and writing) technical concepts to a non-technical audience
Experience with data engineering and data security practices
Experience managing, unifying, and automating dataflows from disparate sources

Required Experience:

Masters Degree (preferred) or Bachelors Degree (required). Heavy preference given to Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Information Science, or a similar quantitative field
5 years related work experience with Masters (7 with Bachelors)
2 to 4 years of programming experience with the ability to write / maintain scripts in Python (or other scripting languages)
Strong understanding of SQL
Working knowledge of data format conversion
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Strong problem solving skills.
Ability to maintain a DOD Secret clearance required.

Desired Experience:

MS degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., statistics, operations research, bioinformatics, economics, computational biology, computer science, mathematics, physics, electrical engineering, industrial engineering).

Additional Requirements

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.

Disclaimer

About Guidehouse

Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.

Rewards and Benefits

Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.

Benefits include:

Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance

Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays

Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance

401(k) Retirement Plan

Basic Life & Supplemental Life

Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts

Short-Term & Long-Term Disability

Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities

Skills Development & Certifications

Employee Referral Program

Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach

Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",3.5,"Guidehouse
3.5","Patuxent River, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
474,Data Analyst,-1,"Who We Are

Strata.ai is a consulting and venture building firm focused on the exponential potential of Decision Science, Artificial Intelligence, and Extended Reality. We partner with the world’s largest organizations to solve, develop, and scale robust solutions through meaningful innovation and a hyper-focus on measurable impact.

We believe that to build successful relationships, technologies, or companies - we need to invest in people. We aim to attract like-minded individuals who see problems as challenges, are obsessed with solving them, who can think creatively and drive their ideas with data, can be depended on to deliver results, and is always willing to help those around them succeed. We believe in integrity, transparency, accountability, and trust.

If it seems that we are describing you, then we would love for you to apply.

Overview

We’re looking for aspiring Data & Decision Scientists, Data Architects, and Machine Learning Engineers to be part of Strata.ai’s Consulting Base. You’ll be working in either team or individual capacities to design, develop, and deliver objective focused business projects for our clients and partners.

Your quality communication, documentation, and organization skills will be instrumental in your success for this role. You’re hungry, constantly researching the latest methods, techniques, and technologies and have an affinity for details and accuracy. When a business decision is made, you're confident that the data behind that decision is correct and complete.

Requirements

Responsibilities
Research, Gather, Organize, and Analyze information from multiple sources and mediums.
Ensures completeness and integrity of data as well as their sources.
Coordinates requests for more or complete information as needed.
Keeps track of information sources, purpose, time of consumption, and destinations.
Research information ownership and privacy concerns, ensures security compliance.
Filter, sort, sanitize, and “clean” data to be programmatically utilized.
Prepare operational datasets with only necessary or relevant data points.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Collaborate with management to prioritize and information needs.
Provides reporting, project summaries, ongoing status updates, and maintains all records of processing activities.
Become a source and advocate within and outside the organization(s) for data science, decision science, and artificial intelligence.
Supports ad hoc needs and performs other duties as assigned.
Requirements
High School Diploma or GED, Undergraduate degree preferred.
Strong Organization and Prioritization Skills
Experience with G-Suite Tooling (Gmail, Docs, Sheets, Slides)
Excellent communication skills in both oral and written.
Attention to detail, ability to execute on directions accurately and timely.
Ability to work in a team environment and maintain a professional disposition.
Commitment and competence to provide excellent customer service; positive, flexible, and empathetically.
Must have your own computer and a fast and stable internet connection.
Benefits

Pay and benefits are competitive and based on industry standards and individual experience and skill sets. We offer salary and contract engagements. Salaries includes Healthcare and 401(k) as well as Unlimited PTO after 90 days.

]]>",-1,Strata.ai,"Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
475,Data Analyst,-1,"Who We Are

Strata.ai is a consulting and venture building firm focused on the exponential potential of Decision Science, Artificial Intelligence, and Extended Reality. We partner with the world’s largest organizations to solve, develop, and scale robust solutions through meaningful innovation and a hyper-focus on measurable impact.

We believe that to build successful relationships, technologies, or companies - we need to invest in people. We aim to attract like-minded individuals who see problems as challenges, are obsessed with solving them, who can think creatively and drive their ideas with data, can be depended on to deliver results, and is always willing to help those around them succeed. We believe in integrity, transparency, accountability, and trust.

If it seems that we are describing you, then we would love for you to apply.

Overview

We’re looking for aspiring Data & Decision Scientists, Data Architects, and Machine Learning Engineers to be part of Strata.ai’s Consulting Base. You’ll be working in either team or individual capacities to design, develop, and deliver objective focused business projects for our clients and partners.

Your quality communication, documentation, and organization skills will be instrumental in your success for this role. You’re hungry, constantly researching the latest methods, techniques, and technologies and have an affinity for details and accuracy. When a business decision is made, you're confident that the data behind that decision is correct and complete.

Requirements

Responsibilities
Research, Gather, Organize, and Analyze information from multiple sources and mediums.
Ensures completeness and integrity of data as well as their sources.
Coordinates requests for more or complete information as needed.
Keeps track of information sources, purpose, time of consumption, and destinations.
Research information ownership and privacy concerns, ensures security compliance.
Filter, sort, sanitize, and “clean” data to be programmatically utilized.
Prepare operational datasets with only necessary or relevant data points.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Collaborate with management to prioritize and information needs.
Provides reporting, project summaries, ongoing status updates, and maintains all records of processing activities.
Become a source and advocate within and outside the organization(s) for data science, decision science, and artificial intelligence.
Supports ad hoc needs and performs other duties as assigned.
Requirements
High School Diploma or GED, Undergraduate degree preferred.
Strong Organization and Prioritization Skills
Experience with G-Suite Tooling (Gmail, Docs, Sheets, Slides)
Excellent communication skills in both oral and written.
Attention to detail, ability to execute on directions accurately and timely.
Ability to work in a team environment and maintain a professional disposition.
Commitment and competence to provide excellent customer service; positive, flexible, and empathetically.
Must have your own computer and a fast and stable internet connection.
Benefits

Pay and benefits are competitive and based on industry standards and individual experience and skill sets. We offer salary and contract engagements. Salaries includes Healthcare and 401(k) as well as Unlimited PTO after 90 days.

]]>",-1,Strata.ai,"Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
476,Laboratory Associate Scientist,"$47k-$95k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Laboratory Associate Scientist

TC Transcontinental, Making Impressions Count

TC Transcontinental is a leader in flexible packaging in North America, and Canada’s largest printer. The Corporation is also the leading Canadian French-language educational publishing group. For over 40 years, TC Transcontinental’s story has been one of innovation and transformation to meet our customers’ evolving needs. Our strong family values, entrepreneurial spirit and long-term vision have always been at the heart of our success. With our 3 business segments in Packaging, Print and Media, we continue to optimize, transform and grow while making impressions that count!

TC Transcontinental Packaging brings a distinctive blend of science, technology, and art together to create flexible packaging that preserves our customers' products and accentuates their brands on the store shelf. The Packaging sector has over 4,000 employees and 29 production facilities worldwide. We specialize in extrusion, lamination, flexographic printing and converting of plastic and paper products. You will join a high-performing team that is passionate about creating the perfect package, no matter what industry.

About this opportunity

Transcontinental Packaging seeks a candidate for an Associate Scientist in its R&D Laboratory Services Group supporting the flexible packaging business initiatives of the company. The successful candidate will characterize raw materials, film structures and processes using chemical, structural, and physical property analysis. The candidate will bring together knowledge of material science and chemistry to assist in the completion of business goals. Laboratory testing includes molecular spectroscopy, thermal analysis, gas barrier testing, surface analysis, microscopy, chromatography and extensive physical strength and performance testing. The position supports all aspects of the business including the R&D trials, R&D capital projects, customer technical support and manufacturing.

What you will do
Independently conduct testing of materials, product structures, finished packages following established procedures and methods.
Understand and interpret chemical characterization including molecular spectroscopy, chromatography, microscopy, permeation and related testing.
Operate and maintain laboratory equipment and instrumentation following specific procedures and quality control measures.
Effectively communicate with internal and external customers to understand the testing objective, discuss results and develop testing strategies to obtain answers and required information.
Develop new methods and technology to characterize packaging structures and materials. Follow advances in chemical and materials sciences to support current and future business needs.
Accurately document, interpret, and report conclusions and results to ensure that the proper procedures are employed.
Challenge data and unexpected outcomes.
Support and contribute to a healthy and safe work environment by following all workplace regulations, policies, and initiatives, including reporting all first aid injuries, accidents, and workplace hazards.

What you have to offer
Bachelor’s degree in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or Material Science with a minimum of 5 years of related industry experience or
Master’s degree in Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or Materials Science with a minimum of 2 years related industry experience industry experience
Proven ability to solve problems using multiple testing strategies and industrial forensic techniques utilizing a wide variety of inputs and results.
Detail oriented with strong analytical skills and an ability to question data and unexpected outcomes
Good working knowledge of operation and maintenance of lab equipment.
Demonstrated effective interpersonal, written and oral communication skills
Interest in and capacity for leadership growth and development
Willingness to travel up to 10%
Ability to work remotely, as needed
What we have to offer
Opportunity to be part of a dynamic and highly motivating work environment where you can develop your potential and launch an exciting career;
Opportunities where your input makes a difference. A competitive compensation package, 401K plan and flexible benefits that are customizable to you and your family’s needs];
Employee perks such as discounts from suppliers on various products and services such as insurance, wireless bundles, travel, and much more.

Learn more about us
https://www.facebook.com/tc.transcontinental/
https://twitter.com/TCTranscontinen
https://www.linkedin.com/company-beta/7331
https://www.youtube.com/user/1Transcontinental
talent@tc.tc
#INDUS",3.1,"TC Transcontinental
3.1","Menasha, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
477,Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer,-1,"Job title: Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary type:
Annual
Salary:
Negotiable
Location: Huntsville, AL.
Job published: 09/28/2020
Job ID: 32284
Contact name: Bo Ryals
Phone number: 256.217.4711

Job Description


Decisive intelligence, Inc. is seeking a Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer to join a new 10 year contract supporting a GMD simulation program.
Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer

Security Clearance: Active DoD SECRET clearance required

Job Description & Position Responsibilities:

Support a focused development team to build a high-fidelity Ground-based Midcourse Defense interceptor 6DOF simulation. Development will take place in an Agile Scrum environment and will make product releases using a phased capability approach. The team will start with an existing government owned interceptor simulation and improve/enhance. In addition, the simulation will be integrated into an existing simulation architecture to enable easy execution and 3D display and analysis. This position would focus on the interceptor endgame EO/IR signal processing and discrimination algorithm development.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, physics or mathematics
10+ years of experience
General 6DOF interceptor aerospace modeling experience for both kill vehicle and booster
EO/IR interceptor endgame signal processing and discrimination algorithm development experience
Missile defense / hit-to-kill interceptor program experience
C/C++ or FORTRAN programming language
Preferred Qualifications:
EO/IR interceptor seeker modeling experience
Interceptor GN&C modeling experience
Agile development process experience
Risk Management Framework (RMF) and software cyber security controls experience
Software configuration management or automated testing experience
#GDHP",5.0,"Decisive Intel
5.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
478,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Opportunity overview

Cohere Health is simplifying healthcare for patients, their doctors, and all those who are important in a patient's healthcare experience. Our focus is to enable an efficient, transparent patient journey where patient goals are central to decision-making.

We are a mission-driven and fast-growing company obsessed with eliminating the wasteful friction patients and doctors experience, particularly for diagnoses that require expensive procedures or medications. To that end, we build products and services that ensure the appropriate plan of care is understood and expeditiously approved, so that patients and doctors can focus on health, rather than payment or administrative hassles.

In this role, you'll join our growing team of world-class engineers, statisticians, and clinical experts to deploy machine learning algorithms that help automate burdensome administrative clinical practices. You will be tasked with finding the most promising opportunities for impact and then delivering on them.

What you will do:
Find the signal in incoherent clinical data
Build reliable and scalable production machine learning systems
Work on feature engineering, statistical analysis, developing novel ML techniques, understanding classifier performance, and ensuring fit-for-purpose.
Work cross-functionally across diverse stakeholders, including product managers, statisticians, EHR data specialists and physicians.
What you will have:
You have at 3 years experience in applied ML in the industry with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in computer science, machine learning, mathematics or similar field
Clear understanding of model building, model maintenance and the measures that optimize models for product use
Understand experimental design and can independently perform collection, measurement, and interpretation of results
Expert in R, SQL,Python or other common analytical data tools
Expert in linear regression and classification approaches
Bonus points if:


Have experience with healthcare data such as claims and EMR data
Have hands on experience building NLP models using Spacy from clinical narratives
Experience with TensorFlow is also a plus.
We can't wait to learn more about you and meet you at Cohere Health!",5.0,"Cohere Health
5.0","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
479,Fire Safety Specialist / Staff Scientist I - Healthcare,"$71k-$85k
(Employer Est.)","EH&E, the Company:
EH&E is an employee owned company that provides businesses, agencies and institutions with innovative and cost saving solutions for their health and safety, environmental and engineering needs. We protect hospitals, higher education institutions, biotech/ pharmaceutical companies and governmental agencies against pollutants/contaminants such as mold, ensuring safety in the workplace. Headquartered in our aesthetically beautiful, remodeled office in Newton, Massachusetts; EH&E is a trusted, recognized partner engaged with international governmental agencies, large scale enterprises, and leading education and healthcare facilities. www.eheinc.com

Job Description:
As a representative of EH&E's Healthcare team, a Fire Safety Specialist /Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who will work with one of our healthcare clients in Boston, MA. This role educates, trains, and provides support to hospital operations in the development and execution of consistent fire and life safety programs. This role will provide the environmental health and safety department depth and knowledge in building code and emergency egress compliance, ILSM program elements, construction safety, fire drills, permitting, investigations, fire and life safety inspections with regulatory agencies, and the capability of leading recurring meetings. This role will participate in other various environmental health and safety programs consisting of but not limited to indoor air quality, environmental investigations and sampling, emergency response, risk assessment, accident investigation, developing and tracking fire and life safety incident trends, and developing and managing programs for improving performance primarily related to fire and life safety. As a member of the environmental health and safety department, this role shares responsibility in ensuring compliance with all safety and environmental programs. This role leads an important safety component within the department, which the client views as critical to its values and mission in providing a safe and compliant work environment enabling the hospital to provide best in class healthcare. This role assists in leading a proactive safety and environmental program and improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Project Manager. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, and respectful image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Regularly consults with members of the Facilities department and fire and compliance specialist personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance.
QA/QC:
Participates in and may lead fire and life safety specific recurring meetings
Conducts and oversees the hospital fire drill program with internal qualified personnel within the department in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies;
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Coordinates and implements programs aimed at mitigation and/or control strategies of fire and life safety vulnerabilities.
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online EH&S training programs focused primarily in fire and life safety, and may be called upon to deliver training content in other safety-related areas as needed.. Updates written materials with code compliance changes as needed
Conducts follow-up with various stakeholders as needed.
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a valuable team member.
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Has familiarity with TJC, CMS, and NFPA standards, and has desire to expand knowledgebase in each
Performs code compliance risk assessments for work that may alter, buildout or remove portions of healthcare buildings
Conducts environmental monitoring related to leaks and floods to mitigate risk to patient care
Participates as an after-hours emergency responder; has the ability to respond to chemical, biological, and other after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information.
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintaining context and understanding the audience.
Financial Management:
Be able to work within timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals.
Key Skills:
NFPA knowledge and experience, preferably in a healthcare of closely related environment
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers).
Education / Training:
Bachelor of Science (BS), with fire and life safety experience as a responsibility in past roles. Experience in a fire and life safety focused role in a healthcare environment; or, at least experience working in a healthcare environment for a facilities or safety department with an understanding and familiarity of the importance of this role. Background working with TJC and NFPA standards, specifically related to building code compliance.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:
HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification
Experience / Background / Knowledge:
Must have at least 2-5 years of experience in an EH&S department, preferably in a healthcare environment or closely related field with a strong background in fire and life safety code.
EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).
Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.
Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
480,Sr Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),"$49k-$85k
(Glassdoor Est.)","We Are Hiring

Remote Opportunity!

Are you a self starter who is passionate about data trends, investigating and researching solutions? Our Ascension Data Science Institute is looking to add a Sr. Data Analysis to their team! This is a great opportunity to join a growing team with a great culture!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as a key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes data for business insight.
Initiate action on data requests with team.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Bachelor's or higher strongly preferred.
Work Experience:

3 years of experience preferred in healthcare operations or administration preferred.

Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy.
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred.
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred.
Experience presenting to high levels of executives.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.3,"Ascension
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
481,Senior Data Engineer,"$96k-$171k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Description Summary

The Data Engineer will be responsible for engineering and maintaining ETL processes for our Enterprise Data Warehouse platform. This person will design and build data integrations, ETL workflows, dimensional data models, and manage our data warehouse and integration infrastructure that fuels strategic business decisions across the organization. They will partner with business users, BI Analysts, and BI Developers to translate data needs into data structures that can be used to implement analytical solutions. They are passionate about data, thrive in an evolving environment, and bring an enthusiastic and collaborative attitude.

Job Skills and Abilities
Ability to use your analytical skills to translate business ideas into technology solutions
Experience in Agile delivery framework is required
Experience delivering data solutions both on Premise and in the cloud
Must be able to interact with all areas of business
Highly motivated, with a strong interest in finance and solving complex problems
Experience implementing complex ETL data flows in a Data Warehouse
Experience working with distributed external resources and vendor teams (onshore and offshore)
Data Modeling and design including conceptual, logical, and physical modeling
SQL Server, SQL Server Integration Services, Azure Data Services (Data Factory, Data Bricks)
T-SQL, Python, R or similar languages
OLTP/OLAP
TFS and GIT
Understanding of DevOps and CI/CD practices
Strong communication and collaboration skills
Responsibilities

Engineering: 90%
Designs, automates, and manages the acquisition, transformation, and data loading
processes in a data warehouse environment
Manages the automation and operations of a data warehouse loading processes
Architects, designs, and implements state-of-the-art data warehouse architecture
Performs data analysis required to troubleshoot ETL related issues and assist in the
resolution of issues
Analyzes information requirements of customers and support teams and determines
the best technical solutions
Collaborates with business and technical partners to understand and evaluate their
requirements to deliver optimal solutions
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual
processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing ETL processes for greater scalability, etc.
Partners with QA team to ensure data quality throughout the ETL process
Create logical and physical data models in support of data warehousing
Create and manage architecture documentation and project artifacts such as data
models, reference architecture diagrams, ETL data maps, and performance
requirements, etc.
Create standards and conventions for data warehouse and ETL processes
Promotes best practices for leveraging CI/CD to deliver ETL solutions
Mentor and lead other Data Engineers
Due Diligence: 10%
Examine & evaluate new technical products and services
Prototype new solutions
Attend conferences and seminars to sharpen skills with latest technologies
Education

BS/BA or equivalent

Work Experience

5+ years of Data Engineering, ETL or Related Experience",3.9,"Harbourvest
3.9","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
482,Data Scientist II (Computational),"$95k-$159k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Job Title: *Data Scientist II (Computational)
Department: *Product Development
Purpose of the job: *Implement, analyze and evaluate algorithms against customer requirements for improved three-dimensional tomographic image reconstructions derived from data acquired by the Decision Sciences muon tomography system. Develop and automate simulation techniques to support this objective and support other research projects.
Citizenship Requirement: *U.S. Citizenship required (defined by Federal contract)
Required Education: *Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or related field or possess relevant experience in lieu of education.
Preferred Education: *• Master’s or PhD in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Mathematics, Physics a plus or possess relevant experience in lieu of advanced degree.
Required Experience and Competencies: *
• 3 - 5 years of experience in three-dimensional imaging techniques, image artifacts, inverse problems and the underlying mathematical principles
• Fluency in programming is required. Python and C++ required.
• Solid background in implementation, evaluation, and analysis of computerized algorithm implementation is required
• Experience in statistical principles and probability theory, image segmentation, automated quantitative evaluation of image data, and feature extraction is highly desired
• Good communication, computer, and interpersonal skills are required to enable an effective interface with other professionals, to produce documentation, and to present results to internal audiences
• Firm grasp of scientific principles and experimental techniques with an ability to think critically with strong problem-solving skills.
• Preferred Experience:
o Experience in experimental nuclear or particle physics is desirable
o Demonstrated expertise in implementing computationally intensive image reconstructions and in accelerating their execution (using methods such as high-performance computing or GPUs).
o Experience in simulations to develop and test tomographic image reconstructions
Required Attributes: *
• Possess a positive attitude and a drive to solve problems using technical creativity and hard work.
• A willingness to jump in and help with any task in a startup environment
• Strong software development discipline will be essential.
• Effective communication skills
• Ability to multitask and prioritize
• The ability to work both independently and as part of a team is essential
Essential Functions/ Responsibilities: *
• Develop research and implementation plans, successfully execute and update those plans, and provide bi-weekly updates to management.
• Research, implement, and evaluate three-dimensional image reconstruction algorithms utilizing muon scatter data as measured by the Decision Sciences muon tomography systems using the following tools:
o Operating Systems/Workstations: CentOS, Scientific Linux
o Languages: UNIX C / C++, Python, UNIX Shell Scripting
o Libraries: STL, Boost libraries, VTK, Apache Spark
o Tools: Paraview, Numpy, Matlab, Pandas DataFrames
Other Responsibilities: *
• Design, implement, and test methods for accelerating image reconstruction algorithms
• Design and test automated feature extraction algorithms
• Document developed algorithms and transition these algorithms to the software team for incorporation into the production code base Provide technical advice and support to other members of the Physics and Software teams in their own development efforts
• All other duties assigned
• Compliance with company’s Safety Program, Code of Conduct and Ethics policy
Travel Requirements: *
Up to 10% of the time
Physical Requirements: *
Physical demands:
• Ability to operate a computer, phone, fax, copy machine and other related office equipment
• Ability to sit or stand at a workstation for up to an entire work shift
Job ID: *0159
For more information about our company please visit www.decisionsciences.com

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Company's website:
https://decisionsciences.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.5,"Decision Sciences
2.5","Poway, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
483,Business Analytics Manager,"$81k-$134k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Customer Service Analytics Manager
Milwaukee Branch
12355 Uline Way, Kenosha, WI 53144

Customer Service is the heartbeat of our company. We depend on our Call Center employees to serve our customers and fulfill our promise of reliability.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Manage the Customer Service analytics team, listening to recommendations and taking measures to maximize team effectiveness.
Provide leadership, training and coaching.
Evaluate business processes, developing and implementing solutions for improvements.
Create performance and success reports.
Build and maintain relationships with branch leadership to drive performance.
Act as a liaison between business and IT groups.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s degree.
5+ years experience in business analysis.
Experience leading and developing top-performing teams.
Experience in call center, warehouse, or supply chain environment.
Knowledge of data design, ETL process, data warehousing and SQL.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café and outdoor patio.
First-class fitness center.
Beautifully maintained walking trails.
Free chair massages.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Opportunities for community involvement.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-JF1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
484,Finance Data Analyst Internship - Paid,"$65k-$79k
(Employer Est.)","Finance Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Finance Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Design, develop, implement and maintain various dashboards and tools.
Utilize SQL and VBA to create tools to increase efficiency in financial processes.
Support the finance department with SQL queries (querying data) and ad hoc analytical tasks.
Gain exposure to multiple business units including Corporate Finance, Accounting, Credit Research / Analysis, Tax, Operations and Corporate Audit.
Enhance technical and financial skills through on-the-job experience and training.

Minimum Requirements
Candidates must be pursuing a Bachelor's degree related to Finance, IT, or Analytics.
SQL or relevant programming experience preferred.
Demonstrate strong problem solving, analytical, leadership and communication skills.
Ability to work on tasks independently.
Microsoft Excel skills required, Access skills a plus.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First-class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Northbrook, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
485,Business Intelligence & Analytics Manager,"$66k-$117k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Business Intelligence & Analytics Manager
Charlotte, NC

InVue is a global company headquartered in Charlotte, NC which provides retailers, brands, and businesses with innovative sales enablement, software, and security solutions to increase their profits. Our products balance the need for an interactive customer experience with security and design requirements at retail. Our commitment to creative design and superior quality has earned the trust of the world’s top retailers and consumer technology brands.

The BI & Analytics Manager is charged with enhancing complex data models into simple and insightful visuals. You will work with Sales, Supply Chain, and other areas of the business to build data driven models to help make the InVue sales and supply chain teams more successful through implementing and optimizing processes such as sales reporting, incentives, lead management, forecasting, sales account strategy, and supply chain performance measurements and improvements. Having ability to understand, create and clarify KPI’s into actionable insights to improve business will allow you to contribute to our overall company success.

Responsibilities (not limited to):

Sales Management Programs
Manage Power BI dashboards, KPI’s, and scorecards for Sales Business Reviews with Sales Directors and Business Development Managers
Assist in building the structure and rhythm for maintaining account plans driven through our CRM and Opportunity Systems
Analysis of sales pricing approval systems and tiers
Provide support on communication and alignment between Sales & Product teams leading goal setting and management reporting
Supply Chain Programs
Build and manage Power BI dashboards and KPI’s to give insight as to delighting the customer
Warehouse analytics to enhance efficiencies and support growth
Working with Operations to establish and maintain a robust S&OP process
Help define reporting formats, ensure compliance, cadence, provide analysis and make recommendations
Other Duties
Monitor existing KPI metrics, developing new metrics, identity correlations and root causes
Performing regular system audits to ensure complete and accurate reporting of data metrics
Develop programs, methodologies, and reports for analyzing and presenting data for internal and external audiences
Invent new ways to define and measure program effectiveness and organizational productivity
Develop ETL procedures from multiple data sources as needed to meet business requirements
Qualifications:
5-10 years of commercial experience in Sales Operations and Sales Management, preferably working with high-growth sales organizations
Highly experienced in creating Power BI applications with a variety of data sources
Advanced skills in Excel and SQL a must
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Computer Science, or related field
Ability to decipher complex financial and sales data and translate into actionable, easy to understand information for the internal and external audiences
Experience working in a technology company; electronic components, manufacturing is a plus
Excellent analytical, critical thinking, and problem-solving skills
Ability to communicate technical information to non-technical business executives
Able to manage multiple projects and be self-motivated
Able to work in a fast paced, ever-changing environment
Strong written and verbal communication capabilities
Team player; can be nimble and manage multiple priorities in an entrepreneurial environment.
Able to travel globally, estimation <15>
About InVue:

InVue (www.invue.com) creates technology solutions for retailers, commercial businesses, and brands that improve customer profitability, efficiency, and security. Today, InVue partners with top retailers and brands like Samsung, Apple, Target, Microsoft, Lenovo, and Google around the world. InVue has been recognized as one of the fastest growing privately held companies in the U.S. by Inc. Magazine five of its eleven years in business.",4.2,"Invue
4.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Security Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
486,Scientist - Synthetic Biology,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

Our approach requires novel receptors to empower cell therapies to sense their environment and respond as needed to resolve disease states. This role in ArsenalBio’s Synthetic Biology group lies on the forefront of development and application of those novel synthetic receptors. In it, you will interface closely with colleagues across ArsenalBio’s Discovery, Development and Technology organizations, as well as external collaborators and thought leaders.
What You Will Do
Lead the high-throughput and high-content screening of synthetic immune receptors for a portfolio of cell therapy applications
Develop and apply methods for pooled and arrayed high-throughput functional screening of large protein libraries in primary immune cells and cell lines
Develop DNA constructs and libraries encoding immune receptor domains, variants and fusions from rational, semi-rational and randomized designs
Dissect and model the biochemical and functional characteristics of select receptor designs
Work with interdisciplinary teams to establish and test novel cell therapy approaches
Provide expert support for multiplexing and scaling biological readouts across our broader scientific team
Maintain familiarity with the relevant current literature and its application to multiplexing readouts, synthetic immunology and cell therapy
Coordinate tasks across multiple projects, demonstrating prioritization and planning
Interpret and effectively execute experiments in line with project timelines and goals
Recruit and mentor junior scientists and research associates with relevant expertise
What You Will Bring
PhD in molecular biology, immunology, protein engineering or a related field, with 3+ years of relevant research experience in industry or academia
Experience with functional screening of engineered immune cells
Experience with high-throughput functional characterization of DNA and protein libraries in pooled and/or arrayed formats
Experience in developing flow cytometry protocols for synthetic biology applications
Working knowledge of NGS technologies and workflows
Familiarity with R or similar environments for pipelining of routine data analysis
Collaborative experience with computational biologists and/or software engineers to help develop and use novel tools for construct design, experimental planning and/or data analysis
Experience with multiplexing/barcoding approaches for scaling experimental throughput
Entrepreneurial behaviors demonstrated by agility, accountability, transparency, resourcefulness, and ability to get things done
Demonstrated ability to perform as a team player
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
487,"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development","$86k-$107k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development
Location: Bedford, MA
Homology Medicines is seeking an outstanding Senior Scientist to assist in the advancement of viral gene therapy production processes for novel adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The individual in this role will be a highly-skilled, talented and motivated researcher who will lead the work to develop and characterize next generation plasmids for large scale manufacturing of AAV vectors. We seek candidates with proven ability to work independently and collaboratively who are driven to pursue cutting edge science and develop next generation therapies to transform the lives of patients.
Essential Functions and Duties
Design, development, and characterization of novel plasmids for AAV production using molecular and cell-based assays
Analyze vector specific characteristics including packaging efficiency and product quality, as impacted by packaging and inverted terminal repeat (ITR) plasmid and integrity
Advance technical understanding and development of critical parameters in mammalian cell culture production systems for AAV vectors
Collaborate closely with analytical characterization team to evaluate critical vector attributes and process performance parameters for AAV vector production
Lead a team of research associate and scientist completing assigned tasks and serve as scientific mentor to overseeing laboratory experimentation and data analysis
Author technical reports and technology transfer documents as needed
Skills and Experience
PhD or MS in molecular biology, virology, or related fields with 4+ (PhD) or 6+ (MS) years industry experience in viral vector production
Expertise in molecular cloning techniques preferably with AAV/ITR experience
Thorough understanding of virus characterization methods including nucleic acid and protein-based approaches
Familiarity with using lab-scale production platforms including adherent cell systems, shake flasks, and bioreactors for live virus or viral vector production
Adept at conducting routine testing and limited troubleshooting of multiple methods
Independently motivated, detail oriented, and good problem-solving ability
Excellent interpersonal written and oral communication skills
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line: www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
488,Validation Scientist,-1,"Summary

Under general supervision, provides direct technical validation engineering support of process and/or equipment upgrades, replacements, and modifications in the laboratory, manufacturing, or manufacturing support environment. Able to troubleshoot basic validation issues. Applies basic validation engineering principles to the design and implementation of system or process modifications and/or capital projects. Organizes, analyzes and presents interpretation of results for operational issues or validation engineering projects of minor scope and complexity.

Requirement
Bachelor’s degree in Science or Engineering and 2 years of directly related experience
Experience in a regulated environment; Biotech, Pharmaceutical, Medical Devices, etc.
Experience in Process Validation (PV)
Experience with PV documentation (authoring, data verification, etc.), GMP systems (LIMS, Trackwise, HLEE, Plant Information System, etc.), on the floor execution, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Documentation: 3 years (Required)
Process Validation: 3 years (Required)
Data Verification: 3 years (Required)
LIMS, Trackwise, HLEE, Plant Information System: 3 years (Required)
GMP System: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
English & Spanish (Required)",-1,PRPDG,Puerto Rico,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
489,Validation Scientist,-1,"Summary

Under general supervision, provides direct technical validation engineering support of process and/or equipment upgrades, replacements, and modifications in the laboratory, manufacturing, or manufacturing support environment. Able to troubleshoot basic validation issues. Applies basic validation engineering principles to the design and implementation of system or process modifications and/or capital projects. Organizes, analyzes and presents interpretation of results for operational issues or validation engineering projects of minor scope and complexity.

Requirement
Bachelor’s degree in Science or Engineering and 2 years of directly related experience
Experience in a regulated environment; Biotech, Pharmaceutical, Medical Devices, etc.
Experience in Process Validation (PV)
Experience with PV documentation (authoring, data verification, etc.), GMP systems (LIMS, Trackwise, HLEE, Plant Information System, etc.), on the floor execution, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Documentation: 3 years (Required)
Process Validation: 3 years (Required)
Data Verification: 3 years (Required)
LIMS, Trackwise, HLEE, Plant Information System: 3 years (Required)
GMP System: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
English & Spanish (Required)",-1,PRPDG,Puerto Rico,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
490,Data Engineer-Journeyman,"$75k-$135k
(Glassdoor Est.)","The NAVAIR Digital Group leads the digital transformation of NAVAIR and works to accelerate and scale digital/analytic technologies and capabilities across the NAVAIR Enterprise as a means to increase speed in the delivery and sustainment of warfighting capability. The Digital Group delivers and executes command-wide strategies that align activities and provides the workforce with agile self-service infrastructure, data accessibility, visualization and analytic tools, and digital/IT services to rapidly research, create, deploy, integrate, and maintain, applications, enterprise solutions, and other digital capabilities. NAVAIR’s digital transformation will require leveraging advanced digital tools to implement fundamentally different business models across all business, technology development, workforce, and mission operation domains. NAVAIR is committed to a digital culture that empowers the workforce to accelerate, innovate, collaborate, develop, and deliver capabilities to meet mission outcomes. Selected candidate will: * Discovers opportunities for data acquisition and sensor integration; performs systems engineering for databases and data processing systems; develops data systems, architectures and models; leverages high-performance computing infrastructures into systems architecture; recommends best architectures, tools, and technologies to address organizational needs. * Interact with the government customer, military personal and other contractors as required Qualifications: * Bachelors degree is required is related field and (3) three to (10) years of experience * Candidate is required to pass a background Investigation * Security+ certification is required. *Security Clearance Requirements: * An active DoD secret clearance is required or higher Overview: Sabre Systems, Inc. is a quality driven, customer focused large business providing innovative solutions in the areas of Cyber, C4ISR, Business Intelligence and Data Analytics, and Enterprise Modernization to federal and civilian customers. Our mission is to ensure our customers have the technology, services, and expertise to overcome threats, maintain superiority, and quickly adapt to emerging obstacles. At Sabre, we're more than just a job - we're a team - and we care for and nurture our employees like family. If you want to be a part of creating and implementing enduring solutions that transform mission challenges into mission success – join Sabre! Sabre provides an excellent benefits package, which includes healthcare, paid days off, tuition reimbursement, and a 401K plan. We respect the unique perspectives that a diverse workforce of minorities, women, individuals with disabilities, and protected veterans brings not only to our company, but also to our customers. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. EOE: Minorities/Females/Disability/Veterans; VEVRAA Federal Contractor #LI-PH1 Job Type: Full-time",4.8,"Sabre Systems
4.8","Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
491,Principal Data Scientist,"$71k-$116k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Technology. Flexibility. Diversity. At the center of it all are the Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics teams at Cummins, working together as a high-energy startup within a Fortune 500 organization. At this Midwestern technology hub, today’s sharpest, most curious minds transform what-ifs into realities.

#LifeAtCummins is about POWERING YOUR POTENTIAL .You’ll have global opportunities to develop your career and make your community a better place - to break ground professionally and be your best personally.

About Digital Accelerator and Advanced Analytics:

Cummins' Digital Accelerator functions as our own tech startup, with strategic access to Fortune 150 resources and talents. Steering the innovation of new experiences for customers, Digital Accelerator is boldly transforming Cummins into a modern and agile technology company. Through the conception, build and launch of inspiring digital solutions, the unique hub of vision and creativity leverages open architecture, connectivity, big data, advanced analytics, internet-of-things, edge computing and more, to drive the company forward on its journey towards smart technologies.

This is an exciting opportunity in Columbus, IN for a Principal Data Scientist. This is an active business facing role where you will work and collaborate with teams to solve problems in a results, customer centric environment.

Your impact will happen in these and other ways:

Manages and Implements advanced analytics projects which solve complex analytical problems using quantitative approaches through a combination of analytical, mathematical and technical skills.
Researches, designs, implements and validates cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve targeted outcomes by leveraging complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques.
Liaises with business stakeholders and leverages business knowledge to industrialize and monetize insights from advanced analytics projects.
Leads key objectives and business goals through the use of data science methodology.
Leverages data science methodology to solve complex business problems.
Creates algorithms using more complex statistical methodologies through the use of statistical programming languages and tools.
Partners with domain experts to verify model capabilities and translate modeling outputs from statistical inferences into business language.
Partners with Solution Architect to enable appropriate data flow/data model, development using appropriate tools/technology, rapid prototyping and informs the design of analytical products.
Trains and mentors less experienced employees on data science tools and methodologies.
Continuous development and advancement of the organization through knowledge sharing and collaboration.
Participates in planning for advancement of the Data Science profession.

Qualifications

Experience:

Significant experience in a relevant discipline area is required with a demonstrated track record of analyzing complex business systems and large data sets. Knowledge of the latest technologies and trends in data science is highly preferred and includes:

Familiarity analyzing complex business systems, industry requirements, and/or data regulations
Background in processing and managing large data sets
Applied knowledge of big data, open source and third party toolsets
SQL query language
Clustered compute cloud-based implementation experience
Experience in building analytical solutions
Experience coaching on implementation of machine learning solutions

Significant experiences in the following are preferred:

Designing and implementing Big Data platform solutions using open source and third-party tools
Microsoft Azure and/or Amazon Web services environment
Experience in Agile software development
Familiarity with validation and testing of machine learning systems
Familiarity with Continuous Integration and Continuous Delivery (CI/CD)

Manage the analytics technical road map in collaboration with supported delivery partners
Design analytics solution approach in collaboration with delivery partners
Provide design direction and technical guidance to developments teams
Oversee in-use model performance and corrective action
Manage activities of a small team of employees

Skills

Programming - Creates, writes and tests computer code, test scripts, and build scripts using algorithmic analysis and design, industry standards and tools, version control, and build and test automation to meet business, technical, security, governance and compliance requirements.

Data Mining - Extracts insights from data by identifying relationships and patterns through use of a suite of data exploration and data visualization techniques to understand the underlying structure of the data and enable sound conclusions upon model building.

Predictive Modeling - Develops analytical or machine learning models by using appropriate variable transformations, feature selection strategies, imputation strategies, class rebalancing, resampling strategies and quality control measures to generate predictive insights used in solving business questions.

Statistical Modeling - Develops descriptive and explanatory statistical models, and simulations for regression, classification, outlier detection, anomaly detection, time series forecasting using knowledge of foundational statistics such as null hypotheses significance tests, regression models, generalized linear modeling, time series analysis, rank statistics, probability distribution fitting survival analysis, etc. to validate hypotheses for any given statistical or business question.

Problem Solving - Solves problems using a systematic analysis process by leveraging industry standard methodologies to create problem traceability and protect the customer; determines the assignable cause; implements robust, data-based solutions; identifies the systemic root causes and recommended actions to prevent problem reoccurrence.

Requirements Analysis - Evaluates relationships and interdependencies between requirements based upon their complexity and value to the business in order to determine feasibility and prioritization.

Strategic Roadmap Planning - Produces a high-level, multi-year product and capability roadmap utilizing internal and external business resource, asset and market knowledge and experience to communicate the organization's focus and priorities to internal and external stakeholders.

Tech savvy - Anticipating and adopting innovations in business-building digital and technology applications.

Manages complexity - Making sense of complex, high quantity, and sometimes contradictory information to effectively solve problems.

Collaborates - Building partnerships and working collaboratively with others to meet shared objectives.

Develops talent - Developing people to meet both their career goals and the organization’s goals.

Communicates Effectively - Developing and delivering multi-mode communications that convey a clear understanding of the unique needs of different audiences.

Education, Licenses, Certifications

College, university or equivalent degree or equivalent work experience in relevant technical discipline is required.
This position may require licensing for compliance with export controls or sanctions regulations.

Compensation and Benefits

Base salary rate commensurate with experience. Additional benefits vary between locations and include options such as our 401(k) Retirement Savings Plan, Cash Balance Pension Plan, Medical/Dental/Life Insurance, Health Savings Account, Domestic Partners Coverage and a full complement of personal and professional benefits.

Cummins and E-verify

At Cummins, we are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer dedicated to diversity in the workplace. Our policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified persons without regard to race, gender, color, disability, national origin, age, religion, union affiliation, sexual orientation, veteran status, citizenship, gender identity and/or expression, or other status protected by law. Cummins validates right to work using E-Verify. Cummins will provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee’s Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.

Ready to think beyond your desk? Apply for this opportunity to start your career with Cummins today.careers.cummins.com

Not ready to apply but want to learn more? Join our Talent Community to get the inside track on great jobs and confidentially connect to our recruiting team: https://www.cumminstalentcommunity.com/profile/join/

#DAAAI

Job
SYSTEMS/INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Primary Location
United States-Indiana-Columbus-US, IN, Columbus, Sears Building
Job Type
Experienced - Exempt / Office
Recruitment Job Type Exempt - Experienced
Job Posting
Jul 24, 2020, 3:42:21 AM
Unposting Date
Ongoing",3.8,"Cummins Inc.
3.8","Columbus, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1919,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
492,Data Engineer,"$62k-$104k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Hagerty, an automotive lifestyle company and the world's pre-eminent membership, insurance and media organization for enthusiast vehicle owners, has an opportunity for a Data Engineer to work on our data science team. In this role you will be building and maintaining our data pipeline and scalable analytics platform. You will also be partnering with other technical and business stakeholders to develop and productionize data science models.

This position can be based remotely, or located in our Traverse City, Ann Arbor, Michigan or Dublin, OH offices.

What You’ll Do:

Implement data engineering best practices
Develop and implement robust and scalable data integration (ETL) pipelines using Python, SQL, Spark, and other AWS/Salesforce cloud solutions.
Develop and implement data pipeline orchestration utilities using Apache
Support AWS platform DevOps best practices throughout all data engineering
Create and manage AWS resources using infrastructure-as-code bestpractices, specifically in terraform.
Partner with internal and external stakeholders to collect requirements and recommend best practice solutions.
Develop solutions to catalog and manage metadata to support data governance and data democratization.
Develop and implement automated test cases and data reconciliation to validate ETL processes and data quality & integrity.
Partner with Data Scientists to design, code, train, test, deploy and iterate machine learning algorithms and systems at scale.

This Might Describe You:

Associates degree, preferably in a technical/analytical field, or relevant work
Additional 3+ years working in another role within an IT delivery team, such as a developer, business systems analyst, data analyst, quality assurance analyst, ETL developer or DBA
Strong problem-solving abilities and attention to detail
Ability to authentically and effectively communicate (written and verbally) with various stakeholders
Ability to create technical artifacts and documentation to support development and maintenance of data products
Experience in successful delivery of data products as productionizable software solutions
Experience or willingness to learn open source data processing technologies such as Kafka, Hadoop, Hive, Presto, Spark, GraphX
Experience ensuring rigorous code development, testing, automation, and other engineering best practices.
Experience in imperative (e.g., Airflow) or declarative (e.g., Informatica/Talend/Pentaho) ETL design, implementation, and maintenance.
Experience cataloging and processing non-relational data.
Experience or willingness to learn one or multiple of the following languages Python, Scala, or SQL
Functional knowledge of relational databases and query authoring (SQL)
Experience or willingness to learn productionizing data science models in frameworks such as numpy, ML Spark, pandas, scikit-learn, tensorflow, MOA, mlpack, etc.
Preferred experience in machine learning techniques such as feature engineering, features selection, supervised and unsupervised algorithms, clustering, graph analytics, and time series analysis, K-means clustering, Gaussian distribution, decision tree, etc.

We Offer:

Competitive compensation
Inclusive benefits package allowing enrollment of dependents and partners
A flexible culture that understands the importance of quality of work over quantity
An opportunity to work with a diverse, global community of 1000+ Hagerty team members across multiple countries, united by our values of open, direct, and kind
A culture of company-wide collaboration and shared success
Company supported and employee-driven resource groups that promote diversity, career development and empowerment
Corporate social responsibility initiatives with global reach
Regular recognition, feedback, and open communication across all levels
Team building, bonding, mentorship and support to grow confidence, trust, and friendships
At Hagerty, we’re focused on building a world-class company and culture, and that starts with the people we hire. We take pride in being an equal opportunity, inclusive employer

If you like wild growth and working with happy, enthusiastic over-achievers, you'll enjoy your career with us!",3.4,"Hagerty
3.4","Traverse City, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
493,Scientist II or higher,"$28k-$63k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Sekisui XenoTech, LLC is currently looking for a Scientist II or higher in our Program Oversight department. This position serves as a Study Director by providing scientific support and leadership to clients and other scientific staff in the conduct of GLP and non-GLP studies, including study and program design, utilization of technology data collection and interpretation, and study report writing. The ideal candidate will be able to handle a fast-paced, always-changing environment while maintaining excellent project management and organizational skills. Strong communication and analytical skills, along with problem solving and attention to detail are essential.

Essential duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited, to the following:

Overseeing conduct of in vitro DMPK studies in accordance with established protocols and facility SOPs

Identify and resolve issues in an efficient and effective manner.

Provide expertise internally and externally for DMPK studies

Act as key point of contact for clients and laboratory scientists

QUALIFICATIONS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

B.S./B.A. in Life Sciences, Physical Sciences, Mathematics or Engineering with 5 or more years lab experience

Masters/Ph.D. with 1 or more years lab experience

Proficient with Microsoft Office (MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Outlook, etc.)

Service orientation, attention to detail, thoroughness, time/task management and effective prioritization.

Able to manage multiple projects or tasks.

Strong communication and interpersonal skills – written and oral.

Able to work well both independently and in a team environment.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS : The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to stand and use display finger dexterity, and use hands to handle or feel. The employee is occasionally required to walk; sit for long periods; reach with hands and arms; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl; talk or hear; and taste or smell. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts, risk of electrical shock, biohazards, flammable liquids, risk of radiation, and vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. At times, the noise level can be louder and hearing protection may be required.

Those interested may apply via the online link. No phone calls please.

Sekisui XenoTech is an EEO employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",3.2,"Sekisui XenoTech, LLC
3.2","Kansas City, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
494,Senior Marketing Data Scientist,"$100k-$164k
(Glassdoor Est.)","National Funding is continuing to grow its Analytics Department and has an exciting opportunity as a Senior Data Scientist. This high-profile role is at the center of activity for the company and is a major driver and contributor to National Funding's core strategy and growth. We are looking for a data-driven individual with excellent analytical skills and experience to work alongside business stakeholders primarily on our Direct Marketing team to deliver insights and make recommendations.

Senior Data Scientist Major Responsibilities

Provides analytic support and strategic thought partnership to Direct Marketing team
The ideal candidate will have the ability to tell stories with the data, communicate effectively and instill confidence in recommendations to motivate stakeholders to take action
Builds recommendations by synthesizing data from multiple sources, developing assumptions where needed, to drive business insights and strategy development
Delivers key insights with interpretation and recommendation, contributes to the development of hypotheses and actions, and presents them to management team
Partners with Marketing leaders to identify key customer segments and contributes to the execution of various campaigns and initiatives
Develop statistical models to aide in selection of prospects for direct mail campaigns
Develops new and better analytics approaches to solve questions in a creative way

The Ideal Candidate

3-5 years of experience in data analysis, preferably in Direct Marketing
Hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Proven leadership within a data-driven organization with the ability to influence decisions
Strong knowledge of SQL and/or SAS
Experience with SAS, R, Python and other data modeling tools
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Experience with Tableau (preferred) or similar BI tools
Experience with A/B testing setup and evaluation preferred
Outstanding communication skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues

Prefer candidates with experience in Finance, Mortgage, Banking",3.4,"National Funding
3.4","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
495,AI/ML - NLP/ML Scientist,"$62k-$112k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Description

Job Description:

Leidos is hiring a AI/ML - NLP/ML Scientist with R and Python scripting expertise for our SSA ITSSC II program in Baltimore, MD. In this role you will build algorithms to meet business requirements and use statistical, mathematical, and predictive modelling skills to utilize a comprehensive platform for data analysis.

Duties will include, but not limited to:

Use Business Intelligence tools to visualize and analyze data
Integrate disparate data sets and work with multiple systems and tools to extract data for deeper analysis;
Use big data platforms
Utilize various programming languages to create scripts to work with data and algorithms
Apply Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Statistical Analysis, Predictive Modelling, and Hypothesis Testing.
Required Skills:
Masters degree (PhD preferred) from an accredited college in a related discipline
Over 3 years of practical hands-on work experience using Data Science methodologies and tooling.
Experience with statistical analysis and machine learning
Proficiency in scripting languages; R, Python, or equivalent
Proficiency in SQL
Proficiency in various models and techniques such as Bag of Words, Latent Semantic Analysis (TF-IDF), Dimension Reduction, and others
Understanding and application of various algorithms such as Logistic Regression, Gaussian Naïve Bayes, K Nearest Neighbors, Random Forest, Support Vector Machines, and others
Evaluation techniques such as Confusion Matrix, F1 score, ROC, AUC, and similar
Proficiency in transforming data, classifications, and translations, as well as resolving data quality and data cleansing
Experience working in big data environments and relational databases
Experience in various tools such as R Studio, Jupyter Notebook, or similar
Excellent research, analytical, written, and oral communications
Ability to work as an independent contributor and in team activities
Must be able to pass a Federal Suitability for Public Trust
Desired Skills:
Experience with healthcare and healthcare systems
Experience with NoSQL such as MongoDB, Neo4j, Elasticsearch, or similar
Advanced skills and expertise in data mining, natural language processing, and distributed computing
Understanding of deep learning techniques
Ability to create, test, and evaluate custom models
Ability to visualize results for business consumption
Understanding of development lifecycle skills

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Public Trust

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.6,"Leidos
3.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
496,Senior Data Engineer,"$99k-$179k
(Glassdoor Est.)","Tuesday, August 11, 2020

This position is expected to lead the data architecture and design of the CSBS enterprise data platform. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists. They will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

They will work with analytical teams to gather technical requirements for both capabilities and tools, as well as, accessing and prioritizing ingest of data assets. They will work with the infrastructure and enterprise architect teams to develop and build out the enterprise platform. The will advise the CDO on technical solutions and tradeoffs, liaise with the Enterprise Architecture to ensure standards are met, and work closely with the Security and Policy teams to ensure the organization is in compliance with their policies. In addition, they will work closely with the modernization product leads to ensure the data needs for the analytical teams is built into the modernized application.

In addition, they will help establish and implement metadata strategy aligned with EA strategy to ensure clear visibility into mapping of data assets to applications, and understanding of impact of changes to data models

Essential Functions

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individual with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs.

Translate data analytic technical requirements to cloud architects, contractors, business leaders and IT functional leads in security, infrastructure, and application development

Build strong relationships across IT functions and data analytics teams

Oversee the buildout of the enterprise Data Warehouse/API strategy

Work with the analytics teams to prioritize data assets

Manage contractors and oversee solution delivery

Optimizing data ingest and ETL processes to ensure our products have maximum performance

Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

Navigate conflicting priorities and provide recommendations to the CDO when necessary

Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets

Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management

Work with the Enterprise Architect to establish modeling standards, data quality standards, data integration patterns or transactional and analytical systems.

Additional Responsibilities

Prepare polished technical and non-technical status reports and presentations for senior management

Minimum Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual should possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed and meet the amount of education, training and/or work experience required.

Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent coursework in data management/computer science

Advanced degree preferred

12+ years of experience in data management or data architecture

Experience managing vendors/contractors

Experience with feature/product ownership

Experience with Agile Scrum methodology

Experience writing clear and effective proposals, policies, research summaries, etc.

Development experience with MuleSoft and Informatica preferred; MicroStrategy a plus

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Knowledge of MuleSoft, Informatica, and MicroStrategy

Familiarity with data transformation, warehousing and data modeling

Working knowledge of MySQL and Oracle databases

Understanding of software development protocols

Fluency with AWS cloud storage

Ability to create well-designed, intuitive user interfaces

Skill in communicating with and translating between technical and non-technical people

Knowledge of the financial services industry a plus

Requirements

Must be eligible to obtain or currently possess a U.S. Government clearance at the Public Trust Moderate (NACI) level or higher

Must be a United States citizen or a Legal Permanent Resident (LPR) with at least three (3) years consecutive residence in the United States as indicated on the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) LPR issued card

Values Instilled Behaviors for Excellence

Member/ Customer Service

Capability to build and value relationships

Ability to prioritize work

Advocate and advance member's goals

Teamwork

Ability to give credit to others

Have a “pitch in” attitude

Learns from successes and setbacks

Respect/Trust

Listens and learns from others

Speaks the truth even when uncomfortable

Ability to honor the expertise of others

Collaboration

Recognizes the contributions of others

Ability to consult and communication effectively

Desires to make others successful

Ownership/Engagement

Ability to preserve through adversity

Willingness to experiment and take risks

Plans ahead and is a forward thinking individual

Leadership Competencies

Achievement Oriented Thinking

Has tough conversations and gives feedback to staff

Empowers others

Remains calm under pressure even when presented with unpredictable situations

Change Management

Communicates consistently and effectively with direct reports about the need for, vision for and impact of change.

Manages team through the change

Overcomes obstacles leading to resistance

Self-Awareness

Has knowledge/clarity about “fit” – the type of environment and people that brings out the best in you and your team

Possesses the ability to discern team’s triggers

Knows the consequences of your behaviors

Working Conditions

General office. Travel 3-4 times per year.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Conference of State Bank Supervisors
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
497,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"Who We Are

Encortex is a data intelligence agency in Boston, that leverages cutting-edge quantitative analysis to help blue chip firms deploy capital more efficiently. We are a small, ambitious, and diverse group of quantitative analysts, data engineers, software engineers, & digital marketers. At the heart of what we do, is the belief that we change the way our clients collect, protect, and monetize data.

Who You Are

You are a curious individual who adapts to new environments and is comfortable with change. You believe in iterative progress, failing fast, and working through issues - alone and with others - until they are complete solved. You expect to contribute to your team's success, but also to the larger Encortex community. You appreciate and reflect our core values of Precision, Curiosity, Honesty, Responsibility, Fun & Respect.

What You’ll Do

As the Senior Data Engineer, reporting to the Vice President of Engineering, you have a love of technology, efficient operations, and use the former to improve the latter.

Responsibilities
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Perform routine data analysis for business owners for the purposes of revenue optimization and discovery
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS 'big data' technologies
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into increased revenue, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
What You’ll Learn

At Encortex, you will benefit from interacting with a small team of super interesting people. You will learn how to solve problems in a community of problem solvers. You will appreciate the value of failing fast, transparent and honest communication, and working with a team that feels the same.

Requirements
1-2 years of data project leadership experience
SQL mastery, including techniques for writing efficient code over large datasets
Ability to leverage critical data-driven thinking and enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight to generate consistently accurate and useful analysis and models
Experience with data visualization techniques and tools such as Redash, Tableau, ChartIO, etc.
Experience building and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets
Strong analytic skills
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Airflow, Luigi, etc.
Experience with statistical analysis of large data sets including regression, classification and correlation
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
* Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
* Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, RDS, Redshift
* Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.
* Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Scala, etc.
Encortex, LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",-1,Encortex LLC,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
498,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"Who We Are

Encortex is a data intelligence agency in Boston, that leverages cutting-edge quantitative analysis to help blue chip firms deploy capital more efficiently. We are a small, ambitious, and diverse group of quantitative analysts, data engineers, software engineers, & digital marketers. At the heart of what we do, is the belief that we change the way our clients collect, protect, and monetize data.

Who You Are

You are a curious individual who adapts to new environments and is comfortable with change. You believe in iterative progress, failing fast, and working through issues - alone and with others - until they are complete solved. You expect to contribute to your team's success, but also to the larger Encortex community. You appreciate and reflect our core values of Precision, Curiosity, Honesty, Responsibility, Fun & Respect.

What You’ll Do

As the Senior Data Engineer, reporting to the Vice President of Engineering, you have a love of technology, efficient operations, and use the former to improve the latter.

Responsibilities
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Perform routine data analysis for business owners for the purposes of revenue optimization and discovery
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS 'big data' technologies
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into increased revenue, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
What You’ll Learn

At Encortex, you will benefit from interacting with a small team of super interesting people. You will learn how to solve problems in a community of problem solvers. You will appreciate the value of failing fast, transparent and honest communication, and working with a team that feels the same.

Requirements
1-2 years of data project leadership experience
SQL mastery, including techniques for writing efficient code over large datasets
Ability to leverage critical data-driven thinking and enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight to generate consistently accurate and useful analysis and models
Experience with data visualization techniques and tools such as Redash, Tableau, ChartIO, etc.
Experience building and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets
Strong analytic skills
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Airflow, Luigi, etc.
Experience with statistical analysis of large data sets including regression, classification and correlation
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
* Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
* Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, RDS, Redshift
* Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.
* Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Scala, etc.
Encortex, LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",-1,Encortex LLC,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
499,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"Who We Are

Encortex is a data intelligence agency in Boston, that leverages cutting-edge quantitative analysis to help blue chip firms deploy capital more efficiently. We are a small, ambitious, and diverse group of quantitative analysts, data engineers, software engineers, & digital marketers. At the heart of what we do, is the belief that we change the way our clients collect, protect, and monetize data.

Who You Are

You are a curious individual who adapts to new environments and is comfortable with change. You believe in iterative progress, failing fast, and working through issues - alone and with others - until they are complete solved. You expect to contribute to your team's success, but also to the larger Encortex community. You appreciate and reflect our core values of Precision, Curiosity, Honesty, Responsibility, Fun & Respect.

What You’ll Do

As the Senior Data Engineer, reporting to the Vice President of Engineering, you have a love of technology, efficient operations, and use the former to improve the latter.

Responsibilities
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Perform routine data analysis for business owners for the purposes of revenue optimization and discovery
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS 'big data' technologies
Build analytics tools that utilize the data pipeline to provide actionable insights into increased revenue, operational efficiency and other key business performance metrics
Work with stakeholders to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing our product into an innovative industry leader
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems
What You’ll Learn

At Encortex, you will benefit from interacting with a small team of super interesting people. You will learn how to solve problems in a community of problem solvers. You will appreciate the value of failing fast, transparent and honest communication, and working with a team that feels the same.

Requirements
1-2 years of data project leadership experience
SQL mastery, including techniques for writing efficient code over large datasets
Ability to leverage critical data-driven thinking and enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight to generate consistently accurate and useful analysis and models
Experience with data visualization techniques and tools such as Redash, Tableau, ChartIO, etc.
Experience building and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets
Strong analytic skills
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management
Working knowledge of message queuing, stream processing, and highly scalable 'big data' data stores
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Airflow, Luigi, etc.
Experience with statistical analysis of large data sets including regression, classification and correlation
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
* Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
* Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, RDS, Redshift
* Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.
* Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Scala, etc.
Encortex, LLC is an equal opportunity employer.",-1,Encortex LLC,"Boston, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
